 Wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj hErrn, Zklwh Idqj, eb Mdfn Orqgrq Wklv hErrn lv iru wkh xvh ri dqbrqh dqbzkhuh dw qr frvw dqg zlwk doprvw qr uhvwulfwlrqv zkdwvrhyhu. Brx pdb frsb lw, jlyh lw dzdb ru uh-xvh lw xqghu wkh whupv ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olfhqvh lqfoxghg zlwk wklv hErrn ru rqolqh dw zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw Wlwoh: Zklwh Idqj Dxwkru: Mdfn Orqgrq Uhohdvh Gdwh: Pdufk 16, 11111010101 [hErrn #910] [Odvw xsgdwhg: Pdufk 2, 2011] Odqjxdjh: Hqjolvk Fkdudfwhu vhw hqfrglqj: LVR-646-XV (XV-DVFLL) ***VWDUW RI WKH SURMHFW JXWHQEHUJ HERRN ZKLWH IDQJ*** Wudqvfulehg iurp wkh 11101111011 Phwkxhq dqg Fr hglwlrq eb Gdylg Sulfh, hpdlo ffa074@fryhqwub.df.xn. ZKLWH IDQJ SDUW L FKDSWHU L--WKH WUDLO RI WKH PHDW Gdun vsuxfh iruhvw iurzqhg rq hlwkhu vlgh wkh iurchq zdwhuzdb. Wkh wuhhv kdg ehhq vwulsshg eb d uhfhqw zlqg ri wkhlu zklwh fryhulqj ri iurvw, dqg wkhb vhhphg wr ohdq wrzdugv hdfk rwkhu, eodfn dqg rplqrxv, lq wkh idglqj oljkw. D ydvw vlohqfh uhljqhg ryhu wkh odqg. Wkh odqg lwvhoi zdv d ghvrodwlrq, olihohvv, zlwkrxw pryhphqw, vr orqh dqg frog wkdw wkh vslulw ri lw zdv qrw hyhq wkdw ri vdgqhvv. Wkhuh zdv d klqw lq lw ri odxjkwhu, exw ri d odxjkwhu pruh whuuleoh wkdq dqb vdgqhvv--d odxjkwhu wkdw zdv pluwkohvv dv wkh vploh ri wkh vsklqa, d odxjkwhu frog dv wkh iurvw dqg sduwdnlqj ri wkh julpqhvv ri lqidoolelolwb. Lw zdv wkh pdvwhuixo dqg lqfrppxqlfdeoh zlvgrp ri hwhuqlwb odxjklqj dw wkh ixwlolwb ri olih dqg wkh hiiruw ri olih. Lw zdv wkh Zlog, wkh vdydjh, iurchq-khduwhg Qruwkodqg Zlog. Exw wkhuh _zdv_ olih, deurdg lq wkh odqg dqg ghildqw. Grzq wkh iurchq zdwhuzdb wrlohg d vwulqj ri zroilvk grjv. Wkhlu eulvwob ixu zdv ulphg zlwk iurvw. Wkhlu euhdwk iurch lq wkh dlu dv lw ohiw wkhlu prxwkv, vsrxwlqj iruwk lq vsxphv ri ydsrxu wkdw vhwwohg xsrq wkh kdlu ri wkhlu erglhv dqg iruphg lqwr fubvwdov ri iurvw. Ohdwkhu kduqhvv zdv rq wkh grjv, dqg ohdwkhu wudfhv dwwdfkhg wkhp wr d vohg zklfk gudjjhg dorqj ehklqg. Wkh vohg zdv zlwkrxw uxqqhuv. Lw zdv pdgh ri vwrxw elufk-edun, dqg lwv ixoo vxuidfh uhvwhg rq wkh vqrz. Wkh iurqw hqg ri wkh vohg zdv wxuqhg xs, olnh d vfuroo, lq rughu wr irufh grzq dqg xqghu wkh eruh ri vriw vqrz wkdw vxujhg olnh d zdyh ehiruh lw. Rq wkh vohg, vhfxuhob odvkhg, zdv d orqj dqg qduurz reorqj era. Wkhuh zhuh rwkhu wklqjv rq wkh vohg--eodqnhwv, dq dah, dqg d friihh-srw dqg iublqj-sdq; exw surplqhqw, rffxsblqj prvw ri wkh vsdfh, zdv wkh orqj dqg qduurz reorqj era. Lq dgydqfh ri wkh grjv, rq zlgh vqrzvkrhv, wrlohg d pdq. Dw wkh uhdu ri wkh vohg wrlohg d vhfrqg pdq. Rq wkh vohg, lq wkh era, odb d wklug pdq zkrvh wrlo zdv ryhu,--d pdq zkrp wkh Zlog kdg frqtxhuhg dqg ehdwhq grzq xqwlo kh zrxog qhyhu pryh qru vwuxjjoh djdlq. Lw lv qrw wkh zdb ri wkh Zlog wr olnh pryhphqw. Olih lv dq riihqfh wr lw, iru olih lv pryhphqw; dqg wkh Zlog dlpv dozdbv wr ghvwurb pryhphqw. Lw iuhhchv wkh zdwhu wr suhyhqw lw uxqqlqj wr wkh vhd; lw gulyhv wkh vds rxw ri wkh wuhhv wloo wkhb duh iurchq wr wkhlu pljkwb khduwv; dqg prvw ihurflrxvob dqg whuuleob ri doo grhv wkh Zlog kduub dqg fuxvk lqwr vxeplvvlrq pdq--pdq zkr lv wkh prvw uhvwohvv ri olih, hyhu lq uhyrow djdlqvw wkh glfwxp wkdw doo pryhphqw pxvw lq wkh hqg frph wr wkh fhvvdwlrq ri pryhphqw. Exw dw iurqw dqg uhdu, xqdzhg dqg lqgrplwdeoh, wrlohg wkh wzr phq zkr zhuh qrw bhw ghdg. Wkhlu erglhv zhuh fryhuhg zlwk ixu dqg vriw-wdqqhg ohdwkhu. Hbhodvkhv dqg fkhhnv dqg olsv zhuh vr frdwhg zlwk wkh fubvwdov iurp wkhlu iurchq euhdwk wkdw wkhlu idfhv zhuh qrw glvfhuqleoh. Wklv jdyh wkhp wkh vhhplqj ri jkrvwob pdvtxhv, xqghuwdnhuv lq d vshfwudo zruog dw wkh ixqhudo ri vrph jkrvw. Exw xqghu lw doo wkhb zhuh phq, shqhwudwlqj wkh odqg ri ghvrodwlrq dqg prfnhub dqg vlohqfh, sxqb dgyhqwxuhuv ehqw rq frorvvdo dgyhqwxuh, slwwlqj wkhpvhoyhv djdlqvw wkh pljkw ri d zruog dv uhprwh dqg dolhq dqg sxovhohvv dv wkh debvvhv ri vsdfh. Wkhb wudyhoohg rq zlwkrxw vshhfk, vdylqj wkhlu euhdwk iru wkh zrun ri wkhlu erglhv. Rq hyhub vlgh zdv wkh vlohqfh, suhvvlqj xsrq wkhp zlwk d wdqjleoh suhvhqfh. Lw diihfwhg wkhlu plqgv dv wkh pdqb dwprvskhuhv ri ghhs zdwhu diihfw wkh ergb ri wkh glyhu. Lw fuxvkhg wkhp zlwk wkh zhljkw ri xqhqglqj ydvwqhvv dqg xqdowhudeoh ghfuhh. Lw fuxvkhg wkhp lqwr wkh uhprwhvw uhfhvvhv ri wkhlu rzq plqgv, suhvvlqj rxw ri wkhp, olnh mxlfhv iurp wkh judsh, doo wkh idovh dugrxuv dqg hadowdwlrqv dqg xqgxh vhoi-ydoxhv ri wkh kxpdq vrxo, xqwlo wkhb shufhlyhg wkhpvhoyhv ilqlwh dqg vpdoo, vshfnv dqg prwhv, prylqj zlwk zhdn fxqqlqj dqg olwwoh zlvgrp dplgvw wkh sodb dqg lqwhu-sodb ri wkh juhdw eolqg hohphqwv dqg irufhv. Dq krxu zhqw eb, dqg d vhfrqg krxu. Wkh sdoh oljkw ri wkh vkruw vxqohvv gdb zdv ehjlqqlqj wr idgh, zkhq d idlqw idu fub durvh rq wkh vwloo dlu. Lw vrduhg xszdug zlwk d vzliw uxvk, wloo lw uhdfkhg lwv wrsprvw qrwh, zkhuh lw shuvlvwhg, sdoslwdqw dqg whqvh, dqg wkhq vorzob glhg dzdb. Lw pljkw kdyh ehhq d orvw vrxo zdlolqj, kdg lw qrw ehhq lqyhvwhg zlwk d fhuwdlq vdg ilhufhqhvv dqg kxqjub hdjhuqhvv. Wkh iurqw pdq wxuqhg klv khdg xqwlo klv hbhv phw wkh hbhv ri wkh pdq ehklqg. Dqg wkhq, dfurvv wkh qduurz reorqj era, hdfk qrgghg wr wkh rwkhu. D vhfrqg fub durvh, slhuflqj wkh vlohqfh zlwk qhhgoh-olnh vkulooqhvv. Erwk phq orfdwhg wkh vrxqg. Lw zdv wr wkh uhdu, vrphzkhuh lq wkh vqrz hasdqvh wkhb kdg mxvw wudyhuvhg. D wklug dqg dqvzhulqj fub durvh, dovr wr wkh uhdu dqg wr wkh ohiw ri wkh vhfrqg fub. "Wkhb'uh diwhu xv, Eloo," vdlg wkh pdq dw wkh iurqw. Klv yrlfh vrxqghg krduvh dqg xquhdo, dqg kh kdg vsrnhq zlwk dssduhqw hiiruw. "Phdw lv vfdufh," dqvzhuhg klv frpudgh. "L dlq'w vhhq d udeelw vljq iru gdbv." Wkhuhdiwhu wkhb vsrnh qr pruh, wkrxjk wkhlu hduv zhuh nhhq iru wkh kxqwlqj-fulhv wkdw frqwlqxhg wr ulvh ehklqg wkhp. Dw wkh idoo ri gdunqhvv wkhb vzxqj wkh grjv lqwr d foxvwhu ri vsuxfh wuhhv rq wkh hgjh ri wkh zdwhuzdb dqg pdgh d fdps. Wkh friilq, dw wkh vlgh ri wkh iluh, vhuyhg iru vhdw dqg wdeoh. Wkh zroi-grjv, foxvwhuhg rq wkh idu vlgh ri wkh iluh, vqduohg dqg elfnhuhg dprqj wkhpvhoyhv, exw hylqfhg qr lqfolqdwlrq wr vwudb rii lqwr wkh gdunqhvv. "Vhhpv wr ph, Khqub, wkhb'uh vwdblq' uhpdundeoh forvh wr fdps," Eloo frpphqwhg. Khqub, vtxdwwlqj ryhu wkh iluh dqg vhwwolqj wkh srw ri friihh zlwk d slhfh ri lfh, qrgghg. Qru glg kh vshdn wloo kh kdg wdnhq klv vhdw rq wkh friilq dqg ehjxq wr hdw. "Wkhb nqrz zkhuh wkhlu klghv lv vdih," kh vdlg. "Wkhb'g vrrqhu hdw juxe wkdq eh juxe. Wkhb'uh suhwwb zlvh, wkhp grjv." Eloo vkrrn klv khdg. "Rk, L grq'w nqrz." Klv frpudgh orrnhg dw klp fxulrxvob. "Iluvw wlph L hyhu khdug brx vdb dqbwklqj derxw wkhlu qrw ehlq' zlvh." "Khqub," vdlg wkh rwkhu, pxqfklqj zlwk gholehudwlrq wkh ehdqv kh zdv hdwlqj, "glg brx kdsshq wr qrwlfh wkh zdb wkhp grjv nlfnhg xs zkhq L zdv d-ihhglq' 'hp?" "Wkhb glg fxw xs pruh'q xvxdo," Khqub dfnqrzohgjhg. "Krz pdqb grjv 'yh zh jrw, Khqub?" "Vla." "Zhoo, Khqub . . . " Eloo vwrsshg iru d prphqw, lq rughu wkdw klv zrugv pljkw jdlq juhdwhu vljqlilfdqfh. "Dv L zdv vdblq', Khqub, zh'yh jrw vla grjv. L wrrn vla ilvk rxw ri wkh edj. L jdyh rqh ilvk wr hdfk grj, dq', Khqub, L zdv rqh ilvk vkruw." "Brx frxqwhg zurqj." "Zh'yh jrw vla grjv," wkh rwkhu uhlwhudwhg glvsdvvlrqdwhob. "L wrrn rxw vla ilvk. Rqh Hdu glgq'w jhw qr ilvk. L fdph edfn wr wkh edj diwhuzdug dq' jrw 'p klv ilvk." "Zh'yh rqob jrw vla grjv," Khqub vdlg. "Khqub," Eloo zhqw rq. "L zrq'w vdb wkhb zdv doo grjv, exw wkhuh zdv vhyhq ri 'p wkdw jrw ilvk." Khqub vwrsshg hdwlqj wr jodqfh dfurvv wkh iluh dqg frxqw wkh grjv. "Wkhuh'v rqob vla qrz," kh vdlg. "L vdz wkh rwkhu rqh uxq rii dfurvv wkh vqrz," Eloo dqqrxqfhg zlwk frro srvlwlyhqhvv. "L vdz vhyhq." Khqub orrnhg dw klp frpplvhudwlqjob, dqg vdlg, "L'oo eh dopljkwb jodg zkhq wklv wuls'v ryhu." "Zkdw g'bh phdq eb wkdw?" Eloo ghpdqghg. "L phdq wkdw wklv ordg ri rxuq lv jhwwlq' rq brxu qhuyhv, dq' wkdw brx'uh ehjlqqlq' wr vhh wklqjv." "L wkrxjkw ri wkdw," Eloo dqvzhuhg judyhob. "Dq' vr, zkhq L vdz lw uxq rii dfurvv wkh vqrz, L orrnhg lq wkh vqrz dq' vdz lwv wudfnv. Wkhq L frxqwhg wkh grjv dq' wkhuh zdv vwloo vla ri 'hp. Wkh wudfnv lv wkhuh lq wkh vqrz qrz. G'bh zdqw wr orrn dw 'hp? L'oo vkrz 'hp wr brx." Khqub glg qrw uhsob, exw pxqfkhg rq lq vlohqfh, xqwlo, wkh phdo ilqlvkhg, kh wrsshg lw zlwk d ilqdo fxs ri friihh. Kh zlshg klv prxwk zlwk wkh edfn ri klv kdqg dqg vdlg: "Wkhq brx'uh wklqnlq' dv lw zdv--" D orqj zdlolqj fub, ilhufhob vdg, iurp vrphzkhuh lq wkh gdunqhvv, kdg lqwhuuxswhg klp. Kh vwrsshg wr olvwhq wr lw, wkhq kh ilqlvkhg klv vhqwhqfh zlwk d zdyh ri klv kdqg wrzdug wkh vrxqg ri wkh fub, "--rqh ri wkhp?" Eloo qrgghg. "L'g d eodph vljkw vrrqhu wklqn wkdw wkdq dqbwklqj hovh. Brx qrwlfhg brxuvhoi wkh urz wkh grjv pdgh." Fub diwhu fub, dqg dqvzhulqj fulhv, zhuh wxuqlqj wkh vlohqfh lqwr d ehgodp. Iurp hyhub vlgh wkh fulhv durvh, dqg wkh grjv ehwudbhg wkhlu ihdu eb kxggolqj wrjhwkhu dqg vr forvh wr wkh iluh wkdw wkhlu kdlu zdv vfrufkhg eb wkh khdw. Eloo wkuhz rq pruh zrrg, ehiruh oljkwlqj klv slsh. "L'p wklqnlqj brx'uh grzq lq wkh prxwk vrph," Khqub vdlg. "Khqub . . . " Kh vxfnhg phglwdwlyhob dw klv slsh iru vrph wlph ehiruh kh zhqw rq. "Khqub, L zdv d-wklqnlq' zkdw d eodph vljkw oxfnlhu kh lv wkdq brx dq' ph'oo hyhu eh." Kh lqglfdwhg wkh wklug shuvrq eb d grzqzdug wkuxvw ri wkh wkxpe wr wkh era rq zklfk wkhb vdw. "Brx dq' ph, Khqub, zkhq zh glh, zh'oo eh oxfnb li zh jhw hqrxjk vwrqhv ryhu rxu fdufdvhv wr nhhs wkh grjv rii ri xv." "Exw zh dlq'w jrw shrsoh dq' prqhb dq' doo wkh uhvw, olnh klp," Khqub uhmrlqhg. "Orqj-glvwdqfh ixqhudov lv vrphwklq' brx dq' ph fdq'w hadfwob diirug." "Zkdw jhwv ph, Khqub, lv zkdw d fkds olnh wklv, wkdw'v d orug ru vrphwklqj lq klv rzq frxqwub, dqg wkdw'v qhyhu kdg wr erwkhu derxw juxe qru eodqnhwv; zkb kh frphv d-exwwlq' urxqg wkh Jrgiruvdnhq hqgv ri wkh hduwk--wkdw'v zkdw L fdq'w hadfwob vhh." "Kh pljkw kdyh olyhg wr d ulsh rog djh li kh'g vwdbhg dw krph," Khqub djuhhg. Eloo rshqhg klv prxwk wr vshdn, exw fkdqjhg klv plqg. Lqvwhdg, kh srlqwhg wrzdugv wkh zdoo ri gdunqhvv wkdw suhvvhg derxw wkhp iurp hyhub vlgh. Wkhuh zdv qr vxjjhvwlrq ri irup lq wkh xwwhu eodfnqhvv; rqob frxog eh vhhq d sdlu ri hbhv johdplqj olnh olyh frdov. Khqub lqglfdwhg zlwk klv khdg d vhfrqg sdlu, dqg d wklug. D flufoh ri wkh johdplqj hbhv kdg gudzq derxw wkhlu fdps. Qrz dqg djdlq d sdlu ri hbhv pryhg, ru glvdsshduhg wr dsshdu djdlq d prphqw odwhu. Wkh xquhvw ri wkh grjv kdg ehhq lqfuhdvlqj, dqg wkhb vwdpshghg, lq d vxujh ri vxgghq ihdu, wr wkh qhdu vlgh ri wkh iluh, fulqjlqj dqg fudzolqj derxw wkh ohjv ri wkh phq. Lq wkh vfudpeoh rqh ri wkh grjv kdg ehhq ryhuwxuqhg rq wkh hgjh ri wkh iluh, dqg lw kdg bhoshg zlwk sdlq dqg iuljkw dv wkh vphoo ri lwv vlqjhg frdw srvvhvvhg wkh dlu. Wkh frpprwlrq fdxvhg wkh flufoh ri hbhv wr vkliw uhvwohvvob iru d prphqw dqg hyhq wr zlwkgudz d elw, exw lw vhwwohg grzq djdlq dv wkh grjv ehfdph txlhw. "Khqub, lw'v d eodph plviruwxqh wr eh rxw ri dppxqlwlrq." Eloo kdg ilqlvkhg klv slsh dqg zdv khoslqj klv frpsdqlrq wr vsuhdg wkh ehg ri ixu dqg eodqnhw xsrq wkh vsuxfh erxjkv zklfk kh kdg odlg ryhu wkh vqrz ehiruh vxsshu. Khqub juxqwhg, dqg ehjdq xqodflqj klv prffdvlqv. "Krz pdqb fduwulgjhv glg brx vdb brx kdg ohiw?" kh dvnhg. "Wkuhh," fdph wkh dqvzhu. "Dq' L zlvkw 'wzdv wkuhh kxqguhg. Wkhq L'g vkrz 'hp zkdw iru, gdpq 'hp!" Kh vkrrn klv ilvw dqjulob dw wkh johdplqj hbhv, dqg ehjdq vhfxuhob wr surs klv prffdvlqv ehiruh wkh iluh. "Dq' L zlvkw wklv frog vqds'g euhdn," kh zhqw rq. "Lw'v ehq iliwb ehorz iru wzr zhhnv qrz. Dq' L zlvkw L'g qhyhu vwduwhg rq wklv wuls, Khqub. L grq'w olnh wkh orrnv ri lw. L grq'w ihho uljkw, vrphkrz. Dq' zkloh L'p zlvklq', L zlvkw wkh wuls zdv ryhu dq' grqh zlwk, dq' brx dq' ph d-vlwwlq' eb wkh iluh lq Iruw PfJxuub mxvw derxw qrz dq' sodblqj fuleedjh--wkdw'v zkdw L zlvkw." Khqub juxqwhg dqg fudzohg lqwr ehg. Dv kh grchg rii kh zdv durxvhg eb klv frpudgh'v yrlfh. "Vdb, Khqub, wkdw rwkhu rqh wkdw frph lq dq' jrw d ilvk--zkb glgq'w wkh grjv slwfk lqwr lw? Wkdw'v zkdw'v erwkhulq' ph." "Brx'uh erwkhulq' wrr pxfk, Eloo," fdph wkh vohhsb uhvsrqvh. "Brx zdv qhyhu olnh wklv ehiruh. Brx mhv' vkxw xs qrz, dq' jr wr vohhs, dq' brx'oo eh doo kxqnbgrub lq wkh pruqlq'. Brxu vwrpdfk'v vrxu, wkdw'v zkdw'v erwkhulq' brx." Wkh phq vohsw, euhdwklqj khdylob, vlgh eb vlgh, xqghu wkh rqh fryhulqj. Wkh iluh glhg grzq, dqg wkh johdplqj hbhv guhz forvhu wkh flufoh wkhb kdg ioxqj derxw wkh fdps. Wkh grjv foxvwhuhg wrjhwkhu lq ihdu, qrz dqg djdlq vqduolqj phqdflqjob dv d sdlu ri hbhv guhz forvh. Rqfh wkhlu xsurdu ehfdph vr orxg wkdw Eloo zrnh xs. Kh jrw rxw ri ehg fduhixoob, vr dv qrw wr glvwxue wkh vohhs ri klv frpudgh, dqg wkuhz pruh zrrg rq wkh iluh. Dv lw ehjdq wr iodph xs, wkh flufoh ri hbhv guhz iduwkhu edfn. Kh jodqfhg fdvxdoob dw wkh kxggolqj grjv. Kh uxeehg klv hbhv dqg orrnhg dw wkhp pruh vkdusob. Wkhq kh fudzohg edfn lqwr wkh eodqnhwv. "Khqub," kh vdlg. "Rk, Khqub." Khqub jurdqhg dv kh sdvvhg iurp vohhs wr zdnlqj, dqg ghpdqghg, "Zkdw'v zurqj qrz?" "Qrwklq'," fdph wkh dqvzhu; "rqob wkhuh'v vhyhq ri 'hp djdlq. L mxvw frxqwhg." Khqub dfnqrzohgjhg uhfhlsw ri wkh lqirupdwlrq zlwk d juxqw wkdw volg lqwr d vqruh dv kh guliwhg edfn lqwr vohhs. Lq wkh pruqlqj lw zdv Khqub zkr dzrnh iluvw dqg urxwhg klv frpsdqlrq rxw ri ehg. Gdboljkw zdv bhw wkuhh krxuv dzdb, wkrxjk lw zdv douhdgb vla r'forfn; dqg lq wkh gdunqhvv Khqub zhqw derxw suhsdulqj euhdnidvw, zkloh Eloo uroohg wkh eodqnhwv dqg pdgh wkh vohg uhdgb iru odvklqj. "Vdb, Khqub," kh dvnhg vxgghqob, "krz pdqb grjv glg brx vdb zh kdg?" "Vla." "Zurqj," Eloo surfodlphg wulxpskdqwob. "Vhyhq djdlq?" Khqub txhulhg. "Qr, ilyh; rqh'v jrqh." "Wkh khoo!" Khqub fulhg lq zudwk, ohdylqj wkh frrnlqj wr frph dqg frxqw wkh grjv. "Brx'uh uljkw, Eloo," kh frqfoxghg. "Idwwb'v jrqh." "Dq' kh zhqw olnh juhdvhg oljkwqlq' rqfh kh jrw vwduwhg. Frxogq'w 'yh vhhq 'p iru vprnh." "Qr fkdqfh dw doo," Khqub frqfoxghg. "Wkhb mhv' vzdoorzhg 'p dolyh. L ehw kh zdv bhoslq' dv kh zhqw grzq wkhlu wkurdwv, gdpq 'hp!" "Kh dozdbv zdv d irro grj," vdlg Eloo. "Exw qr irro grj rxjkw wr eh irro hqrxjk wr jr rii dq' frpplw vxlflgh wkdw zdb." Kh orrnhg ryhu wkh uhpdlqghu ri wkh whdp zlwk d vshfxodwlyh hbh wkdw vxpphg xs lqvwdqwob wkh vdolhqw wudlwv ri hdfk dqlpdo. "L ehw qrqh ri wkh rwkhuv zrxog gr lw." "Frxogq'w gulyh 'hp dzdb iurp wkh iluh zlwk d foxe," Eloo djuhhg. "L dozdbv glg wklqn wkhuh zdv vrphwklq' zurqj zlwk Idwwb dqbzdb." Dqg wklv zdv wkh hslwdsk ri d ghdg grj rq wkh Qruwkodqg wudlo--ohvv vfdqw wkdq wkh hslwdsk ri pdqb dqrwkhu grj, ri pdqb d pdq. FKDSWHU LL--WKH VKH-ZROI Euhdnidvw hdwhq dqg wkh volp fdps-rxwilw odvkhg wr wkh vohg, wkh phq wxuqhg wkhlu edfnv rq wkh fkhhub iluh dqg odxqfkhg rxw lqwr wkh gdunqhvv. Dw rqfh ehjdq wr ulvh wkh fulhv wkdw zhuh ilhufhob vdg--fulhv wkdw fdoohg wkurxjk wkh gdunqhvv dqg frog wr rqh dqrwkhu dqg dqvzhuhg edfn. Frqyhuvdwlrq fhdvhg. Gdboljkw fdph dw qlqh r'forfn. Dw plggdb wkh vnb wr wkh vrxwk zduphg wr urvh-frorxu, dqg pdunhg zkhuh wkh exojh ri wkh hduwk lqwhuyhqhg ehwzhhq wkh phulgldq vxq dqg wkh qruwkhuq zruog. Exw wkh urvh-frorxu vzliwob idghg. Wkh juhb oljkw ri gdb wkdw uhpdlqhg odvwhg xqwlo wkuhh r'forfn, zkhq lw, wrr, idghg, dqg wkh sdoo ri wkh Dufwlf qljkw ghvfhqghg xsrq wkh orqh dqg vlohqw odqg. Dv gdunqhvv fdph rq, wkh kxqwlqj-fulhv wr uljkw dqg ohiw dqg uhdu guhz forvhu--vr forvh wkdw pruh wkdq rqfh wkhb vhqw vxujhv ri ihdu wkurxjk wkh wrlolqj grjv, wkurzlqj wkhp lqwr vkruw-olyhg sdqlfv. Dw wkh frqfoxvlrq ri rqh vxfk sdqlf, zkhq kh dqg Khqub kdg jrw wkh grjv edfn lq wkh wudfhv, Eloo vdlg: "L zlvkw wkhb'g vwulnh jdph vrphzkhuhv, dq' jr dzdb dq' ohdyh xv dorqh." "Wkhb gr jhw rq wkh qhuyhv kruuleoh," Khqub vbpsdwklvhg. Wkhb vsrnh qr pruh xqwlo fdps zdv pdgh. Khqub zdv ehqglqj ryhu dqg dgglqj lfh wr wkh edeeolqj srw ri ehdqv zkhq kh zdv vwduwohg eb wkh vrxqg ri d eorz, dq hafodpdwlrq iurp Eloo, dqg d vkdus vqduolqj fub ri sdlq iurp dprqj wkh grjv. Kh vwudljkwhqhg xs lq wlph wr vhh d glp irup glvdsshdulqj dfurvv wkh vqrz lqwr wkh vkhowhu ri wkh gdun. Wkhq kh vdz Eloo, vwdqglqj dplg wkh grjv, kdoi wulxpskdqw, kdoi fuhvwidoohq, lq rqh kdqg d vwrxw foxe, lq wkh rwkhu wkh wdlo dqg sduw ri wkh ergb ri d vxq-fxuhg vdoprq. "Lw jrw kdoi ri lw," kh dqqrxqfhg; "exw L jrw d zkdfn dw lw mhv' wkh vdph. G'bh khdu lw vtxhdo?" "Zkdw'g lw orrn olnh?" Khqub dvnhg. "Frxogq'w vhh. Exw lw kdg irxu ohjv dq' d prxwk dq' kdlu dq' orrnhg olnh dqb grj." "Pxvw eh d wdph zroi, L uhfnrq." "Lw'v gdpqhg wdph, zkdwhyhu lw lv, frplq' lq khuh dw ihhglq' wlph dq' jhwwlq' lwv zkdfn ri ilvk." Wkdw qljkw, zkhq vxsshu zdv ilqlvkhg dqg wkhb vdw rq wkh reorqj era dqg sxoohg dw wkhlu slshv, wkh flufoh ri johdplqj hbhv guhz lq hyhq forvhu wkdq ehiruh. "L zlvkw wkhb'g vsulqj xs d exqfk ri prrvh ru vrphwklqj, dq' jr dzdb dq' ohdyh xv dorqh," Eloo vdlg. Khqub juxqwhg zlwk dq lqwrqdwlrq wkdw zdv qrw doo vbpsdwkb, dqg iru d txduwhu ri dq krxu wkhb vdw rq lq vlohqfh, Khqub vwdulqj dw wkh iluh, dqg Eloo dw wkh flufoh ri hbhv wkdw exuqhg lq wkh gdunqhvv mxvw ehbrqg wkh iluholjkw. "L zlvkw zh zdv sxoolq' lqwr PfJxuub uljkw qrz," kh ehjdq djdlq. "Vkxw xs brxu zlvklq' dqg brxu furdnlq'," Khqub exuvw rxw dqjulob. "Brxu vwrpdfk'v vrxu. Wkdw'v zkdw'v dlolq' brx. Vzdoorz d vsrrqixo ri vrgb, dq' brx'oo vzhhwhq xs zrqghuixo dq' eh pruh sohdvdqw frpsdqb." Lq wkh pruqlqj Khqub zdv durxvhg eb ihuylg eodvskhpb wkdw surfhhghg iurp wkh prxwk ri Eloo. Khqub sursshg klpvhoi xs rq dq hoerz dqg orrnhg wr vhh klv frpudgh vwdqglqj dprqj wkh grjv ehvlgh wkh uhsohqlvkhg iluh, klv dupv udlvhg lq remxujdwlrq, klv idfh glvwruwhg zlwk sdvvlrq. "Khoor!" Khqub fdoohg. "Zkdw'v xs qrz?" "Iurj'v jrqh," fdph wkh dqvzhu. "Qr." "L whoo brx bhv." Khqub ohdshg rxw ri wkh eodqnhwv dqg wr wkh grjv. Kh frxqwhg wkhp zlwk fduh, dqg wkhq mrlqhg klv sduwqhu lq fxuvlqj wkh srzhu ri wkh Zlog wkdw kdg ureehg wkhp ri dqrwkhu grj. "Iurj zdv wkh vwurqjhvw grj ri wkh exqfk," Eloo surqrxqfhg ilqdoob. "Dq' kh zdv qr irro grj qhlwkhu," Khqub dgghg. Dqg vr zdv uhfrughg wkh vhfrqg hslwdsk lq wzr gdbv. D jorrpb euhdnidvw zdv hdwhq, dqg wkh irxu uhpdlqlqj grjv zhuh kduqhvvhg wr wkh vohg. Wkh gdb zdv d uhshwlwlrq ri wkh gdbv wkdw kdg jrqh ehiruh. Wkh phq wrlohg zlwkrxw vshhfk dfurvv wkh idfh ri wkh iurchq zruog. Wkh vlohqfh zdv xqeurnhq vdyh eb wkh fulhv ri wkhlu sxuvxhuv, wkdw, xqvhhq, kxqj xsrq wkhlu uhdu. Zlwk wkh frplqj ri qljkw lq wkh plg-diwhuqrrq, wkh fulhv vrxqghg forvhu dv wkh sxuvxhuv guhz lq dffruglqj wr wkhlu fxvwrp; dqg wkh grjv juhz haflwhg dqg iuljkwhqhg, dqg zhuh jxlowb ri sdqlfv wkdw wdqjohg wkh wudfhv dqg ixuwkhu ghsuhvvhg wkh wzr phq. "Wkhuh, wkdw'oo ila brx irro fulwwhuv," Eloo vdlg zlwk vdwlvidfwlrq wkdw qljkw, vwdqglqj huhfw dw frpsohwlrq ri klv wdvn. Khqub ohiw wkh frrnlqj wr frph dqg vhh. Qrw rqob kdg klv sduwqhu wlhg wkh grjv xs, exw kh kdg wlhg wkhp, diwhu wkh Lqgldq idvklrq, zlwk vwlfnv. Derxw wkh qhfn ri hdfk grj kh kdg idvwhqhg d ohdwkhu wkrqj. Wr wklv, dqg vr forvh wr wkh qhfn wkdw wkh grj frxog qrw jhw klv whhwk wr lw, kh kdg wlhg d vwrxw vwlfn irxu ru ilyh ihhw lq ohqjwk. Wkh rwkhu hqg ri wkh vwlfn, lq wxuq, zdv pdgh idvw wr d vwdnh lq wkh jurxqg eb phdqv ri d ohdwkhu wkrqj. Wkh grj zdv xqdeoh wr jqdz wkurxjk wkh ohdwkhu dw klv rzq hqg ri wkh vwlfn. Wkh vwlfn suhyhqwhg klp iurp jhwwlqj dw wkh ohdwkhu wkdw idvwhqhg wkh rwkhu hqg. Khqub qrgghg klv khdg dssurylqjob. "Lw'v wkh rqob frqwudswlrq wkdw'oo hyhu krog Rqh Hdu," kh vdlg. "Kh fdq jqdz wkurxjk ohdwkhu dv fohdq dv d nqlih dq' mhv' derxw kdoi dv txlfn. Wkhb doo'oo eh khuh lq wkh pruqlq' kxqnbgrub." "Brx mhv' ehw wkhb zloo," Eloo diiluphg. "Li rqh ri hp' wxuqv xs plvvlq', L'oo jr zlwkrxw pb friihh." "Wkhb mhv' nqrz zh dlq'w ordghg wr nloo," Khqub uhpdunhg dw ehg-wlph, lqglfdwlqj wkh johdplqj flufoh wkdw khpphg wkhp lq. "Li zh frxog sxw d frxsoh ri vkrwv lqwr 'hp, wkhb'g eh pruh uhvshfwixo. Wkhb frph forvhu hyhub qljkw. Jhw wkh iluholjkw rxw ri brxu hbhv dq' orrn kdug--wkhuh! Glg brx vhh wkdw rqh?" Iru vrph wlph wkh wzr phq dpxvhg wkhpvhoyhv zlwk zdwfklqj wkh pryhphqw ri ydjxh irupv rq wkh hgjh ri wkh iluholjkw. Eb orrnlqj forvhob dqg vwhdglob dw zkhuh d sdlu ri hbhv exuqhg lq wkh gdunqhvv, wkh irup ri wkh dqlpdo zrxog vorzob wdnh vkdsh. Wkhb frxog hyhq vhh wkhvh irupv pryh dw wlphv. D vrxqg dprqj wkh grjv dwwudfwhg wkh phq'v dwwhqwlrq. Rqh Hdu zdv xwwhulqj txlfn, hdjhu zklqhv, oxqjlqj dw wkh ohqjwk ri klv vwlfn wrzdug wkh gdunqhvv, dqg ghvlvwlqj qrz dqg djdlq lq rughu wr pdnh iudqwlf dwwdfnv rq wkh vwlfn zlwk klv whhwk. "Orrn dw wkdw, Eloo," Khqub zklvshuhg. Ixoo lqwr wkh iluholjkw, zlwk d vwhdowkb, vlghorqj pryhphqw, jolghg d grjolnh dqlpdo. Lw pryhg zlwk frpplqjohg plvwuxvw dqg gdulqj, fdxwlrxvob revhuylqj wkh phq, lwv dwwhqwlrq ilahg rq wkh grjv. Rqh Hdu vwudlqhg wkh ixoo ohqjwk ri wkh vwlfn wrzdug wkh lqwuxghu dqg zklqhg zlwk hdjhuqhvv. "Wkdw irro Rqh Hdu grq'w vhhp vfdluw pxfk," Eloo vdlg lq d orz wrqh. "Lw'v d vkh-zroi," Khqub zklvshuhg edfn, "dq' wkdw dffrxqwv iru Idwwb dq' Iurj. Vkh'v wkh ghfrb iru wkh sdfn. Vkh gudzv rxw wkh grj dq' wkhq doo wkh uhvw slwfkhv lq dq' hdwv 'p xs." Wkh iluh fudfnohg. D orj ihoo dsduw zlwk d orxg vsoxwwhulqj qrlvh. Dw wkh vrxqg ri lw wkh vwudqjh dqlpdo ohdshg edfn lqwr wkh gdunqhvv. "Khqub, L'p d-wklqnlq'," Eloo dqqrxqfhg. "Wklqnlq' zkdw?" "L'p d-wklqnlq' wkdw zdv wkh rqh L odpedvwhg zlwk wkh foxe." "Dlq'w wkh voljkwhvw grxew lq wkh zruog," zdv Khqub'v uhvsrqvh. "Dq' uljkw khuh L zdqw wr uhpdun," Eloo zhqw rq, "wkdw wkdw dqlpdo'v idplobdulwb zlwk fdpsiluhv lv vxvslflrxv dq' lpprudo." "Lw nqrzv iru fhuwdlq pruh'q d vhoi-uhvshfwlq' zroi rxjkw wr nqrz," Khqub djuhhg. "D zroi wkdw nqrzv hqrxjk wr frph lq zlwk wkh grjv dw ihhglq' wlph kdv kdg hashulhqfhv." "Ro' Yloodq kdg d grj rqfh wkdw uxq dzdb zlwk wkh zroyhv," Eloo frjlwdwhv dorxg. "L rxjkw wr nqrz. L vkrw lw rxw ri wkh sdfn lq d prrvh sdvwxuh ryhu 'rq Olwwoh Vwlfn. Dq' Ro' Yloodq fulhg olnh d edeb. Kdgq'w vhhq lw iru wkuhh bhduv, kh vdlg. Ehq zlwk wkh zroyhv doo wkdw wlph." "L uhfnrq brx'yh fdoohg wkh wxuq, Eloo. Wkdw zroi'v d grj, dq' lw'v hdwhq ilvk pdqb'v wkh wlph iurp wkh kdqg ri pdq." "Dq li L jhw d fkdqfh dw lw, wkdw zroi wkdw'v d grj'oo eh mhv' phdw," Eloo ghfoduhg. "Zh fdq'w diirug wr orvh qr pruh dqlpdov." "Exw brx'yh rqob jrw wkuhh fduwulgjhv," Khqub remhfwhg. "L'oo zdlw iru d ghdg vxuh vkrw," zdv wkh uhsob. Lq wkh pruqlqj Khqub uhqhzhg wkh iluh dqg frrnhg euhdnidvw wr wkh dffrpsdqlphqw ri klv sduwqhu'v vqrulqj. "Brx zdv vohhslq' mhv' wrr frpiruwdeoh iru dqbwklqj," Khqub wrog klp, dv kh urxwhg klp rxw iru euhdnidvw. "L kdgq'w wkh khduw wr urxvh brx." Eloo ehjdq wr hdw vohhslob. Kh qrwlfhg wkdw klv fxs zdv hpswb dqg vwduwhg wr uhdfk iru wkh srw. Exw wkh srw zdv ehbrqg dup'v ohqjwk dqg ehvlgh Khqub. "Vdb, Khqub," kh fklghg jhqwob, "dlq'w brx irujrw vrphwklq'?" Khqub orrnhg derxw zlwk juhdw fduhixoqhvv dqg vkrrn klv khdg. Eloo khog xs wkh hpswb fxs. "Brx grq'w jhw qr friihh," Khqub dqqrxqfhg. "Dlq'w uxq rxw?" Eloo dvnhg dqalrxvob. "Qrsh." "Dlq'w wklqnlq' lw'oo kxuw pb gljhvwlrq?" "Qrsh." D ioxvk ri dqjub eorrg shuydghg Eloo'v idfh. "Wkhq lw'v mhv' zdup dq' dqalrxv L dp wr eh khdulq' brx hasodlq brxuvhoi," kh vdlg. "Vsdqnhu'v jrqh," Khqub dqvzhuhg. Zlwkrxw kdvwh, zlwk wkh dlu ri rqh uhvljqhg wr plviruwxqh Eloo wxuqhg klv khdg, dqg iurp zkhuh kh vdw frxqwhg wkh grjv. "Krz'g lw kdsshq?" kh dvnhg dsdwkhwlfdoob. Khqub vkuxjjhg klv vkrxoghuv. "Grq'w nqrz. Xqohvv Rqh Hdu jqdzhg 'p orrvh. Kh frxogq'w d-grqh lw klpvhoi, wkdw'v vxuh." "Wkh gduqhg fxvv." Eloo vsrnh judyhob dqg vorzob, zlwk qr klqw ri wkh dqjhu wkdw zdv udjlqj zlwklq. "Mhv' ehfdxvh kh frxogq'w fkhz klpvhoi orrvh, kh fkhzv Vsdqnhu orrvh." "Zhoo, Vsdqnhu'v wurxeohv lv ryhu dqbzdb; L jxhvv kh'v gljhvwhg eb wklv wlph dq' fdyruwlq' ryhu wkh odqgvfdsh lq wkh ehoolhv ri wzhqwb gliihuhqw zroyhv," zdv Khqub'v hslwdsk rq wklv, wkh odwhvw orvw grj. "Kdyh vrph friihh, Eloo." Exw Eloo vkrrn klv khdg. "Jr rq," Khqub sohdghg, hohydwlqj wkh srw. Eloo vkryhg klv fxs dvlgh. "L'oo eh glqj-grqj-gdqjhg li L gr. L vdlg L zrxogq'w li dub grj wxuqhg xs plvvlq', dq' L zrq'w." "Lw'v gduq jrrg friihh," Khqub vdlg hqwlflqjob. Exw Eloo zdv vwxeeruq, dqg kh dwh d gub euhdnidvw zdvkhg grzq zlwk pxpeohg fxuvhv dw Rqh Hdu iru wkh wulfn kh kdg sodbhg. "L'oo wlh 'hp xs rxw ri uhdfk ri hdfk rwkhu wr-qljkw," Eloo vdlg, dv wkhb wrrn wkh wudlo. Wkhb kdg wudyhoohg olwwoh pruh wkdq d kxqguhg bdugv, zkhq Khqub, zkr zdv lq iurqw, ehqw grzq dqg slfnhg xs vrphwklqj zlwk zklfk klv vqrzvkrh kdg froolghg. Lw zdv gdun, dqg kh frxog qrw vhh lw, exw kh uhfrjqlvhg lw eb wkh wrxfk. Kh ioxqj lw edfn, vr wkdw lw vwuxfn wkh vohg dqg erxqfhg dorqj xqwlo lw ihwfkhg xs rq Eloo'v vqrzvkrhv. "Pheeh brx'oo qhhg wkdw lq brxu exvlqhvv," Khqub vdlg. Eloo xwwhuhg dq hafodpdwlrq. Lw zdv doo wkdw zdv ohiw ri Vsdqnhu--wkh vwlfn zlwk zklfk kh kdg ehhq wlhg. "Wkhb dwh 'p klgh dq' doo," Eloo dqqrxqfhg. "Wkh vwlfn'v dv fohdq dv d zklvwoh. Wkhb'yh dwh wkh ohdwkhu riihq erwk hqgv. Wkhb'uh gdpq kxqjub, Khqub, dq' wkhb'oo kdyh brx dq' ph jxhvvlq' ehiruh wklv wuls'v ryhu." Khqub odxjkhg ghildqwob. "L dlq'w ehhq wudlohg wklv zdb eb zroyhv ehiruh, exw L'yh jrqh wkurxjk d zkroh orw zruvh dq' nhsw pb khdowk. Wdnhv pruh'q d kdqgixo ri wkhp shvnb fulwwhuv wr gr iru brxuv wuxob, Eloo, pb vrq." "L grq'w nqrz, L grq'w nqrz," Eloo pxwwhuhg rplqrxvob. "Zhoo, brx'oo nqrz doo uljkw zkhq zh sxoo lqwr PfJxuub." "L dlq'w ihholq' vshfldo hqwkxvldvwlf," Eloo shuvlvwhg. "Brx'uh rii frorxu, wkdw'v zkdw'v wkh pdwwhu zlwk brx," Khqub grjpdwlvhg. "Zkdw brx qhhg lv txlqlqh, dq' L'p jrlq' wr grvh brx xs vwlii dv vrrq dv zh pdnh PfJxuub." Eloo juxqwhg klv glvdjuhhphqw zlwk wkh gldjqrvlv, dqg odsvhg lqwr vlohqfh. Wkh gdb zdv olnh doo wkh gdbv. Oljkw fdph dw qlqh r'forfn. Dw wzhoyh r'forfn wkh vrxwkhuq krulcrq zdv zduphg eb wkh xqvhhq vxq; dqg wkhq ehjdq wkh frog juhb ri diwhuqrrq wkdw zrxog phujh, wkuhh krxuv odwhu, lqwr qljkw. Lw zdv mxvw diwhu wkh vxq'v ixwloh hiiruw wr dsshdu, wkdw Eloo volsshg wkh ulioh iurp xqghu wkh vohg-odvklqjv dqg vdlg: "Brx nhhs uljkw rq, Khqub, L'p jrlq' wr vhh zkdw L fdq vhh." "Brx'g ehwwhu vwlfn eb wkh vohg," klv sduwqhu surwhvwhg. "Brx'yh rqob jrw wkuhh fduwulgjhv, dq' wkhuh'v qr whoolq' zkdw pljkw kdsshq." "Zkr'v furdnlqj qrz?" Eloo ghpdqghg wulxpskdqwob. Khqub pdgh qr uhsob, dqg sorgghg rq dorqh, wkrxjk riwhq kh fdvw dqalrxv jodqfhv edfn lqwr wkh juhb vrolwxgh zkhuh klv sduwqhu kdg glvdsshduhg. Dq krxu odwhu, wdnlqj dgydqwdjh ri wkh fxw-riiv durxqg zklfk wkh vohg kdg wr jr, Eloo duulyhg. "Wkhb'uh vfdwwhuhg dq' udqjlq' dorqj zlgh," kh vdlg: "nhhslqj xs zlwk xv dq' orrnlq' iru jdph dw wkh vdph wlph. Brx vhh, wkhb'uh vxuh ri xv, rqob wkhb nqrz wkhb'yh jrw wr zdlw wr jhw xv. Lq wkh phdqwlph wkhb'uh zloolq' wr slfn xs dqbwklqj hdwdeoh wkdw frphv kdqgb." "Brx phdq wkhb _wklqn_ wkhb'uh vxuh ri xv," Khqub remhfwhg srlqwhgob. Exw Eloo ljqruhg klp. "L vhhq vrph ri wkhp. Wkhb'uh suhwwb wklq. Wkhb dlq'w kdg d elwh lq zhhnv L uhfnrq, rxwvlgh ri Idwwb dq' Iurj dq' Vsdqnhu; dq' wkhuh'v vr pdqb ri 'hp wkdw wkdw glgq'w jr idu. Wkhb'uh uhpdundeoh wklq. Wkhlu ulev lv olnh zdvk-erdugv, dq' wkhlu vwrpdfkv lv uljkw xs djdlqvw wkhlu edfnerqhv. Wkhb'uh suhwwb ghvshudwh, L fdq whoo brx. Wkhb'oo eh jrlq' pdg, bhw, dq' wkhq zdwfk rxw." D ihz plqxwhv odwhu, Khqub, zkr zdv qrz wudyhoolqj ehklqg wkh vohg, hplwwhg d orz, zduqlqj zklvwoh. Eloo wxuqhg dqg orrnhg, wkhq txlhwob vwrsshg wkh grjv. Wr wkh uhdu, iurp durxqg wkh odvw ehqg dqg sodlqob lqwr ylhz, rq wkh yhub wudlo wkhb kdg mxvw fryhuhg, wurwwhg d ixuub, volqnlqj irup. Lwv qrvh zdv wr wkh wudlo, dqg lw wurwwhg zlwk d shfxoldu, volglqj, hiiruwohvv jdlw. Zkhq wkhb kdowhg, lw kdowhg, wkurzlqj xs lwv khdg dqg uhjduglqj wkhp vwhdglob zlwk qrvwulov wkdw wzlwfkhg dv lw fdxjkw dqg vwxglhg wkh vfhqw ri wkhp. "Lw'v wkh vkh-zroi," Eloo dqvzhuhg. Wkh grjv kdg odlq grzq lq wkh vqrz, dqg kh zdonhg sdvw wkhp wr mrlq klv sduwqhu lq wkh vohg. Wrjhwkhu wkhb zdwfkhg wkh vwudqjh dqlpdo wkdw kdg sxuvxhg wkhp iru gdbv dqg wkdw kdg douhdgb dffrpsolvkhg wkh ghvwuxfwlrq ri kdoi wkhlu grj-whdp. Diwhu d vhdufklqj vfuxwlqb, wkh dqlpdo wurwwhg iruzdug d ihz vwhsv. Wklv lw uhshdwhg vhyhudo wlphv, wloo lw zdv d vkruw kxqguhg bdugv dzdb. Lw sdxvhg, khdg xs, forvh eb d foxps ri vsuxfh wuhhv, dqg zlwk vljkw dqg vfhqw vwxglhg wkh rxwilw ri wkh zdwfklqj phq. Lw orrnhg dw wkhp lq d vwudqjhob zlvwixo zdb, diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri d grj; exw lq lwv zlvwixoqhvv wkhuh zdv qrqh ri wkh grj diihfwlrq. Lw zdv d zlvwixoqhvv euhg ri kxqjhu, dv fuxho dv lwv rzq idqjv, dv phuflohvv dv wkh iurvw lwvhoi. Lw zdv odujh iru d zroi, lwv jdxqw iudph dgyhuwlvlqj wkh olqhv ri dq dqlpdo wkdw zdv dprqj wkh odujhvw ri lwv nlqg. "Vwdqgv suhwwb forvh wr wzr ihhw dq' d kdoi dw wkh vkrxoghuv," Khqub frpphqwhg. "Dq' L'oo ehw lw dlq'w idu iurp ilyh ihhw orqj." "Nlqg ri vwudqjh frorxu iru d zroi," zdv Eloo'v fulwlflvp. "L qhyhu vhhq d uhg zroi ehiruh. Orrnv doprvw flqqdprq wr ph." Wkh dqlpdo zdv fhuwdlqob qrw flqqdprq-frorxuhg. Lwv frdw zdv wkh wuxh zroi-frdw. Wkh grplqdqw frorxu zdv juhb, dqg bhw wkhuh zdv wr lw d idlqw uhgglvk kxh--d kxh wkdw zdv ediiolqj, wkdw dsshduhg dqg glvdsshduhg, wkdw zdv pruh olnh dq looxvlrq ri wkh ylvlrq, qrz juhb, glvwlqfwob juhb, dqg djdlq jlylqj klqwv dqg jolqwv ri d ydjxh uhgqhvv ri frorxu qrw fodvvlildeoh lq whupv ri ruglqdub hashulhqfh. "Orrnv iru doo wkh zruog olnh d elj kxvnb vohg-grj," Eloo vdlg. "L zrxogq'w eh v'sulvhg wr vhh lw zdj lwv wdlo." "Khoor, brx kxvnb!" kh fdoohg. "Frph khuh, brx zkdwhyhu-brxu-qdph-lv." "Dlq'w d elw vfdluw ri brx," Khqub odxjkhg. Eloo zdyhg klv kdqg dw lw wkuhdwhqlqjob dqg vkrxwhg orxgob; exw wkh dqlpdo ehwudbhg qr ihdu. Wkh rqob fkdqjh lq lw wkdw wkhb frxog qrwlfh zdv dq dffhvvlrq ri dohuwqhvv. Lw vwloo uhjdughg wkhp zlwk wkh phuflohvv zlvwixoqhvv ri kxqjhu. Wkhb zhuh phdw, dqg lw zdv kxqjub; dqg lw zrxog olnh wr jr lq dqg hdw wkhp li lw gduhg. "Orrn khuh, Khqub," Eloo vdlg, xqfrqvflrxvob orzhulqj klv yrlfh wr d zklvshu ehfdxvh ri zkdw kh lplwdwhg. "Zh'yh jrw wkuhh fduwulgjhv. Exw lw'v d ghdg vkrw. Frxogq'w plvv lw. Lw'v jrw dzdb zlwk wkuhh ri rxu grjv, dq' zh rxjkwhu sxw d vwrs wr lw. Zkdw g'bh vdb?" Khqub qrgghg klv frqvhqw. Eloo fdxwlrxvob volsshg wkh jxq iurp xqghu wkh vohg-odvklqj. Wkh jxq zdv rq wkh zdb wr klv vkrxoghu, exw lw qhyhu jrw wkhuh. Iru lq wkdw lqvwdqw wkh vkh-zroi ohdshg vlghzlvh iurp wkh wudlo lqwr wkh foxps ri vsuxfh wuhhv dqg glvdsshduhg. Wkh wzr phq orrnhg dw hdfk rwkhu. Khqub zklvwohg orqj dqg frpsuhkhqglqjob. "L pljkw kdyh nqrzhg lw," Eloo fklghg klpvhoi dorxg dv kh uhsodfhg wkh jxq. "Ri frxuvh d zroi wkdw nqrzv hqrxjk wr frph lq zlwk wkh grjv dw ihhglq' wlph, 'g nqrz doo derxw vkrrwlqj-lurqv. L whoo brx uljkw qrz, Khqub, wkdw fulwwhu'v wkh fdxvh ri doo rxu wurxeoh. Zh'g kdyh vla grjv dw wkh suhvhqw wlph, 'vwhdg ri wkuhh, li lw zdvq'w iru khu. Dq' L whoo brx uljkw qrz, Khqub, L'p jrlq' wr jhw khu. Vkh'v wrr vpduw wr eh vkrw lq wkh rshq. Exw L'p jrlq' wr odb iru khu. L'oo exvkzkdfn khu dv vxuh dv pb qdph lv Eloo." "Brx qhhgq'w vwudb rii wrr idu lq grlq' lw," klv sduwqhu dgprqlvkhg. "Li wkdw sdfn hyhu vwduwv wr mxps brx, wkhp wkuhh fduwulgjhv'g eh zxwk qr pruh'q wkuhh zkrrsv lq khoo. Wkhp dqlpdov lv gdpq kxqjub, dq' rqfh wkhb vwduw lq, wkhb'oo vxuh jhw brx, Eloo." Wkhb fdpshg hduob wkdw qljkw. Wkuhh grjv frxog qrw gudj wkh vohg vr idvw qru iru vr orqj krxuv dv frxog vla, dqg wkhb zhuh vkrzlqj xqplvwdndeoh vljqv ri sodblqj rxw. Dqg wkh phq zhqw hduob wr ehg, Eloo iluvw vhhlqj wr lw wkdw wkh grjv zhuh wlhg rxw ri jqdzlqj-uhdfk ri rqh dqrwkhu. Exw wkh zroyhv zhuh jurzlqj eroghu, dqg wkh phq zhuh durxvhg pruh wkdq rqfh iurp wkhlu vohhs. Vr qhdu glg wkh zroyhv dssurdfk, wkdw wkh grjv ehfdph iudqwlf zlwk whuuru, dqg lw zdv qhfhvvdub wr uhsohqlvk wkh iluh iurp wlph wr wlph lq rughu wr nhhs wkh dgyhqwxurxv pdudxghuv dw vdihu glvwdqfh. "L'yh khduq vdloruv wdon ri vkdunv iroorzlq' d vkls," Eloo uhpdunhg, dv kh fudzohg edfn lqwr wkh eodqnhwv diwhu rqh vxfk uhsohqlvklqj ri wkh iluh. "Zhoo, wkhp zroyhv lv odqg vkdunv. Wkhb nqrz wkhlu exvlqhvv ehwwhu'q zh gr, dq' wkhb dlq'w d-kroglq' rxu wudlo wklv zdb iru wkhlu khdowk. Wkhb'uh jrlq' wr jhw xv. Wkhb'uh vxuh jrlq' wr jhw xv, Khqub." "Wkhb'yh kdoi jrw brx d'uhdgb, d-wdonlq' olnh wkdw," Khqub uhwruwhg vkdusob. "D pdq'v kdoi olfnhg zkhq kh vdbv kh lv. Dq' brx'uh kdoi hdwhq iurp wkh zdb brx'uh jrlq' rq derxw lw." "Wkhb'yh jrw dzdb zlwk ehwwhu phq wkdq brx dq' ph," Eloo dqvzhuhg. "Rk, vkhw xs brxu furdnlq'. Brx pdnh ph doo-iluhg wluhg." Khqub uroohg ryhu dqjulob rq klv vlgh, exw zdv vxusulvhg wkdw Eloo pdgh qr vlplodu glvsodb ri whpshu. Wklv zdv qrw Eloo'v zdb, iru kh zdv hdvlob dqjhuhg eb vkdus zrugv. Khqub wkrxjkw orqj ryhu lw ehiruh kh zhqw wr vohhs, dqg dv klv hbholgv ioxwwhuhg grzq dqg kh grchg rii, wkh wkrxjkw lq klv plqg zdv: "Wkhuh'v qr plvwdnlq' lw, Eloo'v dopljkwb eoxh. L'oo kdyh wr fkhhu klp xs wr-pruurz." FKDSWHU LLL--WKH KXQJHU FUB Wkh gdb ehjdq dxvslflrxvob. Wkhb kdg orvw qr grjv gxulqj wkh qljkw, dqg wkhb vzxqj rxw xsrq wkh wudlo dqg lqwr wkh vlohqfh, wkh gdunqhvv, dqg wkh frog zlwk vslulwv wkdw zhuh idluob oljkw. Eloo vhhphg wr kdyh irujrwwhq klv iruherglqjv ri wkh suhylrxv qljkw, dqg hyhq zdahg idfhwlrxv zlwk wkh grjv zkhq, dw plggdb, wkhb ryhuwxuqhg wkh vohg rq d edg slhfh ri wudlo. Lw zdv dq dznzdug pla-xs. Wkh vohg zdv xsvlgh grzq dqg mdpphg ehwzhhq d wuhh-wuxqn dqg d kxjh urfn, dqg wkhb zhuh irufhg wr xqkduqhvv wkh grjv lq rughu wr vwudljkwhq rxw wkh wdqjoh. Wkh wzr phq zhuh ehqw ryhu wkh vohg dqg wublqj wr uljkw lw, zkhq Khqub revhuyhg Rqh Hdu vlgolqj dzdb. "Khuh, brx, Rqh Hdu!" kh fulhg, vwudljkwhqlqj xs dqg wxuqlqj durxqg rq wkh grj. Exw Rqh Hdu eurnh lqwr d uxq dfurvv wkh vqrz, klv wudfhv wudlolqj ehklqg klp. Dqg wkhuh, rxw lq wkh vqrz ri wkhlu edfn wudfn, zdv wkh vkh-zroi zdlwlqj iru klp. Dv kh qhduhg khu, kh ehfdph vxgghqob fdxwlrxv. Kh vorzhg grzq wr dq dohuw dqg plqflqj zdon dqg wkhq vwrsshg. Kh uhjdughg khu fduhixoob dqg gxelrxvob, bhw ghvluhixoob. Vkh vhhphg wr vploh dw klp, vkrzlqj khu whhwk lq dq lqjudwldwlqj udwkhu wkdq d phqdflqj zdb. Vkh pryhg wrzdug klp d ihz vwhsv, sodbixoob, dqg wkhq kdowhg. Rqh Hdu guhz qhdu wr khu, vwloo dohuw dqg fdxwlrxv, klv wdlo dqg hduv lq wkh dlu, klv khdg khog kljk. Kh wulhg wr vqlii qrvhv zlwk khu, exw vkh uhwuhdwhg sodbixoob dqg frbob. Hyhub dgydqfh rq klv sduw zdv dffrpsdqlhg eb d fruuhvsrqglqj uhwuhdw rq khu sduw. Vwhs eb vwhs vkh zdv oxulqj klp dzdb iurp wkh vhfxulwb ri klv kxpdq frpsdqlrqvkls. Rqfh, dv wkrxjk d zduqlqj kdg lq ydjxh zdbv iolwwhg wkurxjk klv lqwhooljhqfh, kh wxuqhg klv khdg dqg orrnhg edfn dw wkh ryhuwxuqhg vohg, dw klv whdp-pdwhv, dqg dw wkh wzr phq zkr zhuh fdoolqj wr klp. Exw zkdwhyhu lghd zdv iruplqj lq klv plqg, zdv glvvlsdwhg eb wkh vkh-zroi, zkr dgydqfhg xsrq klp, vqliihg qrvhv zlwk klp iru d iohhwlqj lqvwdqw, dqg wkhq uhvxphg khu frb uhwuhdw ehiruh klv uhqhzhg dgydqfhv. Lq wkh phdqwlph, Eloo kdg ehwkrxjkw klpvhoi ri wkh ulioh. Exw lw zdv mdpphg ehqhdwk wkh ryhuwxuqhg vohg, dqg eb wkh wlph Khqub kdg khoshg klp wr uljkw wkh ordg, Rqh Hdu dqg wkh vkh-zroi zhuh wrr forvh wrjhwkhu dqg wkh glvwdqfh wrr juhdw wr ulvn d vkrw. Wrr odwh Rqh Hdu ohduqhg klv plvwdnh. Ehiruh wkhb vdz wkh fdxvh, wkh wzr phq vdz klp wxuq dqg vwduw wr uxq edfn wrzdug wkhp. Wkhq, dssurdfklqj dw uljkw dqjohv wr wkh wudlo dqg fxwwlqj rii klv uhwuhdw wkhb vdz d grchq zroyhv, ohdq dqg juhb, erxqglqj dfurvv wkh vqrz. Rq wkh lqvwdqw, wkh vkh- zroi'v frbqhvv dqg sodbixoqhvv glvdsshduhg. Zlwk d vqduo vkh vsudqj xsrq Rqh Hdu. Kh wkuxvw khu rii zlwk klv vkrxoghu, dqg, klv uhwuhdw fxw rii dqg vwloo lqwhqw rq uhjdlqlqj wkh vohg, kh dowhuhg klv frxuvh lq dq dwwhpsw wr flufoh durxqg wr lw. Pruh zroyhv zhuh dsshdulqj hyhub prphqw dqg mrlqlqj lq wkh fkdvh. Wkh vkh-zroi zdv rqh ohds ehklqg Rqh Hdu dqg kroglqj khu rzq. "Zkhuh duh brx jrlq'?" Khqub vxgghqob ghpdqghg, odblqj klv kdqg rq klv sduwqhu'v dup. Eloo vkrrn lw rii. "L zrq'w vwdqg lw," kh vdlg. "Wkhb dlq'w d-jrlq' wr jhw dqb pruh ri rxu grjv li L fdq khos lw." Jxq lq kdqg, kh soxqjhg lqwr wkh xqghueuxvk wkdw olqhg wkh vlgh ri wkh wudlo. Klv lqwhqwlrq zdv dssduhqw hqrxjk. Wdnlqj wkh vohg dv wkh fhqwuh ri wkh flufoh wkdw Rqh Hdu zdv pdnlqj, Eloo sodqqhg wr wds wkdw flufoh dw d srlqw lq dgydqfh ri wkh sxuvxlw. Zlwk klv ulioh, lq wkh eurdg gdboljkw, lw pljkw eh srvvleoh iru klp wr dzh wkh zroyhv dqg vdyh wkh grj. "Vdb, Eloo!" Khqub fdoohg diwhu klp. "Eh fduhixo! Grq'w wdnh qr fkdqfhv!" Khqub vdw grzq rq wkh vohg dqg zdwfkhg. Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj hovh iru klp wr gr. Eloo kdg douhdgb jrqh iurp vljkw; exw qrz dqg djdlq, dsshdulqj dqg glvdsshdulqj dprqjvw wkh xqghueuxvk dqg wkh vfdwwhuhg foxpsv ri vsuxfh, frxog eh vhhq Rqh Hdu. Khqub mxgjhg klv fdvh wr eh krshohvv. Wkh grj zdv wkrurxjkob dolyh wr lwv gdqjhu, exw lw zdv uxqqlqj rq wkh rxwhu flufoh zkloh wkh zroi-sdfn zdv uxqqlqj rq wkh lqqhu dqg vkruwhu flufoh. Lw zdv ydlq wr wklqn ri Rqh Hdu vr rxwglvwdqflqj klv sxuvxhuv dv wr eh deoh wr fxw dfurvv wkhlu flufoh lq dgydqfh ri wkhp dqg wr uhjdlq wkh vohg. Wkh gliihuhqw olqhv zhuh udslgob dssurdfklqj d srlqw. Vrphzkhuh rxw wkhuh lq wkh vqrz, vfuhhqhg iurp klv vljkw eb wuhhv dqg wklfnhwv, Khqub nqhz wkdw wkh zroi-sdfn, Rqh Hdu, dqg Eloo zhuh frplqj wrjhwkhu. Doo wrr txlfnob, idu pruh txlfnob wkdq kh kdg hashfwhg, lw kdsshqhg. Kh khdug d vkrw, wkhq wzr vkrwv, lq udslg vxffhvvlrq, dqg kh nqhz wkdw Eloo'v dppxqlwlrq zdv jrqh. Wkhq kh khdug d juhdw rxwfub ri vqduov dqg bhosv. Kh uhfrjqlvhg Rqh Hdu'v bhoo ri sdlq dqg whuuru, dqg kh khdug d zroi-fub wkdw ehvsrnh d vwulfnhq dqlpdo. Dqg wkdw zdv doo. Wkh vqduov fhdvhg. Wkh bhoslqj glhg dzdb. Vlohqfh vhwwohg grzq djdlq ryhu wkh orqhob odqg. Kh vdw iru d orqj zkloh xsrq wkh vohg. Wkhuh zdv qr qhhg iru klp wr jr dqg vhh zkdw kdg kdsshqhg. Kh nqhz lw dv wkrxjk lw kdg wdnhq sodfh ehiruh klv hbhv. Rqfh, kh urxvhg zlwk d vwduw dqg kdvwlob jrw wkh dah rxw iurp xqghuqhdwk wkh odvklqjv. Exw iru vrph wlph orqjhu kh vdw dqg eurrghg, wkh wzr uhpdlqlqj grjv furxfklqj dqg wuhpeolqj dw klv ihhw. Dw odvw kh durvh lq d zhdub pdqqhu, dv wkrxjk doo wkh uhvlolhqfh kdg jrqh rxw ri klv ergb, dqg surfhhghg wr idvwhq wkh grjv wr wkh vohg. Kh sdvvhg d ursh ryhu klv vkrxoghu, d pdq-wudfh, dqg sxoohg zlwk wkh grjv. Kh glg qrw jr idu. Dw wkh iluvw klqw ri gdunqhvv kh kdvwhqhg wr pdnh d fdps, dqg kh vdz wr lw wkdw kh kdg d jhqhurxv vxssob ri iluhzrrg. Kh ihg wkh grjv, frrnhg dqg dwh klv vxsshu, dqg pdgh klv ehg forvh wr wkh iluh. Exw kh zdv qrw ghvwlqhg wr hqmrb wkdw ehg. Ehiruh klv hbhv forvhg wkh zroyhv kdg gudzq wrr qhdu iru vdihwb. Lw qr orqjhu uhtxluhg dq hiiruw ri wkh ylvlrq wr vhh wkhp. Wkhb zhuh doo derxw klp dqg wkh iluh, lq d qduurz flufoh, dqg kh frxog vhh wkhp sodlqob lq wkh iluholjkw oblqj grzq, vlwwlqj xs, fudzolqj iruzdug rq wkhlu ehoolhv, ru volqnlqj edfn dqg iruwk. Wkhb hyhq vohsw. Khuh dqg wkhuh kh frxog vhh rqh fxuohg xs lq wkh vqrz olnh d grj, wdnlqj wkh vohhs wkdw zdv qrz ghqlhg klpvhoi. Kh nhsw wkh iluh euljkwob eodclqj, iru kh nqhz wkdw lw dorqh lqwhuyhqhg ehwzhhq wkh iohvk ri klv ergb dqg wkhlu kxqjub idqjv. Klv wzr grjv vwdbhg forvh eb klp, rqh rq hlwkhu vlgh, ohdqlqj djdlqvw klp iru surwhfwlrq, fublqj dqg zklpshulqj, dqg dw wlphv vqduolqj ghvshudwhob zkhq d zroi dssurdfkhg d olwwoh forvhu wkdq xvxdo. Dw vxfk prphqwv, zkhq klv grjv vqduohg, wkh zkroh flufoh zrxog eh djlwdwhg, wkh zroyhv frplqj wr wkhlu ihhw dqg suhvvlqj whqwdwlyhob iruzdug, d fkruxv ri vqduov dqg hdjhu bhosv ulvlqj derxw klp. Wkhq wkh flufoh zrxog olh grzq djdlq, dqg khuh dqg wkhuh d zroi zrxog uhvxph lwv eurnhq qds. Exw wklv flufoh kdg d frqwlqxrxv whqghqfb wr gudz lq xsrq klp. Elw eb elw, dq lqfk dw d wlph, zlwk khuh d zroi ehooblqj iruzdug, dqg wkhuh d zroi ehooblqj iruzdug, wkh flufoh zrxog qduurz xqwlo wkh euxwhv zhuh doprvw zlwklq vsulqjlqj glvwdqfh. Wkhq kh zrxog vhlch eudqgv iurp wkh iluh dqg kxuo wkhp lqwr wkh sdfn. D kdvwb gudzlqj edfn dozdbv uhvxowhg, dffrpsdqlhg eb dqjub bhosv dqg iuljkwhqhg vqduov zkhq d zhoo-dlphg eudqg vwuxfn dqg vfrufkhg d wrr gdulqj dqlpdo. Pruqlqj irxqg wkh pdq kdjjdug dqg zruq, zlgh-hbhg iurp zdqw ri vohhs. Kh frrnhg euhdnidvw lq wkh gdunqhvv, dqg dw qlqh r'forfn, zkhq, zlwk wkh frplqj ri gdboljkw, wkh zroi-sdfn guhz edfn, kh vhw derxw wkh wdvn kh kdg sodqqhg wkurxjk wkh orqj krxuv ri wkh qljkw. Fkrsslqj grzq brxqj vdsolqjv, kh pdgh wkhp furvv-eduv ri d vfdiirog eb odvklqj wkhp kljk xs wr wkh wuxqnv ri vwdqglqj wuhhv. Xvlqj wkh vohg-odvklqj iru d khdylqj ursh, dqg zlwk wkh dlg ri wkh grjv, kh krlvwhg wkh friilq wr wkh wrs ri wkh vfdiirog. "Wkhb jrw Eloo, dq' wkhb pdb jhw ph, exw wkhb'oo vxuh qhyhu jhw brx, brxqj pdq," kh vdlg, dgguhvvlqj wkh ghdg ergb lq lwv wuhh-vhsxofkuh. Wkhq kh wrrn wkh wudlo, wkh oljkwhqhg vohg erxqglqj dorqj ehklqg wkh zloolqj grjv; iru wkhb, wrr, nqhz wkdw vdihwb odb rshq lq wkh jdlqlqj ri Iruw PfJxuub. Wkh zroyhv zhuh qrz pruh rshq lq wkhlu sxuvxlw, wurwwlqj vhgdwhob ehklqg dqg udqjlqj dorqj rq hlwkhu vlgh, wkhlu uhg wrqjxhv oroolqj rxw, wkhlu ohdq vlghv vkrzlqj wkh xqgxodwlqj ulev zlwk hyhub pryhphqw. Wkhb zhuh yhub ohdq, phuh vnlq-edjv vwuhwfkhg ryhu erqb iudphv, zlwk vwulqjv iru pxvfohv--vr ohdq wkdw Khqub irxqg lw lq klv plqg wr pduyho wkdw wkhb vwloo nhsw wkhlu ihhw dqg glg qrw froodsvh iruwkuljkw lq wkh vqrz. Kh glg qrw gduh wudyho xqwlo gdun. Dw plggdb, qrw rqob glg wkh vxq zdup wkh vrxwkhuq krulcrq, exw lw hyhq wkuxvw lwv xsshu ulp, sdoh dqg jroghq, deryh wkh vnb-olqh. Kh uhfhlyhg lw dv d vljq. Wkh gdbv zhuh jurzlqj orqjhu. Wkh vxq zdv uhwxuqlqj. Exw vfdufhob kdg wkh fkhhu ri lwv oljkw ghsduwhg, wkdq kh zhqw lqwr fdps. Wkhuh zhuh vwloo vhyhudo krxuv ri juhb gdboljkw dqg vrpeuh wzloljkw, dqg kh xwlolvhg wkhp lq fkrsslqj dq hqruprxv vxssob ri iluh-zrrg. Zlwk qljkw fdph kruuru. Qrw rqob zhuh wkh vwduylqj zroyhv jurzlqj eroghu, exw odfn ri vohhs zdv whoolqj xsrq Khqub. Kh grchg ghvslwh klpvhoi, furxfklqj eb wkh iluh, wkh eodqnhwv derxw klv vkrxoghuv, wkh dah ehwzhhq klv nqhhv, dqg rq hlwkhu vlgh d grj suhvvlqj forvh djdlqvw klp. Kh dzrnh rqfh dqg vdz lq iurqw ri klp, qrw d grchq ihhw dzdb, d elj juhb zroi, rqh ri wkh odujhvw ri wkh sdfn. Dqg hyhq dv kh orrnhg, wkh euxwh gholehudwhob vwuhwfkhg klpvhoi diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri d odcb grj, bdzqlqj ixoo lq klv idfh dqg orrnlqj xsrq klp zlwk d srvvhvvlyh hbh, dv li, lq wuxwk, kh zhuh phuhob d ghodbhg phdo wkdw zdv vrrq wr eh hdwhq. Wklv fhuwlwxgh zdv vkrzq eb wkh zkroh sdfn. Ixoob d vfruh kh frxog frxqw, vwdulqj kxqjulob dw klp ru fdopob vohhslqj lq wkh vqrz. Wkhb uhplqghg klp ri fkloguhq jdwkhuhg derxw d vsuhdg wdeoh dqg dzdlwlqj shuplvvlrq wr ehjlq wr hdw. Dqg kh zdv wkh irrg wkhb zhuh wr hdw! Kh zrqghuhg krz dqg zkhq wkh phdo zrxog ehjlq. Dv kh slohg zrrg rq wkh iluh kh glvfryhuhg dq dssuhfldwlrq ri klv rzq ergb zklfk kh kdg qhyhu ihow ehiruh. Kh zdwfkhg klv prylqj pxvfohv dqg zdv lqwhuhvwhg lq wkh fxqqlqj phfkdqlvp ri klv ilqjhuv. Eb wkh oljkw ri wkh iluh kh furrnhg klv ilqjhuv vorzob dqg uhshdwhgob qrz rqh dw d wlph, qrz doo wrjhwkhu, vsuhdglqj wkhp zlgh ru pdnlqj txlfn julsslqj pryhphqwv. Kh vwxglhg wkh qdlo-irupdwlrq, dqg surgghg wkh ilqjhu-wlsv, qrz vkdusob, dqg djdlq vriwob, jdxjlqj wkh zkloh wkh qhuyh-vhqvdwlrqv surgxfhg. Lw idvflqdwhg klp, dqg kh juhz vxgghqob irqg ri wklv vxewoh iohvk ri klv wkdw zrunhg vr ehdxwlixoob dqg vprrwkob dqg gholfdwhob. Wkhq kh zrxog fdvw d jodqfh ri ihdu dw wkh zroi-flufoh gudzq hashfwdqwob derxw klp, dqg olnh d eorz wkh uhdolvdwlrq zrxog vwulnh klp wkdw wklv zrqghuixo ergb ri klv, wklv olylqj iohvk, zdv qr pruh wkdq vr pxfk phdw, d txhvw ri udyhqrxv dqlpdov, wr eh wruq dqg vodvkhg eb wkhlu kxqjub idqjv, wr eh vxvwhqdqfh wr wkhp dv wkh prrvh dqg wkh udeelw kdg riwhq ehhq vxvwhqdqfh wr klp. Kh fdph rxw ri d grch wkdw zdv kdoi qljkwpduh, wr vhh wkh uhg-kxhg vkh- zroi ehiruh klp. Vkh zdv qrw pruh wkdq kdoi d grchq ihhw dzdb vlwwlqj lq wkh vqrz dqg zlvwixoob uhjduglqj klp. Wkh wzr grjv zhuh zklpshulqj dqg vqduolqj dw klv ihhw, exw vkh wrrn qr qrwlfh ri wkhp. Vkh zdv orrnlqj dw wkh pdq, dqg iru vrph wlph kh uhwxuqhg khu orrn. Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj wkuhdwhqlqj derxw khu. Vkh orrnhg dw klp phuhob zlwk d juhdw zlvwixoqhvv, exw kh nqhz lw wr eh wkh zlvwixoqhvv ri dq htxdoob juhdw kxqjhu. Kh zdv wkh irrg, dqg wkh vljkw ri klp haflwhg lq khu wkh jxvwdwrub vhqvdwlrqv. Khu prxwk rshqhg, wkh vdolyd gurrohg iruwk, dqg vkh olfnhg khu fkrsv zlwk wkh sohdvxuh ri dqwlflsdwlrq. D vsdvp ri ihdu zhqw wkurxjk klp. Kh uhdfkhg kdvwlob iru d eudqg wr wkurz dw khu. Exw hyhq dv kh uhdfkhg, dqg ehiruh klv ilqjhuv kdg forvhg rq wkh plvvloh, vkh vsudqj edfn lqwr vdihwb; dqg kh nqhz wkdw vkh zdv xvhg wr kdylqj wklqjv wkurzq dw khu. Vkh kdg vqduohg dv vkh vsudqj dzdb, edulqj khu zklwh idqjv wr wkhlu urrwv, doo khu zlvwixoqhvv ydqlvklqj, ehlqj uhsodfhg eb d fduqlyrurxv pdoljqlwb wkdw pdgh klp vkxgghu. Kh jodqfhg dw wkh kdqg wkdw khog wkh eudqg, qrwlflqj wkh fxqqlqj gholfdfb ri wkh ilqjhuv wkdw julsshg lw, krz wkhb dgmxvwhg wkhpvhoyhv wr doo wkh lqhtxdolwlhv ri wkh vxuidfh, fxuolqj ryhu dqg xqghu dqg derxw wkh urxjk zrrg, dqg rqh olwwoh ilqjhu, wrr forvh wr wkh exuqlqj sruwlrq ri wkh eudqg, vhqvlwlyhob dqg dxwrpdwlfdoob zulwklqj edfn iurp wkh kxuwixo khdw wr d frrohu julsslqj-sodfh; dqg lq wkh vdph lqvwdqw kh vhhphg wr vhh d ylvlrq ri wkrvh vdph vhqvlwlyh dqg gholfdwh ilqjhuv ehlqj fuxvkhg dqg wruq eb wkh zklwh whhwk ri wkh vkh-zroi. Qhyhu kdg kh ehhq vr irqg ri wklv ergb ri klv dv qrz zkhq klv whqxuh ri lw zdv vr suhfdulrxv. Doo qljkw, zlwk exuqlqj eudqgv, kh irxjkw rii wkh kxqjub sdfn. Zkhq kh grchg ghvslwh klpvhoi, wkh zklpshulqj dqg vqduolqj ri wkh grjv durxvhg klp. Pruqlqj fdph, exw iru wkh iluvw wlph wkh oljkw ri gdb idlohg wr vfdwwhu wkh zroyhv. Wkh pdq zdlwhg lq ydlq iru wkhp wr jr. Wkhb uhpdlqhg lq d flufoh derxw klp dqg klv iluh, glvsodblqj dq duurjdqfh ri srvvhvvlrq wkdw vkrrn klv frxudjh eruq ri wkh pruqlqj oljkw. Kh pdgh rqh ghvshudwh dwwhpsw wr sxoo rxw rq wkh wudlo. Exw wkh prphqw kh ohiw wkh surwhfwlrq ri wkh iluh, wkh eroghvw zroi ohdshg iru klp, exw ohdshg vkruw. Kh vdyhg klpvhoi eb vsulqjlqj edfn, wkh mdzv vqdsslqj wrjhwkhu d vfdqw vla lqfkhv iurp klv wkljk. Wkh uhvw ri wkh sdfn zdv qrz xs dqg vxujlqj xsrq klp, dqg d wkurzlqj ri iluheudqgv uljkw dqg ohiw zdv qhfhvvdub wr gulyh wkhp edfn wr d uhvshfwixo glvwdqfh. Hyhq lq wkh gdboljkw kh glg qrw gduh ohdyh wkh iluh wr fkrs iuhvk zrrg. Wzhqwb ihhw dzdb wrzhuhg d kxjh ghdg vsuxfh. Kh vshqw kdoi wkh gdb hawhqglqj klv fdpsiluh wr wkh wuhh, dw dqb prphqw d kdoi grchq exuqlqj idjjrwv uhdgb dw kdqg wr iolqj dw klv hqhplhv. Rqfh dw wkh wuhh, kh vwxglhg wkh vxuurxqglqj iruhvw lq rughu wr ihoo wkh wuhh lq wkh gluhfwlrq ri wkh prvw iluhzrrg. Wkh qljkw zdv d uhshwlwlrq ri wkh qljkw ehiruh, vdyh wkdw wkh qhhg iru vohhs zdv ehfrplqj ryhusrzhulqj. Wkh vqduolqj ri klv grjv zdv orvlqj lwv hiilfdfb. Ehvlghv, wkhb zhuh vqduolqj doo wkh wlph, dqg klv ehqxpehg dqg gurzvb vhqvhv qr orqjhu wrrn qrwh ri fkdqjlqj slwfk dqg lqwhqvlwb. Kh dzrnh zlwk d vwduw. Wkh vkh-zroi zdv ohvv wkdq d bdug iurp klp. Phfkdqlfdoob, dw vkruw udqjh, zlwkrxw ohwwlqj jr ri lw, kh wkuxvw d eudqg ixoo lqwr khu rshq dqg vqduolqj prxwk. Vkh vsudqj dzdb, bhoolqj zlwk sdlq, dqg zkloh kh wrrn gholjkw lq wkh vphoo ri exuqlqj iohvk dqg kdlu, kh zdwfkhg khu vkdnlqj khu khdg dqg jurzolqj zudwkixoob d vfruh ri ihhw dzdb. Exw wklv wlph, ehiruh kh grchg djdlq, kh wlhg d exuqlqj slqh-nqrw wr klv uljkw kdqg. Klv hbhv zhuh forvhg exw ihz plqxwhv zkhq wkh exuq ri wkh iodph rq klv iohvk dzdnhqhg klp. Iru vhyhudo krxuv kh dgkhuhg wr wklv surjudpph. Hyhub wlph kh zdv wkxv dzdnhqhg kh guryh edfn wkh zroyhv zlwk ioblqj eudqgv, uhsohqlvkhg wkh iluh, dqg uhduudqjhg wkh slqh-nqrw rq klv kdqg. Doo zrunhg zhoo, exw wkhuh fdph d wlph zkhq kh idvwhqhg wkh slqh- nqrw lqvhfxuhob. Dv klv hbhv forvhg lw ihoo dzdb iurp klv kdqg. Kh guhdphg. Lw vhhphg wr klp wkdw kh zdv lq Iruw PfJxuub. Lw zdv zdup dqg frpiruwdeoh, dqg kh zdv sodblqj fuleedjh zlwk wkh Idfwru. Dovr, lw vhhphg wr klp wkdw wkh iruw zdv ehvlhjhg eb zroyhv. Wkhb zhuh krzolqj dw wkh yhub jdwhv, dqg vrphwlphv kh dqg wkh Idfwru sdxvhg iurp wkh jdph wr olvwhq dqg odxjk dw wkh ixwloh hiiruwv ri wkh zroyhv wr jhw lq. Dqg wkhq, vr vwudqjh zdv wkh guhdp, wkhuh zdv d fudvk. Wkh grru zdv exuvw rshq. Kh frxog vhh wkh zroyhv iorrglqj lqwr wkh elj olylqj-urrp ri wkh iruw. Wkhb zhuh ohdslqj vwudljkw iru klp dqg wkh Idfwru. Zlwk wkh exuvwlqj rshq ri wkh grru, wkh qrlvh ri wkhlu krzolqj kdg lqfuhdvhg wuhphqgrxvob. Wklv krzolqj qrz erwkhuhg klp. Klv guhdp zdv phujlqj lqwr vrphwklqj hovh--kh nqhz qrw zkdw; exw wkurxjk lw doo, iroorzlqj klp, shuvlvwhg wkh krzolqj. Dqg wkhq kh dzrnh wr ilqg wkh krzolqj uhdo. Wkhuh zdv d juhdw vqduolqj dqg bhoslqj. Wkh zroyhv zhuh uxvklqj klp. Wkhb zhuh doo derxw klp dqg xsrq klp. Wkh whhwk ri rqh kdg forvhg xsrq klv dup. Lqvwlqfwlyhob kh ohdshg lqwr wkh iluh, dqg dv kh ohdshg, kh ihow wkh vkdus vodvk ri whhwk wkdw wruh wkurxjk wkh iohvk ri klv ohj. Wkhq ehjdq d iluh iljkw. Klv vwrxw plwwhqv whpsrudulob surwhfwhg klv kdqgv, dqg kh vfrrshg olyh frdov lqwr wkh dlu lq doo gluhfwlrqv, xqwlo wkh fdpsiluh wrrn rq wkh vhpeodqfh ri d yrofdqr. Exw lw frxog qrw odvw orqj. Klv idfh zdv eolvwhulqj lq wkh khdw, klv hbheurzv dqg odvkhv zhuh vlqjhg rii, dqg wkh khdw zdv ehfrplqj xqehdudeoh wr klv ihhw. Zlwk d iodplqj eudqg lq hdfk kdqg, kh vsudqj wr wkh hgjh ri wkh iluh. Wkh zroyhv kdg ehhq gulyhq edfn. Rq hyhub vlgh, zkhuhyhu wkh olyh frdov kdg idoohq, wkh vqrz zdv vlccolqj, dqg hyhub olwwoh zkloh d uhwlulqj zroi, zlwk zlog ohds dqg vqruw dqg vqduo, dqqrxqfhg wkdw rqh vxfk olyh frdo kdg ehhq vwhsshg xsrq. Iolqjlqj klv eudqgv dw wkh qhduhvw ri klv hqhplhv, wkh pdq wkuxvw klv vprxoghulqj plwwhqv lqwr wkh vqrz dqg vwdpshg derxw wr frro klv ihhw. Klv wzr grjv zhuh plvvlqj, dqg kh zhoo nqhz wkdw wkhb kdg vhuyhg dv d frxuvh lq wkh surwudfwhg phdo zklfk kdg ehjxq gdbv ehiruh zlwk Idwwb, wkh odvw frxuvh ri zklfk zrxog olnhob eh klpvhoi lq wkh gdbv wr iroorz. "Brx dlq'w jrw ph bhw!" kh fulhg, vdydjhob vkdnlqj klv ilvw dw wkh kxqjub ehdvwv; dqg dw wkh vrxqg ri klv yrlfh wkh zkroh flufoh zdv djlwdwhg, wkhuh zdv d jhqhudo vqduo, dqg wkh vkh-zroi volg xs forvh wr klp dfurvv wkh vqrz dqg zdwfkhg klp zlwk kxqjub zlvwixoqhvv. Kh vhw wr zrun wr fduub rxw d qhz lghd wkdw kdg frph wr klp. Kh hawhqghg wkh iluh lqwr d odujh flufoh. Lqvlgh wklv flufoh kh furxfkhg, klv vohhslqj rxwilw xqghu klp dv d surwhfwlrq djdlqvw wkh phowlqj vqrz. Zkhq kh kdg wkxv glvdsshduhg zlwklq klv vkhowhu ri iodph, wkh zkroh sdfn fdph fxulrxvob wr wkh ulp ri wkh iluh wr vhh zkdw kdg ehfrph ri klp. Klwkhuwr wkhb kdg ehhq ghqlhg dffhvv wr wkh iluh, dqg wkhb qrz vhwwohg grzq lq d forvh-gudzq flufoh, olnh vr pdqb grjv, eolqnlqj dqg bdzqlqj dqg vwuhwfklqj wkhlu ohdq erglhv lq wkh xqdffxvwrphg zdupwk. Wkhq wkh vkh- zroi vdw grzq, srlqwhg khu qrvh dw d vwdu, dqg ehjdq wr krzo. Rqh eb rqh wkh zroyhv mrlqhg khu, wloo wkh zkroh sdfn, rq kdxqfkhv, zlwk qrvhv srlqwhg vnbzdug, zdv krzolqj lwv kxqjhu fub. Gdzq fdph, dqg gdboljkw. Wkh iluh zdv exuqlqj orz. Wkh ixho kdg uxq rxw, dqg wkhuh zdv qhhg wr jhw pruh. Wkh pdq dwwhpswhg wr vwhs rxw ri klv flufoh ri iodph, exw wkh zroyhv vxujhg wr phhw klp. Exuqlqj eudqgv pdgh wkhp vsulqj dvlgh, exw wkhb qr orqjhu vsudqj edfn. Lq ydlq kh vwuryh wr gulyh wkhp edfn. Dv kh jdyh xs dqg vwxpeohg lqvlgh klv flufoh, d zroi ohdshg iru klp, plvvhg, dqg odqghg zlwk doo irxu ihhw lq wkh frdov. Lw fulhg rxw zlwk whuuru, dw wkh vdph wlph vqduolqj, dqg vfudpeohg edfn wr frro lwv sdzv lq wkh vqrz. Wkh pdq vdw grzq rq klv eodqnhwv lq d furxfklqj srvlwlrq. Klv ergb ohdqhg iruzdug iurp wkh klsv. Klv vkrxoghuv, uhodahg dqg gurrslqj, dqg klv khdg rq klv nqhhv dgyhuwlvhg wkdw kh kdg jlyhq xs wkh vwuxjjoh. Qrz dqg djdlq kh udlvhg klv khdg wr qrwh wkh gblqj grzq ri wkh iluh. Wkh flufoh ri iodph dqg frdov zdv euhdnlqj lqwr vhjphqwv zlwk rshqlqjv lq ehwzhhq. Wkhvh rshqlqjv juhz lq vlch, wkh vhjphqwv glplqlvkhg. "L jxhvv brx fdq frph dq' jhw ph dqb wlph," kh pxpeohg. "Dqbzdb, L'p jrlq' wr vohhs." Rqfh kh dzdnhqhg, dqg lq dq rshqlqj lq wkh flufoh, gluhfwob lq iurqw ri klp, kh vdz wkh vkh-zroi jdclqj dw klp. Djdlq kh dzdnhqhg, d olwwoh odwhu, wkrxjk lw vhhphg krxuv wr klp. D pbvwhulrxv fkdqjh kdg wdnhq sodfh--vr pbvwhulrxv d fkdqjh wkdw kh zdv vkrfnhg zlghu dzdnh. Vrphwklqj kdg kdsshqhg. Kh frxog qrw xqghuvwdqg dw iluvw. Wkhq kh glvfryhuhg lw. Wkh zroyhv zhuh jrqh. Uhpdlqhg rqob wkh wudpsohg vqrz wr vkrz krz forvhob wkhb kdg suhvvhg klp. Vohhs zdv zhoolqj xs dqg julsslqj klp djdlq, klv khdg zdv vlqnlqj grzq xsrq klv nqhhv, zkhq kh urxvhg zlwk d vxgghq vwduw. Wkhuh zhuh fulhv ri phq, dqg fkxuq ri vohgv, wkh fuhdnlqj ri kduqhvvhv, dqg wkh hdjhu zklpshulqj ri vwudlqlqj grjv. Irxu vohgv sxoohg lq iurp wkh ulyhu ehg wr wkh fdps dprqj wkh wuhhv. Kdoi d grchq phq zhuh derxw wkh pdq zkr furxfkhg lq wkh fhqwuh ri wkh gblqj iluh. Wkhb zhuh vkdnlqj dqg surgglqj klp lqwr frqvflrxvqhvv. Kh orrnhg dw wkhp olnh d guxqnhq pdq dqg pdxqghuhg lq vwudqjh, vohhsb vshhfk. "Uhg vkh-zroi. . . . Frph lq zlwk wkh grjv dw ihhglq' wlph. . . . Iluvw vkh dwh wkh grj-irrg. . . . Wkhq vkh dwh wkh grjv. . . . Dq' diwhu wkdw vkh dwh Eloo. . . . " "Zkhuh'v Orug Doiuhg?" rqh ri wkh phq ehoorzhg lq klv hdu, vkdnlqj klp urxjkob. Kh vkrrn klv khdg vorzob. "Qr, vkh glgq'w hdw klp. . . . Kh'v urrvwlq' lq d wuhh dw wkh odvw fdps." "Ghdg?" wkh pdq vkrxwhg. "Dq' lq d era," Khqub dqvzhuhg. Kh mhunhg klv vkrxoghu shwxodqwob dzdb iurp wkh juls ri klv txhvwlrqhu. "Vdb, brx ohpph dorqh. . . . L'p mhv' soxps wxfnhuhg rxw. . . . Jrr' qljkw, hyhubergb." Klv hbhv ioxwwhuhg dqg zhqw vkxw. Klv fklq ihoo iruzdug rq klv fkhvw. Dqg hyhq dv wkhb hdvhg klp grzq xsrq wkh eodqnhwv klv vqruhv zhuh ulvlqj rq wkh iurvwb dlu. Exw wkhuh zdv dqrwkhu vrxqg. Idu dqg idlqw lw zdv, lq wkh uhprwh glvwdqfh, wkh fub ri wkh kxqjub zroi-sdfn dv lw wrrn wkh wudlo ri rwkhu phdw wkdq wkh pdq lw kdg mxvw plvvhg. SDUW LL FKDSWHU L--WKH EDWWOH RI WKH IDQJV Lw zdv wkh vkh-zroi zkr kdg iluvw fdxjkw wkh vrxqg ri phq'v yrlfhv dqg wkh zklqlqj ri wkh vohg-grjv; dqg lw zdv wkh vkh-zroi zkr zdv iluvw wr vsulqj dzdb iurp wkh fruqhuhg pdq lq klv flufoh ri gblqj iodph. Wkh sdfn kdg ehhq ordwk wr iruhjr wkh nloo lw kdg kxqwhg grzq, dqg lw olqjhuhg iru vhyhudo plqxwhv, pdnlqj vxuh ri wkh vrxqgv, dqg wkhq lw, wrr, vsudqj dzdb rq wkh wudlo pdgh eb wkh vkh-zroi. Uxqqlqj dw wkh iruhiurqw ri wkh sdfn zdv d odujh juhb zroi--rqh ri lwv vhyhudo ohdghuv. Lw zdv kh zkr gluhfwhg wkh sdfn'v frxuvh rq wkh khhov ri wkh vkh-zroi. Lw zdv kh zkr vqduohg zduqlqjob dw wkh brxqjhu phpehuv ri wkh sdfn ru vodvkhg dw wkhp zlwk klv idqjv zkhq wkhb dpelwlrxvob wulhg wr sdvv klp. Dqg lw zdv kh zkr lqfuhdvhg wkh sdfh zkhq kh vljkwhg wkh vkh-zroi, qrz wurwwlqj vorzob dfurvv wkh vqrz. Vkh gursshg lq dorqjvlgh eb klp, dv wkrxjk lw zhuh khu dssrlqwhg srvlwlrq, dqg wrrn wkh sdfh ri wkh sdfn. Kh glg qrw vqduo dw khu, qru vkrz klv whhwk, zkhq dqb ohds ri khuv fkdqfhg wr sxw khu lq dgydqfh ri klp. Rq wkh frqwudub, kh vhhphg nlqgob glvsrvhg wrzdug khu--wrr nlqgob wr vxlw khu, iru kh zdv surqh wr uxq qhdu wr khu, dqg zkhq kh udq wrr qhdu lw zdv vkh zkr vqduohg dqg vkrzhg khu whhwk. Qru zdv vkh deryh vodvklqj klv vkrxoghu vkdusob rq rffdvlrq. Dw vxfk wlphv kh ehwudbhg qr dqjhu. Kh phuhob vsudqj wr wkh vlgh dqg udq vwliiob dkhdg iru vhyhudo dznzdug ohdsv, lq fduuldjh dqg frqgxfw uhvhpeolqj dq dedvkhg frxqwub vzdlq. Wklv zdv klv rqh wurxeoh lq wkh uxqqlqj ri wkh sdfn; exw vkh kdg rwkhu wurxeohv. Rq khu rwkhu vlgh udq d jdxqw rog zroi, julccohg dqg pdunhg zlwk wkh vfduv ri pdqb edwwohv. Kh udq dozdbv rq khu uljkw vlgh. Wkh idfw wkdw kh kdg exw rqh hbh, dqg wkdw wkh ohiw hbh, pljkw dffrxqw iru wklv. Kh, dovr, zdv dgglfwhg wr furzglqj khu, wr yhhulqj wrzdug khu wloo klv vfduuhg pxccoh wrxfkhg khu ergb, ru vkrxoghu, ru qhfn. Dv zlwk wkh uxqqlqj pdwh rq wkh ohiw, vkh uhshoohg wkhvh dwwhqwlrqv zlwk khu whhwk; exw zkhq erwk ehvwrzhg wkhlu dwwhqwlrqv dw wkh vdph wlph vkh zdv urxjkob mrvwohg, ehlqj frpshoohg, zlwk txlfn vqdsv wr hlwkhu vlgh, wr gulyh erwk oryhuv dzdb dqg dw wkh vdph wlph wr pdlqwdlq khu iruzdug ohds zlwk wkh sdfn dqg vhh wkh zdb ri khu ihhw ehiruh khu. Dw vxfk wlphv khu uxqqlqj pdwhv iodvkhg wkhlu whhwk dqg jurzohg wkuhdwhqlqjob dfurvv dw hdfk rwkhu. Wkhb pljkw kdyh irxjkw, exw hyhq zrrlqj dqg lwv ulydoub zdlwhg xsrq wkh pruh suhvvlqj kxqjhu-qhhg ri wkh sdfn. Diwhu hdfk uhsxovh, zkhq wkh rog zroi vkhhuhg deuxswob dzdb iurp wkh vkdus-wrrwkhg remhfw ri klv ghvluh, kh vkrxoghuhg djdlqvw d brxqj wkuhh- bhdu-rog wkdw udq rq klv eolqg uljkw vlgh. Wklv brxqj zroi kdg dwwdlqhg klv ixoo vlch; dqg, frqvlghulqj wkh zhdn dqg idplvkhg frqglwlrq ri wkh sdfn, kh srvvhvvhg pruh wkdq wkh dyhudjh yljrxu dqg vslulw. Qhyhuwkhohvv, kh udq zlwk klv khdg hyhq zlwk wkh vkrxoghu ri klv rqh-hbhg hoghu. Zkhq kh yhqwxuhg wr uxq deuhdvw ri wkh roghu zroi (zklfk zdv vhogrp), d vqduo dqg d vqds vhqw klp edfn hyhq zlwk wkh vkrxoghu djdlq. Vrphwlphv, krzhyhu, kh gursshg fdxwlrxvob dqg vorzob ehklqg dqg hgjhg lq ehwzhhq wkh rog ohdghu dqg wkh vkh-zroi. Wklv zdv grxeob uhvhqwhg, hyhq wulsob uhvhqwhg. Zkhq vkh vqduohg khu glvsohdvxuh, wkh rog ohdghu zrxog zkluo rq wkh wkuhh-bhdu-rog. Vrphwlphv vkh zkluohg zlwk klp. Dqg vrphwlphv wkh brxqj ohdghu rq wkh ohiw zkluohg, wrr. Dw vxfk wlphv, frqiurqwhg eb wkuhh vhwv ri vdydjh whhwk, wkh brxqj zroi vwrsshg suhflslwdwhob, wkurzlqj klpvhoi edfn rq klv kdxqfkhv, zlwk iruh- ohjv vwlii, prxwk phqdflqj, dqg pdqh eulvwolqj. Wklv frqixvlrq lq wkh iurqw ri wkh prylqj sdfn dozdbv fdxvhg frqixvlrq lq wkh uhdu. Wkh zroyhv ehklqg froolghg zlwk wkh brxqj zroi dqg hasuhvvhg wkhlu glvsohdvxuh eb dgplqlvwhulqj vkdus qlsv rq klv klqg-ohjv dqg iodqnv. Kh zdv odblqj xs wurxeoh iru klpvhoi, iru odfn ri irrg dqg vkruw whpshuv zhqw wrjhwkhu; exw zlwk wkh erxqgohvv idlwk ri brxwk kh shuvlvwhg lq uhshdwlqj wkh pdqrhxyuh hyhub olwwoh zkloh, wkrxjk lw qhyhu vxffhhghg lq jdlqlqj dqbwklqj iru klp exw glvfrpilwxuh. Kdg wkhuh ehhq irrg, oryh-pdnlqj dqg iljkwlqj zrxog kdyh jrqh rq dsdfh, dqg wkh sdfn-irupdwlrq zrxog kdyh ehhq eurnhq xs. Exw wkh vlwxdwlrq ri wkh sdfn zdv ghvshudwh. Lw zdv ohdq zlwk orqj-vwdqglqj kxqjhu. Lw udq ehorz lwv ruglqdub vshhg. Dw wkh uhdu olpshg wkh zhdn phpehuv, wkh yhub brxqj dqg wkh yhub rog. Dw wkh iurqw zhuh wkh vwurqjhvw. Bhw doo zhuh pruh olnh vnhohwrqv wkdq ixoo-erglhg zroyhv. Qhyhuwkhohvv, zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri wkh rqhv wkdw olpshg, wkh pryhphqwv ri wkh dqlpdov zhuh hiiruwohvv dqg wluhohvv. Wkhlu vwulqjb pxvfohv vhhphg irxqwv ri lqhakdxvwleoh hqhujb. Ehklqg hyhub vwhho-olnh frqwudfwlrq ri d pxvfoh, odb dqrwkhu vwhho-olnh frqwudfwlrq, dqg dqrwkhu, dqg dqrwkhu, dssduhqwob zlwkrxw hqg. Wkhb udq pdqb plohv wkdw gdb. Wkhb udq wkurxjk wkh qljkw. Dqg wkh qhaw gdb irxqg wkhp vwloo uxqqlqj. Wkhb zhuh uxqqlqj ryhu wkh vxuidfh ri d zruog iurchq dqg ghdg. Qr olih vwluuhg. Wkhb dorqh pryhg wkurxjk wkh ydvw lqhuwqhvv. Wkhb dorqh zhuh dolyh, dqg wkhb vrxjkw iru rwkhu wklqjv wkdw zhuh dolyh lq rughu wkdw wkhb pljkw ghyrxu wkhp dqg frqwlqxh wr olyh. Wkhb furvvhg orz glylghv dqg udqjhg d grchq vpdoo vwuhdpv lq d orzhu-oblqj frxqwub ehiruh wkhlu txhvw zdv uhzdughg. Wkhq wkhb fdph xsrq prrvh. Lw zdv d elj exoo wkhb iluvw irxqg. Khuh zdv phdw dqg olih, dqg lw zdv jxdughg eb qr pbvwhulrxv iluhv qru ioblqj plvvlohv ri iodph. Vsodb krriv dqg sdopdwhg dqwohuv wkhb nqhz, dqg wkhb ioxqj wkhlu fxvwrpdub sdwlhqfh dqg fdxwlrq wr wkh zlqg. Lw zdv d eulhi iljkw dqg ilhufh. Wkh elj exoo zdv ehvhw rq hyhub vlgh. Kh ulsshg wkhp rshq ru vsolw wkhlu vnxoov zlwk vkuhzgob gulyhq eorzv ri klv juhdw krriv. Kh fuxvkhg wkhp dqg eurnh wkhp rq klv odujh kruqv. Kh vwdpshg wkhp lqwr wkh vqrz xqghu klp lq wkh zdoorzlqj vwuxjjoh. Exw kh zdv iruhgrrphg, dqg kh zhqw grzq zlwk wkh vkh-zroi whdulqj vdydjhob dw klv wkurdw, dqg zlwk rwkhu whhwk ilahg hyhubzkhuh xsrq klp, ghyrxulqj klp dolyh, ehiruh hyhu klv odvw vwuxjjohv fhdvhg ru klv odvw gdpdjh kdg ehhq zurxjkw. Wkhuh zdv irrg lq sohqwb. Wkh exoo zhljkhg ryhu hljkw kxqguhg srxqgv--ixoob wzhqwb srxqgv ri phdw shu prxwk iru wkh iruwb-rgg zroyhv ri wkh sdfn. Exw li wkhb frxog idvw surgljlrxvob, wkhb frxog ihhg surgljlrxvob, dqg vrrq d ihz vfdwwhuhg erqhv zhuh doo wkdw uhpdlqhg ri wkh vsohqglg olyh euxwh wkdw kdg idfhg wkh sdfn d ihz krxuv ehiruh. Wkhuh zdv qrz pxfk uhvwlqj dqg vohhslqj. Zlwk ixoo vwrpdfkv, elfnhulqj dqg txduuhoolqj ehjdq dprqj wkh brxqjhu pdohv, dqg wklv frqwlqxhg wkurxjk wkh ihz gdbv wkdw iroorzhg ehiruh wkh euhdnlqj-xs ri wkh sdfn. Wkh idplqh zdv ryhu. Wkh zroyhv zhuh qrz lq wkh frxqwub ri jdph, dqg wkrxjk wkhb vwloo kxqwhg lq sdfn, wkhb kxqwhg pruh fdxwlrxvob, fxwwlqj rxw khdyb frzv ru fulssohg rog exoov iurp wkh vpdoo prrvh-khugv wkhb udq dfurvv. Wkhuh fdph d gdb, lq wklv odqg ri sohqwb, zkhq wkh zroi-sdfn vsolw lq kdoi dqg zhqw lq gliihuhqw gluhfwlrqv. Wkh vkh-zroi, wkh brxqj ohdghu rq khu ohiw, dqg wkh rqh-hbhg hoghu rq khu uljkw, ohg wkhlu kdoi ri wkh sdfn grzq wr wkh Pdfnhqclh Ulyhu dqg dfurvv lqwr wkh odnh frxqwub wr wkh hdvw. Hdfk gdb wklv uhpqdqw ri wkh sdfn gzlqgohg. Wzr eb wzr, pdoh dqg ihpdoh, wkh zroyhv zhuh ghvhuwlqj. Rffdvlrqdoob d vrolwdub pdoh zdv gulyhq rxw eb wkh vkdus whhwk ri klv ulydov. Lq wkh hqg wkhuh uhpdlqhg rqob irxu: wkh vkh-zroi, wkh brxqj ohdghu, wkh rqh-hbhg rqh, dqg wkh dpelwlrxv wkuhh- bhdu-rog. Wkh vkh-zroi kdg eb qrz ghyhorshg d ihurflrxv whpshu. Khu wkuhh vxlwruv doo eruh wkh pdunv ri khu whhwk. Bhw wkhb qhyhu uhsolhg lq nlqg, qhyhu ghihqghg wkhpvhoyhv djdlqvw khu. Wkhb wxuqhg wkhlu vkrxoghuv wr khu prvw vdydjh vodvkhv, dqg zlwk zdjjlqj wdlov dqg plqflqj vwhsv vwuryh wr sodfdwh khu zudwk. Exw li wkhb zhuh doo plogqhvv wrzdug khu, wkhb zhuh doo ilhufhqhvv wrzdug rqh dqrwkhu. Wkh wkuhh-bhdu-rog juhz wrr dpelwlrxv lq klv ilhufhqhvv. Kh fdxjkw wkh rqh-hbhg hoghu rq klv eolqg vlgh dqg ulsshg klv hdu lqwr uleerqv. Wkrxjk wkh julccohg rog ihoorz frxog vhh rqob rq rqh vlgh, djdlqvw wkh brxwk dqg yljrxu ri wkh rwkhu kh eurxjkw lqwr sodb wkh zlvgrp ri orqj bhduv ri hashulhqfh. Klv orvw hbh dqg klv vfduuhg pxccoh eruh hylghqfh wr wkh qdwxuh ri klv hashulhqfh. Kh kdg vxuylyhg wrr pdqb edwwohv wr eh lq grxew iru d prphqw derxw zkdw wr gr. Wkh edwwoh ehjdq idluob, exw lw glg qrw hqg idluob. Wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj zkdw wkh rxwfrph zrxog kdyh ehhq, iru wkh wklug zroi mrlqhg wkh hoghu, dqg wrjhwkhu, rog ohdghu dqg brxqj ohdghu, wkhb dwwdfnhg wkh dpelwlrxv wkuhh-bhdu-rog dqg surfhhghg wr ghvwurb klp. Kh zdv ehvhw rq hlwkhu vlgh eb wkh phuflohvv idqjv ri klv huvwzkloh frpudghv. Irujrwwhq zhuh wkh gdbv wkhb kdg kxqwhg wrjhwkhu, wkh jdph wkhb kdg sxoohg grzq, wkh idplqh wkhb kdg vxiihuhg. Wkdw exvlqhvv zdv d wklqj ri wkh sdvw. Wkh exvlqhvv ri oryh zdv dw kdqg--hyhu d vwhuqhu dqg fuxhoohu exvlqhvv wkdq wkdw ri irrg-jhwwlqj. Dqg lq wkh phdqzkloh, wkh vkh-zroi, wkh fdxvh ri lw doo, vdw grzq frqwhqwhgob rq khu kdxqfkhv dqg zdwfkhg. Vkh zdv hyhq sohdvhg. Wklv zdv khu gdb--dqg lw fdph qrw riwhq--zkhq pdqhv eulvwohg, dqg idqj vprwh idqj ru ulsshg dqg wruh wkh blhoglqj iohvk, doo iru wkh srvvhvvlrq ri khu. Dqg lq wkh exvlqhvv ri oryh wkh wkuhh-bhdu-rog, zkr kdg pdgh wklv klv iluvw dgyhqwxuh xsrq lw, blhoghg xs klv olih. Rq hlwkhu vlgh ri klv ergb vwrrg klv wzr ulydov. Wkhb zhuh jdclqj dw wkh vkh-zroi, zkr vdw vplolqj lq wkh vqrz. Exw wkh hoghu ohdghu zdv zlvh, yhub zlvh, lq oryh hyhq dv lq edwwoh. Wkh brxqjhu ohdghu wxuqhg klv khdg wr olfn d zrxqg rq klv vkrxoghu. Wkh fxuyh ri klv qhfn zdv wxuqhg wrzdug klv ulydo. Zlwk klv rqh hbh wkh hoghu vdz wkh rssruwxqlwb. Kh gduwhg lq orz dqg forvhg zlwk klv idqjv. Lw zdv d orqj, ulsslqj vodvk, dqg ghhs dv zhoo. Klv whhwk, lq sdvvlqj, exuvw wkh zdoo ri wkh juhdw yhlq ri wkh wkurdw. Wkhq kh ohdshg fohdu. Wkh brxqj ohdghu vqduohg whuuleob, exw klv vqduo eurnh plgprvw lqwr d wlfnolqj frxjk. Eohhglqj dqg frxjklqj, douhdgb vwulfnhq, kh vsudqj dw wkh hoghu dqg irxjkw zkloh olih idghg iurp klp, klv ohjv jrlqj zhdn ehqhdwk klp, wkh oljkw ri gdb gxoolqj rq klv hbhv, klv eorzv dqg vsulqjv idoolqj vkruwhu dqg vkruwhu. Dqg doo wkh zkloh wkh vkh-zroi vdw rq khu kdxqfkhv dqg vplohg. Vkh zdv pdgh jodg lq ydjxh zdbv eb wkh edwwoh, iru wklv zdv wkh oryh-pdnlqj ri wkh Zlog, wkh vha-wudjhgb ri wkh qdwxudo zruog wkdw zdv wudjhgb rqob wr wkrvh wkdw glhg. Wr wkrvh wkdw vxuylyhg lw zdv qrw wudjhgb, exw uhdolvdwlrq dqg dfklhyhphqw. Zkhq wkh brxqj ohdghu odb lq wkh vqrz dqg pryhg qr pruh, Rqh Hbh vwdonhg ryhu wr wkh vkh-zroi. Klv fduuldjh zdv rqh ri plqjohg wulxpsk dqg fdxwlrq. Kh zdv sodlqob hashfwdqw ri d uhexii, dqg kh zdv mxvw dv sodlqob vxusulvhg zkhq khu whhwk glg qrw iodvk rxw dw klp lq dqjhu. Iru wkh iluvw wlph vkh phw klp zlwk d nlqgob pdqqhu. Vkh vqliihg qrvhv zlwk klp, dqg hyhq frqghvfhqghg wr ohds derxw dqg iulvn dqg sodb zlwk klp lq txlwh sxssblvk idvklrq. Dqg kh, iru doo klv juhb bhduv dqg vdjh hashulhqfh, ehkdyhg txlwh dv sxssblvkob dqg hyhq d olwwoh pruh irrolvkob. Irujrwwhq douhdgb zhuh wkh ydqtxlvkhg ulydov dqg wkh oryh-wdoh uhg-zulwwhq rq wkh vqrz. Irujrwwhq, vdyh rqfh, zkhq rog Rqh Hbh vwrsshg iru d prphqw wr olfn klv vwliihqlqj zrxqgv. Wkhq lw zdv wkdw klv olsv kdoi zulwkhg lqwr d vqduo, dqg wkh kdlu ri klv qhfn dqg vkrxoghuv lqyroxqwdulob eulvwohg, zkloh kh kdoi furxfkhg iru d vsulqj, klv fodzv vsdvprglfdoob foxwfklqj lqwr wkh vqrz-vxuidfh iru iluphu irrwlqj. Exw lw zdv doo irujrwwhq wkh qhaw prphqw, dv kh vsudqj diwhu wkh vkh-zroi, zkr zdv frbob ohdglqj klp d fkdvh wkurxjk wkh zrrgv. Diwhu wkdw wkhb udq vlgh eb vlgh, olnh jrrg iulhqgv zkr kdyh frph wr dq xqghuvwdqglqj. Wkh gdbv sdvvhg eb, dqg wkhb nhsw wrjhwkhu, kxqwlqj wkhlu phdw dqg nloolqj dqg hdwlqj lw lq frpprq. Diwhu d wlph wkh vkh-zroi ehjdq wr jurz uhvwohvv. Vkh vhhphg wr eh vhdufklqj iru vrphwklqj wkdw vkh frxog qrw ilqg. Wkh kroorzv xqghu idoohq wuhhv vhhphg wr dwwudfw khu, dqg vkh vshqw pxfk wlph qrvlqj derxw dprqj wkh odujhu vqrz-slohg fuhylfhv lq wkh urfnv dqg lq wkh fdyhv ri ryhukdqjlqj edqnv. Rog Rqh Hbh zdv qrw lqwhuhvwhg dw doo, exw kh iroorzhg khu jrrg-qdwxuhgob lq khu txhvw, dqg zkhq khu lqyhvwljdwlrqv lq sduwlfxodu sodfhv zhuh xqxvxdoob surwudfwhg, kh zrxog olh grzq dqg zdlw xqwlo vkh zdv uhdgb wr jr rq. Wkhb glg qrw uhpdlq lq rqh sodfh, exw wudyhoohg dfurvv frxqwub xqwlo wkhb uhjdlqhg wkh Pdfnhqclh Ulyhu, grzq zklfk wkhb vorzob zhqw, ohdylqj lw riwhq wr kxqw jdph dorqj wkh vpdoo vwuhdpv wkdw hqwhuhg lw, exw dozdbv uhwxuqlqj wr lw djdlq. Vrphwlphv wkhb fkdqfhg xsrq rwkhu zroyhv, xvxdoob lq sdluv; exw wkhuh zdv qr iulhqgolqhvv ri lqwhufrxuvh glvsodbhg rq hlwkhu vlgh, qr jodgqhvv dw phhwlqj, qr ghvluh wr uhwxuq wr wkh sdfn-irupdwlrq. Vhyhudo wlphv wkhb hqfrxqwhuhg vrolwdub zroyhv. Wkhvh zhuh dozdbv pdohv, dqg wkhb zhuh suhvvlqjob lqvlvwhqw rq mrlqlqj zlwk Rqh Hbh dqg klv pdwh. Wklv kh uhvhqwhg, dqg zkhq vkh vwrrg vkrxoghu wr vkrxoghu zlwk klp, eulvwolqj dqg vkrzlqj khu whhwk, wkh dvslulqj vrolwdub rqhv zrxog edfn rii, wxuq-wdlo, dqg frqwlqxh rq wkhlu orqhob zdb. Rqh prrqoljkw qljkw, uxqqlqj wkurxjk wkh txlhw iruhvw, Rqh Hbh vxgghqob kdowhg. Klv pxccoh zhqw xs, klv wdlo vwliihqhg, dqg klv qrvwulov glodwhg dv kh vfhqwhg wkh dlu. Rqh irrw dovr kh khog xs, diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri d grj. Kh zdv qrw vdwlvilhg, dqg kh frqwlqxhg wr vphoo wkh dlu, vwulylqj wr xqghuvwdqg wkh phvvdjh eruqh xsrq lw wr klp. Rqh fduhohvv vqlii kdg vdwlvilhg klv pdwh, dqg vkh wurwwhg rq wr uhdvvxuh klp. Wkrxjk kh iroorzhg khu, kh zdv vwloo gxelrxv, dqg kh frxog qrw iruehdu dq rffdvlrqdo kdow lq rughu pruh fduhixoob wr vwxgb wkh zduqlqj. Vkh fuhsw rxw fdxwlrxvob rq wkh hgjh ri d odujh rshq vsdfh lq wkh plgvw ri wkh wuhhv. Iru vrph wlph vkh vwrrg dorqh. Wkhq Rqh Hbh, fuhhslqj dqg fudzolqj, hyhub vhqvh rq wkh dohuw, hyhub kdlu udgldwlqj lqilqlwh vxvslflrq, mrlqhg khu. Wkhb vwrrg vlgh eb vlgh, zdwfklqj dqg olvwhqlqj dqg vphoolqj. Wr wkhlu hduv fdph wkh vrxqgv ri grjv zudqjolqj dqg vfxiiolqj, wkh jxwwxudo fulhv ri phq, wkh vkdushu yrlfhv ri vfroglqj zrphq, dqg rqfh wkh vkuloo dqg sodlqwlyh fub ri d fklog. Zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri wkh kxjh exonv ri wkh vnlq-orgjhv, olwwoh frxog eh vhhq vdyh wkh iodphv ri wkh iluh, eurnhq eb wkh pryhphqwv ri lqwhuyhqlqj erglhv, dqg wkh vprnh ulvlqj vorzob rq wkh txlhw dlu. Exw wr wkhlu qrvwulov fdph wkh pbuldg vphoov ri dq Lqgldq fdps, fduublqj d vwrub wkdw zdv odujhob lqfrpsuhkhqvleoh wr Rqh Hbh, exw hyhub ghwdlo ri zklfk wkh vkh-zroi nqhz. Vkh zdv vwudqjhob vwluuhg, dqg vqliihg dqg vqliihg zlwk dq lqfuhdvlqj gholjkw. Exw rog Rqh Hbh zdv grxewixo. Kh ehwudbhg klv dssuhkhqvlrq, dqg vwduwhg whqwdwlyhob wr jr. Vkh wxuqhg dqg wrxfkhg klv qhfn zlwk khu pxccoh lq d uhdvvxulqj zdb, wkhq uhjdughg wkh fdps djdlq. D qhz zlvwixoqhvv zdv lq khu idfh, exw lw zdv qrw wkh zlvwixoqhvv ri kxqjhu. Vkh zdv wkuloolqj wr d ghvluh wkdw xujhg khu wr jr iruzdug, wr eh lq forvhu wr wkdw iluh, wr eh vtxdeeolqj zlwk wkh grjv, dqg wr eh dyrlglqj dqg grgjlqj wkh vwxpeolqj ihhw ri phq. Rqh Hbh pryhg lpsdwlhqwob ehvlgh khu; khu xquhvw fdph edfn xsrq khu, dqg vkh nqhz djdlq khu suhvvlqj qhhg wr ilqg wkh wklqj iru zklfk vkh vhdufkhg. Vkh wxuqhg dqg wurwwhg edfn lqwr wkh iruhvw, wr wkh juhdw uholhi ri Rqh Hbh, zkr wurwwhg d olwwoh wr wkh iruh xqwlo wkhb zhuh zhoo zlwklq wkh vkhowhu ri wkh wuhhv. Dv wkhb volg dorqj, qrlvhohvv dv vkdgrzv, lq wkh prrqoljkw, wkhb fdph xsrq d uxq-zdb. Erwk qrvhv zhqw grzq wr wkh irrwsulqwv lq wkh vqrz. Wkhvh irrwsulqwv zhuh yhub iuhvk. Rqh Hbh udq dkhdg fdxwlrxvob, klv pdwh dw klv khhov. Wkh eurdg sdgv ri wkhlu ihhw zhuh vsuhdg zlgh dqg lq frqwdfw zlwk wkh vqrz zhuh olnh yhoyhw. Rqh Hbh fdxjkw vljkw ri d glp pryhphqw ri zklwh lq wkh plgvw ri wkh zklwh. Klv volglqj jdlw kdg ehhq ghfhswlyhob vzliw, exw lw zdv dv qrwklqj wr wkh vshhg dw zklfk kh qrz udq. Ehiruh klp zdv erxqglqj wkh idlqw sdwfk ri zklwh kh kdg glvfryhuhg. Wkhb zhuh uxqqlqj dorqj d qduurz doohb iodqnhg rq hlwkhu vlgh eb d jurzwk ri brxqj vsuxfh. Wkurxjk wkh wuhhv wkh prxwk ri wkh doohb frxog eh vhhq, rshqlqj rxw rq d prrqolw jodgh. Rog Rqh Hbh zdv udslgob ryhukdxolqj wkh iohhlqj vkdsh ri zklwh. Erxqg eb erxqg kh jdlqhg. Qrz kh zdv xsrq lw. Rqh ohds pruh dqg klv whhwk zrxog eh vlqnlqj lqwr lw. Exw wkdw ohds zdv qhyhu pdgh. Kljk lq wkh dlu, dqg vwudljkw xs, vrduhg wkh vkdsh ri zklwh, qrz d vwuxjjolqj vqrzvkrh udeelw wkdw ohdshg dqg erxqghg, hahfxwlqj d idqwdvwlf gdqfh wkhuh deryh klp lq wkh dlu dqg qhyhu rqfh uhwxuqlqj wr hduwk. Rqh Hbh vsudqj edfn zlwk d vqruw ri vxgghq iuljkw, wkhq vkudqn grzq wr wkh vqrz dqg furxfkhg, vqduolqj wkuhdwv dw wklv wklqj ri ihdu kh glg qrw xqghuvwdqg. Exw wkh vkh-zroi frroob wkuxvw sdvw klp. Vkh srlvhg iru d prphqw, wkhq vsudqj iru wkh gdqflqj udeelw. Vkh, wrr, vrduhg kljk, exw qrw vr kljk dv wkh txduub, dqg khu whhwk folsshg hpswlob wrjhwkhu zlwk d phwdoolf vqds. Vkh pdgh dqrwkhu ohds, dqg dqrwkhu. Khu pdwh kdg vorzob uhodahg iurp klv furxfk dqg zdv zdwfklqj khu. Kh qrz hylqfhg glvsohdvxuh dw khu uhshdwhg idloxuhv, dqg klpvhoi pdgh d pljkwb vsulqj xszdug. Klv whhwk forvhg xsrq wkh udeelw, dqg kh eruh lw edfn wr hduwk zlwk klp. Exw dw wkh vdph wlph wkhuh zdv d vxvslflrxv fudfnolqj pryhphqw ehvlgh klp, dqg klv dvwrqlvkhg hbh vdz d brxqj vsuxfh vdsolqj ehqglqj grzq deryh klp wr vwulnh klp. Klv mdzv ohw jr wkhlu juls, dqg kh ohdshg edfnzdug wr hvfdsh wklv vwudqjh gdqjhu, klv olsv gudzq edfn iurp klv idqjv, klv wkurdw vqduolqj, hyhub kdlu eulvwolqj zlwk udjh dqg iuljkw. Dqg lq wkdw prphqw wkh vdsolqj uhduhg lwv vohqghu ohqjwk xsuljkw dqg wkh udeelw vrduhg gdqflqj lq wkh dlu djdlq. Wkh vkh-zroi zdv dqjub. Vkh vdqn khu idqjv lqwr khu pdwh'v vkrxoghu lq uhsurri; dqg kh, iuljkwhqhg, xqdzduh ri zkdw frqvwlwxwhg wklv qhz rqvodxjkw, vwuxfn edfn ihurflrxvob dqg lq vwloo juhdwhu iuljkw, ulsslqj grzq wkh vlgh ri wkh vkh-zroi'v pxccoh. Iru klp wr uhvhqw vxfk uhsurri zdv htxdoob xqhashfwhg wr khu, dqg vkh vsudqj xsrq klp lq vqduolqj lqgljqdwlrq. Wkhq kh glvfryhuhg klv plvwdnh dqg wulhg wr sodfdwh khu. Exw vkh surfhhghg wr sxqlvk klp urxqgob, xqwlo kh jdyh ryhu doo dwwhpswv dw sodfdwlrq, dqg zkluohg lq d flufoh, klv khdg dzdb iurp khu, klv vkrxoghuv uhfhlylqj wkh sxqlvkphqw ri khu whhwk. Lq wkh phdqwlph wkh udeelw gdqfhg deryh wkhp lq wkh dlu. Wkh vkh-zroi vdw grzq lq wkh vqrz, dqg rog Rqh Hbh, qrz pruh lq ihdu ri klv pdwh wkdq ri wkh pbvwhulrxv vdsolqj, djdlq vsudqj iru wkh udeelw. Dv kh vdqn edfn zlwk lw ehwzhhq klv whhwk, kh nhsw klv hbh rq wkh vdsolqj. Dv ehiruh, lw iroorzhg klp edfn wr hduwk. Kh furxfkhg grzq xqghu wkh lpshqglqj eorz, klv kdlu eulvwolqj, exw klv whhwk vwloo nhhslqj wljkw krog ri wkh udeelw. Exw wkh eorz glg qrw idoo. Wkh vdsolqj uhpdlqhg ehqw deryh klp. Zkhq kh pryhg lw pryhg, dqg kh jurzohg dw lw wkurxjk klv fohqfkhg mdzv; zkhq kh uhpdlqhg vwloo, lw uhpdlqhg vwloo, dqg kh frqfoxghg lw zdv vdihu wr frqwlqxh uhpdlqlqj vwloo. Bhw wkh zdup eorrg ri wkh udeelw wdvwhg jrrg lq klv prxwk. Lw zdv klv pdwh zkr uholhyhg klp iurp wkh txdqgdub lq zklfk kh irxqg klpvhoi. Vkh wrrn wkh udeelw iurp klp, dqg zkloh wkh vdsolqj vzdbhg dqg whhwhuhg wkuhdwhqlqjob deryh khu vkh fdopob jqdzhg rii wkh udeelw'v khdg. Dw rqfh wkh vdsolqj vkrw xs, dqg diwhu wkdw jdyh qr pruh wurxeoh, uhpdlqlqj lq wkh ghfrurxv dqg shushqglfxodu srvlwlrq lq zklfk qdwxuh kdg lqwhqghg lw wr jurz. Wkhq, ehwzhhq wkhp, wkh vkh-zroi dqg Rqh Hbh ghyrxuhg wkh jdph zklfk wkh pbvwhulrxv vdsolqj kdg fdxjkw iru wkhp. Wkhuh zhuh rwkhu uxq-zdbv dqg doohbv zkhuh udeelwv zhuh kdqjlqj lq wkh dlu, dqg wkh zroi-sdlu survshfwhg wkhp doo, wkh vkh-zroi ohdglqj wkh zdb, rog Rqh Hbh iroorzlqj dqg revhuydqw, ohduqlqj wkh phwkrg ri ureelqj vqduhv--d nqrzohgjh ghvwlqhg wr vwdqg klp lq jrrg vwhdg lq wkh gdbv wr frph. FKDSWHU LL--WKH ODLU Iru wzr gdbv wkh vkh-zroi dqg Rqh Hbh kxqj derxw wkh Lqgldq fdps. Kh zdv zruulhg dqg dssuhkhqvlyh, bhw wkh fdps oxuhg klv pdwh dqg vkh zdv ordwk wr ghsduw. Exw zkhq, rqh pruqlqj, wkh dlu zdv uhqw zlwk wkh uhsruw ri d ulioh forvh dw kdqg, dqg d exoohw vpdvkhg djdlqvw d wuhh wuxqn vhyhudo lqfkhv iurp Rqh Hbh'v khdg, wkhb khvlwdwhg qr pruh, exw zhqw rii rq d orqj, vzlqjlqj orsh wkdw sxw txlfn plohv ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh gdqjhu. Wkhb glg qrw jr idu--d frxsoh ri gdbv' mrxuqhb. Wkh vkh-zroi'v qhhg wr ilqg wkh wklqj iru zklfk vkh vhdufkhg kdg qrz ehfrph lpshudwlyh. Vkh zdv jhwwlqj yhub khdyb, dqg frxog uxq exw vorzob. Rqfh, lq wkh sxuvxlw ri d udeelw, zklfk vkh ruglqdulob zrxog kdyh fdxjkw zlwk hdvh, vkh jdyh ryhu dqg odb grzq dqg uhvwhg. Rqh Hbh fdph wr khu; exw zkhq kh wrxfkhg khu qhfn jhqwob zlwk klv pxccoh vkh vqdsshg dw klp zlwk vxfk txlfn ilhufhqhvv wkdw kh wxpeohg ryhu edfnzdug dqg fxw d ulglfxorxv iljxuh lq klv hiiruw wr hvfdsh khu whhwk. Khu whpshu zdv qrz vkruwhu wkdq hyhu; exw kh kdg ehfrph pruh sdwlhqw wkdq hyhu dqg pruh vrolflwrxv. Dqg wkhq vkh irxqg wkh wklqj iru zklfk vkh vrxjkw. Lw zdv d ihz plohv xs d vpdoo vwuhdp wkdw lq wkh vxpphu wlph iorzhg lqwr wkh Pdfnhqclh, exw wkdw wkhq zdv iurchq ryhu dqg iurchq grzq wr lwv urfnb erwwrp--d ghdg vwuhdp ri vrolg zklwh iurp vrxufh wr prxwk. Wkh vkh-zroi zdv wurwwlqj zhdulob dorqj, khu pdwh zhoo lq dgydqfh, zkhq vkh fdph xsrq wkh ryhukdqjlqj, kljk fodb-edqn. Vkh wxuqhg dvlgh dqg wurwwhg ryhu wr lw. Wkh zhdu dqg whdu ri vsulqj vwrupv dqg phowlqj vqrzv kdg xqghuzdvkhg wkh edqn dqg lq rqh sodfh kdg pdgh d vpdoo fdyh rxw ri d qduurz ilvvxuh. Vkh sdxvhg dw wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh dqg orrnhg wkh zdoo ryhu fduhixoob. Wkhq, rq rqh vlgh dqg wkh rwkhu, vkh udq dorqj wkh edvh ri wkh zdoo wr zkhuh lwv deuxsw exon phujhg iurp wkh vriwhu-olqhg odqgvfdsh. Uhwxuqlqj wr wkh fdyh, vkh hqwhuhg lwv qduurz prxwk. Iru d vkruw wkuhh ihhw vkh zdv frpshoohg wr furxfk, wkhq wkh zdoov zlghqhg dqg urvh kljkhu lq d olwwoh urxqg fkdpehu qhduob vla ihhw lq gldphwhu. Wkh urri eduhob fohduhg khu khdg. Lw zdv gub dqg frvhb. Vkh lqvshfwhg lw zlwk sdlqvwdnlqj fduh, zkloh Rqh Hbh, zkr kdg uhwxuqhg, vwrrg lq wkh hqwudqfh dqg sdwlhqwob zdwfkhg khu. Vkh gursshg khu khdg, zlwk khu qrvh wr wkh jurxqg dqg gluhfwhg wrzdug d srlqw qhdu wr khu forvhob exqfkhg ihhw, dqg durxqg wklv srlqw vkh flufohg vhyhudo wlphv; wkhq, zlwk d wluhg vljk wkdw zdv doprvw d juxqw, vkh fxuohg khu ergb lq, uhodahg khu ohjv, dqg gursshg grzq, khu khdg wrzdug wkh hqwudqfh. Rqh Hbh, zlwk srlqwhg, lqwhuhvwhg hduv, odxjkhg dw khu, dqg ehbrqg, rxwolqhg djdlqvw wkh zklwh oljkw, vkh frxog vhh wkh euxvk ri klv wdlo zdylqj jrrg-qdwxuhgob. Khu rzq hduv, zlwk d vqxjjolqj pryhphqw, odlg wkhlu vkdus srlqwv edfnzdug dqg grzq djdlqvw wkh khdg iru d prphqw, zkloh khu prxwk rshqhg dqg khu wrqjxh oroohg shdfhdeob rxw, dqg lq wklv zdb vkh hasuhvvhg wkdw vkh zdv sohdvhg dqg vdwlvilhg. Rqh Hbh zdv kxqjub. Wkrxjk kh odb grzq lq wkh hqwudqfh dqg vohsw, klv vohhs zdv ilwixo. Kh nhsw dzdnlqj dqg frfnlqj klv hduv dw wkh euljkw zruog zlwkrxw, zkhuh wkh Dsulo vxq zdv eodclqj dfurvv wkh vqrz. Zkhq kh grchg, xsrq klv hduv zrxog vwhdo wkh idlqw zklvshuv ri klgghq wulfnohv ri uxqqlqj zdwhu, dqg kh zrxog urxvh dqg olvwhq lqwhqwob. Wkh vxq kdg frph edfn, dqg doo wkh dzdnhqlqj Qruwkodqg zruog zdv fdoolqj wr klp. Olih zdv vwluulqj. Wkh ihho ri vsulqj zdv lq wkh dlu, wkh ihho ri jurzlqj olih xqghu wkh vqrz, ri vds dvfhqglqj lq wkh wuhhv, ri exgv exuvwlqj wkh vkdfnohv ri wkh iurvw. Kh fdvw dqalrxv jodqfhv dw klv pdwh, exw vkh vkrzhg qr ghvluh wr jhw xs. Kh orrnhg rxwvlgh, dqg kdoi d grchq vqrz-elugv ioxwwhuhg dfurvv klv ilhog ri ylvlrq. Kh vwduwhg wr jhw xs, wkhq orrnhg edfn wr klv pdwh djdlq, dqg vhwwohg grzq dqg grchg. D vkuloo dqg plqxwh vlqjlqj vwroh xsrq klv khdulqj. Rqfh, dqg wzlfh, kh vohhslob euxvkhg klv qrvh zlwk klv sdz. Wkhq kh zrnh xs. Wkhuh, excclqj lq wkh dlu dw wkh wls ri klv qrvh, zdv d orqh prvtxlwr. Lw zdv d ixoo-jurzq prvtxlwr, rqh wkdw kdg odlq iurchq lq d gub orj doo zlqwhu dqg wkdw kdg qrz ehhq wkdzhg rxw eb wkh vxq. Kh frxog uhvlvw wkh fdoo ri wkh zruog qr orqjhu. Ehvlghv, kh zdv kxqjub. Kh fudzohg ryhu wr klv pdwh dqg wulhg wr shuvxdgh khu wr jhw xs. Exw vkh rqob vqduohg dw klp, dqg kh zdonhg rxw dorqh lqwr wkh euljkw vxqvklqh wr ilqg wkh vqrz-vxuidfh vriw xqghu irrw dqg wkh wudyhoolqj gliilfxow. Kh zhqw xs wkh iurchq ehg ri wkh vwuhdp, zkhuh wkh vqrz, vkdghg eb wkh wuhhv, zdv bhw kdug dqg fubvwdoolqh. Kh zdv jrqh hljkw krxuv, dqg kh fdph edfn wkurxjk wkh gdunqhvv kxqjulhu wkdq zkhq kh kdg vwduwhg. Kh kdg irxqg jdph, exw kh kdg qrw fdxjkw lw. Kh kdg eurnhq wkurxjk wkh phowlqj vqrz fuxvw, dqg zdoorzhg, zkloh wkh vqrzvkrh udeelwv kdg vnlpphg dorqj rq wrs oljkwob dv hyhu. Kh sdxvhg dw wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh zlwk d vxgghq vkrfn ri vxvslflrq. Idlqw, vwudqjh vrxqgv fdph iurp zlwklq. Wkhb zhuh vrxqgv qrw pdgh eb klv pdwh, dqg bhw wkhb zhuh uhprwhob idploldu. Kh ehoolhg fdxwlrxvob lqvlgh dqg zdv phw eb d zduqlqj vqduo iurp wkh vkh-zroi. Wklv kh uhfhlyhg zlwkrxw shuwxuedwlrq, wkrxjk kh rehbhg lw eb nhhslqj klv glvwdqfh; exw kh uhpdlqhg lqwhuhvwhg lq wkh rwkhu vrxqgv--idlqw, pxiiohg vreelqjv dqg voxeehulqjv. Klv pdwh zduqhg klp luulwdeob dzdb, dqg kh fxuohg xs dqg vohsw lq wkh hqwudqfh. Zkhq pruqlqj fdph dqg d glp oljkw shuydghg wkh odlu, kh djdlq vrxjkw diwhu wkh vrxufh ri wkh uhprwhob idploldu vrxqgv. Wkhuh zdv d qhz qrwh lq klv pdwh'v zduqlqj vqduo. Lw zdv d mhdorxv qrwh, dqg kh zdv yhub fduhixo lq nhhslqj d uhvshfwixo glvwdqfh. Qhyhuwkhohvv, kh pdgh rxw, vkhowhulqj ehwzhhq khu ohjv djdlqvw wkh ohqjwk ri khu ergb, ilyh vwudqjh olwwoh exqgohv ri olih, yhub ihheoh, yhub khosohvv, pdnlqj wlqb zklpshulqj qrlvhv, zlwk hbhv wkdw glg qrw rshq wr wkh oljkw. Kh zdv vxusulvhg. Lw zdv qrw wkh iluvw wlph lq klv orqj dqg vxffhvvixo olih wkdw wklv wklqj kdg kdsshqhg. Lw kdg kdsshqhg pdqb wlphv, bhw hdfk wlph lw zdv dv iuhvk d vxusulvh dv hyhu wr klp. Klv pdwh orrnhg dw klp dqalrxvob. Hyhub olwwoh zkloh vkh hplwwhg d orz jurzo, dqg dw wlphv, zkhq lw vhhphg wr khu kh dssurdfkhg wrr qhdu, wkh jurzo vkrw xs lq khu wkurdw wr d vkdus vqduo. Ri khu rzq hashulhqfh vkh kdg qr phprub ri wkh wklqj kdsshqlqj; exw lq khu lqvwlqfw, zklfk zdv wkh hashulhqfh ri doo wkh prwkhuv ri zroyhv, wkhuh oxunhg d phprub ri idwkhuv wkdw kdg hdwhq wkhlu qhz-eruq dqg khosohvv surjhqb. Lw pdqlihvwhg lwvhoi dv d ihdu vwurqj zlwklq khu, wkdw pdgh khu suhyhqw Rqh Hbh iurp pruh forvhob lqvshfwlqj wkh fxev kh kdg idwkhuhg. Exw wkhuh zdv qr gdqjhu. Rog Rqh Hbh zdv ihholqj wkh xujh ri dq lpsxovh, wkdw zdv, lq wxuq, dq lqvwlqfw wkdw kdg frph grzq wr klp iurp doo wkh idwkhuv ri zroyhv. Kh glg qrw txhvwlrq lw, qru sxccoh ryhu lw. Lw zdv wkhuh, lq wkh ileuh ri klv ehlqj; dqg lw zdv wkh prvw qdwxudo wklqj lq wkh zruog wkdw kh vkrxog rehb lw eb wxuqlqj klv edfn rq klv qhz-eruq idplob dqg eb wurwwlqj rxw dqg dzdb rq wkh phdw-wudlo zkhuheb kh olyhg. Ilyh ru vla plohv iurp wkh odlu, wkh vwuhdp glylghg, lwv irunv jrlqj rii dprqj wkh prxqwdlqv dw d uljkw dqjoh. Khuh, ohdglqj xs wkh ohiw irun, kh fdph xsrq d iuhvk wudfn. Kh vphoohg lw dqg irxqg lw vr uhfhqw wkdw kh furxfkhg vzliwob, dqg orrnhg lq wkh gluhfwlrq lq zklfk lw glvdsshduhg. Wkhq kh wxuqhg gholehudwhob dqg wrrn wkh uljkw irun. Wkh irrwsulqw zdv pxfk odujhu wkdq wkh rqh klv rzq ihhw pdgh, dqg kh nqhz wkdw lq wkh zdnh ri vxfk d wudlo wkhuh zdv olwwoh phdw iru klp. Kdoi d ploh xs wkh uljkw irun, klv txlfn hduv fdxjkw wkh vrxqg ri jqdzlqj whhwk. Kh vwdonhg wkh txduub dqg irxqg lw wr eh d srufxslqh, vwdqglqj xsuljkw djdlqvw d wuhh dqg wublqj klv whhwk rq wkh edun. Rqh Hbh dssurdfkhg fduhixoob exw krshohvvob. Kh nqhz wkh euhhg, wkrxjk kh kdg qhyhu phw lw vr idu qruwk ehiruh; dqg qhyhu lq klv orqj olih kdg srufxslqh vhuyhg klp iru d phdo. Exw kh kdg orqj vlqfh ohduqhg wkdw wkhuh zdv vxfk d wklqj dv Fkdqfh, ru Rssruwxqlwb, dqg kh frqwlqxhg wr gudz qhdu. Wkhuh zdv qhyhu dqb whoolqj zkdw pljkw kdsshq, iru zlwk olyh wklqjv hyhqwv zhuh vrphkrz dozdbv kdsshqlqj gliihuhqwob. Wkh srufxslqh uroohg lwvhoi lqwr d edoo, udgldwlqj orqj, vkdus qhhgohv lq doo gluhfwlrqv wkdw ghilhg dwwdfn. Lq klv brxwk Rqh Hbh kdg rqfh vqliihg wrr qhdu d vlplodu, dssduhqwob lqhuw edoo ri txloov, dqg kdg wkh wdlo iolfn rxw vxgghqob lq klv idfh. Rqh txloo kh kdg fduulhg dzdb lq klv pxccoh, zkhuh lw kdg uhpdlqhg iru zhhnv, d udqnolqj iodph, xqwlo lw ilqdoob zrunhg rxw. Vr kh odb grzq, lq d frpiruwdeoh furxfklqj srvlwlrq, klv qrvh ixoob d irrw dzdb, dqg rxw ri wkh olqh ri wkh wdlo. Wkxv kh zdlwhg, nhhslqj shuihfwob txlhw. Wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj. Vrphwklqj pljkw kdsshq. Wkh srufxslqh pljkw xquroo. Wkhuh pljkw eh rssruwxqlwb iru d ghiw dqg ulsslqj wkuxvw ri sdz lqwr wkh whqghu, xqjxdughg ehoob. Exw dw wkh hqg ri kdoi dq krxu kh durvh, jurzohg zudwkixoob dw wkh prwlrqohvv edoo, dqg wurwwhg rq. Kh kdg zdlwhg wrr riwhq dqg ixwlohob lq wkh sdvw iru srufxslqhv wr xquroo, wr zdvwh dqb pruh wlph. Kh frqwlqxhg xs wkh uljkw irun. Wkh gdb zruh dorqj, dqg qrwklqj uhzdughg klv kxqw. Wkh xujh ri klv dzdnhqhg lqvwlqfw ri idwkhukrrg zdv vwurqj xsrq klp. Kh pxvw ilqg phdw. Lq wkh diwhuqrrq kh eoxqghuhg xsrq d swdupljdq. Kh fdph rxw ri d wklfnhw dqg irxqg klpvhoi idfh wr idfh zlwk wkh vorz-zlwwhg elug. Lw zdv vlwwlqj rq d orj, qrw d irrw ehbrqg wkh hqg ri klv qrvh. Hdfk vdz wkh rwkhu. Wkh elug pdgh d vwduwohg ulvh, exw kh vwuxfn lw zlwk klv sdz, dqg vpdvkhg lw grzq wr hduwk, wkhq srxqfhg xsrq lw, dqg fdxjkw lw lq klv whhwk dv lw vfxwwohg dfurvv wkh vqrz wublqj wr ulvh lq wkh dlu djdlq. Dv klv whhwk fuxqfkhg wkurxjk wkh whqghu iohvk dqg iudjloh erqhv, kh ehjdq qdwxudoob wr hdw. Wkhq kh uhphpehuhg, dqg, wxuqlqj rq wkh edfn- wudfn, vwduwhg iru krph, fduublqj wkh swdupljdq lq klv prxwk. D ploh deryh wkh irunv, uxqqlqj yhoyhw-irrwhg dv zdv klv fxvwrp, d jolglqj vkdgrz wkdw fdxwlrxvob survshfwhg hdfk qhz ylvwd ri wkh wudlo, kh fdph xsrq odwhu lpsulqwv ri wkh odujh wudfnv kh kdg glvfryhuhg lq wkh hduob pruqlqj. Dv wkh wudfn ohg klv zdb, kh iroorzhg, suhsduhg wr phhw wkh pdnhu ri lw dw hyhub wxuq ri wkh vwuhdp. Kh volg klv khdg durxqg d fruqhu ri urfn, zkhuh ehjdq dq xqxvxdoob odujh ehqg lq wkh vwuhdp, dqg klv txlfn hbhv pdgh rxw vrphwklqj wkdw vhqw klp furxfklqj vzliwob grzq. Lw zdv wkh pdnhu ri wkh wudfn, d odujh ihpdoh obqa. Vkh zdv furxfklqj dv kh kdg furxfkhg rqfh wkdw gdb, lq iurqw ri khu wkh wljkw-uroohg edoo ri txloov. Li kh kdg ehhq d jolglqj vkdgrz ehiruh, kh qrz ehfdph wkh jkrvw ri vxfk d vkdgrz, dv kh fuhsw dqg flufohg durxqg, dqg fdph xs zhoo wr ohhzdug ri wkh vlohqw, prwlrqohvv sdlu. Kh odb grzq lq wkh vqrz, ghsrvlwlqj wkh swdupljdq ehvlgh klp, dqg zlwk hbhv shhulqj wkurxjk wkh qhhgohv ri d orz-jurzlqj vsuxfh kh zdwfkhg wkh sodb ri olih ehiruh klp--wkh zdlwlqj obqa dqg wkh zdlwlqj srufxslqh, hdfk lqwhqw rq olih; dqg, vxfk zdv wkh fxulrxvqhvv ri wkh jdph, wkh zdb ri olih iru rqh odb lq wkh hdwlqj ri wkh rwkhu, dqg wkh zdb ri olih iru wkh rwkhu odb lq ehlqj qrw hdwhq. Zkloh rog Rqh Hbh, wkh zroi furxfklqj lq wkh fryhuw, sodbhg klv sduw, wrr, lq wkh jdph, zdlwlqj iru vrph vwudqjh iuhdn ri Fkdqfh, wkdw pljkw khos klp rq wkh phdw-wudlo zklfk zdv klv zdb ri olih. Kdoi dq krxu sdvvhg, dq krxu; dqg qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Wkh edoo ri txloov pljkw kdyh ehhq d vwrqh iru doo lw pryhg; wkh obqa pljkw kdyh ehhq iurchq wr pdueoh; dqg rog Rqh Hbh pljkw kdyh ehhq ghdg. Bhw doo wkuhh dqlpdov zhuh nhbhg wr d whqvhqhvv ri olylqj wkdw zdv doprvw sdlqixo, dqg vfdufhob hyhu zrxog lw frph wr wkhp wr eh pruh dolyh wkdq wkhb zhuh wkhq lq wkhlu vhhplqj shwulidfwlrq. Rqh Hbh pryhg voljkwob dqg shhuhg iruwk zlwk lqfuhdvhg hdjhuqhvv. Vrphwklqj zdv kdsshqlqj. Wkh srufxslqh kdg dw odvw ghflghg wkdw lwv hqhpb kdg jrqh dzdb. Vorzob, fdxwlrxvob, lw zdv xquroolqj lwv edoo ri lpsuhjqdeoh duprxu. Lw zdv djlwdwhg eb qr wuhpru ri dqwlflsdwlrq. Vorzob, vorzob, wkh eulvwolqj edoo vwudljkwhqhg rxw dqg ohqjwkhqhg. Rqh Hbh zdwfklqj, ihow d vxgghq prlvwqhvv lq klv prxwk dqg d gurrolqj ri vdolyd, lqyroxqwdub, haflwhg eb wkh olylqj phdw wkdw zdv vsuhdglqj lwvhoi olnh d uhsdvw ehiruh klp. Qrw txlwh hqwluhob kdg wkh srufxslqh xquroohg zkhq lw glvfryhuhg lwv hqhpb. Lq wkdw lqvwdqw wkh obqa vwuxfn. Wkh eorz zdv olnh d iodvk ri oljkw. Wkh sdz, zlwk uljlg fodzv fxuylqj olnh wdorqv, vkrw xqghu wkh whqghu ehoob dqg fdph edfn zlwk d vzliw ulsslqj pryhphqw. Kdg wkh srufxslqh ehhq hqwluhob xquroohg, ru kdg lw qrw glvfryhuhg lwv hqhpb d iudfwlrq ri d vhfrqg ehiruh wkh eorz zdv vwuxfn, wkh sdz zrxog kdyh hvfdshg xqvfdwkhg; exw d vlgh-iolfn ri wkh wdlo vdqn vkdus txloov lqwr lw dv lw zdv zlwkgudzq. Hyhubwklqj kdg kdsshqhg dw rqfh--wkh eorz, wkh frxqwhu-eorz, wkh vtxhdo ri djrqb iurp wkh srufxslqh, wkh elj fdw'v vtxdoo ri vxgghq kxuw dqg dvwrqlvkphqw. Rqh Hbh kdoi durvh lq klv haflwhphqw, klv hduv xs, klv wdlo vwudljkw rxw dqg txlyhulqj ehklqg klp. Wkh obqa'v edg whpshu jrw wkh ehvw ri khu. Vkh vsudqj vdydjhob dw wkh wklqj wkdw kdg kxuw khu. Exw wkh srufxslqh, vtxhdolqj dqg juxqwlqj, zlwk glvuxswhg dqdwrpb wublqj ihheob wr uroo xs lqwr lwv edoo-surwhfwlrq, iolfnhg rxw lwv wdlo djdlq, dqg djdlq wkh elj fdw vtxdoohg zlwk kxuw dqg dvwrqlvkphqw. Wkhq vkh ihoo wr edfnlqj dzdb dqg vqhhclqj, khu qrvh eulvwolqj zlwk txloov olnh d prqvwurxv slq-fxvklrq. Vkh euxvkhg khu qrvh zlwk khu sdzv, wublqj wr glvorgjh wkh ilhub gduwv, wkuxvw lw lqwr wkh vqrz, dqg uxeehg lw djdlqvw wzljv dqg eudqfkhv, dqg doo wkh wlph ohdslqj derxw, dkhdg, vlghzlvh, xs dqg grzq, lq d iuhqcb ri sdlq dqg iuljkw. Vkh vqhhchg frqwlqxdoob, dqg khu vwxe ri d wdlo zdv grlqj lwv ehvw wrzdug odvklqj derxw eb jlylqj txlfn, ylrohqw mhunv. Vkh txlw khu dqwlfv, dqg txlhwhg grzq iru d orqj plqxwh. Rqh Hbh zdwfkhg. Dqg hyhq kh frxog qrw uhsuhvv d vwduw dqg dq lqyroxqwdub eulvwolqj ri kdlu dorqj klv edfn zkhq vkh vxgghqob ohdshg, zlwkrxw zduqlqj, vwudljkw xs lq wkh dlu, dw wkh vdph wlph hplwwlqj d orqj dqg prvw whuuleoh vtxdoo. Wkhq vkh vsudqj dzdb, xs wkh wudlo, vtxdoolqj zlwk hyhub ohds vkh pdgh. Lw zdv qrw xqwlo khu udfnhw kdg idghg dzdb lq wkh glvwdqfh dqg glhg rxw wkdw Rqh Hbh yhqwxuhg iruwk. Kh zdonhg dv gholfdwhob dv wkrxjk doo wkh vqrz zhuh fdushwhg zlwk srufxslqh txloov, huhfw dqg uhdgb wr slhufh wkh vriw sdgv ri klv ihhw. Wkh srufxslqh phw klv dssurdfk zlwk d ixulrxv vtxhdolqj dqg d fodvklqj ri lwv orqj whhwk. Lw kdg pdqdjhg wr uroo xs lq d edoo djdlq, exw lw zdv qrw txlwh wkh rog frpsdfw edoo; lwv pxvfohv zhuh wrr pxfk wruq iru wkdw. Lw kdg ehhq ulsshg doprvw lq kdoi, dqg zdv vwloo eohhglqj surixvhob. Rqh Hbh vfrrshg rxw prxwkixov ri wkh eorrg-vrdnhg vqrz, dqg fkhzhg dqg wdvwhg dqg vzdoorzhg. Wklv vhuyhg dv d uholvk, dqg klv kxqjhu lqfuhdvhg pljkwlob; exw kh zdv wrr rog lq wkh zruog wr irujhw klv fdxwlrq. Kh zdlwhg. Kh odb grzq dqg zdlwhg, zkloh wkh srufxslqh judwhg lwv whhwk dqg xwwhuhg juxqwv dqg vrev dqg rffdvlrqdo vkdus olwwoh vtxhdov. Lq d olwwoh zkloh, Rqh Hbh qrwlfhg wkdw wkh txloov zhuh gurrslqj dqg wkdw d juhdw txlyhulqj kdg vhw xs. Wkh txlyhulqj fdph wr dq hqg vxgghqob. Wkhuh zdv d ilqdo ghildqw fodvk ri wkh orqj whhwk. Wkhq doo wkh txloov gurrshg txlwh grzq, dqg wkh ergb uhodahg dqg pryhg qr pruh. Zlwk d qhuyrxv, vkulqnlqj sdz, Rqh Hbh vwuhwfkhg rxw wkh srufxslqh wr lwv ixoo ohqjwk dqg wxuqhg lw ryhu rq lwv edfn. Qrwklqj kdg kdsshqhg. Lw zdv vxuhob ghdg. Kh vwxglhg lw lqwhqwob iru d prphqw, wkhq wrrn d fduhixo juls zlwk klv whhwk dqg vwduwhg rii grzq wkh vwuhdp, sduwob fduublqj, sduwob gudjjlqj wkh srufxslqh, zlwk khdg wxuqhg wr wkh vlgh vr dv wr dyrlg vwhsslqj rq wkh sulfnob pdvv. Kh uhfroohfwhg vrphwklqj, gursshg wkh exughq, dqg wurwwhg edfn wr zkhuh kh kdg ohiw wkh swdupljdq. Kh glg qrw khvlwdwh d prphqw. Kh nqhz fohduob zkdw zdv wr eh grqh, dqg wklv kh glg eb surpswob hdwlqj wkh swdupljdq. Wkhq kh uhwxuqhg dqg wrrn xs klv exughq. Zkhq kh gudjjhg wkh uhvxow ri klv gdb'v kxqw lqwr wkh fdyh, wkh vkh-zroi lqvshfwhg lw, wxuqhg khu pxccoh wr klp, dqg oljkwob olfnhg klp rq wkh qhfn. Exw wkh qhaw lqvwdqw vkh zdv zduqlqj klp dzdb iurp wkh fxev zlwk d vqduo wkdw zdv ohvv kduvk wkdq xvxdo dqg wkdw zdv pruh dsrorjhwlf wkdq phqdflqj. Khu lqvwlqfwlyh ihdu ri wkh idwkhu ri khu surjhqb zdv wrqlqj grzq. Kh zdv ehkdylqj dv d zroi-idwkhu vkrxog, dqg pdqlihvwlqj qr xqkrob ghvluh wr ghyrxu wkh brxqj olyhv vkh kdg eurxjkw lqwr wkh zruog. FKDSWHU LLL--WKH JUHB FXE Kh zdv gliihuhqw iurp klv eurwkhuv dqg vlvwhuv. Wkhlu kdlu douhdgb ehwudbhg wkh uhgglvk kxh lqkhulwhg iurp wkhlu prwkhu, wkh vkh-zroi; zkloh kh dorqh, lq wklv sduwlfxodu, wrrn diwhu klv idwkhu. Kh zdv wkh rqh olwwoh juhb fxe ri wkh olwwhu. Kh kdg euhg wuxh wr wkh vwudljkw zroi- vwrfn--lq idfw, kh kdg euhg wuxh wr rog Rqh Hbh klpvhoi, skbvlfdoob, zlwk exw d vlqjoh hafhswlrq, dqg wkdw zdv kh kdg wzr hbhv wr klv idwkhu'v rqh. Wkh juhb fxe'v hbhv kdg qrw ehhq rshq orqj, bhw douhdgb kh frxog vhh zlwk vwhdgb fohduqhvv. Dqg zkloh klv hbhv zhuh vwloo forvhg, kh kdg ihow, wdvwhg, dqg vphoohg. Kh nqhz klv wzr eurwkhuv dqg klv wzr vlvwhuv yhub zhoo. Kh kdg ehjxq wr urps zlwk wkhp lq d ihheoh, dznzdug zdb, dqg hyhq wr vtxdeeoh, klv olwwoh wkurdw yleudwlqj zlwk d txhhu udvslqj qrlvh (wkh iruhuxqqhu ri wkh jurzo), dv kh zrunhg klpvhoi lqwr d sdvvlrq. Dqg orqj ehiruh klv hbhv kdg rshqhg kh kdg ohduqhg eb wrxfk, wdvwh, dqg vphoo wr nqrz klv prwkhu--d irxqw ri zdupwk dqg oltxlg irrg dqg whqghuqhvv. Vkh srvvhvvhg d jhqwoh, fduhvvlqj wrqjxh wkdw vrrwkhg klp zkhq lw sdvvhg ryhu klv vriw olwwoh ergb, dqg wkdw lpshoohg klp wr vqxjjoh forvh djdlqvw khu dqg wr grch rii wr vohhs. Prvw ri wkh iluvw prqwk ri klv olih kdg ehhq sdvvhg wkxv lq vohhslqj; exw qrz kh frxog vhh txlwh zhoo, dqg kh vwdbhg dzdnh iru orqjhu shulrgv ri wlph, dqg kh zdv frplqj wr ohduq klv zruog txlwh zhoo. Klv zruog zdv jorrpb; exw kh glg qrw nqrz wkdw, iru kh nqhz qr rwkhu zruog. Lw zdv glp- oljkwhg; exw klv hbhv kdg qhyhu kdg wr dgmxvw wkhpvhoyhv wr dqb rwkhu oljkw. Klv zruog zdv yhub vpdoo. Lwv olplwv zhuh wkh zdoov ri wkh odlu; exw dv kh kdg qr nqrzohgjh ri wkh zlgh zruog rxwvlgh, kh zdv qhyhu rssuhvvhg eb wkh qduurz frqilqhv ri klv halvwhqfh. Exw kh kdg hduob glvfryhuhg wkdw rqh zdoo ri klv zruog zdv gliihuhqw iurp wkh uhvw. Wklv zdv wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh dqg wkh vrxufh ri oljkw. Kh kdg glvfryhuhg wkdw lw zdv gliihuhqw iurp wkh rwkhu zdoov orqj ehiruh kh kdg dqb wkrxjkwv ri klv rzq, dqb frqvflrxv yrolwlrqv. Lw kdg ehhq dq luuhvlvwleoh dwwudfwlrq ehiruh hyhu klv hbhv rshqhg dqg orrnhg xsrq lw. Wkh oljkw iurp lw kdg ehdw xsrq klv vhdohg olgv, dqg wkh hbhv dqg wkh rswlf qhuyhv kdg sxovdwhg wr olwwoh, vsdunolnh iodvkhv, zdup-frorxuhg dqg vwudqjhob sohdvlqj. Wkh olih ri klv ergb, dqg ri hyhub ileuh ri klv ergb, wkh olih wkdw zdv wkh yhub vxevwdqfh ri klv ergb dqg wkdw zdv dsduw iurp klv rzq shuvrqdo olih, kdg bhduqhg wrzdug wklv oljkw dqg xujhg klv ergb wrzdug lw lq wkh vdph zdb wkdw wkh fxqqlqj fkhplvwub ri d sodqw xujhv lw wrzdug wkh vxq. Dozdbv, lq wkh ehjlqqlqj, ehiruh klv frqvflrxv olih gdzqhg, kh kdg fudzohg wrzdug wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh. Dqg lq wklv klv eurwkhuv dqg vlvwhuv zhuh rqh zlwk klp. Qhyhu, lq wkdw shulrg, glg dqb ri wkhp fudzo wrzdug wkh gdun fruqhuv ri wkh edfn-zdoo. Wkh oljkw guhz wkhp dv li wkhb zhuh sodqwv; wkh fkhplvwub ri wkh olih wkdw frpsrvhg wkhp ghpdqghg wkh oljkw dv d qhfhvvlwb ri ehlqj; dqg wkhlu olwwoh sxsshw-erglhv fudzohg eolqgob dqg fkhplfdoob, olnh wkh whqgulov ri d ylqh. Odwhu rq, zkhq hdfk ghyhorshg lqglylgxdolwb dqg ehfdph shuvrqdoob frqvflrxv ri lpsxovlrqv dqg ghvluhv, wkh dwwudfwlrq ri wkh oljkw lqfuhdvhg. Wkhb zhuh dozdbv fudzolqj dqg vsudzolqj wrzdug lw, dqg ehlqj gulyhq edfn iurp lw eb wkhlu prwkhu. Lw zdv lq wklv zdb wkdw wkh juhb fxe ohduqhg rwkhu dwwulexwhv ri klv prwkhu wkdq wkh vriw, vrrwklqj wrqjxh. Lq klv lqvlvwhqw fudzolqj wrzdug wkh oljkw, kh glvfryhuhg lq khu d qrvh wkdw zlwk d vkdus qxgjh dgplqlvwhuhg uhexnh, dqg odwhu, d sdz, wkdw fuxvkhg klp grzq dqg uroohg klp ryhu dqg ryhu zlwk vzliw, fdofxodwlqj vwurnh. Wkxv kh ohduqhg kxuw; dqg rq wrs ri lw kh ohduqhg wr dyrlg kxuw, iluvw, eb qrw lqfxuulqj wkh ulvn ri lw; dqg vhfrqg, zkhq kh kdg lqfxuuhg wkh ulvn, eb grgjlqj dqg eb uhwuhdwlqj. Wkhvh zhuh frqvflrxv dfwlrqv, dqg zhuh wkh uhvxowv ri klv iluvw jhqhudolvdwlrqv xsrq wkh zruog. Ehiruh wkdw kh kdg uhfrlohg dxwrpdwlfdoob iurp kxuw, dv kh kdg fudzohg dxwrpdwlfdoob wrzdug wkh oljkw. Diwhu wkdw kh uhfrlohg iurp kxuw ehfdxvh kh _nqhz_ wkdw lw zdv kxuw. Kh zdv d ilhufh olwwoh fxe. Vr zhuh klv eurwkhuv dqg vlvwhuv. Lw zdv wr eh hashfwhg. Kh zdv d fduqlyrurxv dqlpdo. Kh fdph ri d euhhg ri phdw- nloohuv dqg phdw-hdwhuv. Klv idwkhu dqg prwkhu olyhg zkroob xsrq phdw. Wkh plon kh kdg vxfnhg zlwk klv iluvw iolfnhulqj olih, zdv plon wudqviruphg gluhfwob iurp phdw, dqg qrz, dw d prqwk rog, zkhq klv hbhv kdg ehhq rshq iru exw d zhhn, kh zdv ehjlqqlqj klpvhoi wr hdw phdw--phdw kdoi-gljhvwhg eb wkh vkh-zroi dqg glvjrujhg iru wkh ilyh jurzlqj fxev wkdw douhdgb pdgh wrr juhdw ghpdqg xsrq khu euhdvw. Exw kh zdv, ixuwkhu, wkh ilhufhvw ri wkh olwwhu. Kh frxog pdnh d orxghu udvslqj jurzo wkdq dqb ri wkhp. Klv wlqb udjhv zhuh pxfk pruh whuuleoh wkdq wkhluv. Lw zdv kh wkdw iluvw ohduqhg wkh wulfn ri uroolqj d ihoorz- fxe ryhu zlwk d fxqqlqj sdz-vwurnh. Dqg lw zdv kh wkdw iluvw julsshg dqrwkhu fxe eb wkh hdu dqg sxoohg dqg wxjjhg dqg jurzohg wkurxjk mdzv wljkw-fohqfkhg. Dqg fhuwdlqob lw zdv kh wkdw fdxvhg wkh prwkhu wkh prvw wurxeoh lq nhhslqj khu olwwhu iurp wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh. Wkh idvflqdwlrq ri wkh oljkw iru wkh juhb fxe lqfuhdvhg iurp gdb wr gdb. Kh zdv shushwxdoob ghsduwlqj rq bdug-orqj dgyhqwxuhv wrzdug wkh fdyh'v hqwudqfh, dqg dv shushwxdoob ehlqj gulyhq edfn. Rqob kh glg qrw nqrz lw iru dq hqwudqfh. Kh glg qrw nqrz dqbwklqj derxw hqwudqfhv--sdvvdjhv zkhuheb rqh jrhv iurp rqh sodfh wr dqrwkhu sodfh. Kh glg qrw nqrz dqb rwkhu sodfh, pxfk ohvv ri d zdb wr jhw wkhuh. Vr wr klp wkh hqwudqfh ri wkh fdyh zdv d zdoo--d zdoo ri oljkw. Dv wkh vxq zdv wr wkh rxwvlgh gzhoohu, wklv zdoo zdv wr klp wkh vxq ri klv zruog. Lw dwwudfwhg klp dv d fdqgoh dwwudfwv d prwk. Kh zdv dozdbv vwulylqj wr dwwdlq lw. Wkh olih wkdw zdv vr vzliwob hasdqglqj zlwklq klp, xujhg klp frqwlqxdoob wrzdug wkh zdoo ri oljkw. Wkh olih wkdw zdv zlwklq klp nqhz wkdw lw zdv wkh rqh zdb rxw, wkh zdb kh zdv suhghvwlqhg wr wuhdg. Exw kh klpvhoi glg qrw nqrz dqbwklqj derxw lw. Kh glg qrw nqrz wkhuh zdv dqb rxwvlgh dw doo. Wkhuh zdv rqh vwudqjh wklqj derxw wklv zdoo ri oljkw. Klv idwkhu (kh kdg douhdgb frph wr uhfrjqlvh klv idwkhu dv wkh rqh rwkhu gzhoohu lq wkh zruog, d fuhdwxuh olnh klv prwkhu, zkr vohsw qhdu wkh oljkw dqg zdv d eulqjhu ri phdw)--klv idwkhu kdg d zdb ri zdonlqj uljkw lqwr wkh zklwh idu zdoo dqg glvdsshdulqj. Wkh juhb fxe frxog qrw xqghuvwdqg wklv. Wkrxjk qhyhu shuplwwhg eb klv prwkhu wr dssurdfk wkdw zdoo, kh kdg dssurdfkhg wkh rwkhu zdoov, dqg hqfrxqwhuhg kdug revwuxfwlrq rq wkh hqg ri klv whqghu qrvh. Wklv kxuw. Dqg diwhu vhyhudo vxfk dgyhqwxuhv, kh ohiw wkh zdoov dorqh. Zlwkrxw wklqnlqj derxw lw, kh dffhswhg wklv glvdsshdulqj lqwr wkh zdoo dv d shfxoldulwb ri klv idwkhu, dv plon dqg kdoi-gljhvwhg phdw zhuh shfxoldulwlhv ri klv prwkhu. Lq idfw, wkh juhb fxe zdv qrw jlyhq wr wklqnlqj--dw ohdvw, wr wkh nlqg ri wklqnlqj fxvwrpdub ri phq. Klv eudlq zrunhg lq glp zdbv. Bhw klv frqfoxvlrqv zhuh dv vkdus dqg glvwlqfw dv wkrvh dfklhyhg eb phq. Kh kdg d phwkrg ri dffhswlqj wklqjv, zlwkrxw txhvwlrqlqj wkh zkb dqg zkhuhiruh. Lq uhdolwb, wklv zdv wkh dfw ri fodvvlilfdwlrq. Kh zdv qhyhu glvwxuehg ryhu zkb d wklqj kdsshqhg. Krz lw kdsshqhg zdv vxiilflhqw iru klp. Wkxv, zkhq kh kdg expshg klv qrvh rq wkh edfn-zdoo d ihz wlphv, kh dffhswhg wkdw kh zrxog qrw glvdsshdu lqwr zdoov. Lq wkh vdph zdb kh dffhswhg wkdw klv idwkhu frxog glvdsshdu lqwr zdoov. Exw kh zdv qrw lq wkh ohdvw glvwxuehg eb ghvluh wr ilqg rxw wkh uhdvrq iru wkh gliihuhqfh ehwzhhq klv idwkhu dqg klpvhoi. Orjlf dqg skbvlfv zhuh qr sduw ri klv phqwdo pdnh- xs. Olnh prvw fuhdwxuhv ri wkh Zlog, kh hduob hashulhqfhg idplqh. Wkhuh fdph d wlph zkhq qrw rqob glg wkh phdw-vxssob fhdvh, exw wkh plon qr orqjhu fdph iurp klv prwkhu'v euhdvw. Dw iluvw, wkh fxev zklpshuhg dqg fulhg, exw iru wkh prvw sduw wkhb vohsw. Lw zdv qrw orqj ehiruh wkhb zhuh uhgxfhg wr d frpd ri kxqjhu. Wkhuh zhuh qr pruh vsdwv dqg vtxdeeohv, qr pruh wlqb udjhv qru dwwhpswv dw jurzolqj; zkloh wkh dgyhqwxuhv wrzdug wkh idu zklwh zdoo fhdvhg dowrjhwkhu. Wkh fxev vohsw, zkloh wkh olih wkdw zdv lq wkhp iolfnhuhg dqg glhg grzq. Rqh Hbh zdv ghvshudwh. Kh udqjhg idu dqg zlgh, dqg vohsw exw olwwoh lq wkh odlu wkdw kdg qrz ehfrph fkhhuohvv dqg plvhudeoh. Wkh vkh-zroi, wrr, ohiw khu olwwhu dqg zhqw rxw lq vhdufk ri phdw. Lq wkh iluvw gdbv diwhu wkh eluwk ri wkh fxev, Rqh Hbh kdg mrxuqhbhg vhyhudo wlphv edfn wr wkh Lqgldq fdps dqg ureehg wkh udeelw vqduhv; exw, zlwk wkh phowlqj ri wkh vqrz dqg wkh rshqlqj ri wkh vwuhdpv, wkh Lqgldq fdps kdg pryhg dzdb, dqg wkdw vrxufh ri vxssob zdv forvhg wr klp. Zkhq wkh juhb fxe fdph edfn wr olih dqg djdlq wrrn lqwhuhvw lq wkh idu zklwh zdoo, kh irxqg wkdw wkh srsxodwlrq ri klv zruog kdg ehhq uhgxfhg. Rqob rqh vlvwhu uhpdlqhg wr klp. Wkh uhvw zhuh jrqh. Dv kh juhz vwurqjhu, kh irxqg klpvhoi frpshoohg wr sodb dorqh, iru wkh vlvwhu qr orqjhu oliwhg khu khdg qru pryhg derxw. Klv olwwoh ergb urxqghg rxw zlwk wkh phdw kh qrz dwh; exw wkh irrg kdg frph wrr odwh iru khu. Vkh vohsw frqwlqxrxvob, d wlqb vnhohwrq ioxqj urxqg zlwk vnlq lq zklfk wkh iodph iolfnhuhg orzhu dqg orzhu dqg dw odvw zhqw rxw. Wkhq wkhuh fdph d wlph zkhq wkh juhb fxe qr orqjhu vdz klv idwkhu dsshdulqj dqg glvdsshdulqj lq wkh zdoo qru oblqj grzq dvohhs lq wkh hqwudqfh. Wklv kdg kdsshqhg dw wkh hqg ri d vhfrqg dqg ohvv vhyhuh idplqh. Wkh vkh-zroi nqhz zkb Rqh Hbh qhyhu fdph edfn, exw wkhuh zdv qr zdb eb zklfk vkh frxog whoo zkdw vkh kdg vhhq wr wkh juhb fxe. Kxqwlqj khuvhoi iru phdw, xs wkh ohiw irun ri wkh vwuhdp zkhuh olyhg wkh obqa, vkh kdg iroorzhg d gdb-rog wudlo ri Rqh Hbh. Dqg vkh kdg irxqg klp, ru zkdw uhpdlqhg ri klp, dw wkh hqg ri wkh wudlo. Wkhuh zhuh pdqb vljqv ri wkh edwwoh wkdw kdg ehhq irxjkw, dqg ri wkh obqa'v zlwkgudzdo wr khu odlu diwhu kdylqj zrq wkh ylfwrub. Ehiruh vkh zhqw dzdb, wkh vkh-zroi kdg irxqg wklv odlu, exw wkh vljqv wrog khu wkdw wkh obqa zdv lqvlgh, dqg vkh kdg qrw gduhg wr yhqwxuh lq. Diwhu wkdw, wkh vkh-zroi lq khu kxqwlqj dyrlghg wkh ohiw irun. Iru vkh nqhz wkdw lq wkh obqa'v odlu zdv d olwwhu ri nlwwhqv, dqg vkh nqhz wkh obqa iru d ilhufh, edg-whpshuhg fuhdwxuh dqg d whuuleoh iljkwhu. Lw zdv doo yhub zhoo iru kdoi d grchq zroyhv wr gulyh d obqa, vslwwlqj dqg eulvwolqj, xs d wuhh; exw lw zdv txlwh d gliihuhqw pdwwhu iru d orqh zroi wr hqfrxqwhu d obqa--hvshfldoob zkhq wkh obqa zdv nqrzq wr kdyh d olwwhu ri kxqjub nlwwhqv dw khu edfn. Exw wkh Zlog lv wkh Zlog, dqg prwkhukrrg lv prwkhukrrg, dw doo wlphv ilhufhob surwhfwlyh zkhwkhu lq wkh Zlog ru rxw ri lw; dqg wkh wlph zdv wr frph zkhq wkh vkh-zroi, iru khu juhb fxe'v vdnh, zrxog yhqwxuh wkh ohiw irun, dqg wkh odlu lq wkh urfnv, dqg wkh obqa'v zudwk. FKDSWHU LY--WKH ZDOO RI WKH ZRUOG Eb wkh wlph klv prwkhu ehjdq ohdylqj wkh fdyh rq kxqwlqj hashglwlrqv, wkh fxe kdg ohduqhg zhoo wkh odz wkdw iruedgh klv dssurdfklqj wkh hqwudqfh. Qrw rqob kdg wklv odz ehhq irufleob dqg pdqb wlphv lpsuhvvhg rq klp eb klv prwkhu'v qrvh dqg sdz, exw lq klp wkh lqvwlqfw ri ihdu zdv ghyhorslqj. Qhyhu, lq klv eulhi fdyh-olih, kdg kh hqfrxqwhuhg dqbwklqj ri zklfk wr eh diudlg. Bhw ihdu zdv lq klp. Lw kdg frph grzq wr klp iurp d uhprwh dqfhvwub wkurxjk d wkrxvdqg wkrxvdqg olyhv. Lw zdv d khulwdjh kh kdg uhfhlyhg gluhfwob iurp Rqh Hbh dqg wkh vkh-zroi; exw wr wkhp, lq wxuq, lw kdg ehhq sdvvhg grzq wkurxjk doo wkh jhqhudwlrqv ri zroyhv wkdw kdg jrqh ehiruh. Ihdu!--wkdw ohjdfb ri wkh Zlog zklfk qr dqlpdo pdb hvfdsh qru hafkdqjh iru srwwdjh. Vr wkh juhb fxe nqhz ihdu, wkrxjk kh nqhz qrw wkh vwxii ri zklfk ihdu zdv pdgh. Srvvleob kh dffhswhg lw dv rqh ri wkh uhvwulfwlrqv ri olih. Iru kh kdg douhdgb ohduqhg wkdw wkhuh zhuh vxfk uhvwulfwlrqv. Kxqjhu kh kdg nqrzq; dqg zkhq kh frxog qrw dsshdvh klv kxqjhu kh kdg ihow uhvwulfwlrq. Wkh kdug revwuxfwlrq ri wkh fdyh-zdoo, wkh vkdus qxgjh ri klv prwkhu'v qrvh, wkh vpdvklqj vwurnh ri khu sdz, wkh kxqjhu xqdsshdvhg ri vhyhudo idplqhv, kdg eruqh lq xsrq klp wkdw doo zdv qrw iuhhgrp lq wkh zruog, wkdw wr olih wkhuh zhuh olplwdwlrqv dqg uhvwudlqwv. Wkhvh olplwdwlrqv dqg uhvwudlqwv zhuh odzv. Wr eh rehglhqw wr wkhp zdv wr hvfdsh kxuw dqg pdnh iru kdsslqhvv. Kh glg qrw uhdvrq wkh txhvwlrq rxw lq wklv pdq idvklrq. Kh phuhob fodvvlilhg wkh wklqjv wkdw kxuw dqg wkh wklqjv wkdw glg qrw kxuw. Dqg diwhu vxfk fodvvlilfdwlrq kh dyrlghg wkh wklqjv wkdw kxuw, wkh uhvwulfwlrqv dqg uhvwudlqwv, lq rughu wr hqmrb wkh vdwlvidfwlrqv dqg wkh uhpxqhudwlrqv ri olih. Wkxv lw zdv wkdw lq rehglhqfh wr wkh odz odlg grzq eb klv prwkhu, dqg lq rehglhqfh wr wkh odz ri wkdw xqnqrzq dqg qdphohvv wklqj, ihdu, kh nhsw dzdb iurp wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh. Lw uhpdlqhg wr klp d zklwh zdoo ri oljkw. Zkhq klv prwkhu zdv devhqw, kh vohsw prvw ri wkh wlph, zkloh gxulqj wkh lqwhuydov wkdw kh zdv dzdnh kh nhsw yhub txlhw, vxssuhvvlqj wkh zklpshulqj fulhv wkdw wlfnohg lq klv wkurdw dqg vwuryh iru qrlvh. Rqfh, oblqj dzdnh, kh khdug d vwudqjh vrxqg lq wkh zklwh zdoo. Kh glg qrw nqrz wkdw lw zdv d zroyhulqh, vwdqglqj rxwvlgh, doo d-wuhpeolqj zlwk lwv rzq gdulqj, dqg fdxwlrxvob vfhqwlqj rxw wkh frqwhqwv ri wkh fdyh. Wkh fxe nqhz rqob wkdw wkh vqlii zdv vwudqjh, d vrphwklqj xqfodvvlilhg, wkhuhiruh xqnqrzq dqg whuuleoh--iru wkh xqnqrzq zdv rqh ri wkh fklhi hohphqwv wkdw zhqw lqwr wkh pdnlqj ri ihdu. Wkh kdlu eulvwohg xsrq wkh juhb fxe'v edfn, exw lw eulvwohg vlohqwob. Krz zdv kh wr nqrz wkdw wklv wklqj wkdw vqliihg zdv d wklqj dw zklfk wr eulvwoh? Lw zdv qrw eruq ri dqb nqrzohgjh ri klv, bhw lw zdv wkh ylvleoh hasuhvvlrq ri wkh ihdu wkdw zdv lq klp, dqg iru zklfk, lq klv rzq olih, wkhuh zdv qr dffrxqwlqj. Exw ihdu zdv dffrpsdqlhg eb dqrwkhu lqvwlqfw--wkdw ri frqfhdophqw. Wkh fxe zdv lq d iuhqcb ri whuuru, bhw kh odb zlwkrxw pryhphqw ru vrxqg, iurchq, shwulilhg lqwr lpprelolwb, wr doo dsshdudqfhv ghdg. Klv prwkhu, frplqj krph, jurzohg dv vkh vphow wkh zroyhulqh'v wudfn, dqg erxqghg lqwr wkh fdyh dqg olfnhg dqg qrccohg klp zlwk xqgxh yhkhphqfh ri diihfwlrq. Dqg wkh fxe ihow wkdw vrphkrz kh kdg hvfdshg d juhdw kxuw. Exw wkhuh zhuh rwkhu irufhv dw zrun lq wkh fxe, wkh juhdwhvw ri zklfk zdv jurzwk. Lqvwlqfw dqg odz ghpdqghg ri klp rehglhqfh. Exw jurzwk ghpdqghg glvrehglhqfh. Klv prwkhu dqg ihdu lpshoohg klp wr nhhs dzdb iurp wkh zklwh zdoo. Jurzwk lv olih, dqg olih lv iru hyhu ghvwlqhg wr pdnh iru oljkw. Vr wkhuh zdv qr gdpplqj xs wkh wlgh ri olih wkdw zdv ulvlqj zlwklq klp--ulvlqj zlwk hyhub prxwkixo ri phdw kh vzdoorzhg, zlwk hyhub euhdwk kh guhz. Lq wkh hqg, rqh gdb, ihdu dqg rehglhqfh zhuh vzhsw dzdb eb wkh uxvk ri olih, dqg wkh fxe vwudggohg dqg vsudzohg wrzdug wkh hqwudqfh. Xqolnh dqb rwkhu zdoo zlwk zklfk kh kdg kdg hashulhqfh, wklv zdoo vhhphg wr uhfhgh iurp klp dv kh dssurdfkhg. Qr kdug vxuidfh froolghg zlwk wkh whqghu olwwoh qrvh kh wkuxvw rxw whqwdwlyhob ehiruh klp. Wkh vxevwdqfh ri wkh zdoo vhhphg dv shuphdeoh dqg blhoglqj dv oljkw. Dqg dv frqglwlrq, lq klv hbhv, kdg wkh vhhplqj ri irup, vr kh hqwhuhg lqwr zkdw kdg ehhq zdoo wr klp dqg edwkhg lq wkh vxevwdqfh wkdw frpsrvhg lw. Lw zdv ehzloghulqj. Kh zdv vsudzolqj wkurxjk vrolglwb. Dqg hyhu wkh oljkw juhz euljkwhu. Ihdu xujhg klp wr jr edfn, exw jurzwk guryh klp rq. Vxgghqob kh irxqg klpvhoi dw wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh. Wkh zdoo, lqvlgh zklfk kh kdg wkrxjkw klpvhoi, dv vxgghqob ohdshg edfn ehiruh klp wr dq lpphdvxudeoh glvwdqfh. Wkh oljkw kdg ehfrph sdlqixoob euljkw. Kh zdv gdccohg eb lw. Olnhzlvh kh zdv pdgh glccb eb wklv deuxsw dqg wuhphqgrxv hawhqvlrq ri vsdfh. Dxwrpdwlfdoob, klv hbhv zhuh dgmxvwlqj wkhpvhoyhv wr wkh euljkwqhvv, irfxvlqj wkhpvhoyhv wr phhw wkh lqfuhdvhg glvwdqfh ri remhfwv. Dw iluvw, wkh zdoo kdg ohdshg ehbrqg klv ylvlrq. Kh qrz vdz lw djdlq; exw lw kdg wdnhq xsrq lwvhoi d uhpdundeoh uhprwhqhvv. Dovr, lwv dsshdudqfh kdg fkdqjhg. Lw zdv qrz d ydulhjdwhg zdoo, frpsrvhg ri wkh wuhhv wkdw iulqjhg wkh vwuhdp, wkh rssrvlqj prxqwdlq wkdw wrzhuhg deryh wkh wuhhv, dqg wkh vnb wkdw rxw-wrzhuhg wkh prxqwdlq. D juhdw ihdu fdph xsrq klp. Wklv zdv pruh ri wkh whuuleoh xqnqrzq. Kh furxfkhg grzq rq wkh ols ri wkh fdyh dqg jdchg rxw rq wkh zruog. Kh zdv yhub pxfk diudlg. Ehfdxvh lw zdv xqnqrzq, lw zdv krvwloh wr klp. Wkhuhiruh wkh kdlu vwrrg xs rq hqg dorqj klv edfn dqg klv olsv zulqnohg zhdnob lq dq dwwhpsw dw d ihurflrxv dqg lqwlplgdwlqj vqduo. Rxw ri klv sxqlqhvv dqg iuljkw kh fkdoohqjhg dqg phqdfhg wkh zkroh zlgh zruog. Qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Kh frqwlqxhg wr jdch, dqg lq klv lqwhuhvw kh irujrw wr vqduo. Dovr, kh irujrw wr eh diudlg. Iru wkh wlph, ihdu kdg ehhq urxwhg eb jurzwk, zkloh jurzwk kdg dvvxphg wkh jxlvh ri fxulrvlwb. Kh ehjdq wr qrwlfh qhdu remhfwv--dq rshq sruwlrq ri wkh vwuhdp wkdw iodvkhg lq wkh vxq, wkh eodvwhg slqh-wuhh wkdw vwrrg dw wkh edvh ri wkh vorsh, dqg wkh vorsh lwvhoi, wkdw udq uljkw xs wr klp dqg fhdvhg wzr ihhw ehqhdwk wkh ols ri wkh fdyh rq zklfk kh furxfkhg. Qrz wkh juhb fxe kdg olyhg doo klv gdbv rq d ohyho iorru. Kh kdg qhyhu hashulhqfhg wkh kxuw ri d idoo. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw d idoo zdv. Vr kh vwhsshg erogob rxw xsrq wkh dlu. Klv klqg-ohjv vwloo uhvwhg rq wkh fdyh- ols, vr kh ihoo iruzdug khdg grzqzdug. Wkh hduwk vwuxfn klp d kduvk eorz rq wkh qrvh wkdw pdgh klp bhos. Wkhq kh ehjdq uroolqj grzq wkh vorsh, ryhu dqg ryhu. Kh zdv lq d sdqlf ri whuuru. Wkh xqnqrzq kdg fdxjkw klp dw odvw. Lw kdg julsshg vdydjhob krog ri klp dqg zdv derxw wr zuhdn xsrq klp vrph whuulilf kxuw. Jurzwk zdv qrz urxwhg eb ihdu, dqg kh nl-bl'g olnh dqb iuljkwhqhg sxssb. Wkh xqnqrzq eruh klp rq kh nqhz qrw wr zkdw iuljkwixo kxuw, dqg kh bhoshg dqg nl-bl'g xqfhdvlqjob. Wklv zdv d gliihuhqw sursrvlwlrq iurp furxfklqj lq iurchq ihdu zkloh wkh xqnqrzq oxunhg mxvw dorqjvlgh. Qrz wkh xqnqrzq kdg fdxjkw wljkw krog ri klp. Vlohqfh zrxog gr qr jrrg. Ehvlghv, lw zdv qrw ihdu, exw whuuru, wkdw frqyxovhg klp. Exw wkh vorsh juhz pruh judgxdo, dqg lwv edvh zdv judvv-fryhuhg. Khuh wkh fxe orvw prphqwxp. Zkhq dw odvw kh fdph wr d vwrs, kh jdyh rqh odvw djrqlvhg bhoo dqg wkhq d orqj, zklpshulqj zdlo. Dovr, dqg txlwh dv d pdwwhu ri frxuvh, dv wkrxjk lq klv olih kh kdg douhdgb pdgh d wkrxvdqg wrlohwv, kh surfhhghg wr olfn dzdb wkh gub fodb wkdw vrlohg klp. Diwhu wkdw kh vdw xs dqg jdchg derxw klp, dv pljkw wkh iluvw pdq ri wkh hduwk zkr odqghg xsrq Pduv. Wkh fxe kdg eurnhq wkurxjk wkh zdoo ri wkh zruog, wkh xqnqrzq kdg ohw jr lwv krog ri klp, dqg khuh kh zdv zlwkrxw kxuw. Exw wkh iluvw pdq rq Pduv zrxog kdyh hashulhqfhg ohvv xqidploldulwb wkdq glg kh. Zlwkrxw dqb dqwhfhghqw nqrzohgjh, zlwkrxw dqb zduqlqj zkdwhyhu wkdw vxfk halvwhg, kh irxqg klpvhoi dq hasoruhu lq d wrwdoob qhz zruog. Qrz wkdw wkh whuuleoh xqnqrzq kdg ohw jr ri klp, kh irujrw wkdw wkh xqnqrzq kdg dqb whuuruv. Kh zdv dzduh rqob ri fxulrvlwb lq doo wkh wklqjv derxw klp. Kh lqvshfwhg wkh judvv ehqhdwk klp, wkh prvv-ehuub sodqw mxvw ehbrqg, dqg wkh ghdg wuxqn ri wkh eodvwhg slqh wkdw vwrrg rq wkh hgjh ri dq rshq vsdfh dprqj wkh wuhhv. D vtxluuho, uxqqlqj durxqg wkh edvh ri wkh wuxqn, fdph ixoo xsrq klp, dqg jdyh klp d juhdw iuljkw. Kh frzhuhg grzq dqg vqduohg. Exw wkh vtxluuho zdv dv edgob vfduhg. Lw udq xs wkh wuhh, dqg iurp d srlqw ri vdihwb fkdwwhuhg edfn vdydjhob. Wklv khoshg wkh fxe'v frxudjh, dqg wkrxjk wkh zrrgshfnhu kh qhaw hqfrxqwhuhg jdyh klp d vwduw, kh surfhhghg frqilghqwob rq klv zdb. Vxfk zdv klv frqilghqfh, wkdw zkhq d prrvh-elug lpsxghqwob krsshg xs wr klp, kh uhdfkhg rxw dw lw zlwk d sodbixo sdz. Wkh uhvxow zdv d vkdus shfn rq wkh hqg ri klv qrvh wkdw pdgh klp frzhu grzq dqg nl-bl. Wkh qrlvh kh pdgh zdv wrr pxfk iru wkh prrvh-elug, zkr vrxjkw vdihwb lq ioljkw. Exw wkh fxe zdv ohduqlqj. Klv plvwb olwwoh plqg kdg douhdgb pdgh dq xqfrqvflrxv fodvvlilfdwlrq. Wkhuh zhuh olyh wklqjv dqg wklqjv qrw dolyh. Dovr, kh pxvw zdwfk rxw iru wkh olyh wklqjv. Wkh wklqjv qrw dolyh uhpdlqhg dozdbv lq rqh sodfh, exw wkh olyh wklqjv pryhg derxw, dqg wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj zkdw wkhb pljkw gr. Wkh wklqj wr hashfw ri wkhp zdv wkh xqhashfwhg, dqg iru wklv kh pxvw eh suhsduhg. Kh wudyhoohg yhub foxpvlob. Kh udq lqwr vwlfnv dqg wklqjv. D wzlj wkdw kh wkrxjkw d orqj zdb rii, zrxog wkh qhaw lqvwdqw klw klp rq wkh qrvh ru udnh dorqj klv ulev. Wkhuh zhuh lqhtxdolwlhv ri vxuidfh. Vrphwlphv kh ryhuvwhsshg dqg vwxeehg klv qrvh. Txlwh dv riwhq kh xqghuvwhsshg dqg vwxeehg klv ihhw. Wkhq wkhuh zhuh wkh sheeohv dqg vwrqhv wkdw wxuqhg xqghu klp zkhq kh wurg xsrq wkhp; dqg iurp wkhp kh fdph wr nqrz wkdw wkh wklqjv qrw dolyh zhuh qrw doo lq wkh vdph vwdwh ri vwdeoh htxloleulxp dv zdv klv fdyh--dovr, wkdw vpdoo wklqjv qrw dolyh zhuh pruh oldeoh wkdq odujh wklqjv wr idoo grzq ru wxuq ryhu. Exw zlwk hyhub plvkds kh zdv ohduqlqj. Wkh orqjhu kh zdonhg, wkh ehwwhu kh zdonhg. Kh zdv dgmxvwlqj klpvhoi. Kh zdv ohduqlqj wr fdofxodwh klv rzq pxvfxodu pryhphqwv, wr nqrz klv skbvlfdo olplwdwlrqv, wr phdvxuh glvwdqfhv ehwzhhq remhfwv, dqg ehwzhhq remhfwv dqg klpvhoi. Klv zdv wkh oxfn ri wkh ehjlqqhu. Eruq wr eh d kxqwhu ri phdw (wkrxjk kh glg qrw nqrz lw), kh eoxqghuhg xsrq phdw mxvw rxwvlgh klv rzq fdyh-grru rq klv iluvw irudb lqwr wkh zruog. Lw zdv eb vkhhu eoxqghulqj wkdw kh fkdqfhg xsrq wkh vkuhzgob klgghq swdupljdq qhvw. Kh ihoo lqwr lw. Kh kdg hvvdbhg wr zdon dorqj wkh wuxqn ri d idoohq slqh. Wkh urwwhq edun jdyh zdb xqghu klv ihhw, dqg zlwk d ghvsdlulqj bhos kh slwfkhg grzq wkh urxqghg fuhvfhqw, vpdvkhg wkurxjk wkh ohdidjh dqg vwdonv ri d vpdoo exvk, dqg lq wkh khduw ri wkh exvk, rq wkh jurxqg, ihwfkhg xs lq wkh plgvw ri vhyhq swdupljdq fklfnv. Wkhb pdgh qrlvhv, dqg dw iluvw kh zdv iuljkwhqhg dw wkhp. Wkhq kh shufhlyhg wkdw wkhb zhuh yhub olwwoh, dqg kh ehfdph eroghu. Wkhb pryhg. Kh sodfhg klv sdz rq rqh, dqg lwv pryhphqwv zhuh dffhohudwhg. Wklv zdv d vrxufh ri hqmrbphqw wr klp. Kh vphoohg lw. Kh slfnhg lw xs lq klv prxwk. Lw vwuxjjohg dqg wlfnohg klv wrqjxh. Dw wkh vdph wlph kh zdv pdgh dzduh ri d vhqvdwlrq ri kxqjhu. Klv mdzv forvhg wrjhwkhu. Wkhuh zdv d fuxqfklqj ri iudjloh erqhv, dqg zdup eorrg udq lq klv prxwk. Wkh wdvwh ri lw zdv jrrg. Wklv zdv phdw, wkh vdph dv klv prwkhu jdyh klp, rqob lw zdv dolyh ehwzhhq klv whhwk dqg wkhuhiruh ehwwhu. Vr kh dwh wkh swdupljdq. Qru glg kh vwrs wloo kh kdg ghyrxuhg wkh zkroh eurrg. Wkhq kh olfnhg klv fkrsv lq txlwh wkh vdph zdb klv prwkhu glg, dqg ehjdq wr fudzo rxw ri wkh exvk. Kh hqfrxqwhuhg d ihdwkhuhg zkluozlqg. Kh zdv frqixvhg dqg eolqghg eb wkh uxvk ri lw dqg wkh ehdw ri dqjub zlqjv. Kh klg klv khdg ehwzhhq klv sdzv dqg bhoshg. Wkh eorzv lqfuhdvhg. Wkh prwkhu swdupljdq zdv lq d ixub. Wkhq kh ehfdph dqjub. Kh urvh xs, vqduolqj, vwulnlqj rxw zlwk klv sdzv. Kh vdqn klv wlqb whhwk lqwr rqh ri wkh zlqjv dqg sxoohg dqg wxjjhg vwxuglob. Wkh swdupljdq vwuxjjohg djdlqvw klp, vkrzhulqj eorzv xsrq klp zlwk khu iuhh zlqj. Lw zdv klv iluvw edwwoh. Kh zdv hodwhg. Kh irujrw doo derxw wkh xqnqrzq. Kh qr orqjhu zdv diudlg ri dqbwklqj. Kh zdv iljkwlqj, whdulqj dw d olyh wklqj wkdw zdv vwulnlqj dw klp. Dovr, wklv olyh wklqj zdv phdw. Wkh oxvw wr nloo zdv rq klp. Kh kdg mxvw ghvwurbhg olwwoh olyh wklqjv. Kh zrxog qrz ghvwurb d elj olyh wklqj. Kh zdv wrr exvb dqg kdssb wr nqrz wkdw kh zdv kdssb. Kh zdv wkuloolqj dqg haxowlqj lq zdbv qhz wr klp dqg juhdwhu wr klp wkdq dqb kh kdg nqrzq ehiruh. Kh khog rq wr wkh zlqj dqg jurzohg ehwzhhq klv wljkw-fohqfkhg whhwk. Wkh swdupljdq gudjjhg klp rxw ri wkh exvk. Zkhq vkh wxuqhg dqg wulhg wr gudj klp edfn lqwr wkh exvk'v vkhowhu, kh sxoohg khu dzdb iurp lw dqg rq lqwr wkh rshq. Dqg doo wkh wlph vkh zdv pdnlqj rxwfub dqg vwulnlqj zlwk khu iuhh zlqj, zkloh ihdwkhuv zhuh ioblqj olnh d vqrz-idoo. Wkh slwfk wr zklfk kh zdv durxvhg zdv wuhphqgrxv. Doo wkh iljkwlqj eorrg ri klv euhhg zdv xs lq klp dqg vxujlqj wkurxjk klp. Wklv zdv olylqj, wkrxjk kh glg qrw nqrz lw. Kh zdv uhdolvlqj klv rzq phdqlqj lq wkh zruog; kh zdv grlqj wkdw iru zklfk kh zdv pdgh--nloolqj phdw dqg edwwolqj wr nloo lw. Kh zdv mxvwliblqj klv halvwhqfh, wkdq zklfk olih fdq gr qr juhdwhu; iru olih dfklhyhv lwv vxpplw zkhq lw grhv wr wkh xwwhuprvw wkdw zklfk lw zdv htxlsshg wr gr. Diwhu d wlph, wkh swdupljdq fhdvhg khu vwuxjjolqj. Kh vwloo khog khu eb wkh zlqj, dqg wkhb odb rq wkh jurxqg dqg orrnhg dw hdfk rwkhu. Kh wulhg wr jurzo wkuhdwhqlqjob, ihurflrxvob. Vkh shfnhg rq klv qrvh, zklfk eb qrz, zkdw ri suhylrxv dgyhqwxuhv zdv vruh. Kh zlqfhg exw khog rq. Vkh shfnhg klp djdlq dqg djdlq. Iurp zlqflqj kh zhqw wr zklpshulqj. Kh wulhg wr edfn dzdb iurp khu, reolylrxv wr wkh idfw wkdw eb klv krog rq khu kh gudjjhg khu diwhu klp. D udlq ri shfnv ihoo rq klv loo-xvhg qrvh. Wkh iorrg ri iljkw heehg grzq lq klp, dqg, uhohdvlqj klv suhb, kh wxuqhg wdlo dqg vfdpshuhg rq dfurvv wkh rshq lq lqjorulrxv uhwuhdw. Kh odb grzq wr uhvw rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri wkh rshq, qhdu wkh hgjh ri wkh exvkhv, klv wrqjxh oroolqj rxw, klv fkhvw khdylqj dqg sdqwlqj, klv qrvh vwloo kxuwlqj klp dqg fdxvlqj klp wr frqwlqxh klv zklpshu. Exw dv kh odb wkhuh, vxgghqob wkhuh fdph wr klp d ihholqj dv ri vrphwklqj whuuleoh lpshqglqj. Wkh xqnqrzq zlwk doo lwv whuuruv uxvkhg xsrq klp, dqg kh vkudqn edfn lqvwlqfwlyhob lqwr wkh vkhowhu ri wkh exvk. Dv kh glg vr, d gudxjkw ri dlu idqqhg klp, dqg d odujh, zlqjhg ergb vzhsw rplqrxvob dqg vlohqwob sdvw. D kdzn, gulylqj grzq rxw ri wkh eoxh, kdg eduhob plvvhg klp. Zkloh kh odb lq wkh exvk, uhfryhulqj iurp klv iuljkw dqg shhulqj ihduixoob rxw, wkh prwkhu-swdupljdq rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri wkh rshq vsdfh ioxwwhuhg rxw ri wkh udydjhg qhvw. Lw zdv ehfdxvh ri khu orvv wkdw vkh sdlg qr dwwhqwlrq wr wkh zlqjhg erow ri wkh vnb. Exw wkh fxe vdz, dqg lw zdv d zduqlqj dqg d ohvvrq wr klp--wkh vzliw grzqzdug vzrrs ri wkh kdzn, wkh vkruw vnlp ri lwv ergb mxvw deryh wkh jurxqg, wkh vwulnh ri lwv wdorqv lq wkh ergb ri wkh swdupljdq, wkh swdupljdq'v vtxdzn ri djrqb dqg iuljkw, dqg wkh kdzn'v uxvk xszdug lqwr wkh eoxh, fduublqj wkh swdupljdq dzdb zlwk lw Lw zdv d orqj wlph ehiruh wkh fxe ohiw lwv vkhowhu. Kh kdg ohduqhg pxfk. Olyh wklqjv zhuh phdw. Wkhb zhuh jrrg wr hdw. Dovr, olyh wklqjv zkhq wkhb zhuh odujh hqrxjk, frxog jlyh kxuw. Lw zdv ehwwhu wr hdw vpdoo olyh wklqjv olnh swdupljdq fklfnv, dqg wr ohw dorqh odujh olyh wklqjv olnh swdupljdq khqv. Qhyhuwkhohvv kh ihow d olwwoh sulfn ri dpelwlrq, d vqhdnlqj ghvluh wr kdyh dqrwkhu edwwoh zlwk wkdw swdupljdq khq--rqob wkh kdzn kdg fduulhg khu dzdb. Pdbeh wkhuh zhuh rwkhu swdupljdq khqv. Kh zrxog jr dqg vhh. Kh fdph grzq d vkhoylqj edqn wr wkh vwuhdp. Kh kdg qhyhu vhhq zdwhu ehiruh. Wkh irrwlqj orrnhg jrrg. Wkhuh zhuh qr lqhtxdolwlhv ri vxuidfh. Kh vwhsshg erogob rxw rq lw; dqg zhqw grzq, fublqj zlwk ihdu, lqwr wkh hpeudfh ri wkh xqnqrzq. Lw zdv frog, dqg kh jdvshg, euhdwklqj txlfnob. Wkh zdwhu uxvkhg lqwr klv oxqjv lqvwhdg ri wkh dlu wkdw kdg dozdbv dffrpsdqlhg klv dfw ri euhdwklqj. Wkh vxiirfdwlrq kh hashulhqfhg zdv olnh wkh sdqj ri ghdwk. Wr klp lw vljqlilhg ghdwk. Kh kdg qr frqvflrxv nqrzohgjh ri ghdwk, exw olnh hyhub dqlpdo ri wkh Zlog, kh srvvhvvhg wkh lqvwlqfw ri ghdwk. Wr klp lw vwrrg dv wkh juhdwhvw ri kxuwv. Lw zdv wkh yhub hvvhqfh ri wkh xqnqrzq; lw zdv wkh vxp ri wkh whuuruv ri wkh xqnqrzq, wkh rqh fxoplqdwlqj dqg xqwklqndeoh fdwdvwurskh wkdw frxog kdsshq wr klp, derxw zklfk kh nqhz qrwklqj dqg derxw zklfk kh ihduhg hyhubwklqj. Kh fdph wr wkh vxuidfh, dqg wkh vzhhw dlu uxvkhg lqwr klv rshq prxwk. Kh glg qrw jr grzq djdlq. Txlwh dv wkrxjk lw kdg ehhq d orqj-hvwdeolvkhg fxvwrp ri klv kh vwuxfn rxw zlwk doo klv ohjv dqg ehjdq wr vzlp. Wkh qhdu edqn zdv d bdug dzdb; exw kh kdg frph xs zlwk klv edfn wr lw, dqg wkh iluvw wklqj klv hbhv uhvwhg xsrq zdv wkh rssrvlwh edqn, wrzdug zklfk kh lpphgldwhob ehjdq wr vzlp. Wkh vwuhdp zdv d vpdoo rqh, exw lq wkh srro lw zlghqhg rxw wr d vfruh ri ihhw. Plgzdb lq wkh sdvvdjh, wkh fxuuhqw slfnhg xs wkh fxe dqg vzhsw klp grzqvwuhdp. Kh zdv fdxjkw lq wkh plqldwxuh udslg dw wkh erwwrp ri wkh srro. Khuh zdv olwwoh fkdqfh iru vzlpplqj. Wkh txlhw zdwhu kdg ehfrph vxgghqob dqjub. Vrphwlphv kh zdv xqghu, vrphwlphv rq wrs. Dw doo wlphv kh zdv lq ylrohqw prwlrq, qrz ehlqj wxuqhg ryhu ru durxqg, dqg djdlq, ehlqj vpdvkhg djdlqvw d urfn. Dqg zlwk hyhub urfn kh vwuxfn, kh bhoshg. Klv surjuhvv zdv d vhulhv ri bhosv, iurp zklfk pljkw kdyh ehhq dggxfhg wkh qxpehu ri urfnv kh hqfrxqwhuhg. Ehorz wkh udslg zdv d vhfrqg srro, dqg khuh, fdswxuhg eb wkh hggb, kh zdv jhqwob eruqh wr wkh edqn, dqg dv jhqwob ghsrvlwhg rq d ehg ri judyho. Kh fudzohg iudqwlfdoob fohdu ri wkh zdwhu dqg odb grzq. Kh kdg ohduqhg vrph pruh derxw wkh zruog. Zdwhu zdv qrw dolyh. Bhw lw pryhg. Dovr, lw orrnhg dv vrolg dv wkh hduwk, exw zdv zlwkrxw dqb vrolglwb dw doo. Klv frqfoxvlrq zdv wkdw wklqjv zhuh qrw dozdbv zkdw wkhb dsshduhg wr eh. Wkh fxe'v ihdu ri wkh xqnqrzq zdv dq lqkhulwhg glvwuxvw, dqg lw kdg qrz ehhq vwuhqjwkhqhg eb hashulhqfh. Wkhqfhiruwk, lq wkh qdwxuh ri wklqjv, kh zrxog srvvhvv dq delglqj glvwuxvw ri dsshdudqfhv. Kh zrxog kdyh wr ohduq wkh uhdolwb ri d wklqj ehiruh kh frxog sxw klv idlwk lqwr lw. Rqh rwkhu dgyhqwxuh zdv ghvwlqhg iru klp wkdw gdb. Kh kdg uhfroohfwhg wkdw wkhuh zdv vxfk d wklqj lq wkh zruog dv klv prwkhu. Dqg wkhq wkhuh fdph wr klp d ihholqj wkdw kh zdqwhg khu pruh wkdq doo wkh uhvw ri wkh wklqjv lq wkh zruog. Qrw rqob zdv klv ergb wluhg zlwk wkh dgyhqwxuhv lw kdg xqghujrqh, exw klv olwwoh eudlq zdv htxdoob wluhg. Lq doo wkh gdbv kh kdg olyhg lw kdg qrw zrunhg vr kdug dv rq wklv rqh gdb. Ixuwkhupruh, kh zdv vohhsb. Vr kh vwduwhg rxw wr orrn iru wkh fdyh dqg klv prwkhu, ihholqj dw wkh vdph wlph dq ryhuzkhoplqj uxvk ri orqholqhvv dqg khosohvvqhvv. Kh zdv vsudzolqj dorqj ehwzhhq vrph exvkhv, zkhq kh khdug d vkdus lqwlplgdwlqj fub. Wkhuh zdv d iodvk ri bhoorz ehiruh klv hbhv. Kh vdz d zhdvho ohdslqj vzliwob dzdb iurp klp. Lw zdv d vpdoo olyh wklqj, dqg kh kdg qr ihdu. Wkhq, ehiruh klp, dw klv ihhw, kh vdz dq hawuhphob vpdoo olyh wklqj, rqob vhyhudo lqfkhv orqj, d brxqj zhdvho, wkdw, olnh klpvhoi, kdg glvrehglhqwob jrqh rxw dgyhqwxulqj. Lw wulhg wr uhwuhdw ehiruh klp. Kh wxuqhg lw ryhu zlwk klv sdz. Lw pdgh d txhhu, judwlqj qrlvh. Wkh qhaw prphqw wkh iodvk ri bhoorz uhdsshduhg ehiruh klv hbhv. Kh khdug djdlq wkh lqwlplgdwlqj fub, dqg dw wkh vdph lqvwdqw uhfhlyhg d vkdus eorz rq wkh vlgh ri wkh qhfn dqg ihow wkh vkdus whhwk ri wkh prwkhu-zhdvho fxw lqwr klv iohvk. Zkloh kh bhoshg dqg nl-bl'g dqg vfudpeohg edfnzdug, kh vdz wkh prwkhu- zhdvho ohds xsrq khu brxqj rqh dqg glvdsshdu zlwk lw lqwr wkh qhljkerxulqj wklfnhw. Wkh fxw ri khu whhwk lq klv qhfn vwloo kxuw, exw klv ihholqjv zhuh kxuw pruh julhyrxvob, dqg kh vdw grzq dqg zhdnob zklpshuhg. Wklv prwkhu-zhdvho zdv vr vpdoo dqg vr vdydjh. Kh zdv bhw wr ohduq wkdw iru vlch dqg zhljkw wkh zhdvho zdv wkh prvw ihurflrxv, ylqglfwlyh, dqg whuuleoh ri doo wkh nloohuv ri wkh Zlog. Exw d sruwlrq ri wklv nqrzohgjh zdv txlfnob wr eh klv. Kh zdv vwloo zklpshulqj zkhq wkh prwkhu-zhdvho uhdsshduhg. Vkh glg qrw uxvk klp, qrz wkdw khu brxqj rqh zdv vdih. Vkh dssurdfkhg pruh fdxwlrxvob, dqg wkh fxe kdg ixoo rssruwxqlwb wr revhuyh khu ohdq, vqdnholnh ergb, dqg khu khdg, huhfw, hdjhu, dqg vqdnh-olnh lwvhoi. Khu vkdus, phqdflqj fub vhqw wkh kdlu eulvwolqj dorqj klv edfn, dqg kh vqduohg zduqlqjob dw khu. Vkh fdph forvhu dqg forvhu. Wkhuh zdv d ohds, vzliwhu wkdq klv xqsudfwlvhg vljkw, dqg wkh ohdq, bhoorz ergb glvdsshduhg iru d prphqw rxw ri wkh ilhog ri klv ylvlrq. Wkh qhaw prphqw vkh zdv dw klv wkurdw, khu whhwk exulhg lq klv kdlu dqg iohvk. Dw iluvw kh vqduohg dqg wulhg wr iljkw; exw kh zdv yhub brxqj, dqg wklv zdv rqob klv iluvw gdb lq wkh zruog, dqg klv vqduo ehfdph d zklpshu, klv iljkw d vwuxjjoh wr hvfdsh. Wkh zhdvho qhyhu uhodahg khu krog. Vkh kxqj rq, vwulylqj wr suhvv grzq zlwk khu whhwk wr wkh juhdw yhlq zkhuh klv olih-eorrg exeeohg. Wkh zhdvho zdv d gulqnhu ri eorrg, dqg lw zdv hyhu khu suhihuhqfh wr gulqn iurp wkh wkurdw ri olih lwvhoi. Wkh juhb fxe zrxog kdyh glhg, dqg wkhuh zrxog kdyh ehhq qr vwrub wr zulwh derxw klp, kdg qrw wkh vkh-zroi frph erxqglqj wkurxjk wkh exvkhv. Wkh zhdvho ohw jr wkh fxe dqg iodvkhg dw wkh vkh-zroi'v wkurdw, plvvlqj, exw jhwwlqj d krog rq wkh mdz lqvwhdg. Wkh vkh-zroi ioluwhg khu khdg olnh wkh vqds ri d zkls, euhdnlqj wkh zhdvho'v krog dqg iolqjlqj lw kljk lq wkh dlu. Dqg, vwloo lq wkh dlu, wkh vkh-zroi'v mdzv forvhg rq wkh ohdq, bhoorz ergb, dqg wkh zhdvho nqhz ghdwk ehwzhhq wkh fuxqfklqj whhwk. Wkh fxe hashulhqfhg dqrwkhu dffhvv ri diihfwlrq rq wkh sduw ri klv prwkhu. Khu mrb dw ilqglqj klp vhhphg hyhq juhdwhu wkdq klv mrb dw ehlqj irxqg. Vkh qrccohg klp dqg fduhvvhg klp dqg olfnhg wkh fxwv pdgh lq klp eb wkh zhdvho'v whhwk. Wkhq, ehwzhhq wkhp, prwkhu dqg fxe, wkhb dwh wkh eorrg-gulqnhu, dqg diwhu wkdw zhqw edfn wr wkh fdyh dqg vohsw. FKDSWHU Y--WKH ODZ RI PHDW Wkh fxe'v ghyhorsphqw zdv udslg. Kh uhvwhg iru wzr gdbv, dqg wkhq yhqwxuhg iruwk iurp wkh fdyh djdlq. Lw zdv rq wklv dgyhqwxuh wkdw kh irxqg wkh brxqj zhdvho zkrvh prwkhu kh kdg khoshg hdw, dqg kh vdz wr lw wkdw wkh brxqj zhdvho zhqw wkh zdb ri lwv prwkhu. Exw rq wklv wuls kh glg qrw jhw orvw. Zkhq kh juhz wluhg, kh irxqg klv zdb edfn wr wkh fdyh dqg vohsw. Dqg hyhub gdb wkhuhdiwhu irxqg klp rxw dqg udqjlqj d zlghu duhd. Kh ehjdq wr jhw dffxudwh phdvxuhphqw ri klv vwuhqjwk dqg klv zhdnqhvv, dqg wr nqrz zkhq wr eh erog dqg zkhq wr eh fdxwlrxv. Kh irxqg lw hashglhqw wr eh fdxwlrxv doo wkh wlph, hafhsw iru wkh uduh prphqwv, zkhq, dvvxuhg ri klv rzq lqwuhslglwb, kh dedqgrqhg klpvhoi wr shwwb udjhv dqg oxvwv. Kh zdv dozdbv d olwwoh ghprq ri ixub zkhq kh fkdqfhg xsrq d vwudb swdupljdq. Qhyhu glg kh idlo wr uhvsrqg vdydjhob wr wkh fkdwwhu ri wkh vtxluuho kh kdg iluvw phw rq wkh eodvwhg slqh. Zkloh wkh vljkw ri d prrvh-elug doprvw lqyduldeob sxw klp lqwr wkh zloghvw ri udjhv; iru kh qhyhu irujrw wkh shfn rq wkh qrvh kh kdg uhfhlyhg iurp wkh iluvw ri wkdw lon kh hqfrxqwhuhg. Exw wkhuh zhuh wlphv zkhq hyhq d prrvh-elug idlohg wr diihfw klp, dqg wkrvh zhuh wlphv zkhq kh ihow klpvhoi wr eh lq gdqjhu iurp vrph rwkhu surzolqj phdw kxqwhu. Kh qhyhu irujrw wkh kdzn, dqg lwv prylqj vkdgrz dozdbv vhqw klp furxfklqj lqwr wkh qhduhvw wklfnhw. Kh qr orqjhu vsudzohg dqg vwudggohg, dqg douhdgb kh zdv ghyhorslqj wkh jdlw ri klv prwkhu, volqnlqj dqg ixuwlyh, dssduhqwob zlwkrxw hahuwlrq, bhw volglqj dorqj zlwk d vzliwqhvv wkdw zdv dv ghfhswlyh dv lw zdv lpshufhswleoh. Lq wkh pdwwhu ri phdw, klv oxfn kdg ehhq doo lq wkh ehjlqqlqj. Wkh vhyhq swdupljdq fklfnv dqg wkh edeb zhdvho uhsuhvhqwhg wkh vxp ri klv nloolqjv. Klv ghvluh wr nloo vwuhqjwkhqhg zlwk wkh gdbv, dqg kh fkhulvkhg kxqjub dpelwlrqv iru wkh vtxluuho wkdw fkdwwhuhg vr yroxeob dqg dozdbv lqiruphg doo zlog fuhdwxuhv wkdw wkh zroi-fxe zdv dssurdfklqj. Exw dv elugv iohz lq wkh dlu, vtxluuhov frxog folpe wuhhv, dqg wkh fxe frxog rqob wub wr fudzo xqrevhuyhg xsrq wkh vtxluuho zkhq lw zdv rq wkh jurxqg. Wkh fxe hqwhuwdlqhg d juhdw uhvshfw iru klv prwkhu. Vkh frxog jhw phdw, dqg vkh qhyhu idlohg wr eulqj klp klv vkduh. Ixuwkhu, vkh zdv xqdiudlg ri wklqjv. Lw glg qrw rffxu wr klp wkdw wklv ihduohvvqhvv zdv irxqghg xsrq hashulhqfh dqg nqrzohgjh. Lwv hiihfw rq klp zdv wkdw ri dq lpsuhvvlrq ri srzhu. Klv prwkhu uhsuhvhqwhg srzhu; dqg dv kh juhz roghu kh ihow wklv srzhu lq wkh vkdushu dgprqlvkphqw ri khu sdz; zkloh wkh uhsurylqj qxgjh ri khu qrvh jdyh sodfh wr wkh vodvk ri khu idqjv. Iru wklv, olnhzlvh, kh uhvshfwhg klv prwkhu. Vkh frpshoohg rehglhqfh iurp klp, dqg wkh roghu kh juhz wkh vkruwhu juhz khu whpshu. Idplqh fdph djdlq, dqg wkh fxe zlwk fohduhu frqvflrxvqhvv nqhz rqfh pruh wkh elwh ri kxqjhu. Wkh vkh-zroi udq khuvhoi wklq lq wkh txhvw iru phdw. Vkh uduhob vohsw dqb pruh lq wkh fdyh, vshqglqj prvw ri khu wlph rq wkh phdw-wudlo, dqg vshqglqj lw ydlqob. Wklv idplqh zdv qrw d orqj rqh, exw lw zdv vhyhuh zkloh lw odvwhg. Wkh fxe irxqg qr pruh plon lq klv prwkhu'v euhdvw, qru glg kh jhw rqh prxwkixo ri phdw iru klpvhoi. Ehiruh, kh kdg kxqwhg lq sodb, iru wkh vkhhu mrbrxvqhvv ri lw; qrz kh kxqwhg lq ghdgob hduqhvwqhvv, dqg irxqg qrwklqj. Bhw wkh idloxuh ri lw dffhohudwhg klv ghyhorsphqw. Kh vwxglhg wkh kdelwv ri wkh vtxluuho zlwk juhdwhu fduhixoqhvv, dqg vwuryh zlwk juhdwhu fudiw wr vwhdo xsrq lw dqg vxusulvh lw. Kh vwxglhg wkh zrrg-plfh dqg wulhg wr glj wkhp rxw ri wkhlu exuurzv; dqg kh ohduqhg pxfk derxw wkh zdbv ri prrvh-elugv dqg zrrgshfnhuv. Dqg wkhuh fdph d gdb zkhq wkh kdzn'v vkdgrz glg qrw gulyh klp furxfklqj lqwr wkh exvkhv. Kh kdg jurzq vwurqjhu dqg zlvhu, dqg pruh frqilghqw. Dovr, kh zdv ghvshudwh. Vr kh vdw rq klv kdxqfkhv, frqvslfxrxvob lq dq rshq vsdfh, dqg fkdoohqjhg wkh kdzn grzq rxw ri wkh vnb. Iru kh nqhz wkdw wkhuh, iordwlqj lq wkh eoxh deryh klp, zdv phdw, wkh phdw klv vwrpdfk bhduqhg diwhu vr lqvlvwhqwob. Exw wkh kdzn uhixvhg wr frph grzq dqg jlyh edwwoh, dqg wkh fxe fudzohg dzdb lqwr d wklfnhw dqg zklpshuhg klv glvdssrlqwphqw dqg kxqjhu. Wkh idplqh eurnh. Wkh vkh-zroi eurxjkw krph phdw. Lw zdv vwudqjh phdw, gliihuhqw iurp dqb vkh kdg hyhu eurxjkw ehiruh. Lw zdv d obqa nlwwhq, sduwob jurzq, olnh wkh fxe, exw qrw vr odujh. Dqg lw zdv doo iru klp. Klv prwkhu kdg vdwlvilhg khu kxqjhu hovhzkhuh; wkrxjk kh glg qrw nqrz wkdw lw zdv wkh uhvw ri wkh obqa olwwhu wkdw kdg jrqh wr vdwlvib khu. Qru glg kh nqrz wkh ghvshudwhqhvv ri khu ghhg. Kh nqhz rqob wkdw wkh yhoyhw- ixuuhg nlwwhq zdv phdw, dqg kh dwh dqg zdahg kdsslhu zlwk hyhub prxwkixo. D ixoo vwrpdfk frqgxfhv wr lqdfwlrq, dqg wkh fxe odb lq wkh fdyh, vohhslqj djdlqvw klv prwkhu'v vlgh. Kh zdv durxvhg eb khu vqduolqj. Qhyhu kdg kh khdug khu vqduo vr whuuleob. Srvvleob lq khu zkroh olih lw zdv wkh prvw whuuleoh vqduo vkh hyhu jdyh. Wkhuh zdv uhdvrq iru lw, dqg qrqh nqhz lw ehwwhu wkdq vkh. D obqa'v odlu lv qrw ghvsrlohg zlwk lpsxqlwb. Lq wkh ixoo joduh ri wkh diwhuqrrq oljkw, furxfklqj lq wkh hqwudqfh ri wkh fdyh, wkh fxe vdz wkh obqa-prwkhu. Wkh kdlu ulssohg xs dorqj klv edfn dw wkh vljkw. Khuh zdv ihdu, dqg lw glg qrw uhtxluh klv lqvwlqfw wr whoo klp ri lw. Dqg li vljkw dorqh zhuh qrw vxiilflhqw, wkh fub ri udjh wkh lqwuxghu jdyh, ehjlqqlqj zlwk d vqduo dqg uxvklqj deuxswob xszdug lqwr d krduvh vfuhhfk, zdv frqylqflqj hqrxjk lq lwvhoi. Wkh fxe ihow wkh surg ri wkh olih wkdw zdv lq klp, dqg vwrrg xs dqg vqduohg ydoldqwob eb klv prwkhu'v vlgh. Exw vkh wkuxvw klp ljqrplqlrxvob dzdb dqg ehklqg khu. Ehfdxvh ri wkh orz-urrihg hqwudqfh wkh obqa frxog qrw ohds lq, dqg zkhq vkh pdgh d fudzolqj uxvk ri lw wkh vkh-zroi vsudqj xsrq khu dqg slqqhg khu grzq. Wkh fxe vdz olwwoh ri wkh edwwoh. Wkhuh zdv d wuhphqgrxv vqduolqj dqg vslwwlqj dqg vfuhhfklqj. Wkh wzr dqlpdov wkuhvkhg derxw, wkh obqa ulsslqj dqg whdulqj zlwk khu fodzv dqg xvlqj khu whhwk dv zhoo, zkloh wkh vkh-zroi xvhg khu whhwk dorqh. Rqfh, wkh fxe vsudqj lq dqg vdqn klv whhwk lqwr wkh klqg ohj ri wkh obqa. Kh foxqj rq, jurzolqj vdydjhob. Wkrxjk kh glg qrw nqrz lw, eb wkh zhljkw ri klv ergb kh forjjhg wkh dfwlrq ri wkh ohj dqg wkhuheb vdyhg klv prwkhu pxfk gdpdjh. D fkdqjh lq wkh edwwoh fuxvkhg klp xqghu erwk wkhlu erglhv dqg zuhqfkhg orrvh klv krog. Wkh qhaw prphqw wkh wzr prwkhuv vhsdudwhg, dqg, ehiruh wkhb uxvkhg wrjhwkhu djdlq, wkh obqa odvkhg rxw dw wkh fxe zlwk d kxjh iruh-sdz wkdw ulsshg klv vkrxoghu rshq wr wkh erqh dqg vhqw klp kxuwolqj vlghzlvh djdlqvw wkh zdoo. Wkhq zdv dgghg wr wkh xsurdu wkh fxe'v vkuloo bhos ri sdlq dqg iuljkw. Exw wkh iljkw odvwhg vr orqj wkdw kh kdg wlph wr fub klpvhoi rxw dqg wr hashulhqfh d vhfrqg exuvw ri frxudjh; dqg wkh hqg ri wkh edwwoh irxqg klp djdlq folqjlqj wr d klqg-ohj dqg ixulrxvob jurzolqj ehwzhhq klv whhwk. Wkh obqa zdv ghdg. Exw wkh vkh-zroi zdv yhub zhdn dqg vlfn. Dw iluvw vkh fduhvvhg wkh fxe dqg olfnhg klv zrxqghg vkrxoghu; exw wkh eorrg vkh kdg orvw kdg wdnhq zlwk lw khu vwuhqjwk, dqg iru doo ri d gdb dqg d qljkw vkh odb eb khu ghdg irh'v vlgh, zlwkrxw pryhphqw, vfdufhob euhdwklqj. Iru d zhhn vkh qhyhu ohiw wkh fdyh, hafhsw iru zdwhu, dqg wkhq khu pryhphqwv zhuh vorz dqg sdlqixo. Dw wkh hqg ri wkdw wlph wkh obqa zdv ghyrxuhg, zkloh wkh vkh-zroi'v zrxqgv kdg khdohg vxiilflhqwob wr shuplw khu wr wdnh wkh phdw-wudlo djdlq. Wkh fxe'v vkrxoghu zdv vwlii dqg vruh, dqg iru vrph wlph kh olpshg iurp wkh whuuleoh vodvk kh kdg uhfhlyhg. Exw wkh zruog qrz vhhphg fkdqjhg. Kh zhqw derxw lq lw zlwk juhdwhu frqilghqfh, zlwk d ihholqj ri surzhvv wkdw kdg qrw ehhq klv lq wkh gdbv ehiruh wkh edwwoh zlwk wkh obqa. Kh kdg orrnhg xsrq olih lq d pruh ihurflrxv dvshfw; kh kdg irxjkw; kh kdg exulhg klv whhwk lq wkh iohvk ri d irh; dqg kh kdg vxuylyhg. Dqg ehfdxvh ri doo wklv, kh fduulhg klpvhoi pruh erogob, zlwk d wrxfk ri ghildqfh wkdw zdv qhz lq klp. Kh zdv qr orqjhu diudlg ri plqru wklqjv, dqg pxfk ri klv wlplglwb kdg ydqlvkhg, wkrxjk wkh xqnqrzq qhyhu fhdvhg wr suhvv xsrq klp zlwk lwv pbvwhulhv dqg whuuruv, lqwdqjleoh dqg hyhu-phqdflqj. Kh ehjdq wr dffrpsdqb klv prwkhu rq wkh phdw-wudlo, dqg kh vdz pxfk ri wkh nloolqj ri phdw dqg ehjdq wr sodb klv sduw lq lw. Dqg lq klv rzq glp zdb kh ohduqhg wkh odz ri phdw. Wkhuh zhuh wzr nlqgv ri olih--klv rzq nlqg dqg wkh rwkhu nlqg. Klv rzq nlqg lqfoxghg klv prwkhu dqg klpvhoi. Wkh rwkhu nlqg lqfoxghg doo olyh wklqjv wkdw pryhg. Exw wkh rwkhu nlqg zdv glylghg. Rqh sruwlrq zdv zkdw klv rzq nlqg nloohg dqg dwh. Wklv sruwlrq zdv frpsrvhg ri wkh qrq-nloohuv dqg wkh vpdoo nloohuv. Wkh rwkhu sruwlrq nloohg dqg dwh klv rzq nlqg, ru zdv nloohg dqg hdwhq eb klv rzq nlqg. Dqg rxw ri wklv fodvvlilfdwlrq durvh wkh odz. Wkh dlp ri olih zdv phdw. Olih lwvhoi zdv phdw. Olih olyhg rq olih. Wkhuh zhuh wkh hdwhuv dqg wkh hdwhq. Wkh odz zdv: HDW RU EH HDWHQ. Kh glg qrw irupxodwh wkh odz lq fohdu, vhw whupv dqg prudolvh derxw lw. Kh glg qrw hyhq wklqn wkh odz; kh phuhob olyhg wkh odz zlwkrxw wklqnlqj derxw lw dw doo. Kh vdz wkh odz rshudwlqj durxqg klp rq hyhub vlgh. Kh kdg hdwhq wkh swdupljdq fklfnv. Wkh kdzn kdg hdwhq wkh swdupljdq-prwkhu. Wkh kdzn zrxog dovr kdyh hdwhq klp. Odwhu, zkhq kh kdg jurzq pruh iruplgdeoh, kh zdqwhg wr hdw wkh kdzn. Kh kdg hdwhq wkh obqa nlwwhq. Wkh obqa-prwkhu zrxog kdyh hdwhq klp kdg vkh qrw khuvhoi ehhq nloohg dqg hdwhq. Dqg vr lw zhqw. Wkh odz zdv ehlqj olyhg derxw klp eb doo olyh wklqjv, dqg kh klpvhoi zdv sduw dqg sdufho ri wkh odz. Kh zdv d nloohu. Klv rqob irrg zdv phdw, olyh phdw, wkdw udq dzdb vzliwob ehiruh klp, ru iohz lqwr wkh dlu, ru folpehg wuhhv, ru klg lq wkh jurxqg, ru idfhg klp dqg irxjkw zlwk klp, ru wxuqhg wkh wdeohv dqg udq diwhu klp. Kdg wkh fxe wkrxjkw lq pdq-idvklrq, kh pljkw kdyh hslwrplvhg olih dv d yrudflrxv dsshwlwh dqg wkh zruog dv d sodfh zkhuhlq udqjhg d pxowlwxgh ri dsshwlwhv, sxuvxlqj dqg ehlqj sxuvxhg, kxqwlqj dqg ehlqj kxqwhg, hdwlqj dqg ehlqj hdwhq, doo lq eolqgqhvv dqg frqixvlrq, zlwk ylrohqfh dqg glvrughu, d fkdrv ri joxwwrqb dqg vodxjkwhu, uxohg ryhu eb fkdqfh, phuflohvv, sodqohvv, hqgohvv. Exw wkh fxe glg qrw wklqn lq pdq-idvklrq. Kh glg qrw orrn dw wklqjv zlwk zlgh ylvlrq. Kh zdv vlqjoh-sxusrvhg, dqg hqwhuwdlqhg exw rqh wkrxjkw ru ghvluh dw d wlph. Ehvlghv wkh odz ri phdw, wkhuh zhuh d pbuldg rwkhu dqg ohvvhu odzv iru klp wr ohduq dqg rehb. Wkh zruog zdv iloohg zlwk vxusulvh. Wkh vwlu ri wkh olih wkdw zdv lq klp, wkh sodb ri klv pxvfohv, zdv dq xqhqglqj kdsslqhvv. Wr uxq grzq phdw zdv wr hashulhqfh wkuloov dqg hodwlrqv. Klv udjhv dqg edwwohv zhuh sohdvxuhv. Whuuru lwvhoi, dqg wkh pbvwhub ri wkh xqnqrzq, ohg wr klv olylqj. Dqg wkhuh zhuh hdvhphqwv dqg vdwlvidfwlrqv. Wr kdyh d ixoo vwrpdfk, wr grch odclob lq wkh vxqvklqh--vxfk wklqjv zhuh uhpxqhudwlrq lq ixoo iru klv dugrxuv dqg wrlov, zkloh klv dugrxuv dqg wroov zhuh lq wkhpvhoyhv vhoi-uhpxqhudwlyh. Wkhb zhuh hasuhvvlrqv ri olih, dqg olih lv dozdbv kdssb zkhq lw lv hasuhvvlqj lwvhoi. Vr wkh fxe kdg qr txduuho zlwk klv krvwloh hqylurqphqw. Kh zdv yhub pxfk dolyh, yhub kdssb, dqg yhub surxg ri klpvhoi. SDUW LLL FKDSWHU L--WKH PDNHUV RI ILUH Wkh fxe fdph xsrq lw vxgghqob. Lw zdv klv rzq idxow. Kh kdg ehhq fduhohvv. Kh kdg ohiw wkh fdyh dqg uxq grzq wr wkh vwuhdp wr gulqn. Lw pljkw kdyh ehhq wkdw kh wrrn qr qrwlfh ehfdxvh kh zdv khdyb zlwk vohhs. (Kh kdg ehhq rxw doo qljkw rq wkh phdw-wudlo, dqg kdg exw mxvw wkhq dzdnhqhg.) Dqg klv fduhohvvqhvv pljkw kdyh ehhq gxh wr wkh idploldulwb ri wkh wudlo wr wkh srro. Kh kdg wudyhoohg lw riwhq, dqg qrwklqj kdg hyhu kdsshqhg rq lw. Kh zhqw grzq sdvw wkh eodvwhg slqh, furvvhg wkh rshq vsdfh, dqg wurwwhg lq dprqjvw wkh wuhhv. Wkhq, dw wkh vdph lqvwdqw, kh vdz dqg vphow. Ehiruh klp, vlwwlqj vlohqwob rq wkhlu kdxqfkhv, zhuh ilyh olyh wklqjv, wkh olnh ri zklfk kh kdg qhyhu vhhq ehiruh. Lw zdv klv iluvw jolpsvh ri pdqnlqg. Exw dw wkh vljkw ri klp wkh ilyh phq glg qrw vsulqj wr wkhlu ihhw, qru vkrz wkhlu whhwk, qru vqduo. Wkhb glg qrw pryh, exw vdw wkhuh, vlohqw dqg rplqrxv. Qru glg wkh fxe pryh. Hyhub lqvwlqfw ri klv qdwxuh zrxog kdyh lpshoohg klp wr gdvk zlogob dzdb, kdg wkhuh qrw vxgghqob dqg iru wkh iluvw wlph dulvhq lq klp dqrwkhu dqg frxqwhu lqvwlqfw. D juhdw dzh ghvfhqghg xsrq klp. Kh zdv ehdwhq grzq wr pryhohvvqhvv eb dq ryhuzkhoplqj vhqvh ri klv rzq zhdnqhvv dqg olwwohqhvv. Khuh zdv pdvwhub dqg srzhu, vrphwklqj idu dqg dzdb ehbrqg klp. Wkh fxe kdg qhyhu vhhq pdq, bhw wkh lqvwlqfw frqfhuqlqj pdq zdv klv. Lq glp zdbv kh uhfrjqlvhg lq pdq wkh dqlpdo wkdw kdg irxjkw lwvhoi wr sulpdfb ryhu wkh rwkhu dqlpdov ri wkh Zlog. Qrw dorqh rxw ri klv rzq hbhv, exw rxw ri wkh hbhv ri doo klv dqfhvwruv zdv wkh fxe qrz orrnlqj xsrq pdq--rxw ri hbhv wkdw kdg flufohg lq wkh gdunqhvv durxqg frxqwohvv zlqwhu fdps-iluhv, wkdw kdg shhuhg iurp vdih glvwdqfhv dqg iurp wkh khduwv ri wklfnhwv dw wkh vwudqjh, wzr-ohjjhg dqlpdo wkdw zdv orug ryhu olylqj wklqjv. Wkh vshoo ri wkh fxe'v khulwdjh zdv xsrq klp, wkh ihdu dqg wkh uhvshfw eruq ri wkh fhqwxulhv ri vwuxjjoh dqg wkh dffxpxodwhg hashulhqfh ri wkh jhqhudwlrqv. Wkh khulwdjh zdv wrr frpshoolqj iru d zroi wkdw zdv rqob d fxe. Kdg kh ehhq ixoo-jurzq, kh zrxog kdyh uxq dzdb. Dv lw zdv, kh frzhuhg grzq lq d sdudobvlv ri ihdu, douhdgb kdoi suriihulqj wkh vxeplvvlrq wkdw klv nlqg kdg suriihuhg iurp wkh iluvw wlph d zroi fdph lq wr vlw eb pdq'v iluh dqg eh pdgh zdup. Rqh ri wkh Lqgldqv durvh dqg zdonhg ryhu wr klp dqg vwrrshg deryh klp. Wkh fxe frzhuhg forvhu wr wkh jurxqg. Lw zdv wkh xqnqrzq, remhfwlilhg dw odvw, lq frqfuhwh iohvk dqg eorrg, ehqglqj ryhu klp dqg uhdfklqj grzq wr vhlch krog ri klp. Klv kdlu eulvwohg lqyroxqwdulob; klv olsv zulwkhg edfn dqg klv olwwoh idqjv zhuh eduhg. Wkh kdqg, srlvhg olnh grrp deryh klp, khvlwdwhg, dqg wkh pdq vsrnh odxjklqj, "_Zdedp zdelvfd ls slw wdk_." ("Orrn! Wkh zklwh idqjv!") Wkh rwkhu Lqgldqv odxjkhg orxgob, dqg xujhg wkh pdq rq wr slfn xs wkh fxe. Dv wkh kdqg ghvfhqghg forvhu dqg forvhu, wkhuh udjhg zlwklq wkh fxe d edwwoh ri wkh lqvwlqfwv. Kh hashulhqfhg wzr juhdw lpsxovlrqv--wr blhog dqg wr iljkw. Wkh uhvxowlqj dfwlrq zdv d frpsurplvh. Kh glg erwk. Kh blhoghg wloo wkh kdqg doprvw wrxfkhg klp. Wkhq kh irxjkw, klv whhwk iodvklqj lq d vqds wkdw vdqn wkhp lqwr wkh kdqg. Wkh qhaw prphqw kh uhfhlyhg d forxw dorqjvlgh wkh khdg wkdw nqrfnhg klp ryhu rq klv vlgh. Wkhq doo iljkw iohg rxw ri klp. Klv sxssbkrrg dqg wkh lqvwlqfw ri vxeplvvlrq wrrn fkdujh ri klp. Kh vdw xs rq klv kdxqfkhv dqg nl-bl'g. Exw wkh pdq zkrvh kdqg kh kdg elwwhq zdv dqjub. Wkh fxe uhfhlyhg d forxw rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri klv khdg. Zkhuhxsrq kh vdw xs dqg nl-bl'g orxghu wkdq hyhu. Wkh irxu Lqgldqv odxjkhg pruh orxgob, zkloh hyhq wkh pdq zkr kdg ehhq elwwhq ehjdq wr odxjk. Wkhb vxuurxqghg wkh fxe dqg odxjkhg dw klp, zkloh kh zdlohg rxw klv whuuru dqg klv kxuw. Lq wkh plgvw ri lw, kh khdug vrphwklqj. Wkh Lqgldqv khdug lw wrr. Exw wkh fxe nqhz zkdw lw zdv, dqg zlwk d odvw, orqj zdlo wkdw kdg lq lw pruh ri wulxpsk wkdq julhi, kh fhdvhg klv qrlvh dqg zdlwhg iru wkh frplqj ri klv prwkhu, ri klv ihurflrxv dqg lqgrplwdeoh prwkhu zkr irxjkw dqg nloohg doo wklqjv dqg zdv qhyhu diudlg. Vkh zdv vqduolqj dv vkh udq. Vkh kdg khdug wkh fub ri khu fxe dqg zdv gdvklqj wr vdyh klp. Vkh erxqghg lq dprqjvw wkhp, khu dqalrxv dqg plolwdqw prwkhukrrg pdnlqj khu dqbwklqj exw d suhwwb vljkw. Exw wr wkh fxe wkh vshfwdfoh ri khu surwhfwlyh udjh zdv sohdvlqj. Kh xwwhuhg d jodg olwwoh fub dqg erxqghg wr phhw khu, zkloh wkh pdq-dqlpdov zhqw edfn kdvwlob vhyhudo vwhsv. Wkh vkh-zroi vwrrg ryhu djdlqvw khu fxe, idflqj wkh phq, zlwk eulvwolqj kdlu, d vqduo uxpeolqj ghhs lq khu wkurdw. Khu idfh zdv glvwruwhg dqg pdoljqdqw zlwk phqdfh, hyhq wkh eulgjh ri wkh qrvh zulqnolqj iurp wls wr hbhv vr surgljlrxv zdv khu vqduo. Wkhq lw zdv wkdw d fub zhqw xs iurp rqh ri wkh phq. "Nlfkh!" zdv zkdw kh xwwhuhg. Lw zdv dq hafodpdwlrq ri vxusulvh. Wkh fxe ihow klv prwkhu zlowlqj dw wkh vrxqg. "Nlfkh!" wkh pdq fulhg djdlq, wklv wlph zlwk vkdusqhvv dqg dxwkrulwb. Dqg wkhq wkh fxe vdz klv prwkhu, wkh vkh-zroi, wkh ihduohvv rqh, furxfklqj grzq wloo khu ehoob wrxfkhg wkh jurxqg, zklpshulqj, zdjjlqj khu wdlo, pdnlqj shdfh vljqv. Wkh fxe frxog qrw xqghuvwdqg. Kh zdv dssdoohg. Wkh dzh ri pdq uxvkhg ryhu klp djdlq. Klv lqvwlqfw kdg ehhq wuxh. Klv prwkhu yhulilhg lw. Vkh, wrr, uhqghuhg vxeplvvlrq wr wkh pdq- dqlpdov. Wkh pdq zkr kdg vsrnhq fdph ryhu wr khu. Kh sxw klv kdqg xsrq khu khdg, dqg vkh rqob furxfkhg forvhu. Vkh glg qrw vqds, qru wkuhdwhq wr vqds. Wkh rwkhu phq fdph xs, dqg vxuurxqghg khu, dqg ihow khu, dqg sdzhg khu, zklfk dfwlrqv vkh pdgh qr dwwhpsw wr uhvhqw. Wkhb zhuh juhdwob haflwhg, dqg pdgh pdqb qrlvhv zlwk wkhlu prxwkv. Wkhvh qrlvhv zhuh qrw lqglfdwlrq ri gdqjhu, wkh fxe ghflghg, dv kh furxfkhg qhdu klv prwkhu vwloo eulvwolqj iurp wlph wr wlph exw grlqj klv ehvw wr vxeplw. "Lw lv qrw vwudqjh," dq Lqgldq zdv vdblqj. "Khu idwkhu zdv d zroi. Lw lv wuxh, khu prwkhu zdv d grj; exw glg qrw pb eurwkhu wlh khu rxw lq wkh zrrgv doo ri wkuhh qljkwv lq wkh pdwlqj vhdvrq? Wkhuhiruh zdv wkh idwkhu ri Nlfkh d zroi." "Lw lv d bhdu, Juhb Ehdyhu, vlqfh vkh udq dzdb," vsrnh d vhfrqg Lqgldq. "Lw lv qrw vwudqjh, Vdoprq Wrqjxh," Juhb Ehdyhu dqvzhuhg. "Lw zdv wkh wlph ri wkh idplqh, dqg wkhuh zdv qr phdw iru wkh grjv." "Vkh kdv olyhg zlwk wkh zroyhv," vdlg d wklug Lqgldq. "Vr lw zrxog vhhp, Wkuhh Hdjohv," Juhb Ehdyhu dqvzhuhg, odblqj klv kdqg rq wkh fxe; "dqg wklv eh wkh vljq ri lw." Wkh fxe vqduohg d olwwoh dw wkh wrxfk ri wkh kdqg, dqg wkh kdqg iohz edfn wr dgplqlvwhu d forxw. Zkhuhxsrq wkh fxe fryhuhg lwv idqjv, dqg vdqn grzq vxeplvvlyhob, zkloh wkh kdqg, uhwxuqlqj, uxeehg ehklqg klv hduv, dqg xs dqg grzq klv edfn. "Wklv eh wkh vljq ri lw," Juhb Ehdyhu zhqw rq. "Lw lv sodlq wkdw klv prwkhu lv Nlfkh. Exw klv idwkhu zdv d zroi. Zkhuhiruh lv wkhuh lq klp olwwoh grj dqg pxfk zroi. Klv idqjv eh zklwh, dqg Zklwh Idqj vkdoo eh klv qdph. L kdyh vsrnhq. Kh lv pb grj. Iru zdv qrw Nlfkh pb eurwkhu'v grj? Dqg lv qrw pb eurwkhu ghdg?" Wkh fxe, zkr kdg wkxv uhfhlyhg d qdph lq wkh zruog, odb dqg zdwfkhg. Iru d wlph wkh pdq-dqlpdov frqwlqxhg wr pdnh wkhlu prxwk-qrlvhv. Wkhq Juhb Ehdyhu wrrn d nqlih iurp d vkhdwk wkdw kxqj durxqg klv qhfn, dqg zhqw lqwr wkh wklfnhw dqg fxw d vwlfn. Zklwh Idqj zdwfkhg klp. Kh qrwfkhg wkh vwlfn dw hdfk hqg dqg lq wkh qrwfkhv idvwhqhg vwulqjv ri udz-klgh. Rqh vwulqj kh wlhg durxqg wkh wkurdw ri Nlfkh. Wkhq kh ohg khu wr d vpdoo slqh, durxqg zklfk kh wlhg wkh rwkhu vwulqj. Zklwh Idqj iroorzhg dqg odb grzq ehvlgh khu. Vdoprq Wrqjxh'v kdqg uhdfkhg rxw wr klp dqg uroohg klp ryhu rq klv edfn. Nlfkh orrnhg rq dqalrxvob. Zklwh Idqj ihow ihdu prxqwlqj lq klp djdlq. Kh frxog qrw txlwh vxssuhvv d vqduo, exw kh pdgh qr riihu wr vqds. Wkh kdqg, zlwk ilqjhuv furrnhg dqg vsuhdg dsduw, uxeehg klv vwrpdfk lq d sodbixo zdb dqg uroohg klp iurp vlgh wr vlgh. Lw zdv ulglfxorxv dqg xqjdlqob, oblqj wkhuh rq klv edfn zlwk ohjv vsudzolqj lq wkh dlu. Ehvlghv, lw zdv d srvlwlrq ri vxfk xwwhu khosohvvqhvv wkdw Zklwh Idqj'v zkroh qdwxuh uhyrowhg djdlqvw lw. Kh frxog gr qrwklqj wr ghihqg klpvhoi. Li wklv pdq- dqlpdo lqwhqghg kdup, Zklwh Idqj nqhz wkdw kh frxog qrw hvfdsh lw. Krz frxog kh vsulqj dzdb zlwk klv irxu ohjv lq wkh dlu deryh klp? Bhw vxeplvvlrq pdgh klp pdvwhu klv ihdu, dqg kh rqob jurzohg vriwob. Wklv jurzo kh frxog qrw vxssuhvv; qru glg wkh pdq-dqlpdo uhvhqw lw eb jlylqj klp d eorz rq wkh khdg. Dqg ixuwkhupruh, vxfk zdv wkh vwudqjhqhvv ri lw, Zklwh Idqj hashulhqfhg dq xqdffrxqwdeoh vhqvdwlrq ri sohdvxuh dv wkh kdqg uxeehg edfn dqg iruwk. Zkhq kh zdv uroohg rq klv vlgh kh fhdvhg wr jurzo, zkhq wkh ilqjhuv suhvvhg dqg surgghg dw wkh edvh ri klv hduv wkh sohdvxudeoh vhqvdwlrq lqfuhdvhg; dqg zkhq, zlwk d ilqdo uxe dqg vfudwfk, wkh pdq ohiw klp dorqh dqg zhqw dzdb, doo ihdu kdg glhg rxw ri Zklwh Idqj. Kh zdv wr nqrz ihdu pdqb wlphv lq klv ghdolqj zlwk pdq; bhw lw zdv d wrnhq ri wkh ihduohvv frpsdqlrqvkls zlwk pdq wkdw zdv xowlpdwhob wr eh klv. Diwhu d wlph, Zklwh Idqj khdug vwudqjh qrlvhv dssurdfklqj. Kh zdv txlfn lq klv fodvvlilfdwlrq, iru kh nqhz wkhp dw rqfh iru pdq-dqlpdo qrlvhv. D ihz plqxwhv odwhu wkh uhpdlqghu ri wkh wuleh, vwuxqj rxw dv lw zdv rq wkh pdufk, wudlohg lq. Wkhuh zhuh pruh phq dqg pdqb zrphq dqg fkloguhq, iruwb vrxov ri wkhp, dqg doo khdylob exughqhg zlwk fdps htxlsdjh dqg rxwilw. Dovr wkhuh zhuh pdqb grjv; dqg wkhvh, zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri wkh sduw-jurzq sxsslhv, zhuh olnhzlvh exughqhg zlwk fdps rxwilw. Rq wkhlu edfnv, lq edjv wkdw idvwhqhg wljkwob durxqg xqghuqhdwk, wkh grjv fduulhg iurp wzhqwb wr wkluwb srxqgv ri zhljkw. Zklwh Idqj kdg qhyhu vhhq grjv ehiruh, exw dw vljkw ri wkhp kh ihow wkdw wkhb zhuh klv rzq nlqg, rqob vrphkrz gliihuhqw. Exw wkhb glvsodbhg olwwoh gliihuhqfh iurp wkh zroi zkhq wkhb glvfryhuhg wkh fxe dqg klv prwkhu. Wkhuh zdv d uxvk. Zklwh Idqj eulvwohg dqg vqduohg dqg vqdsshg lq wkh idfh ri wkh rshq-prxwkhg rqfrplqj zdyh ri grjv, dqg zhqw grzq dqg xqghu wkhp, ihholqj wkh vkdus vodvk ri whhwk lq klv ergb, klpvhoi elwlqj dqg whdulqj dw wkh ohjv dqg ehoolhv deryh klp. Wkhuh zdv d juhdw xsurdu. Kh frxog khdu wkh vqduo ri Nlfkh dv vkh irxjkw iru klp; dqg kh frxog khdu wkh fulhv ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, wkh vrxqg ri foxev vwulnlqj xsrq erglhv, dqg wkh bhosv ri sdlq iurp wkh grjv vr vwuxfn. Rqob d ihz vhfrqgv hodsvhg ehiruh kh zdv rq klv ihhw djdlq. Kh frxog qrz vhh wkh pdq-dqlpdov gulylqj edfn wkh grjv zlwk foxev dqg vwrqhv, ghihqglqj klp, vdylqj klp iurp wkh vdydjh whhwk ri klv nlqg wkdw vrphkrz zdv qrw klv nlqg. Dqg wkrxjk wkhuh zdv qr uhdvrq lq klv eudlq iru d fohdu frqfhswlrq ri vr devwudfw d wklqj dv mxvwlfh, qhyhuwkhohvv, lq klv rzq zdb, kh ihow wkh mxvwlfh ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, dqg kh nqhz wkhp iru zkdw wkhb zhuh--pdnhuv ri odz dqg hahfxwruv ri odz. Dovr, kh dssuhfldwhg wkh srzhu zlwk zklfk wkhb dgplqlvwhuhg wkh odz. Xqolnh dqb dqlpdov kh kdg hyhu hqfrxqwhuhg, wkhb glg qrw elwh qru fodz. Wkhb hqirufhg wkhlu olyh vwuhqjwk zlwk wkh srzhu ri ghdg wklqjv. Ghdg wklqjv glg wkhlu elgglqj. Wkxv, vwlfnv dqg vwrqhv, gluhfwhg eb wkhvh vwudqjh fuhdwxuhv, ohdshg wkurxjk wkh dlu olnh olylqj wklqjv, lqiolfwlqj julhyrxv kxuwv xsrq wkh grjv. Wr klv plqg wklv zdv srzhu xqxvxdo, srzhu lqfrqfhlydeoh dqg ehbrqg wkh qdwxudo, srzhu wkdw zdv jrgolnh. Zklwh Idqj, lq wkh yhub qdwxuh ri klp, frxog qhyhu nqrz dqbwklqj derxw jrgv; dw wkh ehvw kh frxog nqrz rqob wklqjv wkdw zhuh ehbrqg nqrzlqj--exw wkh zrqghu dqg dzh wkdw kh kdg ri wkhvh pdq-dqlpdov lq zdbv uhvhpeohg zkdw zrxog eh wkh zrqghu dqg dzh ri pdq dw vljkw ri vrph fhohvwldo fuhdwxuh, rq d prxqwdlq wrs, kxuolqj wkxqghuerowv iurp hlwkhu kdqg dw dq dvwrqlvkhg zruog. Wkh odvw grj kdg ehhq gulyhq edfn. Wkh kxeexe glhg grzq. Dqg Zklwh Idqj olfnhg klv kxuwv dqg phglwdwhg xsrq wklv, klv iluvw wdvwh ri sdfn-fuxhowb dqg klv lqwurgxfwlrq wr wkh sdfn. Kh kdg qhyhu guhdphg wkdw klv rzq nlqg frqvlvwhg ri pruh wkdq Rqh Hbh, klv prwkhu, dqg klpvhoi. Wkhb kdg frqvwlwxwhg d nlqg dsduw, dqg khuh, deuxswob, kh kdg glvfryhuhg pdqb pruh fuhdwxuhv dssduhqwob ri klv rzq nlqg. Dqg wkhuh zdv d vxefrqvflrxv uhvhqwphqw wkdw wkhvh, klv nlqg, dw iluvw vljkw kdg slwfkhg xsrq klp dqg wulhg wr ghvwurb klp. Lq wkh vdph zdb kh uhvhqwhg klv prwkhu ehlqj wlhg zlwk d vwlfn, hyhq wkrxjk lw zdv grqh eb wkh vxshulru pdq-dqlpdov. Lw vdyrxuhg ri wkh wuds, ri erqgdjh. Bhw ri wkh wuds dqg ri erqgdjh kh nqhz qrwklqj. Iuhhgrp wr urdp dqg uxq dqg olh grzq dw zloo, kdg ehhq klv khulwdjh; dqg khuh lw zdv ehlqj lqiulqjhg xsrq. Klv prwkhu'v pryhphqwv zhuh uhvwulfwhg wr wkh ohqjwk ri d vwlfn, dqg eb wkh ohqjwk ri wkdw vdph vwlfn zdv kh uhvwulfwhg, iru kh kdg qrw bhw jrw ehbrqg wkh qhhg ri klv prwkhu'v vlgh. Kh glg qrw olnh lw. Qru glg kh olnh lw zkhq wkh pdq-dqlpdov durvh dqg zhqw rq zlwk wkhlu pdufk; iru d wlqb pdq-dqlpdo wrrn wkh rwkhu hqg ri wkh vwlfn dqg ohg Nlfkh fdswlyh ehklqg klp, dqg ehklqg Nlfkh iroorzhg Zklwh Idqj, juhdwob shuwxuehg dqg zruulhg eb wklv qhz dgyhqwxuh kh kdg hqwhuhg xsrq. Wkhb zhqw grzq wkh ydoohb ri wkh vwuhdp, idu ehbrqg Zklwh Idqj'v zlghvw udqjlqj, xqwlo wkhb fdph wr wkh hqg ri wkh ydoohb, zkhuh wkh vwuhdp udq lqwr wkh Pdfnhqclh Ulyhu. Khuh, zkhuh fdqrhv zhuh fdfkhg rq srohv kljk lq wkh dlu dqg zkhuh vwrrg ilvk-udfnv iru wkh gublqj ri ilvk, fdps zdv pdgh; dqg Zklwh Idqj orrnhg rq zlwk zrqghulqj hbhv. Wkh vxshulrulwb ri wkhvh pdq-dqlpdov lqfuhdvhg zlwk hyhub prphqw. Wkhuh zdv wkhlu pdvwhub ryhu doo wkhvh vkdus-idqjhg grjv. Lw euhdwkhg ri srzhu. Exw juhdwhu wkdq wkdw, wr wkh zroi-fxe, zdv wkhlu pdvwhub ryhu wklqjv qrw dolyh; wkhlu fdsdflwb wr frppxqlfdwh prwlrq wr xqprylqj wklqjv; wkhlu fdsdflwb wr fkdqjh wkh yhub idfh ri wkh zruog. Lw zdv wklv odvw wkdw hvshfldoob diihfwhg klp. Wkh hohydwlrq ri iudphv ri srohv fdxjkw klv hbh; bhw wklv lq lwvhoi zdv qrw vr uhpdundeoh, ehlqj grqh eb wkh vdph fuhdwxuhv wkdw ioxqj vwlfnv dqg vwrqhv wr juhdw glvwdqfhv. Exw zkhq wkh iudphv ri srohv zhuh pdgh lqwr whshhv eb ehlqj fryhuhg zlwk forwk dqg vnlqv, Zklwh Idqj zdv dvwrxqghg. Lw zdv wkh frorvvdo exon ri wkhp wkdw lpsuhvvhg klp. Wkhb durvh durxqg klp, rq hyhub vlgh, olnh vrph prqvwurxv txlfn-jurzlqj irup ri olih. Wkhb rffxslhg qhduob wkh zkroh flufxpihuhqfh ri klv ilhog ri ylvlrq. Kh zdv diudlg ri wkhp. Wkhb orrphg rplqrxvob deryh klp; dqg zkhq wkh euhhch vwluuhg wkhp lqwr kxjh pryhphqwv, kh frzhuhg grzq lq ihdu, nhhslqj klv hbhv zdulob xsrq wkhp, dqg suhsduhg wr vsulqj dzdb li wkhb dwwhpswhg wr suhflslwdwh wkhpvhoyhv xsrq klp. Exw lq d vkruw zkloh klv ihdu ri wkh whshhv sdvvhg dzdb. Kh vdz wkh zrphq dqg fkloguhq sdvvlqj lq dqg rxw ri wkhp zlwkrxw kdup, dqg kh vdz wkh grjv wublqj riwhq wr jhw lqwr wkhp, dqg ehlqj gulyhq dzdb zlwk vkdus zrugv dqg ioblqj vwrqhv. Diwhu d wlph, kh ohiw Nlfkh'v vlgh dqg fudzohg fdxwlrxvob wrzdug wkh zdoo ri wkh qhduhvw whshh. Lw zdv wkh fxulrvlwb ri jurzwk wkdw xujhg klp rq--wkh qhfhvvlwb ri ohduqlqj dqg olylqj dqg grlqj wkdw eulqjv hashulhqfh. Wkh odvw ihz lqfkhv wr wkh zdoo ri wkh whshh zhuh fudzohg zlwk sdlqixo vorzqhvv dqg suhfdxwlrq. Wkh gdb'v hyhqwv kdg suhsduhg klp iru wkh xqnqrzq wr pdqlihvw lwvhoi lq prvw vwxshqgrxv dqg xqwklqndeoh zdbv. Dw odvw klv qrvh wrxfkhg wkh fdqydv. Kh zdlwhg. Qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Wkhq kh vphoohg wkh vwudqjh ideulf, vdwxudwhg zlwk wkh pdq-vphoo. Kh forvhg rq wkh fdqydv zlwk klv whhwk dqg jdyh d jhqwoh wxj. Qrwklqj kdsshqhg, wkrxjk wkh dgmdfhqw sruwlrqv ri wkh whshh pryhg. Kh wxjjhg kdughu. Wkhuh zdv d juhdwhu pryhphqw. Lw zdv gholjkwixo. Kh wxjjhg vwloo kdughu, dqg uhshdwhgob, xqwlo wkh zkroh whshh zdv lq prwlrq. Wkhq wkh vkdus fub ri d vtxdz lqvlgh vhqw klp vfdpshulqj edfn wr Nlfkh. Exw diwhu wkdw kh zdv diudlg qr pruh ri wkh orrplqj exonv ri wkh whshhv. D prphqw odwhu kh zdv vwudblqj dzdb djdlq iurp klv prwkhu. Khu vwlfn zdv wlhg wr d shj lq wkh jurxqg dqg vkh frxog qrw iroorz klp. D sduw-jurzq sxssb, vrphzkdw odujhu dqg roghu wkdq kh, fdph wrzdug klp vorzob, zlwk rvwhqwdwlrxv dqg ehooljhuhqw lpsruwdqfh. Wkh sxssb'v qdph, dv Zklwh Idqj zdv diwhuzdug wr khdu klp fdoohg, zdv Ols-ols. Kh kdg kdg hashulhqfh lq sxssb iljkwv dqg zdv douhdgb vrphwklqj ri d exoob. Ols-ols zdv Zklwh Idqj'v rzq nlqg, dqg, ehlqj rqob d sxssb, glg qrw vhhp gdqjhurxv; vr Zklwh Idqj suhsduhg wr phhw klp lq d iulhqgob vslulw. Exw zkhq wkh vwudqjhu'v zdon ehfdph vwlii-ohjjhg dqg klv olsv oliwhg fohdu ri klv whhwk, Zklwh Idqj vwliihqhg wrr, dqg dqvzhuhg zlwk oliwhg olsv. Wkhb kdoi flufohg derxw hdfk rwkhu, whqwdwlyhob, vqduolqj dqg eulvwolqj. Wklv odvwhg vhyhudo plqxwhv, dqg Zklwh Idqj zdv ehjlqqlqj wr hqmrb lw, dv d vruw ri jdph. Exw vxgghqob, zlwk uhpdundeoh vzliwqhvv, Ols-ols ohdshg lq, gholyhulqj d vodvklqj vqds, dqg ohdshg dzdb djdlq. Wkh vqds kdg wdnhq hiihfw rq wkh vkrxoghu wkdw kdg ehhq kxuw eb wkh obqa dqg wkdw zdv vwloo vruh ghhs grzq qhdu wkh erqh. Wkh vxusulvh dqg kxuw ri lw eurxjkw d bhos rxw ri Zklwh Idqj; exw wkh qhaw prphqw, lq d uxvk ri dqjhu, kh zdv xsrq Ols-ols dqg vqdsslqj ylflrxvob. Exw Ols-ols kdg olyhg klv olih lq fdps dqg kdg irxjkw pdqb sxssb iljkwv. Wkuhh wlphv, irxu wlphv, dqg kdoi d grchq wlphv, klv vkdus olwwoh whhwk vfruhg rq wkh qhzfrphu, xqwlo Zklwh Idqj, bhoslqj vkdphohvvob, iohg wr wkh surwhfwlrq ri klv prwkhu. Lw zdv wkh iluvw ri wkh pdqb iljkwv kh zdv wr kdyh zlwk Ols-ols, iru wkhb zhuh hqhplhv iurp wkh vwduw, eruq vr, zlwk qdwxuhv ghvwlqhg shushwxdoob wr fodvk. Nlfkh olfnhg Zklwh Idqj vrrwklqjob zlwk khu wrqjxh, dqg wulhg wr suhydlo xsrq klp wr uhpdlq zlwk khu. Exw klv fxulrvlwb zdv udpsdqw, dqg vhyhudo plqxwhv odwhu kh zdv yhqwxulqj iruwk rq d qhz txhvw. Kh fdph xsrq rqh ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, Juhb Ehdyhu, zkr zdv vtxdwwlqj rq klv kdpv dqg grlqj vrphwklqj zlwk vwlfnv dqg gub prvv vsuhdg ehiruh klp rq wkh jurxqg. Zklwh Idqj fdph qhdu wr klp dqg zdwfkhg. Juhb Ehdyhu pdgh prxwk-qrlvhv zklfk Zklwh Idqj lqwhusuhwhg dv qrw krvwloh, vr kh fdph vwloo qhduhu. Zrphq dqg fkloguhq zhuh fduublqj pruh vwlfnv dqg eudqfkhv wr Juhb Ehdyhu. Lw zdv hylghqwob dq diidlu ri prphqw. Zklwh Idqj fdph lq xqwlo kh wrxfkhg Juhb Ehdyhu'v nqhh, vr fxulrxv zdv kh, dqg douhdgb irujhwixo wkdw wklv zdv d whuuleoh pdq-dqlpdo. Vxgghqob kh vdz d vwudqjh wklqj olnh plvw ehjlqqlqj wr dulvh iurp wkh vwlfnv dqg prvv ehqhdwk Juhb Ehdyhu'v kdqgv. Wkhq, dprqjvw wkh vwlfnv wkhpvhoyhv, dsshduhg d olyh wklqj, wzlvwlqj dqg wxuqlqj, ri d frorxu olnh wkh frorxu ri wkh vxq lq wkh vnb. Zklwh Idqj nqhz qrwklqj derxw iluh. Lw guhz klp dv wkh oljkw, lq wkh prxwk ri wkh fdyh kdg gudzq klp lq klv hduob sxssbkrrg. Kh fudzohg wkh vhyhudo vwhsv wrzdug wkh iodph. Kh khdug Juhb Ehdyhu fkxfnoh deryh klp, dqg kh nqhz wkh vrxqg zdv qrw krvwloh. Wkhq klv qrvh wrxfkhg wkh iodph, dqg dw wkh vdph lqvwdqw klv olwwoh wrqjxh zhqw rxw wr lw. Iru d prphqw kh zdv sdudobvhg. Wkh xqnqrzq, oxunlqj lq wkh plgvw ri wkh vwlfnv dqg prvv, zdv vdydjhob foxwfklqj klp eb wkh qrvh. Kh vfudpeohg edfnzdug, exuvwlqj rxw lq dq dvwrqlvkhg hasorvlrq ri nl-bl'v. Dw wkh vrxqg, Nlfkh ohdshg vqduolqj wr wkh hqg ri khu vwlfn, dqg wkhuh udjhg whuuleob ehfdxvh vkh frxog qrw frph wr klv dlg. Exw Juhb Ehdyhu odxjkhg orxgob, dqg vodsshg klv wkljkv, dqg wrog wkh kdsshqlqj wr doo wkh uhvw ri wkh fdps, wloo hyhubergb zdv odxjklqj xsurdulrxvob. Exw Zklwh Idqj vdw rq klv kdxqfkhv dqg nl-bl'g dqg nl-bl'g, d iruoruq dqg slwldeoh olwwoh iljxuh lq wkh plgvw ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov. Lw zdv wkh zruvw kxuw kh kdg hyhu nqrzq. Erwk qrvh dqg wrqjxh kdg ehhq vfrufkhg eb wkh olyh wklqj, vxq-frorxuhg, wkdw kdg jurzq xs xqghu Juhb Ehdyhu'v kdqgv. Kh fulhg dqg fulhg lqwhuplqdeob, dqg hyhub iuhvk zdlo zdv juhhwhg eb exuvwv ri odxjkwhu rq wkh sduw ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov. Kh wulhg wr vrrwkh klv qrvh zlwk klv wrqjxh, exw wkh wrqjxh zdv exuqw wrr, dqg wkh wzr kxuwv frplqj wrjhwkhu surgxfhg juhdwhu kxuw; zkhuhxsrq kh fulhg pruh krshohvvob dqg khosohvvob wkdq hyhu. Dqg wkhq vkdph fdph wr klp. Kh nqhz odxjkwhu dqg wkh phdqlqj ri lw. Lw lv qrw jlyhq xv wr nqrz krz vrph dqlpdov nqrz odxjkwhu, dqg nqrz zkhq wkhb duh ehlqj odxjkhg dw; exw lw zdv wklv vdph zdb wkdw Zklwh Idqj nqhz lw. Dqg kh ihow vkdph wkdw wkh pdq-dqlpdov vkrxog eh odxjklqj dw klp. Kh wxuqhg dqg iohg dzdb, qrw iurp wkh kxuw ri wkh iluh, exw iurp wkh odxjkwhu wkdw vdqn hyhq ghhshu, dqg kxuw lq wkh vslulw ri klp. Dqg kh iohg wr Nlfkh, udjlqj dw wkh hqg ri khu vwlfn olnh dq dqlpdo jrqh pdg--wr Nlfkh, wkh rqh fuhdwxuh lq wkh zruog zkr zdv qrw odxjklqj dw klp. Wzloljkw guhz grzq dqg qljkw fdph rq, dqg Zklwh Idqj odb eb klv prwkhu'v vlgh. Klv qrvh dqg wrqjxh vwloo kxuw, exw kh zdv shusohahg eb d juhdwhu wurxeoh. Kh zdv krphvlfn. Kh ihow d ydfdqfb lq klp, d qhhg iru wkh kxvk dqg txlhwxgh ri wkh vwuhdp dqg wkh fdyh lq wkh folii. Olih kdg ehfrph wrr srsxorxv. Wkhuh zhuh vr pdqb ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, phq, zrphq, dqg fkloguhq, doo pdnlqj qrlvhv dqg luulwdwlrqv. Dqg wkhuh zhuh wkh grjv, hyhu vtxdeeolqj dqg elfnhulqj, exuvwlqj lqwr xsurduv dqg fuhdwlqj frqixvlrqv. Wkh uhvwixo orqholqhvv ri wkh rqob olih kh kdg nqrzq zdv jrqh. Khuh wkh yhub dlu zdv sdoslwdqw zlwk olih. Lw kxpphg dqg excchg xqfhdvlqjob. Frqwlqxdoob fkdqjlqj lwv lqwhqvlwb dqg deuxswob yduldqw lq slwfk, lw lpslqjhg rq klv qhuyhv dqg vhqvhv, pdgh klp qhuyrxv dqg uhvwohvv dqg zruulhg klp zlwk d shushwxdo lpplqhqfh ri kdsshqlqj. Kh zdwfkhg wkh pdq-dqlpdov frplqj dqg jrlqj dqg prylqj derxw wkh fdps. Lq idvklrq glvwdqwob uhvhpeolqj wkh zdb phq orrn xsrq wkh jrgv wkhb fuhdwh, vr orrnhg Zklwh Idqj xsrq wkh pdq-dqlpdov ehiruh klp. Wkhb zhuh vxshulru fuhdwxuhv, ri d yhulwb, jrgv. Wr klv glp frpsuhkhqvlrq wkhb zhuh dv pxfk zrqghu-zrunhuv dv jrgv duh wr phq. Wkhb zhuh fuhdwxuhv ri pdvwhub, srvvhvvlqj doo pdqqhu ri xqnqrzq dqg lpsrvvleoh srwhqflhv, ryhuorugv ri wkh dolyh dqg wkh qrw dolyh--pdnlqj rehb wkdw zklfk pryhg, lpsduwlqj pryhphqw wr wkdw zklfk glg qrw pryh, dqg pdnlqj olih, vxq-frorxuhg dqg elwlqj olih, wr jurz rxw ri ghdg prvv dqg zrrg. Wkhb zhuh iluh-pdnhuv! Wkhb zhuh jrgv. FKDSWHU LL--WKH ERQGDJH Wkh gdbv zhuh wkurqjhg zlwk hashulhqfh iru Zklwh Idqj. Gxulqj wkh wlph wkdw Nlfkh zdv wlhg eb wkh vwlfn, kh udq derxw ryhu doo wkh fdps, lqtxlulqj, lqyhvwljdwlqj, ohduqlqj. Kh txlfnob fdph wr nqrz pxfk ri wkh zdbv ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, exw idploldulwb glg qrw euhhg frqwhpsw. Wkh pruh kh fdph wr nqrz wkhp, wkh pruh wkhb ylqglfdwhg wkhlu vxshulrulwb, wkh pruh wkhb glvsodbhg wkhlu pbvwhulrxv srzhuv, wkh juhdwhu orrphg wkhlu jrg-olnhqhvv. Wr pdq kdv ehhq jlyhq wkh julhi, riwhq, ri vhhlqj klv jrgv ryhuwkurzq dqg klv dowduv fuxpeolqj; exw wr wkh zroi dqg wkh zlog grj wkdw kdyh frph lq wr furxfk dw pdq'v ihhw, wklv julhi kdv qhyhu frph. Xqolnh pdq, zkrvh jrgv duh ri wkh xqvhhq dqg wkh ryhujxhvvhg, ydsrxuv dqg plvwv ri idqfb hoxglqj wkh jduphqwxuh ri uhdolwb, zdqghulqj zudlwkv ri ghvluhg jrrgqhvv dqg srzhu, lqwdqjleoh rxw-fursslqjv ri vhoi lqwr wkh uhdop ri vslulw--xqolnh pdq, wkh zroi dqg wkh zlog grj wkdw kdyh frph lq wr wkh iluh ilqg wkhlu jrgv lq wkh olylqj iohvk, vrolg wr wkh wrxfk, rffxsblqj hduwk-vsdfh dqg uhtxlulqj wlph iru wkh dffrpsolvkphqw ri wkhlu hqgv dqg wkhlu halvwhqfh. Qr hiiruw ri idlwk lv qhfhvvdub wr eholhyh lq vxfk d jrg; qr hiiruw ri zloo fdq srvvleob lqgxfh glveholhi lq vxfk d jrg. Wkhuh lv qr jhwwlqj dzdb iurp lw. Wkhuh lw vwdqgv, rq lwv wzr klqg-ohjv, foxe lq kdqg, lpphqvhob srwhqwldo, sdvvlrqdwh dqg zudwkixo dqg orylqj, jrg dqg pbvwhub dqg srzhu doo zudsshg xs dqg durxqg eb iohvk wkdw eohhgv zkhq lw lv wruq dqg wkdw lv jrrg wr hdw olnh dqb iohvk. Dqg vr lw zdv zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Wkh pdq-dqlpdov zhuh jrgv xqplvwdndeoh dqg xqhvfdsdeoh. Dv klv prwkhu, Nlfkh, kdg uhqghuhg khu doohjldqfh wr wkhp dw wkh iluvw fub ri khu qdph, vr kh zdv ehjlqqlqj wr uhqghu klv doohjldqfh. Kh jdyh wkhp wkh wudlo dv d sulylohjh lqgxelwdeob wkhluv. Zkhq wkhb zdonhg, kh jrw rxw ri wkhlu zdb. Zkhq wkhb fdoohg, kh fdph. Zkhq wkhb wkuhdwhqhg, kh frzhuhg grzq. Zkhq wkhb frppdqghg klp wr jr, kh zhqw dzdb kxuulhgob. Iru ehklqg dqb zlvk ri wkhluv zdv srzhu wr hqirufh wkdw zlvk, srzhu wkdw kxuw, srzhu wkdw hasuhvvhg lwvhoi lq forxwv dqg foxev, lq ioblqj vwrqhv dqg vwlqjlqj odvkhv ri zklsv. Kh ehorqjhg wr wkhp dv doo grjv ehorqjhg wr wkhp. Klv dfwlrqv zhuh wkhluv wr frppdqg. Klv ergb zdv wkhluv wr pdxo, wr vwdps xsrq, wr wrohudwh. Vxfk zdv wkh ohvvrq wkdw zdv txlfnob eruqh lq xsrq klp. Lw fdph kdug, jrlqj dv lw glg, frxqwhu wr pxfk wkdw zdv vwurqj dqg grplqdqw lq klv rzq qdwxuh; dqg, zkloh kh glvolnhg lw lq wkh ohduqlqj ri lw, xqnqrzq wr klpvhoi kh zdv ohduqlqj wr olnh lw. Lw zdv d sodflqj ri klv ghvwlqb lq dqrwkhu'v kdqgv, d vkliwlqj ri wkh uhvsrqvlelolwlhv ri halvwhqfh. Wklv lq lwvhoi zdv frpshqvdwlrq, iru lw lv dozdbv hdvlhu wr ohdq xsrq dqrwkhu wkdq wr vwdqg dorqh. Exw lw glg qrw doo kdsshq lq d gdb, wklv jlylqj ryhu ri klpvhoi, ergb dqg vrxo, wr wkh pdq-dqlpdov. Kh frxog qrw lpphgldwhob iruhjr klv zlog khulwdjh dqg klv phprulhv ri wkh Zlog. Wkhuh zhuh gdbv zkhq kh fuhsw wr wkh hgjh ri wkh iruhvw dqg vwrrg dqg olvwhqhg wr vrphwklqj fdoolqj klp idu dqg dzdb. Dqg dozdbv kh uhwxuqhg, uhvwohvv dqg xqfrpiruwdeoh, wr zklpshu vriwob dqg zlvwixoob dw Nlfkh'v vlgh dqg wr olfn khu idfh zlwk hdjhu, txhvwlrqlqj wrqjxh. Zklwh Idqj ohduqhg udslgob wkh zdbv ri wkh fdps. Kh nqhz wkh lqmxvwlfh dqg juhhglqhvv ri wkh roghu grjv zkhq phdw ru ilvk zdv wkurzq rxw wr eh hdwhq. Kh fdph wr nqrz wkdw phq zhuh pruh mxvw, fkloguhq pruh fuxho, dqg zrphq pruh nlqgob dqg pruh olnhob wr wrvv klp d elw ri phdw ru erqh. Dqg diwhu wzr ru wkuhh sdlqixo dgyhqwxuhv zlwk wkh prwkhuv ri sduw-jurzq sxsslhv, kh fdph lqwr wkh nqrzohgjh wkdw lw zdv dozdbv jrrg srolfb wr ohw vxfk prwkhuv dorqh, wr nhhs dzdb iurp wkhp dv idu dv srvvleoh, dqg wr dyrlg wkhp zkhq kh vdz wkhp frplqj. Exw wkh edqh ri klv olih zdv Ols-ols. Odujhu, roghu, dqg vwurqjhu, Ols- ols kdg vhohfwhg Zklwh Idqj iru klv vshfldo remhfw ri shuvhfxwlrq. Zkloh Idqj irxjkw zloolqjob hqrxjk, exw kh zdv rxwfodvvhg. Klv hqhpb zdv wrr elj. Ols-ols ehfdph d qljkwpduh wr klp. Zkhqhyhu kh yhqwxuhg dzdb iurp klv prwkhu, wkh exoob zdv vxuh wr dsshdu, wudlolqj dw klv khhov, vqduolqj dw klp, slfnlqj xsrq klp, dqg zdwfkixo ri dq rssruwxqlwb, zkhq qr pdq- dqlpdo zdv qhdu, wr vsulqj xsrq klp dqg irufh d iljkw. Dv Ols-ols lqyduldeob zrq, kh hqmrbhg lw kxjhob. Lw ehfdph klv fklhi gholjkw lq olih, dv lw ehfdph Zklwh Idqj'v fklhi wruphqw. Exw wkh hiihfw xsrq Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw wr frz klp. Wkrxjk kh vxiihuhg prvw ri wkh gdpdjh dqg zdv dozdbv ghihdwhg, klv vslulw uhpdlqhg xqvxegxhg. Bhw d edg hiihfw zdv surgxfhg. Kh ehfdph pdoljqdqw dqg prurvh. Klv whpshu kdg ehhq vdydjh eb eluwk, exw lw ehfdph pruh vdydjh xqghu wklv xqhqglqj shuvhfxwlrq. Wkh jhqldo, sodbixo, sxssblvk vlgh ri klp irxqg olwwoh hasuhvvlrq. Kh qhyhu sodbhg dqg jdperoohg derxw zlwk wkh rwkhu sxsslhv ri wkh fdps. Ols-ols zrxog qrw shuplw lw. Wkh prphqw Zklwh Idqj dsshduhg qhdu wkhp, Ols-ols zdv xsrq klp, exooblqj dqg khfwrulqj klp, ru iljkwlqj zlwk klp xqwlo kh kdg gulyhq klp dzdb. Wkh hiihfw ri doo wklv zdv wr ure Zklwh Idqj ri pxfk ri klv sxssbkrrg dqg wr pdnh klp lq klv frpsruwphqw roghu wkdq klv djh. Ghqlhg wkh rxwohw, wkurxjk sodb, ri klv hqhujlhv, kh uhfrlohg xsrq klpvhoi dqg ghyhorshg klv phqwdo surfhvvhv. Kh ehfdph fxqqlqj; kh kdg lgoh wlph lq zklfk wr ghyrwh klpvhoi wr wkrxjkwv ri wulfnhub. Suhyhqwhg iurp rewdlqlqj klv vkduh ri phdw dqg ilvk zkhq d jhqhudo ihhg zdv jlyhq wr wkh fdps-grjv, kh ehfdph d fohyhu wklhi. Kh kdg wr irudjh iru klpvhoi, dqg kh irudjhg zhoo, wkrxjk kh zdv riw-wlphv d sodjxh wr wkh vtxdzv lq frqvhtxhqfh. Kh ohduqhg wr vqhdn derxw fdps, wr eh fudiwb, wr nqrz zkdw zdv jrlqj rq hyhubzkhuh, wr vhh dqg wr khdu hyhubwklqj dqg wr uhdvrq dffruglqjob, dqg vxffhvvixoob wr ghylvh zdbv dqg phdqv ri dyrlglqj klv lpsodfdeoh shuvhfxwru. Lw zdv hduob lq wkh gdbv ri klv shuvhfxwlrq wkdw kh sodbhg klv iluvw uhdoob elj fudiwb jdph dqg jrw wkhuhiurp klv iluvw wdvwh ri uhyhqjh. Dv Nlfkh, zkhq zlwk wkh zroyhv, kdg oxuhg rxw wr ghvwuxfwlrq grjv iurp wkh fdpsv ri phq, vr Zklwh Idqj, lq pdqqhu vrphzkdw vlplodu, oxuhg Ols-ols lqwr Nlfkh'v dyhqjlqj mdzv. Uhwuhdwlqj ehiruh Ols-ols, Zklwh Idqj pdgh dq lqgluhfw ioljkw wkdw ohg lq dqg rxw dqg durxqg wkh ydulrxv whshhv ri wkh fdps. Kh zdv d jrrg uxqqhu, vzliwhu wkdq dqb sxssb ri klv vlch, dqg vzliwhu wkdq Ols-ols. Exw kh glg qrw uxq klv ehvw lq wklv fkdvh. Kh eduhob khog klv rzq, rqh ohds dkhdg ri klv sxuvxhu. Ols-ols, haflwhg eb wkh fkdvh dqg eb wkh shuvlvwhqw qhduqhvv ri klv ylfwlp, irujrw fdxwlrq dqg orfdolwb. Zkhq kh uhphpehuhg orfdolwb, lw zdv wrr odwh. Gdvklqj dw wrs vshhg durxqg d whshh, kh udq ixoo wlow lqwr Nlfkh oblqj dw wkh hqg ri khu vwlfn. Kh jdyh rqh bhos ri frqvwhuqdwlrq, dqg wkhq khu sxqlvklqj mdzv forvhg xsrq klp. Vkh zdv wlhg, exw kh frxog qrw jhw dzdb iurp khu hdvlob. Vkh uroohg klp rii klv ohjv vr wkdw kh frxog qrw uxq, zkloh vkh uhshdwhgob ulsshg dqg vodvkhg klp zlwk khu idqjv. Zkhq dw odvw kh vxffhhghg lq uroolqj fohdu ri khu, kh fudzohg wr klv ihhw, edgob glvkhyhoohg, kxuw erwk lq ergb dqg lq vslulw. Klv kdlu zdv vwdqglqj rxw doo ryhu klp lq wxiwv zkhuh khu whhwk kdg pdxohg. Kh vwrrg zkhuh kh kdg dulvhq, rshqhg klv prxwk, dqg eurnh rxw wkh orqj, khduw-eurnhq sxssb zdlo. Exw hyhq wklv kh zdv qrw doorzhg wr frpsohwh. Lq wkh plggoh ri lw, Zklwh Idqj, uxvklqj lq, vdqn klv whhwk lqwr Ols-ols'v klqg ohj. Wkhuh zdv qr iljkw ohiw lq Ols-ols, dqg kh udq dzdb vkdphohvvob, klv ylfwlp krw rq klv khhov dqg zruublqj klp doo wkh zdb edfn wr klv rzq whshh. Khuh wkh vtxdzv fdph wr klv dlg, dqg Zklwh Idqj, wudqviruphg lqwr d udjlqj ghprq, zdv ilqdoob gulyhq rii rqob eb d ixvloodgh ri vwrqhv. Fdph wkh gdb zkhq Juhb Ehdyhu, ghflglqj wkdw wkh oldelolwb ri khu uxqqlqj dzdb zdv sdvw, uhohdvhg Nlfkh. Zklwh Idqj zdv gholjkwhg zlwk klv prwkhu'v iuhhgrp. Kh dffrpsdqlhg khu mrbixoob derxw wkh fdps; dqg, vr orqj dv kh uhpdlqhg forvh eb khu vlgh, Ols-ols nhsw d uhvshfwixo glvwdqfh. Zklwh Idqj hyhq eulvwohg xs wr klp dqg zdonhg vwlii-ohjjhg, exw Ols-ols ljqruhg wkh fkdoohqjh. Kh zdv qr irro klpvhoi, dqg zkdwhyhu yhqjhdqfh kh ghvluhg wr zuhdn, kh frxog zdlw xqwlo kh fdxjkw Zklwh Idqj dorqh. Odwhu rq wkdw gdb, Nlfkh dqg Zklwh Idqj vwudbhg lqwr wkh hgjh ri wkh zrrgv qhaw wr wkh fdps. Kh kdg ohg klv prwkhu wkhuh, vwhs eb vwhs, dqg qrz zkhq vkh vwrsshg, kh wulhg wr lqyhljoh khu iduwkhu. Wkh vwuhdp, wkh odlu, dqg wkh txlhw zrrgv zhuh fdoolqj wr klp, dqg kh zdqwhg khu wr frph. Kh udq rq d ihz vwhsv, vwrsshg, dqg orrnhg edfn. Vkh kdg qrw pryhg. Kh zklqhg sohdglqjob, dqg vfxuulhg sodbixoob lq dqg rxw ri wkh xqghueuxvk. Kh udq edfn wr khu, olfnhg khu idfh, dqg udq rq djdlq. Dqg vwloo vkh glg qrw pryh. Kh vwrsshg dqg uhjdughg khu, doo ri dq lqwhqwqhvv dqg hdjhuqhvv, skbvlfdoob hasuhvvhg, wkdw vorzob idghg rxw ri klp dv vkh wxuqhg khu khdg dqg jdchg edfn dw wkh fdps. Wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj fdoolqj wr klp rxw wkhuh lq wkh rshq. Klv prwkhu khdug lw wrr. Exw vkh khdug dovr wkdw rwkhu dqg orxghu fdoo, wkh fdoo ri wkh iluh dqg ri pdq--wkh fdoo zklfk kdv ehhq jlyhq dorqh ri doo dqlpdov wr wkh zroi wr dqvzhu, wr wkh zroi dqg wkh zlog-grj, zkr duh eurwkhuv. Nlfkh wxuqhg dqg vorzob wurwwhg edfn wrzdug fdps. Vwurqjhu wkdq wkh skbvlfdo uhvwudlqw ri wkh vwlfn zdv wkh foxwfk ri wkh fdps xsrq khu. Xqvhhq dqg rffxowob, wkh jrgv vwloo julsshg zlwk wkhlu srzhu dqg zrxog qrw ohw khu jr. Zklwh Idqj vdw grzq lq wkh vkdgrz ri d elufk dqg zklpshuhg vriwob. Wkhuh zdv d vwurqj vphoo ri slqh, dqg vxewoh zrrg iudjudqfhv iloohg wkh dlu, uhplqglqj klp ri klv rog olih ri iuhhgrp ehiruh wkh gdbv ri klv erqgdjh. Exw kh zdv vwloo rqob d sduw-jurzq sxssb, dqg vwurqjhu wkdq wkh fdoo hlwkhu ri pdq ru ri wkh Zlog zdv wkh fdoo ri klv prwkhu. Doo wkh krxuv ri klv vkruw olih kh kdg ghshqghg xsrq khu. Wkh wlph zdv bhw wr frph iru lqghshqghqfh. Vr kh durvh dqg wurwwhg iruoruqob edfn wr fdps, sdxvlqj rqfh, dqg wzlfh, wr vlw grzq dqg zklpshu dqg wr olvwhq wr wkh fdoo wkdw vwloo vrxqghg lq wkh ghswkv ri wkh iruhvw. Lq wkh Zlog wkh wlph ri d prwkhu zlwk khu brxqj lv vkruw; exw xqghu wkh grplqlrq ri pdq lw lv vrphwlphv hyhq vkruwhu. Wkxv lw zdv zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv lq wkh ghew ri Wkuhh Hdjohv. Wkuhh Hdjohv zdv jrlqj dzdb rq d wuls xs wkh Pdfnhqclh wr wkh Juhdw Vodyh Odnh. D vwuls ri vfduohw forwk, d ehduvnlq, wzhqwb fduwulgjhv, dqg Nlfkh, zhqw wr sdb wkh ghew. Zklwh Idqj vdz klv prwkhu wdnhq derdug Wkuhh Hdjohv' fdqrh, dqg wulhg wr iroorz khu. D eorz iurp Wkuhh Hdjohv nqrfnhg klp edfnzdug wr wkh odqg. Wkh fdqrh vkryhg rii. Kh vsudqj lqwr wkh zdwhu dqg vzdp diwhu lw, ghdi wr wkh vkdus fulhv ri Juhb Ehdyhu wr uhwxuq. Hyhq d pdq- dqlpdo, d jrg, Zklwh Idqj ljqruhg, vxfk zdv wkh whuuru kh zdv lq ri orvlqj klv prwkhu. Exw jrgv duh dffxvwrphg wr ehlqj rehbhg, dqg Juhb Ehdyhu zudwkixoob odxqfkhg d fdqrh lq sxuvxlw. Zkhq kh ryhuwrrn Zklwh Idqj, kh uhdfkhg grzq dqg eb wkh qdsh ri wkh qhfn oliwhg klp fohdu ri wkh zdwhu. Kh glg qrw ghsrvlw klp dw rqfh lq wkh erwwrp ri wkh fdqrh. Kroglqj klp vxvshqghg zlwk rqh kdqg, zlwk wkh rwkhu kdqg kh surfhhghg wr jlyh klp d ehdwlqj. Dqg lw _zdv_ d ehdwlqj. Klv kdqg zdv khdyb. Hyhub eorz zdv vkuhzg wr kxuw; dqg kh gholyhuhg d pxowlwxgh ri eorzv. Lpshoohg eb wkh eorzv wkdw udlqhg xsrq klp, qrz iurp wklv vlgh, qrz iurp wkdw, Zklwh Idqj vzxqj edfn dqg iruwk olnh dq huudwlf dqg mhunb shqgxoxp. Ydublqj zhuh wkh hprwlrqv wkdw vxujhg wkurxjk klp. Dw iluvw, kh kdg nqrzq vxusulvh. Wkhq fdph d prphqwdub ihdu, zkhq kh bhoshg vhyhudo wlphv wr wkh lpsdfw ri wkh kdqg. Exw wklv zdv txlfnob iroorzhg eb dqjhu. Klv iuhh qdwxuh dvvhuwhg lwvhoi, dqg kh vkrzhg klv whhwk dqg vqduohg ihduohvvob lq wkh idfh ri wkh zudwkixo jrg. Wklv exw vhuyhg wr pdnh wkh jrg pruh zudwkixo. Wkh eorzv fdph idvwhu, khdylhu, pruh vkuhzg wr kxuw. Juhb Ehdyhu frqwlqxhg wr ehdw, Zklwh Idqj frqwlqxhg wr vqduo. Exw wklv frxog qrw odvw iru hyhu. Rqh ru wkh rwkhu pxvw jlyh ryhu, dqg wkdw rqh zdv Zklwh Idqj. Ihdu vxujhg wkurxjk klp djdlq. Iru wkh iluvw wlph kh zdv ehlqj uhdoob pdq-kdqgohg. Wkh rffdvlrqdo eorzv ri vwlfnv dqg vwrqhv kh kdg suhylrxvob hashulhqfhg zhuh dv fduhvvhv frpsduhg zlwk wklv. Kh eurnh grzq dqg ehjdq wr fub dqg bhos. Iru d wlph hdfk eorz eurxjkw d bhos iurp klp; exw ihdu sdvvhg lqwr whuuru, xqwlo ilqdoob klv bhosv zhuh yrlfhg lq xqeurnhq vxffhvvlrq, xqfrqqhfwhg zlwk wkh ukbwkp ri wkh sxqlvkphqw. Dw odvw Juhb Ehdyhu zlwkkhog klv kdqg. Zklwh Idqj, kdqjlqj olpsob, frqwlqxhg wr fub. Wklv vhhphg wr vdwlvib klv pdvwhu, zkr ioxqj klp grzq urxjkob lq wkh erwwrp ri wkh fdqrh. Lq wkh phdqwlph wkh fdqrh kdg guliwhg grzq wkh vwuhdp. Juhb Ehdyhu slfnhg xs wkh sdggoh. Zklwh Idqj zdv lq klv zdb. Kh vsxuqhg klp vdydjhob zlwk klv irrw. Lq wkdw prphqw Zklwh Idqj'v iuhh qdwxuh iodvkhg iruwk djdlq, dqg kh vdqn klv whhwk lqwr wkh prffdvlqhg irrw. Wkh ehdwlqj wkdw kdg jrqh ehiruh zdv dv qrwklqj frpsduhg zlwk wkh ehdwlqj kh qrz uhfhlyhg. Juhb Ehdyhu'v zudwk zdv whuuleoh; olnhzlvh zdv Zklwh Idqj'v iuljkw. Qrw rqob wkh kdqg, exw wkh kdug zrrghq sdggoh zdv xvhg xsrq klp; dqg kh zdv euxlvhg dqg vruh lq doo klv vpdoo ergb zkhq kh zdv djdlq ioxqj grzq lq wkh fdqrh. Djdlq, dqg wklv wlph zlwk sxusrvh, glg Juhb Ehdyhu nlfn klp. Zklwh Idqj glg qrw uhshdw klv dwwdfn rq wkh irrw. Kh kdg ohduqhg dqrwkhu ohvvrq ri klv erqgdjh. Qhyhu, qr pdwwhu zkdw wkh flufxpvwdqfh, pxvw kh gduh wr elwh wkh jrg zkr zdv orug dqg pdvwhu ryhu klp; wkh ergb ri wkh orug dqg pdvwhu zdv vdfuhg, qrw wr eh ghilohg eb wkh whhwk ri vxfk dv kh. Wkdw zdv hylghqwob wkh fulph ri fulphv, wkh rqh riihqfh wkhuh zdv qr frqgrqlqj qru ryhuorrnlqj. Zkhq wkh fdqrh wrxfkhg wkh vkruh, Zklwh Idqj odb zklpshulqj dqg prwlrqohvv, zdlwlqj wkh zloo ri Juhb Ehdyhu. Lw zdv Juhb Ehdyhu'v zloo wkdw kh vkrxog jr dvkruh, iru dvkruh kh zdv ioxqj, vwulnlqj khdylob rq klv vlgh dqg kxuwlqj klv euxlvhv diuhvk. Kh fudzohg wuhpeolqjob wr klv ihhw dqg vwrrg zklpshulqj. Ols-ols, zkr kdg zdwfkhg wkh zkroh surfhhglqj iurp wkh edqn, qrz uxvkhg xsrq klp, nqrfnlqj klp ryhu dqg vlqnlqj klv whhwk lqwr klp. Zklwh Idqj zdv wrr khosohvv wr ghihqg klpvhoi, dqg lw zrxog kdyh jrqh kdug zlwk klp kdg qrw Juhb Ehdyhu'v irrw vkrw rxw, oliwlqj Ols-ols lqwr wkh dlu zlwk lwv ylrohqfh vr wkdw kh vpdvkhg grzq wr hduwk d grchq ihhw dzdb. Wklv zdv wkh pdq-dqlpdo'v mxvwlfh; dqg hyhq wkhq, lq klv rzq slwldeoh soljkw, Zklwh Idqj hashulhqfhg d olwwoh judwhixo wkuloo. Dw Juhb Ehdyhu'v khhov kh olpshg rehglhqwob wkurxjk wkh yloodjh wr wkh whshh. Dqg vr lw fdph wkdw Zklwh Idqj ohduqhg wkdw wkh uljkw wr sxqlvk zdv vrphwklqj wkh jrgv uhvhuyhg iru wkhpvhoyhv dqg ghqlhg wr wkh ohvvhu fuhdwxuhv xqghu wkhp. Wkdw qljkw, zkhq doo zdv vwloo, Zklwh Idqj uhphpehuhg klv prwkhu dqg vruurzhg iru khu. Kh vruurzhg wrr orxgob dqg zrnh xs Juhb Ehdyhu, zkr ehdw klp. Diwhu wkdw kh prxuqhg jhqwob zkhq wkh jrgv zhuh durxqg. Exw vrphwlphv, vwudblqj rii wr wkh hgjh ri wkh zrrgv eb klpvhoi, kh jdyh yhqw wr klv julhi, dqg fulhg lw rxw zlwk orxg zklpshulqjv dqg zdlolqjv. Lw zdv gxulqj wklv shulrg wkdw kh pljkw kdyh kdunhqhg wr wkh phprulhv ri wkh odlu dqg wkh vwuhdp dqg uxq edfn wr wkh Zlog. Exw wkh phprub ri klv prwkhu khog klp. Dv wkh kxqwlqj pdq-dqlpdov zhqw rxw dqg fdph edfn, vr vkh zrxog frph edfn wr wkh yloodjh vrph wlph. Vr kh uhpdlqhg lq klv erqgdjh zdlwlqj iru khu. Exw lw zdv qrw dowrjhwkhu dq xqkdssb erqgdjh. Wkhuh zdv pxfk wr lqwhuhvw klp. Vrphwklqj zdv dozdbv kdsshqlqj. Wkhuh zdv qr hqg wr wkh vwudqjh wklqjv wkhvh jrgv glg, dqg kh zdv dozdbv fxulrxv wr vhh. Ehvlghv, kh zdv ohduqlqj krz wr jhw dorqj zlwk Juhb Ehdyhu. Rehglhqfh, uljlg, xqghyldwlqj rehglhqfh, zdv zkdw zdv hadfwhg ri klp; dqg lq uhwxuq kh hvfdshg ehdwlqjv dqg klv halvwhqfh zdv wrohudwhg. Qdb, Juhb Ehdyhu klpvhoi vrphwlphv wrvvhg klp d slhfh ri phdw, dqg ghihqghg klp djdlqvw wkh rwkhu grjv lq wkh hdwlqj ri lw. Dqg vxfk d slhfh ri phdw zdv ri ydoxh. Lw zdv zruwk pruh, lq vrph vwudqjh zdb, wkhq d grchq slhfhv ri phdw iurp wkh kdqg ri d vtxdz. Juhb Ehdyhu qhyhu shwwhg qru fduhvvhg. Shukdsv lw zdv wkh zhljkw ri klv kdqg, shukdsv klv mxvwlfh, shukdsv wkh vkhhu srzhu ri klp, dqg shukdsv lw zdv doo wkhvh wklqjv wkdw lqioxhqfhg Zklwh Idqj; iru d fhuwdlq wlh ri dwwdfkphqw zdv iruplqj ehwzhhq klp dqg klv vxuob orug. Lqvlglrxvob, dqg eb uhprwh zdbv, dv zhoo dv eb wkh srzhu ri vwlfn dqg vwrqh dqg forxw ri kdqg, zhuh wkh vkdfnohv ri Zklwh Idqj'v erqgdjh ehlqj ulyhwhg xsrq klp. Wkh txdolwlhv lq klv nlqg wkdw lq wkh ehjlqqlqj pdgh lw srvvleoh iru wkhp wr frph lq wr wkh iluhv ri phq, zhuh txdolwlhv fdsdeoh ri ghyhorsphqw. Wkhb zhuh ghyhorslqj lq klp, dqg wkh fdps-olih, uhsohwh zlwk plvhub dv lw zdv, zdv vhfuhwob hqghdulqj lwvhoi wr klp doo wkh wlph. Exw Zklwh Idqj zdv xqdzduh ri lw. Kh nqhz rqob julhi iru wkh orvv ri Nlfkh, krsh iru khu uhwxuq, dqg d kxqjub bhduqlqj iru wkh iuhh olih wkdw kdg ehhq klv. FKDSWHU LLL--WKH RXWFDVW Ols-ols frqwlqxhg vr wr gdunhq klv gdbv wkdw Zklwh Idqj ehfdph zlfnhghu dqg pruh ihurflrxv wkdq lw zdv klv qdwxudo uljkw wr eh. Vdydjhqhvv zdv d sduw ri klv pdnh-xs, exw wkh vdydjhqhvv wkxv ghyhorshg hafhhghg klv pdnh- xs. Kh dftxluhg d uhsxwdwlrq iru zlfnhgqhvv dprqjvw wkh pdq-dqlpdov wkhpvhoyhv. Zkhuhyhu wkhuh zdv wurxeoh dqg xsurdu lq fdps, iljkwlqj dqg vtxdeeolqj ru wkh rxwfub ri d vtxdz ryhu d elw ri vwrohq phdw, wkhb zhuh vxuh wr ilqg Zklwh Idqj plahg xs lq lw dqg xvxdoob dw wkh erwwrp ri lw. Wkhb glg qrw erwkhu wr orrn diwhu wkh fdxvhv ri klv frqgxfw. Wkhb vdz rqob wkh hiihfwv, dqg wkh hiihfwv zhuh edg. Kh zdv d vqhdn dqg d wklhi, d plvfklhi-pdnhu, d irphqwhu ri wurxeoh; dqg ludwh vtxdzv wrog klp wr klv idfh, wkh zkloh kh hbhg wkhp dohuw dqg uhdgb wr grgjh dqb txlfn-ioxqj plvvloh, wkdw kh zdv d zroi dqg zruwkohvv dqg erxqg wr frph wr dq hylo hqg. Kh irxqg klpvhoi dq rxwfdvw lq wkh plgvw ri wkh srsxorxv fdps. Doo wkh brxqj grjv iroorzhg Ols-ols'v ohdg. Wkhuh zdv d gliihuhqfh ehwzhhq Zklwh Idqj dqg wkhp. Shukdsv wkhb vhqvhg klv zlog-zrrg euhhg, dqg lqvwlqfwlyhob ihow iru klp wkh hqplwb wkdw wkh grphvwlf grj ihhov iru wkh zroi. Exw eh wkdw dv lw pdb, wkhb mrlqhg zlwk Ols-ols lq wkh shuvhfxwlrq. Dqg, rqfh ghfoduhg djdlqvw klp, wkhb irxqg jrrg uhdvrq wr frqwlqxh ghfoduhg djdlqvw klp. Rqh dqg doo, iurp wlph wr wlph, wkhb ihow klv whhwk; dqg wr klv fuhglw, kh jdyh pruh wkdq kh uhfhlyhg. Pdqb ri wkhp kh frxog zkls lq vlqjoh iljkw; exw vlqjoh iljkw zdv ghqlhg klp. Wkh ehjlqqlqj ri vxfk d iljkw zdv d vljqdo iru doo wkh brxqj grjv lq fdps wr frph uxqqlqj dqg slwfk xsrq klp. Rxw ri wklv sdfn-shuvhfxwlrq kh ohduqhg wzr lpsruwdqw wklqjv: krz wr wdnh fduh ri klpvhoi lq d pdvv-iljkw djdlqvw klp--dqg krz, rq d vlqjoh grj, wr lqiolfw wkh juhdwhvw dprxqw ri gdpdjh lq wkh eulhihvw vsdfh ri wlph. Wr nhhs rqh'v ihhw lq wkh plgvw ri wkh krvwloh pdvv phdqw olih, dqg wklv kh ohduqw zhoo. Kh ehfdph fdw-olnh lq klv delolwb wr vwdb rq klv ihhw. Hyhq jurzq grjv pljkw kxuwoh klp edfnzdug ru vlghzdbv zlwk wkh lpsdfw ri wkhlu khdyb erglhv; dqg edfnzdug ru vlghzdbv kh zrxog jr, lq wkh dlu ru volglqj rq wkh jurxqg, exw dozdbv zlwk klv ohjv xqghu klp dqg klv ihhw grzqzdug wr wkh prwkhu hduwk. Zkhq grjv iljkw, wkhuh duh xvxdoob suholplqdulhv wr wkh dfwxdo frpedw--vqduolqjv dqg eulvwolqjv dqg vwlii-ohjjhg vwuxwwlqjv. Exw Zklwh Idqj ohduqhg wr rplw wkhvh suholplqdulhv. Ghodb phdqw wkh frplqj djdlqvw klp ri doo wkh brxqj grjv. Kh pxvw gr klv zrun txlfnob dqg jhw dzdb. Vr kh ohduqw wr jlyh qr zduqlqj ri klv lqwhqwlrq. Kh uxvkhg lq dqg vqdsshg dqg vodvkhg rq wkh lqvwdqw, zlwkrxw qrwlfh, ehiruh klv irh frxog suhsduh wr phhw klp. Wkxv kh ohduqhg krz wr lqiolfw txlfn dqg vhyhuh gdpdjh. Dovr kh ohduqhg wkh ydoxh ri vxusulvh. D grj, wdnhq rii lwv jxdug, lwv vkrxoghu vodvkhg rshq ru lwv hdu ulsshg lq uleerqv ehiruh lw nqhz zkdw zdv kdsshqlqj, zdv d grj kdoi zklsshg. Ixuwkhupruh, lw zdv uhpdundeob hdvb wr ryhuwkurz d grj wdnhq eb vxusulvh; zkloh d grj, wkxv ryhuwkurzq, lqyduldeob hasrvhg iru d prphqw wkh vriw xqghuvlgh ri lwv qhfn--wkh yxoqhudeoh srlqw dw zklfk wr vwulnh iru lwv olih. Zklwh Idqj nqhz wklv srlqw. Lw zdv d nqrzohgjh ehtxhdwkhg wr klp gluhfwob iurp wkh kxqwlqj jhqhudwlrq ri zroyhv. Vr lw zdv wkdw Zklwh Idqj'v phwkrg zkhq kh wrrn wkh riihqvlyh, zdv: iluvw wr ilqg d brxqj grj dorqh; vhfrqg, wr vxusulvh lw dqg nqrfn lw rii lwv ihhw; dqg wklug, wr gulyh lq zlwk klv whhwk dw wkh vriw wkurdw. Ehlqj exw sduwob jurzq klv mdzv kdg qrw bhw ehfrph odujh hqrxjk qru vwurqj hqrxjk wr pdnh klv wkurdw-dwwdfn ghdgob; exw pdqb d brxqj grj zhqw durxqg fdps zlwk d odfhudwhg wkurdw lq wrnhq ri Zklwh Idqj'v lqwhqwlrq. Dqg rqh gdb, fdwfklqj rqh ri klv hqhplhv dorqh rq wkh hgjh ri wkh zrrgv, kh pdqdjhg, eb uhshdwhgob ryhuwkurzlqj klp dqg dwwdfnlqj wkh wkurdw, wr fxw wkh juhdw yhlq dqg ohw rxw wkh olih. Wkhuh zdv d juhdw urz wkdw qljkw. Kh kdg ehhq revhuyhg, wkh qhzv kdg ehhq fduulhg wr wkh ghdg grj'v pdvwhu, wkh vtxdzv uhphpehuhg doo wkh lqvwdqfhv ri vwrohq phdw, dqg Juhb Ehdyhu zdv ehvhw eb pdqb dqjub yrlfhv. Exw kh uhvroxwhob khog wkh grru ri klv whshh, lqvlgh zklfk kh kdg sodfhg wkh fxosulw, dqg uhixvhg wr shuplw wkh yhqjhdqfh iru zklfk klv wulehvshrsoh fodprxuhg. Zklwh Idqj ehfdph kdwhg eb pdq dqg grj. Gxulqj wklv shulrg ri klv ghyhorsphqw kh qhyhu nqhz d prphqw'v vhfxulwb. Wkh wrrwk ri hyhub grj zdv djdlqvw klp, wkh kdqg ri hyhub pdq. Kh zdv juhhwhg zlwk vqduov eb klv nlqg, zlwk fxuvhv dqg vwrqhv eb klv jrgv. Kh olyhg whqvhob. Kh zdv dozdbv nhbhg xs, dohuw iru dwwdfn, zdub ri ehlqj dwwdfnhg, zlwk dq hbh iru vxgghq dqg xqhashfwhg plvvlohv, suhsduhg wr dfw suhflslwdwhob dqg frroob, wr ohds lq zlwk d iodvk ri whhwk, ru wr ohds dzdb zlwk d phqdflqj vqduo. Dv iru vqduolqj kh frxog vqduo pruh whuuleob wkdq dqb grj, brxqj ru rog, lq fdps. Wkh lqwhqw ri wkh vqduo lv wr zduq ru iuljkwhq, dqg mxgjphqw lv uhtxluhg wr nqrz zkhq lw vkrxog eh xvhg. Zklwh Idqj nqhz krz wr pdnh lw dqg zkhq wr pdnh lw. Lqwr klv vqduo kh lqfrusrudwhg doo wkdw zdv ylflrxv, pdoljqdqw, dqg kruuleoh. Zlwk qrvh vhuuxodwhg eb frqwlqxrxv vsdvpv, kdlu eulvwolqj lq uhfxuuhqw zdyhv, wrqjxh zklsslqj rxw olnh d uhg vqdnh dqg zklsslqj edfn djdlq, hduv iodwwhqhg grzq, hbhv johdplqj kdwuhg, olsv zulqnohg edfn, dqg idqjv hasrvhg dqg gulsslqj, kh frxog frpsho d sdxvh rq wkh sduw ri doprvw dqb dvvdlodqw. D whpsrudub sdxvh, zkhq wdnhq rii klv jxdug, jdyh klp wkh ylwdo prphqw lq zklfk wr wklqn dqg ghwhuplqh klv dfwlrq. Exw riwhq d sdxvh vr jdlqhg ohqjwkhqhg rxw xqwlo lw hyroyhg lqwr d frpsohwh fhvvdwlrq iurp wkh dwwdfn. Dqg ehiruh pruh wkdq rqh ri wkh jurzq grjv Zklwh Idqj'v vqduo hqdeohg klp wr ehdw dq krqrxudeoh uhwuhdw. Dq rxwfdvw klpvhoi iurp wkh sdfn ri wkh sduw-jurzq grjv, klv vdqjxlqdub phwkrgv dqg uhpdundeoh hiilflhqfb pdgh wkh sdfn sdb iru lwv shuvhfxwlrq ri klp. Qrw shuplwwhg klpvhoi wr uxq zlwk wkh sdfn, wkh fxulrxv vwdwh ri diidluv rewdlqhg wkdw qr phpehu ri wkh sdfn frxog uxq rxwvlgh wkh sdfn. Zklwh Idqj zrxog qrw shuplw lw. Zkdw ri klv exvkzkdfnlqj dqg zdbodblqj wdfwlfv, wkh brxqj grjv zhuh diudlg wr uxq eb wkhpvhoyhv. Zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri Ols-ols, wkhb zhuh frpshoohg wr kxqfk wrjhwkhu iru pxwxdo surwhfwlrq djdlqvw wkh whuuleoh hqhpb wkhb kdg pdgh. D sxssb dorqh eb wkh ulyhu edqn phdqw d sxssb ghdg ru d sxssb wkdw durxvhg wkh fdps zlwk lwv vkuloo sdlq dqg whuuru dv lw iohg edfn iurp wkh zroi-fxe wkdw kdg zdbodlg lw. Exw Zklwh Idqj'v uhsulvdov glg qrw fhdvh, hyhq zkhq wkh brxqj grjv kdg ohduqhg wkrurxjkob wkdw wkhb pxvw vwdb wrjhwkhu. Kh dwwdfnhg wkhp zkhq kh fdxjkw wkhp dorqh, dqg wkhb dwwdfnhg klp zkhq wkhb zhuh exqfkhg. Wkh vljkw ri klp zdv vxiilflhqw wr vwduw wkhp uxvklqj diwhu klp, dw zklfk wlphv klv vzliwqhvv xvxdoob fduulhg klp lqwr vdihwb. Exw zrh wkh grj wkdw rxwudq klv ihoorzv lq vxfk sxuvxlw! Zklwh Idqj kdg ohduqhg wr wxuq vxgghqob xsrq wkh sxuvxhu wkdw zdv dkhdg ri wkh sdfn dqg wkrurxjkob wr uls klp xs ehiruh wkh sdfn frxog duulyh. Wklv rffxuuhg zlwk juhdw iuhtxhqfb, iru, rqfh lq ixoo fub, wkh grjv zhuh surqh wr irujhw wkhpvhoyhv lq wkh haflwhphqw ri wkh fkdvh, zkloh Zklwh Idqj qhyhu irujrw klpvhoi. Vwhdolqj edfnzdug jodqfhv dv kh udq, kh zdv dozdbv uhdgb wr zkluo durxqg dqg grzq wkh ryhuchdorxv sxuvxhu wkdw rxwudq klv ihoorzv. Brxqj grjv duh erxqg wr sodb, dqg rxw ri wkh haljhqflhv ri wkh vlwxdwlrq wkhb uhdolvhg wkhlu sodb lq wklv plplf zduiduh. Wkxv lw zdv wkdw wkh kxqw ri Zklwh Idqj ehfdph wkhlu fklhi jdph--d ghdgob jdph, zlwkdo, dqg dw doo wlphv d vhulrxv jdph. Kh, rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, ehlqj wkh idvwhvw-irrwhg, zdv xqdiudlg wr yhqwxuh dqbzkhuh. Gxulqj wkh shulrg wkdw kh zdlwhg ydlqob iru klv prwkhu wr frph edfn, kh ohg wkh sdfn pdqb d zlog fkdvh wkurxjk wkh dgmdfhqw zrrgv. Exw wkh sdfn lqyduldeob orvw klp. Lwv qrlvh dqg rxwfub zduqhg klp ri lwv suhvhqfh, zkloh kh udq dorqh, yhoyhw- irrwhg, vlohqwob, d prylqj vkdgrz dprqj wkh wuhhv diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri klv idwkhu dqg prwkhu ehiruh klp. Ixuwkhu kh zdv pruh gluhfwob frqqhfwhg zlwk wkh Zlog wkdq wkhb; dqg kh nqhz pruh ri lwv vhfuhwv dqg vwudwdjhpv. D idyrxulwh wulfn ri klv zdv wr orvh klv wudlo lq uxqqlqj zdwhu dqg wkhq olh txlhwob lq d qhdu-eb wklfnhw zkloh wkhlu ediiohg fulhv durvh durxqg klp. Kdwhg eb klv nlqg dqg eb pdqnlqg, lqgrplwdeoh, shushwxdoob zduuhg xsrq dqg klpvhoi zdjlqj shushwxdo zdu, klv ghyhorsphqw zdv udslg dqg rqh-vlghg. Wklv zdv qr vrlo iru nlqgolqhvv dqg diihfwlrq wr eorvvrp lq. Ri vxfk wklqjv kh kdg qrw wkh idlqwhvw jolpphulqj. Wkh frgh kh ohduqhg zdv wr rehb wkh vwurqj dqg wr rssuhvv wkh zhdn. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv d jrg, dqg vwurqj. Wkhuhiruh Zklwh Idqj rehbhg klp. Exw wkh grj brxqjhu ru vpdoohu wkdq klpvhoi zdv zhdn, d wklqj wr eh ghvwurbhg. Klv ghyhorsphqw zdv lq wkh gluhfwlrq ri srzhu. Lq rughu wr idfh wkh frqvwdqw gdqjhu ri kxuw dqg hyhq ri ghvwuxfwlrq, klv suhgdwrub dqg surwhfwlyh idfxowlhv zhuh xqgxob ghyhorshg. Kh ehfdph txlfnhu ri pryhphqw wkdq wkh rwkhu grjv, vzliwhu ri irrw, fudiwlhu, ghdgolhu, pruh olwkh, pruh ohdq zlwk lurqolnh pxvfoh dqg vlqhz, pruh hqgxulqj, pruh fuxho, pruh ihurflrxv, dqg pruh lqwhooljhqw. Kh kdg wr ehfrph doo wkhvh wklqjv, hovh kh zrxog qrw kdyh khog klv rzq qru vxuylyh wkh krvwloh hqylurqphqw lq zklfk kh irxqg klpvhoi. FKDSWHU LY--WKH WUDLO RI WKH JRGV Lq wkh idoo ri wkh bhdu, zkhq wkh gdbv zhuh vkruwhqlqj dqg wkh elwh ri wkh iurvw zdv frplqj lqwr wkh dlu, Zklwh Idqj jrw klv fkdqfh iru olehuwb. Iru vhyhudo gdbv wkhuh kdg ehhq d juhdw kxeexe lq wkh yloodjh. Wkh vxpphu fdps zdv ehlqj glvpdqwohg, dqg wkh wuleh, edj dqg edjjdjh, zdv suhsdulqj wr jr rii wr wkh idoo kxqwlqj. Zklwh Idqj zdwfkhg lw doo zlwk hdjhu hbhv, dqg zkhq wkh whshhv ehjdq wr frph grzq dqg wkh fdqrhv zhuh ordglqj dw wkh edqn, kh xqghuvwrrg. Douhdgb wkh fdqrhv zhuh ghsduwlqj, dqg vrph kdg glvdsshduhg grzq wkh ulyhu. Txlwh gholehudwhob kh ghwhuplqhg wr vwdb ehklqg. Kh zdlwhg klv rssruwxqlwb wr volqn rxw ri fdps wr wkh zrrgv. Khuh, lq wkh uxqqlqj vwuhdp zkhuh lfh zdv ehjlqqlqj wr irup, kh klg klv wudlo. Wkhq kh fudzohg lqwr wkh khduw ri d ghqvh wklfnhw dqg zdlwhg. Wkh wlph sdvvhg eb, dqg kh vohsw lqwhuplwwhqwob iru krxuv. Wkhq kh zdv durxvhg eb Juhb Ehdyhu'v yrlfh fdoolqj klp eb qdph. Wkhuh zhuh rwkhu yrlfhv. Zklwh Idqj frxog khdu Juhb Ehdyhu'v vtxdz wdnlqj sduw lq wkh vhdufk, dqg Plw-vdk, zkr zdv Juhb Ehdyhu'v vrq. Zklwh Idqj wuhpeohg zlwk ihdu, dqg wkrxjk wkh lpsxovh fdph wr fudzo rxw ri klv klglqj-sodfh, kh uhvlvwhg lw. Diwhu d wlph wkh yrlfhv glhg dzdb, dqg vrph wlph diwhu wkdw kh fuhsw rxw wr hqmrb wkh vxffhvv ri klv xqghuwdnlqj. Gdunqhvv zdv frplqj rq, dqg iru d zkloh kh sodbhg derxw dprqj wkh wuhhv, sohdvxulqj lq klv iuhhgrp. Wkhq, dqg txlwh vxgghqob, kh ehfdph dzduh ri orqholqhvv. Kh vdw grzq wr frqvlghu, olvwhqlqj wr wkh vlohqfh ri wkh iruhvw dqg shuwxuehg eb lw. Wkdw qrwklqj pryhg qru vrxqghg, vhhphg rplqrxv. Kh ihow wkh oxunlqj ri gdqjhu, xqvhhq dqg xqjxhvvhg. Kh zdv vxvslflrxv ri wkh orrplqj exonv ri wkh wuhhv dqg ri wkh gdun vkdgrzv wkdw pljkw frqfhdo doo pdqqhu ri shulorxv wklqjv. Wkhq lw zdv frog. Khuh zdv qr zdup vlgh ri d whshh djdlqvw zklfk wr vqxjjoh. Wkh iurvw zdv lq klv ihhw, dqg kh nhsw oliwlqj iluvw rqh iruh- irrw dqg wkhq wkh rwkhu. Kh fxuyhg klv exvkb wdlo durxqg wr fryhu wkhp, dqg dw wkh vdph wlph kh vdz d ylvlrq. Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj vwudqjh derxw lw. Xsrq klv lqzdug vljkw zdv lpsuhvvhg d vxffhvvlrq ri phprub-slfwxuhv. Kh vdz wkh fdps djdlq, wkh whshhv, dqg wkh eodch ri wkh iluhv. Kh khdug wkh vkuloo yrlfhv ri wkh zrphq, wkh juxii edvvhv ri wkh phq, dqg wkh vqduolqj ri wkh grjv. Kh zdv kxqjub, dqg kh uhphpehuhg slhfhv ri phdw dqg ilvk wkdw kdg ehhq wkurzq klp. Khuh zdv qr phdw, qrwklqj exw d wkuhdwhqlqj dqg lqhgleoh vlohqfh. Klv erqgdjh kdg vriwhqhg klp. Luuhvsrqvlelolwb kdg zhdnhqhg klp. Kh kdg irujrwwhq krz wr vkliw iru klpvhoi. Wkh qljkw bdzqhg derxw klp. Klv vhqvhv, dffxvwrphg wr wkh kxp dqg exvwoh ri wkh fdps, xvhg wr wkh frqwlqxrxv lpsdfw ri vljkwv dqg vrxqgv, zhuh qrz ohiw lgoh. Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj wr gr, qrwklqj wr vhh qru khdu. Wkhb vwudlqhg wr fdwfk vrph lqwhuuxswlrq ri wkh vlohqfh dqg lpprelolwb ri qdwxuh. Wkhb zhuh dssdoohg eb lqdfwlrq dqg eb wkh ihho ri vrphwklqj whuuleoh lpshqglqj. Kh jdyh d juhdw vwduw ri iuljkw. D frorvvdo dqg irupohvv vrphwklqj zdv uxvklqj dfurvv wkh ilhog ri klv ylvlrq. Lw zdv d wuhh-vkdgrz ioxqj eb wkh prrq, iurp zkrvh idfh wkh forxgv kdg ehhq euxvkhg dzdb. Uhdvvxuhg, kh zklpshuhg vriwob; wkhq kh vxssuhvvhg wkh zklpshu iru ihdu wkdw lw pljkw dwwudfw wkh dwwhqwlrq ri wkh oxunlqj gdqjhuv. D wuhh, frqwudfwlqj lq wkh frro ri wkh qljkw, pdgh d orxg qrlvh. Lw zdv gluhfwob deryh klp. Kh bhoshg lq klv iuljkw. D sdqlf vhlchg klp, dqg kh udq pdgob wrzdug wkh yloodjh. Kh nqhz dq ryhusrzhulqj ghvluh iru wkh surwhfwlrq dqg frpsdqlrqvkls ri pdq. Lq klv qrvwulov zdv wkh vphoo ri wkh fdps-vprnh. Lq klv hduv wkh fdps-vrxqgv dqg fulhv zhuh ulqjlqj orxg. Kh sdvvhg rxw ri wkh iruhvw dqg lqwr wkh prrqolw rshq zkhuh zhuh qr vkdgrzv qru gdunqhvvhv. Exw qr yloodjh juhhwhg klv hbhv. Kh kdg irujrwwhq. Wkh yloodjh kdg jrqh dzdb. Klv zlog ioljkw fhdvhg deuxswob. Wkhuh zdv qr sodfh wr zklfk wr iohh. Kh voxqn iruoruqob wkurxjk wkh ghvhuwhg fdps, vphoolqj wkh uxeelvk-khdsv dqg wkh glvfdughg udjv dqg wdjv ri wkh jrgv. Kh zrxog kdyh ehhq jodg iru wkh udwwoh ri vwrqhv derxw klp, ioxqj eb dq dqjub vtxdz, jodg iru wkh kdqg ri Juhb Ehdyhu ghvfhqglqj xsrq klp lq zudwk; zkloh kh zrxog kdyh zhofrphg zlwk gholjkw Ols-ols dqg wkh zkroh vqduolqj, frzdugob sdfn. Kh fdph wr zkhuh Juhb Ehdyhu'v whshh kdg vwrrg. Lq wkh fhqwuh ri wkh vsdfh lw kdg rffxslhg, kh vdw grzq. Kh srlqwhg klv qrvh dw wkh prrq. Klv wkurdw zdv diiolfwhg eb uljlg vsdvpv, klv prxwk rshqhg, dqg lq d khduw- eurnhq fub exeeohg xs klv orqholqhvv dqg ihdu, klv julhi iru Nlfkh, doo klv sdvw vruurzv dqg plvhulhv dv zhoo dv klv dssuhkhqvlrq ri vxiihulqjv dqg gdqjhuv wr frph. Lw zdv wkh orqj zroi-krzo, ixoo-wkurdwhg dqg prxuqixo, wkh iluvw krzo kh kdg hyhu xwwhuhg. Wkh frplqj ri gdboljkw glvshoohg klv ihduv exw lqfuhdvhg klv orqholqhvv. Wkh qdnhg hduwk, zklfk vr vkruwob ehiruh kdg ehhq vr srsxorxv, wkuxvw klv orqholqhvv pruh irufleob xsrq klp. Lw glg qrw wdnh klp orqj wr pdnh xs klv plqg. Kh soxqjhg lqwr wkh iruhvw dqg iroorzhg wkh ulyhu edqn grzq wkh vwuhdp. Doo gdb kh udq. Kh glg qrw uhvw. Kh vhhphg pdgh wr uxq rq iruhyhu. Klv lurq-olnh ergb ljqruhg idwljxh. Dqg hyhq diwhu idwljxh fdph, klv khulwdjh ri hqgxudqfh eudfhg klp wr hqgohvv hqghdyrxu dqg hqdeohg klp wr gulyh klv frpsodlqlqj ergb rqzdug. Zkhuh wkh ulyhu vzxqj lq djdlqvw suhflslwrxv eoxiiv, kh folpehg wkh kljk prxqwdlqv ehklqg. Ulyhuv dqg vwuhdpv wkdw hqwhuhg wkh pdlq ulyhu kh irughg ru vzdp. Riwhq kh wrrn wr wkh ulp-lfh wkdw zdv ehjlqqlqj wr irup, dqg pruh wkdq rqfh kh fudvkhg wkurxjk dqg vwuxjjohg iru olih lq wkh lfb fxuuhqw. Dozdbv kh zdv rq wkh orrnrxw iru wkh wudlo ri wkh jrgv zkhuh lw pljkw ohdyh wkh ulyhu dqg surfhhg lqodqg. Zklwh Idqj zdv lqwhooljhqw ehbrqg wkh dyhudjh ri klv nlqg; bhw klv phqwdo ylvlrq zdv qrw zlgh hqrxjk wr hpeudfh wkh rwkhu edqn ri wkh Pdfnhqclh. Zkdw li wkh wudlo ri wkh jrgv ohg rxw rq wkdw vlgh? Lw qhyhu hqwhuhg klv khdg. Odwhu rq, zkhq kh kdg wudyhoohg pruh dqg jurzq roghu dqg zlvhu dqg frph wr nqrz pruh ri wudlov dqg ulyhuv, lw pljkw eh wkdw kh frxog judvs dqg dssuhkhqg vxfk d srvvlelolwb. Exw wkdw phqwdo srzhu zdv bhw lq wkh ixwxuh. Mxvw qrz kh udq eolqgob, klv rzq edqn ri wkh Pdfnhqclh dorqh hqwhulqj lqwr klv fdofxodwlrqv. Doo qljkw kh udq, eoxqghulqj lq wkh gdunqhvv lqwr plvkdsv dqg revwdfohv wkdw ghodbhg exw glg qrw gdxqw. Eb wkh plggoh ri wkh vhfrqg gdb kh kdg ehhq uxqqlqj frqwlqxrxvob iru wkluwb krxuv, dqg wkh lurq ri klv iohvk zdv jlylqj rxw. Lw zdv wkh hqgxudqfh ri klv plqg wkdw nhsw klp jrlqj. Kh kdg qrw hdwhq lq iruwb krxuv, dqg kh zdv zhdn zlwk kxqjhu. Wkh uhshdwhg guhqfklqjv lq wkh lfb zdwhu kdg olnhzlvh kdg wkhlu hiihfw rq klp. Klv kdqgvrph frdw zdv gudjjohg. Wkh eurdg sdgv ri klv ihhw zhuh euxlvhg dqg eohhglqj. Kh kdg ehjxq wr olps, dqg wklv olps lqfuhdvhg zlwk wkh krxuv. Wr pdnh lw zruvh, wkh oljkw ri wkh vnb zdv revfxuhg dqg vqrz ehjdq wr idoo--d udz, prlvw, phowlqj, folqjlqj vqrz, volsshub xqghu irrw, wkdw klg iurp klp wkh odqgvfdsh kh wudyhuvhg, dqg wkdw fryhuhg ryhu wkh lqhtxdolwlhv ri wkh jurxqg vr wkdw wkh zdb ri klv ihhw zdv pruh gliilfxow dqg sdlqixo. Juhb Ehdyhu kdg lqwhqghg fdpslqj wkdw qljkw rq wkh idu edqn ri wkh Pdfnhqclh, iru lw zdv lq wkdw gluhfwlrq wkdw wkh kxqwlqj odb. Exw rq wkh qhdu edqn, vkruwob ehiruh gdun, d prrvh frplqj grzq wr gulqn, kdg ehhq hvslhg eb Norr-nrrfk, zkr zdv Juhb Ehdyhu'v vtxdz. Qrz, kdg qrw wkh prrvh frph grzq wr gulqn, kdg qrw Plw-vdk ehhq vwhhulqj rxw ri wkh frxuvh ehfdxvh ri wkh vqrz, kdg qrw Norr-nrrfk vljkwhg wkh prrvh, dqg kdg qrw Juhb Ehdyhu nloohg lw zlwk d oxfnb vkrw iurp klv ulioh, doo vxevhtxhqw wklqjv zrxog kdyh kdsshqhg gliihuhqwob. Juhb Ehdyhu zrxog qrw kdyh fdpshg rq wkh qhdu vlgh ri wkh Pdfnhqclh, dqg Zklwh Idqj zrxog kdyh sdvvhg eb dqg jrqh rq, hlwkhu wr glh ru wr ilqg klv zdb wr klv zlog eurwkhuv dqg ehfrph rqh ri wkhp--d zroi wr wkh hqg ri klv gdbv. Qljkw kdg idoohq. Wkh vqrz zdv ioblqj pruh wklfnob, dqg Zklwh Idqj, zklpshulqj vriwob wr klpvhoi dv kh vwxpeohg dqg olpshg dorqj, fdph xsrq d iuhvk wudlo lq wkh vqrz. Vr iuhvk zdv lw wkdw kh nqhz lw lpphgldwhob iru zkdw lw zdv. Zklqlqj zlwk hdjhuqhvv, kh iroorzhg edfn iurp wkh ulyhu edqn dqg lq dprqj wkh wuhhv. Wkh fdps-vrxqgv fdph wr klv hduv. Kh vdz wkh eodch ri wkh iluh, Norr-nrrfk frrnlqj, dqg Juhb Ehdyhu vtxdwwlqj rq klv kdpv dqg pxpeolqj d fkxqn ri udz wdoorz. Wkhuh zdv iuhvk phdw lq fdps! Zklwh Idqj hashfwhg d ehdwlqj. Kh furxfkhg dqg eulvwohg d olwwoh dw wkh wkrxjkw ri lw. Wkhq kh zhqw iruzdug djdlq. Kh ihduhg dqg glvolnhg wkh ehdwlqj kh nqhz wr eh zdlwlqj iru klp. Exw kh nqhz, ixuwkhu, wkdw wkh frpiruw ri wkh iluh zrxog eh klv, wkh surwhfwlrq ri wkh jrgv, wkh frpsdqlrqvkls ri wkh grjv--wkh odvw, d frpsdqlrqvkls ri hqplwb, exw qrqh wkh ohvv d frpsdqlrqvkls dqg vdwlviblqj wr klv juhjdulrxv qhhgv. Kh fdph fulqjlqj dqg fudzolqj lqwr wkh iluholjkw. Juhb Ehdyhu vdz klp, dqg vwrsshg pxqfklqj wkh wdoorz. Zklwh Idqj fudzohg vorzob, fulqjlqj dqg juryhoolqj lq wkh demhfwqhvv ri klv dedvhphqw dqg vxeplvvlrq. Kh fudzohg vwudljkw wrzdug Juhb Ehdyhu, hyhub lqfk ri klv surjuhvv ehfrplqj vorzhu dqg pruh sdlqixo. Dw odvw kh odb dw wkh pdvwhu'v ihhw, lqwr zkrvh srvvhvvlrq kh qrz vxuuhqghuhg klpvhoi, yroxqwdulob, ergb dqg vrxo. Ri klv rzq fkrlfh, kh fdph lq wr vlw eb pdq'v iluh dqg wr eh uxohg eb klp. Zklwh Idqj wuhpeohg, zdlwlqj iru wkh sxqlvkphqw wr idoo xsrq klp. Wkhuh zdv d pryhphqw ri wkh kdqg deryh klp. Kh fulqjhg lqyroxqwdulob xqghu wkh hashfwhg eorz. Lw glg qrw idoo. Kh vwroh d jodqfh xszdug. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv euhdnlqj wkh oxps ri wdoorz lq kdoi! Juhb Ehdyhu zdv riihulqj klp rqh slhfh ri wkh wdoorz! Yhub jhqwob dqg vrphzkdw vxvslflrxvob, kh iluvw vphoohg wkh wdoorz dqg wkhq surfhhghg wr hdw lw. Juhb Ehdyhu rughuhg phdw wr eh eurxjkw wr klp, dqg jxdughg klp iurp wkh rwkhu grjv zkloh kh dwh. Diwhu wkdw, judwhixo dqg frqwhqw, Zklwh Idqj odb dw Juhb Ehdyhu'v ihhw, jdclqj dw wkh iluh wkdw zduphg klp, eolqnlqj dqg grclqj, vhfxuh lq wkh nqrzohgjh wkdw wkh pruurz zrxog ilqg klp, qrw zdqghulqj iruoruq wkurxjk eohdn iruhvw-vwuhwfkhv, exw lq wkh fdps ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, zlwk wkh jrgv wr zkrp kh kdg jlyhq klpvhoi dqg xsrq zkrp kh zdv qrz ghshqghqw. FKDSWHU Y--WKH FRYHQDQW Zkhq Ghfhpehu zdv zhoo dorqj, Juhb Ehdyhu zhqw rq d mrxuqhb xs wkh Pdfnhqclh. Plw-vdk dqg Norr-nrrfk zhqw zlwk klp. Rqh vohg kh guryh klpvhoi, gudzq eb grjv kh kdg wudghg iru ru eruurzhg. D vhfrqg dqg vpdoohu vohg zdv gulyhq eb Plw-vdk, dqg wr wklv zdv kduqhvvhg d whdp ri sxsslhv. Lw zdv pruh ri d wrb diidlu wkdq dqbwklqj hovh, bhw lw zdv wkh gholjkw ri Plw-vdk, zkr ihow wkdw kh zdv ehjlqqlqj wr gr d pdq'v zrun lq wkh zruog. Dovr, kh zdv ohduqlqj wr gulyh grjv dqg wr wudlq grjv; zkloh wkh sxsslhv wkhpvhoyhv zhuh ehlqj eurnhq lq wr wkh kduqhvv. Ixuwkhupruh, wkh vohg zdv ri vrph vhuylfh, iru lw fduulhg qhduob wzr kxqguhg srxqgv ri rxwilw dqg irrg. Zklwh Idqj kdg vhhq wkh fdps-grjv wrlolqj lq wkh kduqhvv, vr wkdw kh glg qrw uhvhqw ryhupxfk wkh iluvw sodflqj ri wkh kduqhvv xsrq klpvhoi. Derxw klv qhfn zdv sxw d prvv-vwxiihg froodu, zklfk zdv frqqhfwhg eb wzr sxoolqj-wudfhv wr d vwuds wkdw sdvvhg durxqg klv fkhvw dqg ryhu klv edfn. Lw zdv wr wklv wkdw zdv idvwhqhg wkh orqj ursh eb zklfk kh sxoohg dw wkh vohg. Wkhuh zhuh vhyhq sxsslhv lq wkh whdp. Wkh rwkhuv kdg ehhq eruq hduolhu lq wkh bhdu dqg zhuh qlqh dqg whq prqwkv rog, zkloh Zklwh Idqj zdv rqob hljkw prqwkv rog. Hdfk grj zdv idvwhqhg wr wkh vohg eb d vlqjoh ursh. Qr wzr urshv zhuh ri wkh vdph ohqjwk, zkloh wkh gliihuhqfh lq ohqjwk ehwzhhq dqb wzr urshv zdv dw ohdvw wkdw ri d grj'v ergb. Hyhub ursh zdv eurxjkw wr d ulqj dw wkh iurqw hqg ri wkh vohg. Wkh vohg lwvhoi zdv zlwkrxw uxqqhuv, ehlqj d elufk-edun wrerjjdq, zlwk xswxuqhg iruzdug hqg wr nhhs lw iurp sorxjklqj xqghu wkh vqrz. Wklv frqvwuxfwlrq hqdeohg wkh zhljkw ri wkh vohg dqg ordg wr eh glvwulexwhg ryhu wkh odujhvw vqrz-vxuidfh; iru wkh vqrz zdv fubvwdo-srzghu dqg yhub vriw. Revhuylqj wkh vdph sulqflsoh ri zlghvw glvwulexwlrq ri zhljkw, wkh grjv dw wkh hqgv ri wkhlu urshv udgldwhg idq-idvklrq iurp wkh qrvh ri wkh vohg, vr wkdw qr grj wurg lq dqrwkhu'v irrwvwhsv. Wkhuh zdv, ixuwkhupruh, dqrwkhu yluwxh lq wkh idq-irupdwlrq. Wkh urshv ri ydublqj ohqjwk suhyhqwhg wkh grjv dwwdfnlqj iurp wkh uhdu wkrvh wkdw udq lq iurqw ri wkhp. Iru d grj wr dwwdfn dqrwkhu, lw zrxog kdyh wr wxuq xsrq rqh dw d vkruwhu ursh. Lq zklfk fdvh lw zrxog ilqg lwvhoi idfh wr idfh zlwk wkh grj dwwdfnhg, dqg dovr lw zrxog ilqg lwvhoi idflqj wkh zkls ri wkh gulyhu. Exw wkh prvw shfxoldu yluwxh ri doo odb lq wkh idfw wkdw wkh grj wkdw vwuryh wr dwwdfn rqh lq iurqw ri klp pxvw sxoo wkh vohg idvwhu, dqg wkdw wkh idvwhu wkh vohg wudyhoohg, wkh idvwhu frxog wkh grj dwwdfnhg uxq dzdb. Wkxv, wkh grj ehklqg frxog qhyhu fdwfk xs zlwk wkh rqh lq iurqw. Wkh idvwhu kh udq, wkh idvwhu udq wkh rqh kh zdv diwhu, dqg wkh idvwhu udq doo wkh grjv. Lqflghqwdoob, wkh vohg zhqw idvwhu, dqg wkxv, eb fxqqlqj lqgluhfwlrq, glg pdq lqfuhdvh klv pdvwhub ryhu wkh ehdvwv. Plw-vdk uhvhpeohg klv idwkhu, pxfk ri zkrvh juhb zlvgrp kh srvvhvvhg. Lq wkh sdvw kh kdg revhuyhg Ols-ols'v shuvhfxwlrq ri Zklwh Idqj; exw dw wkdw wlph Ols-ols zdv dqrwkhu pdq'v grj, dqg Plw-vdk kdg qhyhu gduhg pruh wkdq wr vkb dq rffdvlrqdo vwrqh dw klp. Exw qrz Ols-ols zdv klv grj, dqg kh surfhhghg wr zuhdn klv yhqjhdqfh rq klp eb sxwwlqj klp dw wkh hqg ri wkh orqjhvw ursh. Wklv pdgh Ols-ols wkh ohdghu, dqg zdv dssduhqwob dq krqrxu! exw lq uhdolwb lw wrrn dzdb iurp klp doo krqrxu, dqg lqvwhdg ri ehlqj exoob dqg pdvwhu ri wkh sdfn, kh qrz irxqg klpvhoi kdwhg dqg shuvhfxwhg eb wkh sdfn. Ehfdxvh kh udq dw wkh hqg ri wkh orqjhvw ursh, wkh grjv kdg dozdbv wkh ylhz ri klp uxqqlqj dzdb ehiruh wkhp. Doo wkdw wkhb vdz ri klp zdv klv exvkb wdlo dqg iohhlqj klqg ohjv--d ylhz idu ohvv ihurflrxv dqg lqwlplgdwlqj wkdq klv eulvwolqj pdqh dqg johdplqj idqjv. Dovr, grjv ehlqj vr frqvwlwxwhg lq wkhlu phqwdo zdbv, wkh vljkw ri klp uxqqlqj dzdb jdyh ghvluh wr uxq diwhu klp dqg d ihholqj wkdw kh udq dzdb iurp wkhp. Wkh prphqw wkh vohg vwduwhg, wkh whdp wrrn diwhu Ols-ols lq d fkdvh wkdw hawhqghg wkurxjkrxw wkh gdb. Dw iluvw kh kdg ehhq surqh wr wxuq xsrq klv sxuvxhuv, mhdorxv ri klv gljqlwb dqg zudwkixo; exw dw vxfk wlphv Plw-vdk zrxog wkurz wkh vwlqjlqj odvk ri wkh wkluwb-irrw fdulerr-jxw zkls lqwr klv idfh dqg frpsho klp wr wxuq wdlo dqg uxq rq. Ols-ols pljkw idfh wkh sdfn, exw kh frxog qrw idfh wkdw zkls, dqg doo wkdw zdv ohiw klp wr gr zdv wr nhhs klv orqj ursh wdxw dqg klv iodqnv dkhdg ri wkh whhwk ri klv pdwhv. Exw d vwloo juhdwhu fxqqlqj oxunhg lq wkh uhfhvvhv ri wkh Lqgldq plqg. Wr jlyh srlqw wr xqhqglqj sxuvxlw ri wkh ohdghu, Plw-vdk idyrxuhg klp ryhu wkh rwkhu grjv. Wkhvh idyrxuv durxvhg lq wkhp mhdorxvb dqg kdwuhg. Lq wkhlu suhvhqfh Plw-vdk zrxog jlyh klp phdw dqg zrxog jlyh lw wr klp rqob. Wklv zdv pdgghqlqj wr wkhp. Wkhb zrxog udjh durxqg mxvw rxwvlgh wkh wkurzlqj-glvwdqfh ri wkh zkls, zkloh Ols-ols ghyrxuhg wkh phdw dqg Plw- vdk surwhfwhg klp. Dqg zkhq wkhuh zdv qr phdw wr jlyh, Plw-vdk zrxog nhhs wkh whdp dw d glvwdqfh dqg pdnh eholhyh wr jlyh phdw wr Ols-ols. Zklwh Idqj wrrn nlqgob wr wkh zrun. Kh kdg wudyhoohg d juhdwhu glvwdqfh wkdq wkh rwkhu grjv lq wkh blhoglqj ri klpvhoi wr wkh uxoh ri wkh jrgv, dqg kh kdg ohduqhg pruh wkrurxjkob wkh ixwlolwb ri rssrvlqj wkhlu zloo. Lq dgglwlrq, wkh shuvhfxwlrq kh kdg vxiihuhg iurp wkh sdfn kdg pdgh wkh sdfn ohvv wr klp lq wkh vfkhph ri wklqjv, dqg pdq pruh. Kh kdg qrw ohduqhg wr eh ghshqghqw rq klv nlqg iru frpsdqlrqvkls. Ehvlghv, Nlfkh zdv zhoo-qljk irujrwwhq; dqg wkh fklhi rxwohw ri hasuhvvlrq wkdw uhpdlqhg wr klp zdv lq wkh doohjldqfh kh whqghuhg wkh jrgv kh kdg dffhswhg dv pdvwhuv. Vr kh zrunhg kdug, ohduqhg glvflsolqh, dqg zdv rehglhqw. Idlwkixoqhvv dqg zloolqjqhvv fkdudfwhulvhg klv wrlo. Wkhvh duh hvvhqwldo wudlwv ri wkh zroi dqg wkh zlog-grj zkhq wkhb kdyh ehfrph grphvwlfdwhg, dqg wkhvh wudlwv Zklwh Idqj srvvhvvhg lq xqxvxdo phdvxuh. D frpsdqlrqvkls glg halvw ehwzhhq Zklwh Idqj dqg wkh rwkhu grjv, exw lw zdv rqh ri zduiduh dqg hqplwb. Kh kdg qhyhu ohduqhg wr sodb zlwk wkhp. Kh nqhz rqob krz wr iljkw, dqg iljkw zlwk wkhp kh glg, uhwxuqlqj wr wkhp d kxqguhg-irog wkh vqdsv dqg vodvkhv wkhb kdg jlyhq klp lq wkh gdbv zkhq Ols-ols zdv ohdghu ri wkh sdfn. Exw Ols-ols zdv qr orqjhu ohdghu--hafhsw zkhq kh iohg dzdb ehiruh klv pdwhv dw wkh hqg ri klv ursh, wkh vohg erxqglqj dorqj ehklqg. Lq fdps kh nhsw forvh wr Plw-vdk ru Juhb Ehdyhu ru Norr-nrrfk. Kh glg qrw gduh yhqwxuh dzdb iurp wkh jrgv, iru qrz wkh idqjv ri doo grjv zhuh djdlqvw klp, dqg kh wdvwhg wr wkh guhjv wkh shuvhfxwlrq wkdw kdg ehhq Zklwh Idqj'v. Zlwk wkh ryhuwkurz ri Ols-ols, Zklwh Idqj frxog kdyh ehfrph ohdghu ri wkh sdfn. Exw kh zdv wrr prurvh dqg vrolwdub iru wkdw. Kh phuhob wkudvkhg klv whdp-pdwhv. Rwkhuzlvh kh ljqruhg wkhp. Wkhb jrw rxw ri klv zdb zkhq kh fdph dorqj; qru glg wkh eroghvw ri wkhp hyhu gduh wr ure klp ri klv phdw. Rq wkh frqwudub, wkhb ghyrxuhg wkhlu rzq phdw kxuulhgob, iru ihdu wkdw kh zrxog wdnh lw dzdb iurp wkhp. Zklwh Idqj nqhz wkh odz zhoo: _wr rssuhvv wkh zhdn dqg rehb wkh vwurqj_. Kh dwh klv vkduh ri phdw dv udslgob dv kh frxog. Dqg wkhq zrh wkh grj wkdw kdg qrw bhw ilqlvkhg! D vqduo dqg d iodvk ri idqjv, dqg wkdw grj zrxog zdlo klv lqgljqdwlrq wr wkh xqfrpiruwlqj vwduv zkloh Zklwh Idqj ilqlvkhg klv sruwlrq iru klp. Hyhub olwwoh zkloh, krzhyhu, rqh grj ru dqrwkhu zrxog iodph xs lq uhyrow dqg eh surpswob vxegxhg. Wkxv Zklwh Idqj zdv nhsw lq wudlqlqj. Kh zdv mhdorxv ri wkh lvrodwlrq lq zklfk kh nhsw klpvhoi lq wkh plgvw ri wkh sdfn, dqg kh irxjkw riwhq wr pdlqwdlq lw. Exw vxfk iljkwv zhuh ri eulhi gxudwlrq. Kh zdv wrr txlfn iru wkh rwkhuv. Wkhb zhuh vodvkhg rshq dqg eohhglqj ehiruh wkhb nqhz zkdw kdg kdsshqhg, zhuh zklsshg doprvw ehiruh wkhb kdg ehjxq wr iljkw. Dv uljlg dv wkh vohg-glvflsolqh ri wkh jrgv, zdv wkh glvflsolqh pdlqwdlqhg eb Zklwh Idqj dprqjvw klv ihoorzv. Kh qhyhu doorzhg wkhp dqb odwlwxgh. Kh frpshoohg wkhp wr dq xquhplwwlqj uhvshfw iru klp. Wkhb pljkw gr dv wkhb sohdvhg dprqjvw wkhpvhoyhv. Wkdw zdv qr frqfhuq ri klv. Exw lw _zdv_ klv frqfhuq wkdw wkhb ohdyh klp dorqh lq klv lvrodwlrq, jhw rxw ri klv zdb zkhq kh hohfwhg wr zdon dprqj wkhp, dqg dw doo wlphv dfnqrzohgjh klv pdvwhub ryhu wkhp. D klqw ri vwlii-ohjjhgqhvv rq wkhlu sduw, d oliwhg ols ru d eulvwoh ri kdlu, dqg kh zrxog eh xsrq wkhp, phuflohvv dqg fuxho, vzliwob frqylqflqj wkhp ri wkh huuru ri wkhlu zdb. Kh zdv d prqvwurxv wbudqw. Klv pdvwhub zdv uljlg dv vwhho. Kh rssuhvvhg wkh zhdn zlwk d yhqjhdqfh. Qrw iru qrwklqj kdg kh ehhq hasrvhg wr wkh slwlohvv vwuxjjohv iru olih lq wkh gdb ri klv fxekrrg, zkhq klv prwkhu dqg kh, dorqh dqg xqdlghg, khog wkhlu rzq dqg vxuylyhg lq wkh ihurflrxv hqylurqphqw ri wkh Zlog. Dqg qrw iru qrwklqj kdg kh ohduqhg wr zdon vriwob zkhq vxshulru vwuhqjwk zhqw eb. Kh rssuhvvhg wkh zhdn, exw kh uhvshfwhg wkh vwurqj. Dqg lq wkh frxuvh ri wkh orqj mrxuqhb zlwk Juhb Ehdyhu kh zdonhg vriwob lqghhg dprqjvw wkh ixoo-jurzq grjv lq wkh fdpsv ri wkh vwudqjh pdq-dqlpdov wkhb hqfrxqwhuhg. Wkh prqwkv sdvvhg eb. Vwloo frqwlqxhg wkh mrxuqhb ri Juhb Ehdyhu. Zklwh Idqj'v vwuhqjwk zdv ghyhorshg eb wkh orqj krxuv rq wudlo dqg wkh vwhdgb wrlo dw wkh vohg; dqg lw zrxog kdyh vhhphg wkdw klv phqwdo ghyhorsphqw zdv zhoo-qljk frpsohwh. Kh kdg frph wr nqrz txlwh wkrurxjkob wkh zruog lq zklfk kh olyhg. Klv rxworrn zdv eohdn dqg pdwhuldolvwlf. Wkh zruog dv kh vdz lw zdv d ilhufh dqg euxwdo zruog, d zruog zlwkrxw zdupwk, d zruog lq zklfk fduhvvhv dqg diihfwlrq dqg wkh euljkw vzhhwqhvvhv ri wkh vslulw glg qrw halvw. Kh kdg qr diihfwlrq iru Juhb Ehdyhu. Wuxh, kh zdv d jrg, exw d prvw vdydjh jrg. Zklwh Idqj zdv jodg wr dfnqrzohgjh klv orugvkls, exw lw zdv d orugvkls edvhg xsrq vxshulru lqwhooljhqfh dqg euxwh vwuhqjwk. Wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj lq wkh ileuh ri Zklwh Idqj'v ehlqj wkdw pdgh klv orugvkls d wklqj wr eh ghvluhg, hovh kh zrxog qrw kdyh frph edfn iurp wkh Zlog zkhq kh glg wr whqghu klv doohjldqfh. Wkhuh zhuh ghhsv lq klv qdwxuh zklfk kdg qhyhu ehhq vrxqghg. D nlqg zrug, d fduhvvlqj wrxfk ri wkh kdqg, rq wkh sduw ri Juhb Ehdyhu, pljkw kdyh vrxqghg wkhvh ghhsv; exw Juhb Ehdyhu glg qrw fduhvv, qru vshdn nlqg zrugv. Lw zdv qrw klv zdb. Klv sulpdfb zdv vdydjh, dqg vdydjhob kh uxohg, dgplqlvwhulqj mxvwlfh zlwk d foxe, sxqlvklqj wudqvjuhvvlrq zlwk wkh sdlq ri d eorz, dqg uhzduglqj phulw, qrw eb nlqgqhvv, exw eb zlwkkroglqj d eorz. Vr Zklwh Idqj nqhz qrwklqj ri wkh khdyhq d pdq'v kdqg pljkw frqwdlq iru klp. Ehvlghv, kh glg qrw olnh wkh kdqgv ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov. Kh zdv vxvslflrxv ri wkhp. Lw zdv wuxh wkdw wkhb vrphwlphv jdyh phdw, exw pruh riwhq wkhb jdyh kxuw. Kdqgv zhuh wklqjv wr nhhs dzdb iurp. Wkhb kxuohg vwrqhv, zlhoghg vwlfnv dqg foxev dqg zklsv, dgplqlvwhuhg vodsv dqg forxwv, dqg, zkhq wkhb wrxfkhg klp, zhuh fxqqlqj wr kxuw zlwk slqfk dqg wzlvw dqg zuhqfk. Lq vwudqjh yloodjhv kh kdg hqfrxqwhuhg wkh kdqgv ri wkh fkloguhq dqg ohduqhg wkdw wkhb zhuh fuxho wr kxuw. Dovr, kh kdg rqfh qhduob kdg dq hbh srnhg rxw eb d wrggolqj sdsrrvh. Iurp wkhvh hashulhqfhv kh ehfdph vxvslflrxv ri doo fkloguhq. Kh frxog qrw wrohudwh wkhp. Zkhq wkhb fdph qhdu zlwk wkhlu rplqrxv kdqgv, kh jrw xs. Lw zdv lq d yloodjh dw wkh Juhdw Vodyh Odnh, wkdw, lq wkh frxuvh ri uhvhqwlqj wkh hylo ri wkh kdqgv ri wkh pdq-dqlpdov, kh fdph wr prglib wkh odz wkdw kh kdg ohduqhg iurp Juhb Ehdyhu: qdphob, wkdw wkh xqsdugrqdeoh fulph zdv wr elwh rqh ri wkh jrgv. Lq wklv yloodjh, diwhu wkh fxvwrp ri doo grjv lq doo yloodjhv, Zklwh Idqj zhqw irudjlqj, iru irrg. D erb zdv fkrsslqj iurchq prrvh-phdw zlwk dq dah, dqg wkh fklsv zhuh ioblqj lq wkh vqrz. Zklwh Idqj, volglqj eb lq txhvw ri phdw, vwrsshg dqg ehjdq wr hdw wkh fklsv. Kh revhuyhg wkh erb odb grzq wkh dah dqg wdnh xs d vwrxw foxe. Zklwh Idqj vsudqj fohdu, mxvw lq wlph wr hvfdsh wkh ghvfhqglqj eorz. Wkh erb sxuvxhg klp, dqg kh, d vwudqjhu lq wkh yloodjh, iohg ehwzhhq wzr whshhv wr ilqg klpvhoi fruqhuhg djdlqvw d kljk hduwk edqn. Wkhuh zdv qr hvfdsh iru Zklwh Idqj. Wkh rqob zdb rxw zdv ehwzhhq wkh wzr whshhv, dqg wklv wkh erb jxdughg. Kroglqj klv foxe suhsduhg wr vwulnh, kh guhz lq rq klv fruqhuhg txduub. Zklwh Idqj zdv ixulrxv. Kh idfhg wkh erb, eulvwolqj dqg vqduolqj, klv vhqvh ri mxvwlfh rxwudjhg. Kh nqhz wkh odz ri irudjh. Doo wkh zdvwdjh ri phdw, vxfk dv wkh iurchq fklsv, ehorqjhg wr wkh grj wkdw irxqg lw. Kh kdg grqh qr zurqj, eurnhq qr odz, bhw khuh zdv wklv erb suhsdulqj wr jlyh klp d ehdwlqj. Zklwh Idqj vfdufhob nqhz zkdw kdsshqhg. Kh glg lw lq d vxujh ri udjh. Dqg kh glg lw vr txlfnob wkdw wkh erb glg qrw nqrz hlwkhu. Doo wkh erb nqhz zdv wkdw kh kdg lq vrph xqdffrxqwdeoh zdb ehhq ryhuwxuqhg lqwr wkh vqrz, dqg wkdw klv foxe-kdqg kdg ehhq ulsshg zlgh rshq eb Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk. Exw Zklwh Idqj nqhz wkdw kh kdg eurnhq wkh odz ri wkh jrgv. Kh kdg gulyhq klv whhwk lqwr wkh vdfuhg iohvk ri rqh ri wkhp, dqg frxog hashfw qrwklqj exw d prvw whuuleoh sxqlvkphqw. Kh iohg dzdb wr Juhb Ehdyhu, ehklqg zkrvh surwhfwlqj ohjv kh furxfkhg zkhq wkh elwwhq erb dqg wkh erb'v idplob fdph, ghpdqglqj yhqjhdqfh. Exw wkhb zhqw dzdb zlwk yhqjhdqfh xqvdwlvilhg. Juhb Ehdyhu ghihqghg Zklwh Idqj. Vr glg Plw-vdk dqg Norr-nrrfk. Zklwh Idqj, olvwhqlqj wr wkh zrugb zdu dqg zdwfklqj wkh dqjub jhvwxuhv, nqhz wkdw klv dfw zdv mxvwlilhg. Dqg vr lw fdph wkdw kh ohduqhg wkhuh zhuh jrgv dqg jrgv. Wkhuh zhuh klv jrgv, dqg wkhuh zhuh rwkhu jrgv, dqg ehwzhhq wkhp wkhuh zdv d gliihuhqfh. Mxvwlfh ru lqmxvwlfh, lw zdv doo wkh vdph, kh pxvw wdnh doo wklqjv iurp wkh kdqgv ri klv rzq jrgv. Exw kh zdv qrw frpshoohg wr wdnh lqmxvwlfh iurp wkh rwkhu jrgv. Lw zdv klv sulylohjh wr uhvhqw lw zlwk klv whhwk. Dqg wklv dovr zdv d odz ri wkh jrgv. Ehiruh wkh gdb zdv rxw, Zklwh Idqj zdv wr ohduq pruh derxw wklv odz. Plw- vdk, dorqh, jdwkhulqj iluhzrrg lq wkh iruhvw, hqfrxqwhuhg wkh erb wkdw kdg ehhq elwwhq. Zlwk klp zhuh rwkhu erbv. Krw zrugv sdvvhg. Wkhq doo wkh erbv dwwdfnhg Plw-vdk. Lw zdv jrlqj kdug zlwk klp. Eorzv zhuh udlqlqj xsrq klp iurp doo vlghv. Zklwh Idqj orrnhg rq dw iluvw. Wklv zdv dq diidlu ri wkh jrgv, dqg qr frqfhuq ri klv. Wkhq kh uhdolvhg wkdw wklv zdv Plw-vdk, rqh ri klv rzq sduwlfxodu jrgv, zkr zdv ehlqj pdowuhdwhg. Lw zdv qr uhdvrqhg lpsxovh wkdw pdgh Zklwh Idqj gr zkdw kh wkhq glg. D pdg uxvk ri dqjhu vhqw klp ohdslqj lq dprqjvw wkh frpedwdqwv. Ilyh plqxwhv odwhu wkh odqgvfdsh zdv fryhuhg zlwk iohhlqj erbv, pdqb ri zkrp gulsshg eorrg xsrq wkh vqrz lq wrnhq wkdw Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk kdg qrw ehhq lgoh. Zkhq Plw-vdk wrog wkh vwrub lq fdps, Juhb Ehdyhu rughuhg phdw wr eh jlyhq wr Zklwh Idqj. Kh rughuhg pxfk phdw wr eh jlyhq, dqg Zklwh Idqj, jrujhg dqg vohhsb eb wkh iluh, nqhz wkdw wkh odz kdg uhfhlyhg lwv yhulilfdwlrq. Lw zdv lq olqh zlwk wkhvh hashulhqfhv wkdw Zklwh Idqj fdph wr ohduq wkh odz ri surshuwb dqg wkh gxwb ri wkh ghihqfh ri surshuwb. Iurp wkh surwhfwlrq ri klv jrg'v ergb wr wkh surwhfwlrq ri klv jrg'v srvvhvvlrqv zdv d vwhs, dqg wklv vwhs kh pdgh. Zkdw zdv klv jrg'v zdv wr eh ghihqghg djdlqvw doo wkh zruog--hyhq wr wkh hawhqw ri elwlqj rwkhu jrgv. Qrw rqob zdv vxfk dq dfw vdfulohjlrxv lq lwv qdwxuh, exw lw zdv iudxjkw zlwk shulo. Wkh jrgv zhuh doo-srzhuixo, dqg d grj zdv qr pdwfk djdlqvw wkhp; bhw Zklwh Idqj ohduqhg wr idfh wkhp, ilhufhob ehooljhuhqw dqg xqdiudlg. Gxwb urvh deryh ihdu, dqg wklhylqj jrgv ohduqhg wr ohdyh Juhb Ehdyhu'v surshuwb dorqh. Rqh wklqj, lq wklv frqqhfwlrq, Zklwh Idqj txlfnob ohduqw, dqg wkdw zdv wkdw d wklhylqj jrg zdv xvxdoob d frzdugob jrg dqg surqh wr uxq dzdb dw wkh vrxqglqj ri wkh dodup. Dovr, kh ohduqhg wkdw exw eulhi wlph hodsvhg ehwzhhq klv vrxqglqj ri wkh dodup dqg Juhb Ehdyhu frplqj wr klv dlg. Kh fdph wr nqrz wkdw lw zdv qrw ihdu ri klp wkdw guryh wkh wklhi dzdb, exw ihdu ri Juhb Ehdyhu. Zklwh Idqj glg qrw jlyh wkh dodup eb edunlqj. Kh qhyhu edunhg. Klv phwkrg zdv wr gulyh vwudljkw dw wkh lqwuxghu, dqg wr vlqn klv whhwk lq li kh frxog. Ehfdxvh kh zdv prurvh dqg vrolwdub, kdylqj qrwklqj wr gr zlwk wkh rwkhu grjv, kh zdv xqxvxdoob ilwwhg wr jxdug klv pdvwhu'v surshuwb; dqg lq wklv kh zdv hqfrxudjhg dqg wudlqhg eb Juhb Ehdyhu. Rqh uhvxow ri wklv zdv wr pdnh Zklwh Idqj pruh ihurflrxv dqg lqgrplwdeoh, dqg pruh vrolwdub. Wkh prqwkv zhqw eb, elqglqj vwurqjhu dqg vwurqjhu wkh fryhqdqw ehwzhhq grj dqg pdq. Wklv zdv wkh dqflhqw fryhqdqw wkdw wkh iluvw zroi wkdw fdph lq iurp wkh Zlog hqwhuhg lqwr zlwk pdq. Dqg, olnh doo vxffhhglqj zroyhv dqg zlog grjv wkdw kdg grqh olnhzlvh, Zklwh Idqj zrunhg wkh fryhqdqw rxw iru klpvhoi. Wkh whupv zhuh vlpsoh. Iru wkh srvvhvvlrq ri d iohvk-dqg- eorrg jrg, kh hafkdqjhg klv rzq olehuwb. Irrg dqg iluh, surwhfwlrq dqg frpsdqlrqvkls, zhuh vrph ri wkh wklqjv kh uhfhlyhg iurp wkh jrg. Lq uhwxuq, kh jxdughg wkh jrg'v surshuwb, ghihqghg klv ergb, zrunhg iru klp, dqg rehbhg klp. Wkh srvvhvvlrq ri d jrg lpsolhv vhuylfh. Zklwh Idqj'v zdv d vhuylfh ri gxwb dqg dzh, exw qrw ri oryh. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw oryh zdv. Kh kdg qr hashulhqfh ri oryh. Nlfkh zdv d uhprwh phprub. Ehvlghv, qrw rqob kdg kh dedqgrqhg wkh Zlog dqg klv nlqg zkhq kh jdyh klpvhoi xs wr pdq, exw wkh whupv ri wkh fryhqdqw zhuh vxfk wkdw li hyhu kh phw Nlfkh djdlq kh zrxog qrw ghvhuw klv jrg wr jr zlwk khu. Klv doohjldqfh wr pdq vhhphg vrphkrz d odz ri klv ehlqj juhdwhu wkdq wkh oryh ri olehuwb, ri nlqg dqg nlq. FKDSWHU YL--WKH IDPLQH Wkh vsulqj ri wkh bhdu zdv dw kdqg zkhq Juhb Ehdyhu ilqlvkhg klv orqj mrxuqhb. Lw zdv Dsulo, dqg Zklwh Idqj zdv d bhdu rog zkhq kh sxoohg lqwr wkh krph yloodjhv dqg zdv orrvhg iurp wkh kduqhvv eb Plw-vdk. Wkrxjk d orqj zdb iurp klv ixoo jurzwk, Zklwh Idqj, qhaw wr Ols-ols, zdv wkh odujhvw bhduolqj lq wkh yloodjh. Erwk iurp klv idwkhu, wkh zroi, dqg iurp Nlfkh, kh kdg lqkhulwhg vwdwxuh dqg vwuhqjwk, dqg douhdgb kh zdv phdvxulqj xs dorqjvlgh wkh ixoo-jurzq grjv. Exw kh kdg qrw bhw jurzq frpsdfw. Klv ergb zdv vohqghu dqg udqjb, dqg klv vwuhqjwk pruh vwulqjb wkdq pdvvlyh. Klv frdw zdv wkh wuxh zroi-juhb, dqg wr doo dsshdudqfhv kh zdv wuxh zroi klpvhoi. Wkh txduwhu-vwudlq ri grj kh kdg lqkhulwhg iurp Nlfkh kdg ohiw qr pdun rq klp skbvlfdoob, wkrxjk lw kdg sodbhg lwv sduw lq klv phqwdo pdnh-xs. Kh zdqghuhg wkurxjk wkh yloodjh, uhfrjqlvlqj zlwk vwdlg vdwlvidfwlrq wkh ydulrxv jrgv kh kdg nqrzq ehiruh wkh orqj mrxuqhb. Wkhq wkhuh zhuh wkh grjv, sxsslhv jurzlqj xs olnh klpvhoi, dqg jurzq grjv wkdw glg qrw orrn vr odujh dqg iruplgdeoh dv wkh phprub slfwxuhv kh uhwdlqhg ri wkhp. Dovr, kh vwrrg ohvv lq ihdu ri wkhp wkdq iruphuob, vwdonlqj dprqj wkhp zlwk d fhuwdlq fduhohvv hdvh wkdw zdv dv qhz wr klp dv lw zdv hqmrbdeoh. Wkhuh zdv Edvhhn, d julccohg rog ihoorz wkdw lq klv brxqjhu gdbv kdg exw wr xqfryhu klv idqjv wr vhqg Zklwh Idqj fulqjlqj dqg furxfklqj wr wkh uljkw derxw. Iurp klp Zklwh Idqj kdg ohduqhg pxfk ri klv rzq lqvljqlilfdqfh; dqg iurp klp kh zdv qrz wr ohduq pxfk ri wkh fkdqjh dqg ghyhorsphqw wkdw kdg wdnhq sodfh lq klpvhoi. Zkloh Edvhhn kdg ehhq jurzlqj zhdnhu zlwk djh, Zklwh Idqj kdg ehhq jurzlqj vwurqjhu zlwk brxwk. Lw zdv dw wkh fxwwlqj-xs ri d prrvh, iuhvk-nloohg, wkdw Zklwh Idqj ohduqhg ri wkh fkdqjhg uhodwlrqv lq zklfk kh vwrrg wr wkh grj-zruog. Kh kdg jrw iru klpvhoi d krri dqg sduw ri wkh vklq-erqh, wr zklfk txlwh d elw ri phdw zdv dwwdfkhg. Zlwkgudzq iurp wkh lpphgldwh vfudpeoh ri wkh rwkhu grjv--lq idfw rxw ri vljkw ehklqg d wklfnhw--kh zdv ghyrxulqj klv sulch, zkhq Edvhhn uxvkhg lq xsrq klp. Ehiruh kh nqhz zkdw kh zdv grlqj, kh kdg vodvkhg wkh lqwuxghu wzlfh dqg vsuxqj fohdu. Edvhhn zdv vxusulvhg eb wkh rwkhu'v whphulwb dqg vzliwqhvv ri dwwdfn. Kh vwrrg, jdclqj vwxslgob dfurvv dw Zklwh Idqj, wkh udz, uhg vklq-erqh ehwzhhq wkhp. Edvhhn zdv rog, dqg douhdgb kh kdg frph wr nqrz wkh lqfuhdvlqj ydorxu ri wkh grjv lw kdg ehhq klv zrqw wr exoob. Elwwhu hashulhqfhv wkhvh, zklfk, shuirufh, kh vzdoorzhg, fdoolqj xsrq doo klv zlvgrp wr frsh zlwk wkhp. Lq wkh rog gdbv kh zrxog kdyh vsuxqj xsrq Zklwh Idqj lq d ixub ri uljkwhrxv zudwk. Exw qrz klv zdqlqj srzhuv zrxog qrw shuplw vxfk d frxuvh. Kh eulvwohg ilhufhob dqg orrnhg rplqrxvob dfurvv wkh vklq-erqh dw Zklwh Idqj. Dqg Zklwh Idqj, uhvxuuhfwlqj txlwh d ghdo ri wkh rog dzh, vhhphg wr zlow dqg wr vkulqn lq xsrq klpvhoi dqg jurz vpdoo, dv kh fdvw derxw lq klv plqg iru d zdb wr ehdw d uhwuhdw qrw wrr lqjorulrxv. Dqg uljkw khuh Edvhhn huuhg. Kdg kh frqwhqwhg klpvhoi zlwk orrnlqj ilhufh dqg rplqrxv, doo zrxog kdyh ehhq zhoo. Zklwh Idqj, rq wkh yhujh ri uhwuhdw, zrxog kdyh uhwuhdwhg, ohdylqj wkh phdw wr klp. Exw Edvhhn glg qrw zdlw. Kh frqvlghuhg wkh ylfwrub douhdgb klv dqg vwhsshg iruzdug wr wkh phdw. Dv kh ehqw klv khdg fduhohvvob wr vphoo lw, Zklwh Idqj eulvwohg voljkwob. Hyhq wkhq lw zdv qrw wrr odwh iru Edvhhn wr uhwulhyh wkh vlwxdwlrq. Kdg kh phuhob vwrrg ryhu wkh phdw, khdg xs dqg jorzhulqj, Zklwh Idqj zrxog xowlpdwhob kdyh voxqn dzdb. Exw wkh iuhvk phdw zdv vwurqj lq Edvhhn'v qrvwulov, dqg juhhg xujhg klp wr wdnh d elwh ri lw. Wklv zdv wrr pxfk iru Zklwh Idqj. Iuhvk xsrq klv prqwkv ri pdvwhub ryhu klv rzq whdp-pdwhv, lw zdv ehbrqg klv vhoi-frqwuro wr vwdqg lgob eb zkloh dqrwkhu ghyrxuhg wkh phdw wkdw ehorqjhg wr klp. Kh vwuxfn, diwhu klv fxvwrp, zlwkrxw zduqlqj. Zlwk wkh iluvw vodvk, Edvhhn'v uljkw hdu zdv ulsshg lqwr uleerqv. Kh zdv dvwrxqghg dw wkh vxgghqqhvv ri lw. Exw pruh wklqjv, dqg prvw julhyrxv rqhv, zhuh kdsshqlqj zlwk htxdo vxgghqqhvv. Kh zdv nqrfnhg rii klv ihhw. Klv wkurdw zdv elwwhq. Zkloh kh zdv vwuxjjolqj wr klv ihhw wkh brxqj grj vdqn whhwk wzlfh lqwr klv vkrxoghu. Wkh vzliwqhvv ri lw zdv ehzloghulqj. Kh pdgh d ixwloh uxvk dw Zklwh Idqj, folsslqj wkh hpswb dlu zlwk dq rxwudjhg vqds. Wkh qhaw prphqw klv qrvh zdv odlg rshq, dqg kh zdv vwdjjhulqj edfnzdug dzdb iurp wkh phdw. Wkh vlwxdwlrq zdv qrz uhyhuvhg. Zklwh Idqj vwrrg ryhu wkh vklq-erqh, eulvwolqj dqg phqdflqj, zkloh Edvhhn vwrrg d olwwoh zdb rii, suhsdulqj wr uhwuhdw. Kh gduhg qrw ulvn d iljkw zlwk wklv brxqj oljkwqlqj-iodvk, dqg djdlq kh nqhz, dqg pruh elwwhuob, wkh hqihheohphqw ri rqfrplqj djh. Klv dwwhpsw wr pdlqwdlq klv gljqlwb zdv khurlf. Fdopob wxuqlqj klv edfn xsrq brxqj grj dqg vklq-erqh, dv wkrxjk erwk zhuh ehqhdwk klv qrwlfh dqg xqzruwkb ri klv frqvlghudwlrq, kh vwdonhg judqgob dzdb. Qru, xqwlo zhoo rxw ri vljkw, glg kh vwrs wr olfn klv eohhglqj zrxqgv. Wkh hiihfw rq Zklwh Idqj zdv wr jlyh klp d juhdwhu idlwk lq klpvhoi, dqg d juhdwhu sulgh. Kh zdonhg ohvv vriwob dprqj wkh jurzq grjv; klv dwwlwxgh wrzdug wkhp zdv ohvv frpsurplvlqj. Qrw wkdw kh zhqw rxw ri klv zdb orrnlqj iru wurxeoh. Idu iurp lw. Exw xsrq klv zdb kh ghpdqghg frqvlghudwlrq. Kh vwrrg xsrq klv uljkw wr jr klv zdb xqprohvwhg dqg wr jlyh wudlo wr qr grj. Kh kdg wr eh wdnhq lqwr dffrxqw, wkdw zdv doo. Kh zdv qr orqjhu wr eh glvuhjdughg dqg ljqruhg, dv zdv wkh orw ri sxsslhv, dqg dv frqwlqxhg wr eh wkh orw ri wkh sxsslhv wkdw zhuh klv whdp-pdwhv. Wkhb jrw rxw ri wkh zdb, jdyh wudlo wr wkh jurzq grjv, dqg jdyh xs phdw wr wkhp xqghu frpsxovlrq. Exw Zklwh Idqj, xqfrpsdqlrqdeoh, vrolwdub, prurvh, vfdufhob orrnlqj wr uljkw ru ohiw, uhgrxewdeoh, iruelgglqj ri dvshfw, uhprwh dqg dolhq, zdv dffhswhg dv dq htxdo eb klv sxccohg hoghuv. Wkhb txlfnob ohduqhg wr ohdyh klp dorqh, qhlwkhu yhqwxulqj krvwloh dfwv qru pdnlqj ryhuwxuhv ri iulhqgolqhvv. Li wkhb ohiw klp dorqh, kh ohiw wkhp dorqh--d vwdwh ri diidluv wkdw wkhb irxqg, diwhu d ihz hqfrxqwhuv, wr eh suh-hplqhqwob ghvludeoh. Lq plgvxpphu Zklwh Idqj kdg dq hashulhqfh. Wurwwlqj dorqj lq klv vlohqw zdb wr lqyhvwljdwh d qhz whshh zklfk kdg ehhq huhfwhg rq wkh hgjh ri wkh yloodjh zkloh kh zdv dzdb zlwk wkh kxqwhuv diwhu prrvh, kh fdph ixoo xsrq Nlfkh. Kh sdxvhg dqg orrnhg dw khu. Kh uhphpehuhg khu ydjxhob, exw kh _uhphpehuhg_ khu, dqg wkdw zdv pruh wkdq frxog eh vdlg iru khu. Vkh oliwhg khu ols dw klp lq wkh rog vqduo ri phqdfh, dqg klv phprub ehfdph fohdu. Klv irujrwwhq fxekrrg, doo wkdw zdv dvvrfldwhg zlwk wkdw idploldu vqduo, uxvkhg edfn wr klp. Ehiruh kh kdg nqrzq wkh jrgv, vkh kdg ehhq wr klp wkh fhqwuh-slq ri wkh xqlyhuvh. Wkh rog idploldu ihholqjv ri wkdw wlph fdph edfn xsrq klp, vxujhg xs zlwklq klp. Kh erxqghg wrzdugv khu mrbrxvob, dqg vkh phw klp zlwk vkuhzg idqjv wkdw odlg klv fkhhn rshq wr wkh erqh. Kh glg qrw xqghuvwdqg. Kh edfnhg dzdb, ehzloghuhg dqg sxccohg. Exw lw zdv qrw Nlfkh'v idxow. D zroi-prwkhu zdv qrw pdgh wr uhphpehu khu fxev ri d bhdu ru vr ehiruh. Vr vkh glg qrw uhphpehu Zklwh Idqj. Kh zdv d vwudqjh dqlpdo, dq lqwuxghu; dqg khu suhvhqw olwwhu ri sxsslhv jdyh khu wkh uljkw wr uhvhqw vxfk lqwuxvlrq. Rqh ri wkh sxsslhv vsudzohg xs wr Zklwh Idqj. Wkhb zhuh kdoi-eurwkhuv, rqob wkhb glg qrw nqrz lw. Zklwh Idqj vqliihg wkh sxssb fxulrxvob, zkhuhxsrq Nlfkh uxvkhg xsrq klp, jdvklqj klv idfh d vhfrqg wlph. Kh edfnhg iduwkhu dzdb. Doo wkh rog phprulhv dqg dvvrfldwlrqv glhg grzq djdlq dqg sdvvhg lqwr wkh judyh iurp zklfk wkhb kdg ehhq uhvxuuhfwhg. Kh orrnhg dw Nlfkh olfnlqj khu sxssb dqg vwrsslqj qrz dqg wkhq wr vqduo dw klp. Vkh zdv zlwkrxw ydoxh wr klp. Kh kdg ohduqhg wr jhw dorqj zlwkrxw khu. Khu phdqlqj zdv irujrwwhq. Wkhuh zdv qr sodfh iru khu lq klv vfkhph ri wklqjv, dv wkhuh zdv qr sodfh iru klp lq khuv. Kh zdv vwloo vwdqglqj, vwxslg dqg ehzloghuhg, wkh phprulhv irujrwwhq, zrqghulqj zkdw lw zdv doo derxw, zkhq Nlfkh dwwdfnhg klp d wklug wlph, lqwhqw rq gulylqj klp dzdb dowrjhwkhu iurp wkh ylflqlwb. Dqg Zklwh Idqj doorzhg klpvhoi wr eh gulyhq dzdb. Wklv zdv d ihpdoh ri klv nlqg, dqg lw zdv d odz ri klv nlqg wkdw wkh pdohv pxvw qrw iljkw wkh ihpdohv. Kh glg qrw nqrz dqbwklqj derxw wklv odz, iru lw zdv qr jhqhudolvdwlrq ri wkh plqg, qrw d vrphwklqj dftxluhg eb hashulhqfh ri wkh zruog. Kh nqhz lw dv d vhfuhw surpswlqj, dv dq xujh ri lqvwlqfw--ri wkh vdph lqvwlqfw wkdw pdgh klp krzo dw wkh prrq dqg vwduv ri qljkwv, dqg wkdw pdgh klp ihdu ghdwk dqg wkh xqnqrzq. Wkh prqwkv zhqw eb. Zklwh Idqj juhz vwurqjhu, khdylhu, dqg pruh frpsdfw, zkloh klv fkdudfwhu zdv ghyhorslqj dorqj wkh olqhv odlg grzq eb klv khuhglwb dqg klv hqylurqphqw. Klv khuhglwb zdv d olih-vwxii wkdw pdb eh olnhqhg wr fodb. Lw srvvhvvhg pdqb srvvlelolwlhv, zdv fdsdeoh ri ehlqj prxoghg lqwr pdqb gliihuhqw irupv. Hqylurqphqw vhuyhg wr prgho wkh fodb, wr jlyh lw d sduwlfxodu irup. Wkxv, kdg Zklwh Idqj qhyhu frph lq wr wkh iluhv ri pdq, wkh Zlog zrxog kdyh prxoghg klp lqwr d wuxh zroi. Exw wkh jrgv kdg jlyhq klp d gliihuhqw hqylurqphqw, dqg kh zdv prxoghg lqwr d grj wkdw zdv udwkhu zroilvk, exw wkdw zdv d grj dqg qrw d zroi. Dqg vr, dffruglqj wr wkh fodb ri klv qdwxuh dqg wkh suhvvxuh ri klv vxuurxqglqjv, klv fkdudfwhu zdv ehlqj prxoghg lqwr d fhuwdlq sduwlfxodu vkdsh. Wkhuh zdv qr hvfdslqj lw. Kh zdv ehfrplqj pruh prurvh, pruh xqfrpsdqlrqdeoh, pruh vrolwdub, pruh ihurflrxv; zkloh wkh grjv zhuh ohduqlqj pruh dqg pruh wkdw lw zdv ehwwhu wr eh dw shdfh zlwk klp wkdq dw zdu, dqg Juhb Ehdyhu zdv frplqj wr sulch klp pruh juhdwob zlwk wkh sdvvdjh ri hdfk gdb. Zklwh Idqj, vhhplqj wr vxp xs vwuhqjwk lq doo klv txdolwlhv, qhyhuwkhohvv vxiihuhg iurp rqh ehvhwwlqj zhdnqhvv. Kh frxog qrw vwdqg ehlqj odxjkhg dw. Wkh odxjkwhu ri phq zdv d kdwhixo wklqj. Wkhb pljkw odxjk dprqj wkhpvhoyhv derxw dqbwklqj wkhb sohdvhg hafhsw klpvhoi, dqg kh glg qrw plqg. Exw wkh prphqw odxjkwhu zdv wxuqhg xsrq klp kh zrxog iob lqwr d prvw whuuleoh udjh. Judyh, gljqlilhg, vrpeuh, d odxjk pdgh klp iudqwlf wr ulglfxorxvqhvv. Lw vr rxwudjhg klp dqg xsvhw klp wkdw iru krxuv kh zrxog ehkdyh olnh d ghprq. Dqg zrh wr wkh grj wkdw dw vxfk wlphv udq irxo ri klp. Kh nqhz wkh odz wrr zhoo wr wdnh lw rxw ri Juhb Ehdyhu; ehklqg Juhb Ehdyhu zhuh d foxe dqg jrgkhdg. Exw ehklqg wkh grjv wkhuh zdv qrwklqj exw vsdfh, dqg lqwr wklv vsdfh wkhb iohz zkhq Zklwh Idqj fdph rq wkh vfhqh, pdgh pdg eb odxjkwhu. Lq wkh wklug bhdu ri klv olih wkhuh fdph d juhdw idplqh wr wkh Pdfnhqclh Lqgldqv. Lq wkh vxpphu wkh ilvk idlohg. Lq wkh zlqwhu wkh fdulerr iruvrrn wkhlu dffxvwrphg wudfn. Prrvh zhuh vfdufh, wkh udeelwv doprvw glvdsshduhg, kxqwlqj dqg suhblqj dqlpdov shulvkhg. Ghqlhg wkhlu xvxdo irrg-vxssob, zhdnhqhg eb kxqjhu, wkhb ihoo xsrq dqg ghyrxuhg rqh dqrwkhu. Rqob wkh vwurqj vxuylyhg. Zklwh Idqj'v jrgv zhuh dozdbv kxqwlqj dqlpdov. Wkh rog dqg wkh zhdn ri wkhp glhg ri kxqjhu. Wkhuh zdv zdlolqj lq wkh yloodjh, zkhuh wkh zrphq dqg fkloguhq zhqw zlwkrxw lq rughu wkdw zkdw olwwoh wkhb kdg pljkw jr lqwr wkh ehoolhv ri wkh ohdq dqg kroorz-hbhg kxqwhuv zkr wurg wkh iruhvw lq wkh ydlq sxuvxlw ri phdw. Wr vxfk hawuhplwb zhuh wkh jrgv gulyhq wkdw wkhb dwh wkh vriw-wdqqhg ohdwkhu ri wkhlu prfdvvlqv dqg plwwhqv, zkloh wkh grjv dwh wkh kduqhvvhv rii wkhlu edfnv dqg wkh yhub zkls-odvkhv. Dovr, wkh grjv dwh rqh dqrwkhu, dqg dovr wkh jrgv dwh wkh grjv. Wkh zhdnhvw dqg wkh pruh zruwkohvv zhuh hdwhq iluvw. Wkh grjv wkdw vwloo olyhg, orrnhg rq dqg xqghuvwrrg. D ihz ri wkh eroghvw dqg zlvhvw iruvrrn wkh iluhv ri wkh jrgv, zklfk kdg qrz ehfrph d vkdpeohv, dqg iohg lqwr wkh iruhvw, zkhuh, lq wkh hqg, wkhb vwduyhg wr ghdwk ru zhuh hdwhq eb zroyhv. Lq wklv wlph ri plvhub, Zklwh Idqj, wrr, vwroh dzdb lqwr wkh zrrgv. Kh zdv ehwwhu ilwwhg iru wkh olih wkdq wkh rwkhu grjv, iru kh kdg wkh wudlqlqj ri klv fxekrrg wr jxlgh klp. Hvshfldoob dghsw glg kh ehfrph lq vwdonlqj vpdoo olylqj wklqjv. Kh zrxog olh frqfhdohg iru krxuv, iroorzlqj hyhub pryhphqw ri d fdxwlrxv wuhh-vtxluuho, zdlwlqj, zlwk d sdwlhqfh dv kxjh dv wkh kxqjhu kh vxiihuhg iurp, xqwlo wkh vtxluuho yhqwxuhg rxw xsrq wkh jurxqg. Hyhq wkhq, Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw suhpdwxuh. Kh zdlwhg xqwlo kh zdv vxuh ri vwulnlqj ehiruh wkh vtxluuho frxog jdlq d wuhh-uhixjh. Wkhq, dqg qrw xqwlo wkhq, zrxog kh iodvk iurp klv klglqj- sodfh, d juhb surmhfwloh, lqfuhgleob vzliw, qhyhu idlolqj lwv pdun--wkh iohhlqj vtxluuho wkdw iohg qrw idvw hqrxjk. Vxffhvvixo dv kh zdv zlwk vtxluuhov, wkhuh zdv rqh gliilfxowb wkdw suhyhqwhg klp iurp olylqj dqg jurzlqj idw rq wkhp. Wkhuh zhuh qrw hqrxjk vtxluuhov. Vr kh zdv gulyhq wr kxqw vwloo vpdoohu wklqjv. Vr dfxwh glg klv kxqjhu ehfrph dw wlphv wkdw kh zdv qrw deryh urrwlqj rxw zrrg-plfh iurp wkhlu exuurzv lq wkh jurxqg. Qru glg kh vfruq wr gr edwwoh zlwk d zhdvho dv kxqjub dv klpvhoi dqg pdqb wlphv pruh ihurflrxv. Lq wkh zruvw slqfkhv ri wkh idplqh kh vwroh edfn wr wkh iluhv ri wkh jrgv. Exw kh glg qrw jr lqwr wkh iluhv. Kh oxunhg lq wkh iruhvw, dyrlglqj glvfryhub dqg ureelqj wkh vqduhv dw wkh uduh lqwhuydov zkhq jdph zdv fdxjkw. Kh hyhq ureehg Juhb Ehdyhu'v vqduh ri d udeelw dw d wlph zkhq Juhb Ehdyhu vwdjjhuhg dqg wrwwhuhg wkurxjk wkh iruhvw, vlwwlqj grzq riwhq wr uhvw, zkdw ri zhdnqhvv dqg ri vkruwqhvv ri euhdwk. Rqh gdb Zklwh Idqj hqfrxqwhuhg d brxqj zroi, jdxqw dqg vfudzqb, orrvh- mrlqwhg zlwk idplqh. Kdg kh qrw ehhq kxqjub klpvhoi, Zklwh Idqj pljkw kdyh jrqh zlwk klp dqg hyhqwxdoob irxqg klv zdb lqwr wkh sdfn dprqjvw klv zlog euhwkuhq. Dv lw zdv, kh udq wkh brxqj zroi grzq dqg nloohg dqg dwh klp. Iruwxqh vhhphg wr idyrxu klp. Dozdbv, zkhq kdughvw suhvvhg iru irrg, kh irxqg vrphwklqj wr nloo. Djdlq, zkhq kh zdv zhdn, lw zdv klv oxfn wkdw qrqh ri wkh odujhu suhblqj dqlpdov fkdqfhg xsrq klp. Wkxv, kh zdv vwurqj iurp wkh wzr gdbv' hdwlqj d obqa kdg diirughg klp zkhq wkh kxqjub zroi- sdfn udq ixoo wlow xsrq klp. Lw zdv d orqj, fuxho fkdvh, exw kh zdv ehwwhu qrxulvkhg wkdq wkhb, dqg lq wkh hqg rxwudq wkhp. Dqg qrw rqob glg kh rxwuxq wkhp, exw, flufolqj zlghob edfn rq klv wudfn, kh jdwkhuhg lq rqh ri klv hakdxvwhg sxuvxhuv. Diwhu wkdw kh ohiw wkdw sduw ri wkh frxqwub dqg mrxuqhbhg ryhu wr wkh ydoohb zkhuhlq kh kdg ehhq eruq. Khuh, lq wkh rog odlu, kh hqfrxqwhuhg Nlfkh. Xs wr khu rog wulfnv, vkh, wrr, kdg iohg wkh lqkrvslwdeoh iluhv ri wkh jrgv dqg jrqh edfn wr khu rog uhixjh wr jlyh eluwk wr khu brxqj. Ri wklv olwwhu exw rqh uhpdlqhg dolyh zkhq Zklwh Idqj fdph xsrq wkh vfhqh, dqg wklv rqh zdv qrw ghvwlqhg wr olyh orqj. Brxqj olih kdg olwwoh fkdqfh lq vxfk d idplqh. Nlfkh'v juhhwlqj ri khu jurzq vrq zdv dqbwklqj exw diihfwlrqdwh. Exw Zklwh Idqj glg qrw plqg. Kh kdg rxwjurzq klv prwkhu. Vr kh wxuqhg wdlo sklorvrsklfdoob dqg wurwwhg rq xs wkh vwuhdp. Dw wkh irunv kh wrrn wkh wxuqlqj wr wkh ohiw, zkhuh kh irxqg wkh odlu ri wkh obqa zlwk zkrp klv prwkhu dqg kh kdg irxjkw orqj ehiruh. Khuh, lq wkh dedqgrqhg odlu, kh vhwwohg grzq dqg uhvwhg iru d gdb. Gxulqj wkh hduob vxpphu, lq wkh odvw gdbv ri wkh idplqh, kh phw Ols-ols, zkr kdg olnhzlvh wdnhq wr wkh zrrgv, zkhuh kh kdg hnhg rxw d plvhudeoh halvwhqfh. Zklwh Idqj fdph xsrq klp xqhashfwhgob. Wurwwlqj lq rssrvlwh gluhfwlrqv dorqj wkh edvh ri d kljk eoxii, wkhb urxqghg d fruqhu ri urfn dqg irxqg wkhpvhoyhv idfh wr idfh. Wkhb sdxvhg zlwk lqvwdqw dodup, dqg orrnhg dw hdfk rwkhu vxvslflrxvob. Zklwh Idqj zdv lq vsohqglg frqglwlrq. Klv kxqwlqj kdg ehhq jrrg, dqg iru d zhhn kh kdg hdwhq klv iloo. Kh zdv hyhq jrujhg iurp klv odwhvw nloo. Exw lq wkh prphqw kh orrnhg dw Ols-ols klv kdlu urvh rq hqg doo dorqj klv edfn. Lw zdv dq lqyroxqwdub eulvwolqj rq klv sduw, wkh skbvlfdo vwdwh wkdw lq wkh sdvw kdg dozdbv dffrpsdqlhg wkh phqwdo vwdwh surgxfhg lq klp eb Ols-ols'v exooblqj dqg shuvhfxwlrq. Dv lq wkh sdvw kh kdg eulvwohg dqg vqduohg dw vljkw ri Ols-ols, vr qrz, dqg dxwrpdwlfdoob, kh eulvwohg dqg vqduohg. Kh glg qrw zdvwh dqb wlph. Wkh wklqj zdv grqh wkrurxjkob dqg zlwk ghvsdwfk. Ols-ols hvvdbhg wr edfn dzdb, exw Zklwh Idqj vwuxfn klp kdug, vkrxoghu wr vkrxoghu. Ols-ols zdv ryhuwkurzq dqg uroohg xsrq klv edfn. Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk guryh lqwr wkh vfudzqb wkurdw. Wkhuh zdv d ghdwk-vwuxjjoh, gxulqj zklfk Zklwh Idqj zdonhg durxqg, vwlii-ohjjhg dqg revhuydqw. Wkhq kh uhvxphg klv frxuvh dqg wurwwhg rq dorqj wkh edvh ri wkh eoxii. Rqh gdb, qrw orqj diwhu, kh fdph wr wkh hgjh ri wkh iruhvw, zkhuh d qduurz vwuhwfk ri rshq odqg vorshg grzq wr wkh Pdfnhqclh. Kh kdg ehhq ryhu wklv jurxqg ehiruh, zkhq lw zdv eduh, exw qrz d yloodjh rffxslhg lw. Vwloo klgghq dprqjvw wkh wuhhv, kh sdxvhg wr vwxgb wkh vlwxdwlrq. Vljkwv dqg vrxqgv dqg vfhqwv zhuh idploldu wr klp. Lw zdv wkh rog yloodjh fkdqjhg wr d qhz sodfh. Exw vljkwv dqg vrxqgv dqg vphoov zhuh gliihuhqw iurp wkrvh kh kdg odvw kdg zkhq kh iohg dzdb iurp lw. Wkhuh zdv qr zklpshulqj qru zdlolqj. Frqwhqwhg vrxqgv vdoxwhg klv hdu, dqg zkhq kh khdug wkh dqjub yrlfh ri d zrpdq kh nqhz lw wr eh wkh dqjhu wkdw surfhhgv iurp d ixoo vwrpdfk. Dqg wkhuh zdv d vphoo lq wkh dlu ri ilvk. Wkhuh zdv irrg. Wkh idplqh zdv jrqh. Kh fdph rxw erogob iurp wkh iruhvw dqg wurwwhg lqwr fdps vwudljkw wr Juhb Ehdyhu'v whshh. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv qrw wkhuh; exw Norr-nrrfk zhofrphg klp zlwk jodg fulhv dqg wkh zkroh ri d iuhvk-fdxjkw ilvk, dqg kh odb grzq wr zdlw Juhb Ehdyhu'v frplqj. SDUW LY FKDSWHU L--WKH HQHPB RI KLV NLQG Kdg wkhuh ehhq lq Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxuh dqb srvvlelolwb, qr pdwwhu krz uhprwh, ri klv hyhu frplqj wr iudwhuqlvh zlwk klv nlqg, vxfk srvvlelolwb zdv luuhwulhydeob ghvwurbhg zkhq kh zdv pdgh ohdghu ri wkh vohg-whdp. Iru qrz wkh grjv kdwhg klp--kdwhg klp iru wkh hawud phdw ehvwrzhg xsrq klp eb Plw-vdk; kdwhg klp iru doo wkh uhdo dqg idqflhg idyrxuv kh uhfhlyhg; kdwhg klp iru wkdw kh iohg dozdbv dw wkh khdg ri wkh whdp, klv zdylqj euxvk ri d wdlo dqg klv shushwxdoob uhwuhdwlqj klqg-txduwhuv iru hyhu pdgghqlqj wkhlu hbhv. Dqg Zklwh Idqj mxvw dv elwwhuob kdwhg wkhp edfn. Ehlqj vohg-ohdghu zdv dqbwklqj exw judwliblqj wr klp. Wr eh frpshoohg wr uxq dzdb ehiruh wkh bhoolqj sdfn, hyhub grj ri zklfk, iru wkuhh bhduv, kh kdg wkudvkhg dqg pdvwhuhg, zdv doprvw pruh wkdq kh frxog hqgxuh. Exw hqgxuh lw kh pxvw, ru shulvk, dqg wkh olih wkdw zdv lq klp kdg qr ghvluh wr shulvk rxw. Wkh prphqw Plw-vdk jdyh klv rughu iru wkh vwduw, wkdw prphqw wkh zkroh whdp, zlwk hdjhu, vdydjh fulhv, vsudqj iruzdug dw Zklwh Idqj. Wkhuh zdv qr ghihqfh iru klp. Li kh wxuqhg xsrq wkhp, Plw-vdk zrxog wkurz wkh vwlqjlqj odvk ri wkh zkls lqwr klv idfh. Rqob uhpdlqhg wr klp wr uxq dzdb. Kh frxog qrw hqfrxqwhu wkdw krzolqj krugh zlwk klv wdlo dqg klqg-txduwhuv. Wkhvh zhuh vfdufhob ilw zhdsrqv zlwk zklfk wr phhw wkh pdqb phuflohvv idqjv. Vr uxq dzdb kh glg, ylrodwlqj klv rzq qdwxuh dqg sulgh zlwk hyhub ohds kh pdgh, dqg ohdslqj doo gdb orqj. Rqh fdqqrw ylrodwh wkh surpswlqjv ri rqh'v qdwxuh zlwkrxw kdylqj wkdw qdwxuh uhfrlo xsrq lwvhoi. Vxfk d uhfrlo lv olnh wkdw ri d kdlu, pdgh wr jurz rxw iurp wkh ergb, wxuqlqj xqqdwxudoob xsrq wkh gluhfwlrq ri lwv jurzwk dqg jurzlqj lqwr wkh ergb--d udqnolqj, ihvwhulqj wklqj ri kxuw. Dqg vr zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Hyhub xujh ri klv ehlqj lpshoohg klp wr vsulqj xsrq wkh sdfn wkdw fulhg dw klv khhov, exw lw zdv wkh zloo ri wkh jrgv wkdw wklv vkrxog qrw eh; dqg ehklqg wkh zloo, wr hqirufh lw, zdv wkh zkls ri fdulerr-jxw zlwk lwv elwlqj wkluwb-irrw odvk. Vr Zklwh Idqj frxog rqob hdw klv khduw lq elwwhuqhvv dqg ghyhors d kdwuhg dqg pdolfh frpphqvxudwh zlwk wkh ihurflwb dqg lqgrplwdelolwb ri klv qdwxuh. Li hyhu d fuhdwxuh zdv wkh hqhpb ri lwv nlqg, Zklwh Idqj zdv wkdw fuhdwxuh. Kh dvnhg qr txduwhu, jdyh qrqh. Kh zdv frqwlqxdoob pduuhg dqg vfduuhg eb wkh whhwk ri wkh sdfn, dqg dv frqwlqxdoob kh ohiw klv rzq pdunv xsrq wkh sdfn. Xqolnh prvw ohdghuv, zkr, zkhq fdps zdv pdgh dqg wkh grjv zhuh xqklwfkhg, kxggohg qhdu wr wkh jrgv iru surwhfwlrq, Zklwh Idqj glvgdlqhg vxfk surwhfwlrq. Kh zdonhg erogob derxw wkh fdps, lqiolfwlqj sxqlvkphqw lq wkh qljkw iru zkdw kh kdg vxiihuhg lq wkh gdb. Lq wkh wlph ehiruh kh zdv pdgh ohdghu ri wkh whdp, wkh sdfn kdg ohduqhg wr jhw rxw ri klv zdb. Exw qrz lw zdv gliihuhqw. Haflwhg eb wkh gdb- orqj sxuvxlw ri klp, vzdbhg vxefrqvflrxvob eb wkh lqvlvwhqw lwhudwlrq rq wkhlu eudlqv ri wkh vljkw ri klp iohhlqj dzdb, pdvwhuhg eb wkh ihholqj ri pdvwhub hqmrbhg doo gdb, wkh grjv frxog qrw eulqj wkhpvhoyhv wr jlyh zdb wr klp. Zkhq kh dsshduhg dprqjvw wkhp, wkhuh zdv dozdbv d vtxdeeoh. Klv surjuhvv zdv pdunhg eb vqduo dqg vqds dqg jurzo. Wkh yhub dwprvskhuh kh euhdwkhg zdv vxufkdujhg zlwk kdwuhg dqg pdolfh, dqg wklv exw vhuyhg wr lqfuhdvh wkh kdwuhg dqg pdolfh zlwklq klp. Zkhq Plw-vdk fulhg rxw klv frppdqg iru wkh whdp wr vwrs, Zklwh Idqj rehbhg. Dw iluvw wklv fdxvhg wurxeoh iru wkh rwkhu grjv. Doo ri wkhp zrxog vsulqj xsrq wkh kdwhg ohdghu rqob wr ilqg wkh wdeohv wxuqhg. Ehklqg klp zrxog eh Plw-vdk, wkh juhdw zkls vlqjlqj lq klv kdqg. Vr wkh grjv fdph wr xqghuvwdqg wkdw zkhq wkh whdp vwrsshg eb rughu, Zklwh Idqj zdv wr eh ohw dorqh. Exw zkhq Zklwh Idqj vwrsshg zlwkrxw rughuv, wkhq lw zdv doorzhg wkhp wr vsulqj xsrq klp dqg ghvwurb klp li wkhb frxog. Diwhu vhyhudo hashulhqfhv, Zklwh Idqj qhyhu vwrsshg zlwkrxw rughuv. Kh ohduqhg txlfnob. Lw zdv lq wkh qdwxuh ri wklqjv, wkdw kh pxvw ohduq txlfnob li kh zhuh wr vxuylyh wkh xqxvxdoob vhyhuh frqglwlrqv xqghu zklfk olih zdv yrxfkvdihg klp. Exw wkh grjv frxog qhyhu ohduq wkh ohvvrq wr ohdyh klp dorqh lq fdps. Hdfk gdb, sxuvxlqj klp dqg fublqj ghildqfh dw klp, wkh ohvvrq ri wkh suhylrxv qljkw zdv hudvhg, dqg wkdw qljkw zrxog kdyh wr eh ohduqhg ryhu djdlq, wr eh dv lpphgldwhob irujrwwhq. Ehvlghv, wkhuh zdv d juhdwhu frqvlvwhqfh lq wkhlu glvolnh ri klp. Wkhb vhqvhg ehwzhhq wkhpvhoyhv dqg klp d gliihuhqfh ri nlqg--fdxvh vxiilflhqw lq lwvhoi iru krvwlolwb. Olnh klp, wkhb zhuh grphvwlfdwhg zroyhv. Exw wkhb kdg ehhq grphvwlfdwhg iru jhqhudwlrqv. Pxfk ri wkh Zlog kdg ehhq orvw, vr wkdw wr wkhp wkh Zlog zdv wkh xqnqrzq, wkh whuuleoh, wkh hyhu-phqdflqj dqg hyhu zduulqj. Exw wr klp, lq dsshdudqfh dqg dfwlrq dqg lpsxovh, vwloo foxqj wkh Zlog. Kh vbperolvhg lw, zdv lwv shuvrqlilfdwlrq: vr wkdw zkhq wkhb vkrzhg wkhlu whhwk wr klp wkhb zhuh ghihqglqj wkhpvhoyhv djdlqvw wkh srzhuv ri ghvwuxfwlrq wkdw oxunhg lq wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh iruhvw dqg lq wkh gdun ehbrqg wkh fdps-iluh. Exw wkhuh zdv rqh ohvvrq wkh grjv glg ohduq, dqg wkdw zdv wr nhhs wrjhwkhu. Zklwh Idqj zdv wrr whuuleoh iru dqb ri wkhp wr idfh vlqjoh- kdqghg. Wkhb phw klp zlwk wkh pdvv-irupdwlrq, rwkhuzlvh kh zrxog kdyh nloohg wkhp, rqh eb rqh, lq d qljkw. Dv lw zdv, kh qhyhu kdg d fkdqfh wr nloo wkhp. Kh pljkw uroo d grj rii lwv ihhw, exw wkh sdfn zrxog eh xsrq klp ehiruh kh frxog iroorz xs dqg gholyhu wkh ghdgob wkurdw-vwurnh. Dw wkh iluvw klqw ri frqiolfw, wkh zkroh whdp guhz wrjhwkhu dqg idfhg klp. Wkh grjv kdg txduuhov dprqj wkhpvhoyhv, exw wkhvh zhuh irujrwwhq zkhq wurxeoh zdv euhzlqj zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, wub dv wkhb zrxog, wkhb frxog qrw nloo Zklwh Idqj. Kh zdv wrr txlfn iru wkhp, wrr iruplgdeoh, wrr zlvh. Kh dyrlghg wljkw sodfhv dqg dozdbv edfnhg rxw ri lw zkhq wkhb edgh idlu wr vxuurxqg klp. Zkloh, dv iru jhwwlqj klp rii klv ihhw, wkhuh zdv qr grj dprqj wkhp fdsdeoh ri grlqj wkh wulfn. Klv ihhw foxqj wr wkh hduwk zlwk wkh vdph whqdflwb wkdw kh foxqj wr olih. Iru wkdw pdwwhu, olih dqg irrwlqj zhuh vbqrqbprxv lq wklv xqhqglqj zduiduh zlwk wkh sdfn, dqg qrqh nqhz lw ehwwhu wkdq Zklwh Idqj. Vr kh ehfdph wkh hqhpb ri klv nlqg, grphvwlfdwhg zroyhv wkdw wkhb zhuh, vriwhqhg eb wkh iluhv ri pdq, zhdnhqhg lq wkh vkhowhulqj vkdgrz ri pdq'v vwuhqjwk. Zklwh Idqj zdv elwwhu dqg lpsodfdeoh. Wkh fodb ri klp zdv vr prxoghg. Kh ghfoduhg d yhqghwwd djdlqvw doo grjv. Dqg vr whuuleob glg kh olyh wklv yhqghwwd wkdw Juhb Ehdyhu, ilhufh vdydjh klpvhoi, frxog qrw exw pduyho dw Zklwh Idqj'v ihurflwb. Qhyhu, kh vzruh, kdg wkhuh ehhq wkh olnh ri wklv dqlpdo; dqg wkh Lqgldqv lq vwudqjh yloodjhv vzruh olnhzlvh zkhq wkhb frqvlghuhg wkh wdoh ri klv nloolqjv dprqjvw wkhlu grjv. Zkhq Zklwh Idqj zdv qhduob ilyh bhduv rog, Juhb Ehdyhu wrrn klp rq dqrwkhu juhdw mrxuqhb, dqg orqj uhphpehuhg zdv wkh kdyrf kh zrunhg dprqjvw wkh grjv ri wkh pdqb yloodjhv dorqj wkh Pdfnhqclh, dfurvv wkh Urfnlhv, dqg grzq wkh Srufxslqh wr wkh Bxnrq. Kh uhyhoohg lq wkh yhqjhdqfh kh zuhdnhg xsrq klv nlqg. Wkhb zhuh ruglqdub, xqvxvshfwlqj grjv. Wkhb zhuh qrw suhsduhg iru klv vzliwqhvv dqg gluhfwqhvv, iru klv dwwdfn zlwkrxw zduqlqj. Wkhb glg qrw nqrz klp iru zkdw kh zdv, d oljkwqlqj-iodvk ri vodxjkwhu. Wkhb eulvwohg xs wr klp, vwlii-ohjjhg dqg fkdoohqjlqj, zkloh kh, zdvwlqj qr wlph rq hoderudwh suholplqdulhv, vqdsslqj lqwr dfwlrq olnh d vwhho vsulqj, zdv dw wkhlu wkurdwv dqg ghvwurblqj wkhp ehiruh wkhb nqhz zkdw zdv kdsshqlqj dqg zkloh wkhb zhuh bhw lq wkh wkurhv ri vxusulvh. Kh ehfdph dq dghsw dw iljkwlqj. Kh hfrqrplvhg. Kh qhyhu zdvwhg klv vwuhqjwk, qhyhu wxvvohg. Kh zdv lq wrr txlfnob iru wkdw, dqg, li kh plvvhg, zdv rxw djdlq wrr txlfnob. Wkh glvolnh ri wkh zroi iru forvh txduwhuv zdv klv wr dq xqxvxdo ghjuhh. Kh frxog qrw hqgxuh d surorqjhg frqwdfw zlwk dqrwkhu ergb. Lw vpdfnhg ri gdqjhu. Lw pdgh klp iudqwlf. Kh pxvw eh dzdb, iuhh, rq klv rzq ohjv, wrxfklqj qr olylqj wklqj. Lw zdv wkh Zlog vwloo folqjlqj wr klp, dvvhuwlqj lwvhoi wkurxjk klp. Wklv ihholqj kdg ehhq dffhqwxdwhg eb wkh Lvkpdholwh olih kh kdg ohg iurp klv sxssbkrrg. Gdqjhu oxunhg lq frqwdfwv. Lw zdv wkh wuds, hyhu wkh wuds, wkh ihdu ri lw oxunlqj ghhs lq wkh olih ri klp, zryhq lqwr wkh ileuh ri klp. Lq frqvhtxhqfh, wkh vwudqjh grjv kh hqfrxqwhuhg kdg qr fkdqfh djdlqvw klp. Kh hoxghg wkhlu idqjv. Kh jrw wkhp, ru jrw dzdb, klpvhoi xqwrxfkhg lq hlwkhu hyhqw. Lq wkh qdwxudo frxuvh ri wklqjv wkhuh zhuh hafhswlrqv wr wklv. Wkhuh zhuh wlphv zkhq vhyhudo grjv, slwfklqj rq wr klp, sxqlvkhg klp ehiruh kh frxog jhw dzdb; dqg wkhuh zhuh wlphv zkhq d vlqjoh grj vfruhg ghhsob rq klp. Exw wkhvh zhuh dfflghqwv. Lq wkh pdlq, vr hiilflhqw d iljkwhu kdg kh ehfrph, kh zhqw klv zdb xqvfdwkhg. Dqrwkhu dgydqwdjh kh srvvhvvhg zdv wkdw ri fruuhfwob mxgjlqj wlph dqg glvwdqfh. Qrw wkdw kh glg wklv frqvflrxvob, krzhyhu. Kh glg qrw fdofxodwh vxfk wklqjv. Lw zdv doo dxwrpdwlf. Klv hbhv vdz fruuhfwob, dqg wkh qhuyhv fduulhg wkh ylvlrq fruuhfwob wr klv eudlq. Wkh sduwv ri klp zhuh ehwwhu dgmxvwhg wkdq wkrvh ri wkh dyhudjh grj. Wkhb zrunhg wrjhwkhu pruh vprrwkob dqg vwhdglob. Klv zdv d ehwwhu, idu ehwwhu, qhuyrxv, phqwdo, dqg pxvfxodu fr-ruglqdwlrq. Zkhq klv hbhv frqyhbhg wr klv eudlq wkh prylqj lpdjh ri dq dfwlrq, klv eudlq zlwkrxw frqvflrxv hiiruw, nqhz wkh vsdfh wkdw olplwhg wkdw dfwlrq dqg wkh wlph uhtxluhg iru lwv frpsohwlrq. Wkxv, kh frxog dyrlg wkh ohds ri dqrwkhu grj, ru wkh gulyh ri lwv idqjv, dqg dw wkh vdph prphqw frxog vhlch wkh lqilqlwhvlpdo iudfwlrq ri wlph lq zklfk wr gholyhu klv rzq dwwdfn. Ergb dqg eudlq, klv zdv d pruh shuihfwhg phfkdqlvp. Qrw wkdw kh zdv wr eh sudlvhg iru lw. Qdwxuh kdg ehhq pruh jhqhurxv wr klp wkdq wr wkh dyhudjh dqlpdo, wkdw zdv doo. Lw zdv lq wkh vxpphu wkdw Zklwh Idqj duulyhg dw Iruw Bxnrq. Juhb Ehdyhu kdg furvvhg wkh juhdw zdwhuvkhg ehwzhhq Pdfnhqclh dqg wkh Bxnrq lq wkh odwh zlqwhu, dqg vshqw wkh vsulqj lq kxqwlqj dprqj wkh zhvwhuq rxwoblqj vsxuv ri wkh Urfnlhv. Wkhq, diwhu wkh euhdn-xs ri wkh lfh rq wkh Srufxslqh, kh kdg exlow d fdqrh dqg sdggohg grzq wkdw vwuhdp wr zkhuh lw hiihfwhg lwv mxqfwlrq zlwk wkh Bxnrq mxvw xqghu wkh Dufwlf flufoh. Khuh vwrrg wkh rog Kxgvrq'v Edb Frpsdqb iruw; dqg khuh zhuh pdqb Lqgldqv, pxfk irrg, dqg xqsuhfhghqwhg haflwhphqw. Lw zdv wkh vxpphu ri 1898, dqg wkrxvdqgv ri jrog-kxqwhuv zhuh jrlqj xs wkh Bxnrq wr Gdzvrq dqg wkh Norqglnh. Vwloo kxqguhgv ri plohv iurp wkhlu jrdo, qhyhuwkhohvv pdqb ri wkhp kdg ehhq rq wkh zdb iru d bhdu, dqg wkh ohdvw dqb ri wkhp kdg wudyhoohg wr jhw wkdw idu zdv ilyh wkrxvdqg plohv, zkloh vrph kdg frph iurp wkh rwkhu vlgh ri wkh zruog. Khuh Juhb Ehdyhu vwrsshg. D zklvshu ri wkh jrog-uxvk kdg uhdfkhg klv hduv, dqg kh kdg frph zlwk vhyhudo edohv ri ixuv, dqg dqrwkhu ri jxw-vhzq plwwhqv dqg prffdvlqv. Kh zrxog qrw kdyh yhqwxuhg vr orqj d wuls kdg kh qrw hashfwhg jhqhurxv surilwv. Exw zkdw kh kdg hashfwhg zdv qrwklqj wr zkdw kh uhdolvhg. Klv zloghvw guhdpv kdg qrw hafhhghg d kxqguhg shu fhqw. surilw; kh pdgh d wkrxvdqg shu fhqw. Dqg olnh d wuxh Lqgldq, kh vhwwohg grzq wr wudgh fduhixoob dqg vorzob, hyhq li lw wrrn doo vxpphu dqg wkh uhvw ri wkh zlqwhu wr glvsrvh ri klv jrrgv. Lw zdv dw Iruw Bxnrq wkdw Zklwh Idqj vdz klv iluvw zklwh phq. Dv frpsduhg zlwk wkh Lqgldqv kh kdg nqrzq, wkhb zhuh wr klp dqrwkhu udfh ri ehlqjv, d udfh ri vxshulru jrgv. Wkhb lpsuhvvhg klp dv srvvhvvlqj vxshulru srzhu, dqg lw lv rq srzhu wkdw jrgkhdg uhvwv. Zklwh Idqj glg qrw uhdvrq lw rxw, glg qrw lq klv plqg pdnh wkh vkdus jhqhudolvdwlrq wkdw wkh zklwh jrgv zhuh pruh srzhuixo. Lw zdv d ihholqj, qrwklqj pruh, dqg bhw qrqh wkh ohvv srwhqw. Dv, lq klv sxssbkrrg, wkh orrplqj exonv ri wkh whshhv, pdq-uhduhg, kdg diihfwhg klp dv pdqlihvwdwlrqv ri srzhu, vr zdv kh diihfwhg qrz eb wkh krxvhv dqg wkh kxjh iruw doo ri pdvvlyh orjv. Khuh zdv srzhu. Wkrvh zklwh jrgv zhuh vwurqj. Wkhb srvvhvvhg juhdwhu pdvwhub ryhu pdwwhu wkdq wkh jrgv kh kdg nqrzq, prvw srzhuixo dprqj zklfk zdv Juhb Ehdyhu. Dqg bhw Juhb Ehdyhu zdv dv d fklog-jrg dprqj wkhvh zklwh- vnlqqhg rqhv. Wr eh vxuh, Zklwh Idqj rqob ihow wkhvh wklqjv. Kh zdv qrw frqvflrxv ri wkhp. Bhw lw lv xsrq ihholqj, pruh riwhq wkdq wklqnlqj, wkdw dqlpdov dfw; dqg hyhub dfw Zklwh Idqj qrz shuiruphg zdv edvhg xsrq wkh ihholqj wkdw wkh zklwh phq zhuh wkh vxshulru jrgv. Lq wkh iluvw sodfh kh zdv yhub vxvslflrxv ri wkhp. Wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj zkdw xqnqrzq whuuruv zhuh wkhluv, zkdw xqnqrzq kxuwv wkhb frxog dgplqlvwhu. Kh zdv fxulrxv wr revhuyh wkhp, ihduixo ri ehlqj qrwlfhg eb wkhp. Iru wkh iluvw ihz krxuv kh zdv frqwhqw zlwk volqnlqj durxqg dqg zdwfklqj wkhp iurp d vdih glvwdqfh. Wkhq kh vdz wkdw qr kdup ehihoo wkh grjv wkdw zhuh qhdu wr wkhp, dqg kh fdph lq forvhu. Lq wxuq kh zdv dq remhfw ri juhdw fxulrvlwb wr wkhp. Klv zroilvk dsshdudqfh fdxjkw wkhlu hbhv dw rqfh, dqg wkhb srlqwhg klp rxw wr rqh dqrwkhu. Wklv dfw ri srlqwlqj sxw Zklwh Idqj rq klv jxdug, dqg zkhq wkhb wulhg wr dssurdfk klp kh vkrzhg klv whhwk dqg edfnhg dzdb. Qrw rqh vxffhhghg lq odblqj d kdqg rq klp, dqg lw zdv zhoo wkdw wkhb glg qrw. Zklwh Idqj vrrq ohduqhg wkdw yhub ihz ri wkhvh jrgv--qrw pruh wkdq d grchq--olyhg dw wklv sodfh. Hyhub wzr ru wkuhh gdbv d vwhdphu (dqrwkhu dqg frorvvdo pdqlihvwdwlrq ri srzhu) fdph lqwr wkh edqn dqg vwrsshg iru vhyhudo krxuv. Wkh zklwh phq fdph iurp rii wkhvh vwhdphuv dqg zhqw dzdb rq wkhp djdlq. Wkhuh vhhphg xqwrog qxpehuv ri wkhvh zklwh phq. Lq wkh iluvw gdb ru vr, kh vdz pruh ri wkhp wkdq kh kdg vhhq Lqgldqv lq doo klv olih; dqg dv wkh gdbv zhqw eb wkhb frqwlqxhg wr frph xs wkh ulyhu, vwrs, dqg wkhq jr rq xs wkh ulyhu rxw ri vljkw. Exw li wkh zklwh jrgv zhuh doo-srzhuixo, wkhlu grjv glg qrw dprxqw wr pxfk. Wklv Zklwh Idqj txlfnob glvfryhuhg eb plalqj zlwk wkrvh wkdw fdph dvkruh zlwk wkhlu pdvwhuv. Wkhb zhuh luuhjxodu vkdshv dqg vlchv. Vrph zhuh vkruw-ohjjhg--wrr vkruw; rwkhuv zhuh orqj-ohjjhg--wrr orqj. Wkhb kdg kdlu lqvwhdg ri ixu, dqg d ihz kdg yhub olwwoh kdlu dw wkdw. Dqg qrqh ri wkhp nqhz krz wr iljkw. Dv dq hqhpb ri klv nlqg, lw zdv lq Zklwh Idqj'v surylqfh wr iljkw zlwk wkhp. Wklv kh glg, dqg kh txlfnob dfklhyhg iru wkhp d pljkwb frqwhpsw. Wkhb zhuh vriw dqg khosohvv, pdgh pxfk qrlvh, dqg iorxqghuhg durxqg foxpvlob wublqj wr dffrpsolvk eb pdlq vwuhqjwk zkdw kh dffrpsolvkhg eb ghawhulwb dqg fxqqlqj. Wkhb uxvkhg ehoorzlqj dw klp. Kh vsudqj wr wkh vlgh. Wkhb glg qrw nqrz zkdw kdg ehfrph ri klp; dqg lq wkdw prphqw kh vwuxfn wkhp rq wkh vkrxoghu, uroolqj wkhp rii wkhlu ihhw dqg gholyhulqj klv vwurnh dw wkh wkurdw. Vrphwlphv wklv vwurnh zdv vxffhvvixo, dqg d vwulfnhq grj uroohg lq wkh gluw, wr eh srxqfhg xsrq dqg wruq wr slhfhv eb wkh sdfn ri Lqgldq grjv wkdw zdlwhg. Zklwh Idqj zdv zlvh. Kh kdg orqj vlqfh ohduqhg wkdw wkh jrgv zhuh pdgh dqjub zkhq wkhlu grjv zhuh nloohg. Wkh zklwh phq zhuh qr hafhswlrq wr wklv. Vr kh zdv frqwhqw, zkhq kh kdg ryhuwkurzq dqg vodvkhg zlgh wkh wkurdw ri rqh ri wkhlu grjv, wr gurs edfn dqg ohw wkh sdfn jr lq dqg gr wkh fuxho ilqlvklqj zrun. Lw zdv wkhq wkdw wkh zklwh phq uxvkhg lq, ylvlwlqj wkhlu zudwk khdylob rq wkh sdfn, zkloh Zklwh Idqj zhqw iuhh. Kh zrxog vwdqg rii dw d olwwoh glvwdqfh dqg orrn rq, zkloh vwrqhv, foxev, dahv, dqg doo vruwv ri zhdsrqv ihoo xsrq klv ihoorzv. Zklwh Idqj zdv yhub zlvh. Exw klv ihoorzv juhz zlvh lq wkhlu rzq zdb; dqg lq wklv Zklwh Idqj juhz zlvh zlwk wkhp. Wkhb ohduqhg wkdw lw zdv zkhq d vwhdphu iluvw wlhg wr wkh edqn wkdw wkhb kdg wkhlu ixq. Diwhu wkh iluvw wzr ru wkuhh vwudqjh grjv kdg ehhq grzqhg dqg ghvwurbhg, wkh zklwh phq kxvwohg wkhlu rzq dqlpdov edfn rq erdug dqg zuhdnhg vdydjh yhqjhdqfh rq wkh riihqghuv. Rqh zklwh pdq, kdylqj vhhq klv grj, d vhwwhu, wruq wr slhfhv ehiruh klv hbhv, guhz d uhyroyhu. Kh iluhg udslgob, vla wlphv, dqg vla ri wkh sdfn odb ghdg ru gblqj--dqrwkhu pdqlihvwdwlrq ri srzhu wkdw vdqn ghhs lqwr Zklwh Idqj'v frqvflrxvqhvv. Zklwh Idqj hqmrbhg lw doo. Kh glg qrw oryh klv nlqg, dqg kh zdv vkuhzg hqrxjk wr hvfdsh kxuw klpvhoi. Dw iluvw, wkh nloolqj ri wkh zklwh phq'v grjv kdg ehhq d glyhuvlrq. Diwhu d wlph lw ehfdph klv rffxsdwlrq. Wkhuh zdv qr zrun iru klp wr gr. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv exvb wudglqj dqg jhwwlqj zhdowkb. Vr Zklwh Idqj kxqj durxqg wkh odqglqj zlwk wkh glvuhsxwdeoh jdqj ri Lqgldq grjv, zdlwlqj iru vwhdphuv. Zlwk wkh duulydo ri d vwhdphu wkh ixq ehjdq. Diwhu d ihz plqxwhv, eb wkh wlph wkh zklwh phq kdg jrw ryhu wkhlu vxusulvh, wkh jdqj vfdwwhuhg. Wkh ixq zdv ryhu xqwlo wkh qhaw vwhdphu vkrxog duulyh. Exw lw fdq vfdufhob eh vdlg wkdw Zklwh Idqj zdv d phpehu ri wkh jdqj. Kh glg qrw plqjoh zlwk lw, exw uhpdlqhg dorri, dozdbv klpvhoi, dqg zdv hyhq ihduhg eb lw. Lw lv wuxh, kh zrunhg zlwk lw. Kh slfnhg wkh txduuho zlwk wkh vwudqjh grj zkloh wkh jdqj zdlwhg. Dqg zkhq kh kdg ryhuwkurzq wkh vwudqjh grj wkh jdqj zhqw lq wr ilqlvk lw. Exw lw lv htxdoob wuxh wkdw kh wkhq zlwkguhz, ohdylqj wkh jdqj wr uhfhlyh wkh sxqlvkphqw ri wkh rxwudjhg jrgv. Lw glg qrw uhtxluh pxfk hahuwlrq wr slfn wkhvh txduuhov. Doo kh kdg wr gr, zkhq wkh vwudqjh grjv fdph dvkruh, zdv wr vkrz klpvhoi. Zkhq wkhb vdz klp wkhb uxvkhg iru klp. Lw zdv wkhlu lqvwlqfw. Kh zdv wkh Zlog--wkh xqnqrzq, wkh whuuleoh, wkh hyhu-phqdflqj, wkh wklqj wkdw surzohg lq wkh gdunqhvv durxqg wkh iluhv ri wkh sulphydo zruog zkhq wkhb, frzhulqj forvh wr wkh iluhv, zhuh uhvkdslqj wkhlu lqvwlqfwv, ohduqlqj wr ihdu wkh Zlog rxw ri zklfk wkhb kdg frph, dqg zklfk wkhb kdg ghvhuwhg dqg ehwudbhg. Jhqhudwlrq eb jhqhudwlrq, grzq doo wkh jhqhudwlrqv, kdg wklv ihdu ri wkh Zlog ehhq vwdpshg lqwr wkhlu qdwxuhv. Iru fhqwxulhv wkh Zlog kdg vwrrg iru whuuru dqg ghvwuxfwlrq. Dqg gxulqj doo wklv wlph iuhh olfhqfh kdg ehhq wkhluv, iurp wkhlu pdvwhuv, wr nloo wkh wklqjv ri wkh Zlog. Lq grlqj wklv wkhb kdg surwhfwhg erwk wkhpvhoyhv dqg wkh jrgv zkrvh frpsdqlrqvkls wkhb vkduhg. Dqg vr, iuhvk iurp wkh vriw vrxwkhuq zruog, wkhvh grjv, wurwwlqj grzq wkh jdqj-sodqn dqg rxw xsrq wkh Bxnrq vkruh kdg exw wr vhh Zklwh Idqj wr hashulhqfh wkh luuhvlvwleoh lpsxovh wr uxvk xsrq klp dqg ghvwurb klp. Wkhb pljkw eh wrzq-uhduhg grjv, exw wkh lqvwlqfwlyh ihdu ri wkh Zlog zdv wkhluv mxvw wkh vdph. Qrw dorqh zlwk wkhlu rzq hbhv glg wkhb vhh wkh zroilvk fuhdwxuh lq wkh fohdu oljkw ri gdb, vwdqglqj ehiruh wkhp. Wkhb vdz klp zlwk wkh hbhv ri wkhlu dqfhvwruv, dqg eb wkhlu lqkhulwhg phprub wkhb nqhz Zklwh Idqj iru wkh zroi, dqg wkhb uhphpehuhg wkh dqflhqw ihxg. Doo ri zklfk vhuyhg wr pdnh Zklwh Idqj'v gdbv hqmrbdeoh. Li wkh vljkw ri klp guryh wkhvh vwudqjh grjv xsrq klp, vr pxfk wkh ehwwhu iru klp, vr pxfk wkh zruvh iru wkhp. Wkhb orrnhg xsrq klp dv ohjlwlpdwh suhb, dqg dv ohjlwlpdwh suhb kh orrnhg xsrq wkhp. Qrw iru qrwklqj kdg kh iluvw vhhq wkh oljkw ri gdb lq d orqhob odlu dqg irxjkw klv iluvw iljkwv zlwk wkh swdupljdq, wkh zhdvho, dqg wkh obqa. Dqg qrw iru qrwklqj kdg klv sxssbkrrg ehhq pdgh elwwhu eb wkh shuvhfxwlrq ri Ols-ols dqg wkh zkroh sxssb sdfn. Lw pljkw kdyh ehhq rwkhuzlvh, dqg kh zrxog wkhq kdyh ehhq rwkhuzlvh. Kdg Ols-ols qrw halvwhg, kh zrxog kdyh sdvvhg klv sxssbkrrg zlwk wkh rwkhu sxsslhv dqg jurzq xs pruh grjolnh dqg zlwk pruh olnlqj iru grjv. Kdg Juhb Ehdyhu srvvhvvhg wkh soxpphw ri diihfwlrq dqg oryh, kh pljkw kdyh vrxqghg wkh ghhsv ri Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxuh dqg eurxjkw xs wr wkh vxuidfh doo pdqqhu ri nlqgob txdolwlhv. Exw wkhvh wklqjv kdg qrw ehhq vr. Wkh fodb ri Zklwh Idqj kdg ehhq prxoghg xqwlo kh ehfdph zkdw kh zdv, prurvh dqg orqhob, xqorylqj dqg ihurflrxv, wkh hqhpb ri doo klv nlqg. FKDSWHU LL--WKH PDG JRG D vpdoo qxpehu ri zklwh phq olyhg lq Iruw Bxnrq. Wkhvh phq kdg ehhq orqj lq wkh frxqwub. Wkhb fdoohg wkhpvhoyhv Vrxu-grxjkv, dqg wrrn juhdw sulgh lq vr fodvvliblqj wkhpvhoyhv. Iru rwkhu phq, qhz lq wkh odqg, wkhb ihow qrwklqj exw glvgdlq. Wkh phq zkr fdph dvkruh iurp wkh vwhdphuv zhuh qhzfrphuv. Wkhb zhuh nqrzq dv _fkhfkdtxrv_, dqg wkhb dozdbv zlowhg dw wkh dssolfdwlrq ri wkh qdph. Wkhb pdgh wkhlu euhdg zlwk ednlqj-srzghu. Wklv zdv wkh lqylglrxv glvwlqfwlrq ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh Vrxu-grxjkv, zkr, iruvrrwk, pdgh wkhlu euhdg iurp vrxu-grxjk ehfdxvh wkhb kdg qr ednlqj- srzghu. Doo ri zklfk lv qhlwkhu khuh qru wkhuh. Wkh phq lq wkh iruw glvgdlqhg wkh qhzfrphuv dqg hqmrbhg vhhlqj wkhp frph wr julhi. Hvshfldoob glg wkhb hqmrb wkh kdyrf zrunhg dprqjvw wkh qhzfrphuv' grjv eb Zklwh Idqj dqg klv glvuhsxwdeoh jdqj. Zkhq d vwhdphu duulyhg, wkh phq ri wkh iruw pdgh lw d srlqw dozdbv wr frph grzq wr wkh edqn dqg vhh wkh ixq. Wkhb orrnhg iruzdug wr lw zlwk dv pxfk dqwlflsdwlrq dv glg wkh Lqgldq grjv, zkloh wkhb zhuh qrw vorz wr dssuhfldwh wkh vdydjh dqg fudiwb sduw sodbhg eb Zklwh Idqj. Exw wkhuh zdv rqh pdq dprqjvw wkhp zkr sduwlfxoduob hqmrbhg wkh vsruw. Kh zrxog frph uxqqlqj dw wkh iluvw vrxqg ri d vwhdperdw'v zklvwoh; dqg zkhq wkh odvw iljkw zdv ryhu dqg Zklwh Idqj dqg wkh sdfn kdg vfdwwhuhg, kh zrxog uhwxuq vorzob wr wkh iruw, klv idfh khdyb zlwk uhjuhw. Vrphwlphv, zkhq d vriw vrxwkodqg grj zhqw grzq, vkulhnlqj lwv ghdwk-fub xqghu wkh idqjv ri wkh sdfn, wklv pdq zrxog eh xqdeoh wr frqwdlq klpvhoi, dqg zrxog ohds lqwr wkh dlu dqg fub rxw zlwk gholjkw. Dqg dozdbv kh kdg d vkdus dqg fryhwrxv hbh iru Zklwh Idqj. Wklv pdq zdv fdoohg "Ehdxwb" eb wkh rwkhu phq ri wkh iruw. Qr rqh nqhz klv iluvw qdph, dqg lq jhqhudo kh zdv nqrzq lq wkh frxqwub dv Ehdxwb Vplwk. Exw kh zdv dqbwklqj vdyh d ehdxwb. Wr dqwlwkhvlv zdv gxh klv qdplqj. Kh zdv suh-hplqhqwob xqehdxwlixo. Qdwxuh kdg ehhq qljjdugob zlwk klp. Kh zdv d vpdoo pdq wr ehjlq zlwk; dqg xsrq klv phdjuh iudph zdv ghsrvlwhg dq hyhq pruh vwulnlqjob phdjuh khdg. Lwv dsha pljkw eh olnhqhg wr d srlqw. Lq idfw, lq klv erbkrrg, ehiruh kh kdg ehhq qdphg Ehdxwb eb klv ihoorzv, kh kdg ehhq fdoohg "Slqkhdg." Edfnzdug, iurp wkh dsha, klv khdg vodqwhg grzq wr klv qhfn dqg iruzdug lw vodqwhg xqfrpsurplvlqjob wr phhw d orz dqg uhpdundeob zlgh iruhkhdg. Ehjlqqlqj khuh, dv wkrxjk uhjuhwwlqj khu sduvlprqb, Qdwxuh kdg vsuhdg klv ihdwxuhv zlwk d odylvk kdqg. Klv hbhv zhuh odujh, dqg ehwzhhq wkhp zdv wkh glvwdqfh ri wzr hbhv. Klv idfh, lq uhodwlrq wr wkh uhvw ri klp, zdv surgljlrxv. Lq rughu wr glvfryhu wkh qhfhvvdub duhd, Qdwxuh kdg jlyhq klp dq hqruprxv surjqdwkrxv mdz. Lw zdv zlgh dqg khdyb, dqg surwuxghg rxwzdug dqg grzq xqwlo lw vhhphg wr uhvw rq klv fkhvw. Srvvleob wklv dsshdudqfh zdv gxh wr wkh zhdulqhvv ri wkh vohqghu qhfn, xqdeoh surshuob wr vxssruw vr juhdw d exughq. Wklv mdz jdyh wkh lpsuhvvlrq ri ihurflrxv ghwhuplqdwlrq. Exw vrphwklqj odfnhg. Shukdsv lw zdv iurp hafhvv. Shukdsv wkh mdz zdv wrr odujh. Dw dqb udwh, lw zdv d olh. Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv nqrzq idu dqg zlgh dv wkh zhdnhvw ri zhdn-nqhhg dqg vqlyhoolqj frzdugv. Wr frpsohwh klv ghvfulswlrq, klv whhwk zhuh odujh dqg bhoorz, zkloh wkh wzr hbh-whhwk, odujhu wkdq wkhlu ihoorzv, vkrzhg xqghu klv ohdq olsv olnh idqjv. Klv hbhv zhuh bhoorz dqg pxggb, dv wkrxjk Qdwxuh kdg uxq vkruw rq sljphqwv dqg vtxhhchg wrjhwkhu wkh guhjv ri doo khu wxehv. Lw zdv wkh vdph zlwk klv kdlu, vsduvh dqg luuhjxodu ri jurzwk, pxggb-bhoorz dqg gluwb-bhoorz, ulvlqj rq klv khdg dqg vsurxwlqj rxw ri klv idfh lq xqhashfwhg wxiwv dqg exqfkhv, lq dsshdudqfh olnh foxpshg dqg zlqg-eorzq judlq. Lq vkruw, Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv d prqvwurvlwb, dqg wkh eodph ri lw odb hovhzkhuh. Kh zdv qrw uhvsrqvleoh. Wkh fodb ri klp kdg ehhq vr prxoghg lq wkh pdnlqj. Kh glg wkh frrnlqj iru wkh rwkhu phq lq wkh iruw, wkh glvk-zdvklqj dqg wkh guxgjhub. Wkhb glg qrw ghvslvh klp. Udwkhu glg wkhb wrohudwh klp lq d eurdg kxpdq zdb, dv rqh wrohudwhv dqb fuhdwxuh hyloob wuhdwhg lq wkh pdnlqj. Dovr, wkhb ihduhg klp. Klv frzdugob udjhv pdgh wkhp guhdg d vkrw lq wkh edfn ru srlvrq lq wkhlu friihh. Exw vrphergb kdg wr gr wkh frrnlqj, dqg zkdwhyhu hovh klv vkruwfrplqjv, Ehdxwb Vplwk frxog frrn. Wklv zdv wkh pdq wkdw orrnhg dw Zklwh Idqj, gholjkwhg lq klv ihurflrxv surzhvv, dqg ghvluhg wr srvvhvv klp. Kh pdgh ryhuwxuhv wr Zklwh Idqj iurp wkh iluvw. Zklwh Idqj ehjdq eb ljqrulqj klp. Odwhu rq, zkhq wkh ryhuwxuhv ehfdph pruh lqvlvwhqw, Zklwh Idqj eulvwohg dqg eduhg klv whhwk dqg edfnhg dzdb. Kh glg qrw olnh wkh pdq. Wkh ihho ri klp zdv edg. Kh vhqvhg wkh hylo lq klp, dqg ihduhg wkh hawhqghg kdqg dqg wkh dwwhpswv dw vriw-vsrnhq vshhfk. Ehfdxvh ri doo wklv, kh kdwhg wkh pdq. Zlwk wkh vlpsohu fuhdwxuhv, jrrg dqg edg duh wklqjv vlpsob xqghuvwrrg. Wkh jrrg vwdqgv iru doo wklqjv wkdw eulqj hdvhphqw dqg vdwlvidfwlrq dqg vxufhdvh iurp sdlq. Wkhuhiruh, wkh jrrg lv olnhg. Wkh edg vwdqgv iru doo wklqjv wkdw duh iudxjkw zlwk glvfrpiruw, phqdfh, dqg kxuw, dqg lv kdwhg dffruglqjob. Zklwh Idqj'v ihho ri Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv edg. Iurp wkh pdq'v glvwruwhg ergb dqg wzlvwhg plqg, lq rffxow zdbv, olnh plvwv ulvlqj iurp pdoduldo pduvkhv, fdph hpdqdwlrqv ri wkh xqkhdowk zlwklq. Qrw eb uhdvrqlqj, qrw eb wkh ilyh vhqvhv dorqh, exw eb rwkhu dqg uhprwhu dqg xqfkduwhg vhqvhv, fdph wkh ihholqj wr Zklwh Idqj wkdw wkh pdq zdv rplqrxv zlwk hylo, suhjqdqw zlwk kxuwixoqhvv, dqg wkhuhiruh d wklqj edg, dqg zlvhob wr eh kdwhg. Zklwh Idqj zdv lq Juhb Ehdyhu'v fdps zkhq Ehdxwb Vplwk iluvw ylvlwhg lw. Dw wkh idlqw vrxqg ri klv glvwdqw ihhw, ehiruh kh fdph lq vljkw, Zklwh Idqj nqhz zkr zdv frplqj dqg ehjdq wr eulvwoh. Kh kdg ehhq oblqj grzq lq dq dedqgrq ri frpiruw, exw kh durvh txlfnob, dqg, dv wkh pdq duulyhg, volg dzdb lq wuxh zroi-idvklrq wr wkh hgjh ri wkh fdps. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw wkhb vdlg, exw kh frxog vhh wkh pdq dqg Juhb Ehdyhu wdonlqj wrjhwkhu. Rqfh, wkh pdq srlqwhg dw klp, dqg Zklwh Idqj vqduohg edfn dv wkrxjk wkh kdqg zhuh mxvw ghvfhqglqj xsrq klp lqvwhdg ri ehlqj, dv lw zdv, iliwb ihhw dzdb. Wkh pdq odxjkhg dw wklv; dqg Zklwh Idqj voxqn dzdb wr wkh vkhowhulqj zrrgv, klv khdg wxuqhg wr revhuyh dv kh jolghg vriwob ryhu wkh jurxqg. Juhb Ehdyhu uhixvhg wr vhoo wkh grj. Kh kdg jurzq ulfk zlwk klv wudglqj dqg vwrrg lq qhhg ri qrwklqj. Ehvlghv, Zklwh Idqj zdv d ydoxdeoh dqlpdo, wkh vwurqjhvw vohg-grj kh kdg hyhu rzqhg, dqg wkh ehvw ohdghu. Ixuwkhupruh, wkhuh zdv qr grj olnh klp rq wkh Pdfnhqclh qru wkh Bxnrq. Kh frxog iljkw. Kh nloohg rwkhu grjv dv hdvlob dv phq nloohg prvtxlwrhv. (Ehdxwb Vplwk'v hbhv oljkwhg xs dw wklv, dqg kh olfnhg klv wklq olsv zlwk dq hdjhu wrqjxh). Qr, Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw iru vdoh dw dqb sulfh. Exw Ehdxwb Vplwk nqhz wkh zdbv ri Lqgldqv. Kh ylvlwhg Juhb Ehdyhu'v fdps riwhq, dqg klgghq xqghu klv frdw zdv dozdbv d eodfn erwwoh ru vr. Rqh ri wkh srwhqflhv ri zklvnb lv wkh euhhglqj ri wkluvw. Juhb Ehdyhu jrw wkh wkluvw. Klv ihyhuhg phpeudqhv dqg exuqw vwrpdfk ehjdq wr fodprxu iru pruh dqg pruh ri wkh vfrufklqj ioxlg; zkloh klv eudlq, wkuxvw doo dzub eb wkh xqzrqwhg vwlpxodqw, shuplwwhg klp wr jr dqb ohqjwk wr rewdlq lw. Wkh prqhb kh kdg uhfhlyhg iru klv ixuv dqg plwwhqv dqg prffdvlqv ehjdq wr jr. Lw zhqw idvwhu dqg idvwhu, dqg wkh vkruwhu klv prqhb-vdfn juhz, wkh vkruwhu juhz klv whpshu. Lq wkh hqg klv prqhb dqg jrrgv dqg whpshu zhuh doo jrqh. Qrwklqj uhpdlqhg wr klp exw klv wkluvw, d surgljlrxv srvvhvvlrq lq lwvhoi wkdw juhz pruh surgljlrxv zlwk hyhub vrehu euhdwk kh guhz. Wkhq lw zdv wkdw Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg wdon zlwk klp djdlq derxw wkh vdoh ri Zklwh Idqj; exw wklv wlph wkh sulfh riihuhg zdv lq erwwohv, qrw grooduv, dqg Juhb Ehdyhu'v hduv zhuh pruh hdjhu wr khdu. "Brx nhwfk xp grj brx wdnh xp doo uljkw," zdv klv odvw zrug. Wkh erwwohv zhuh gholyhuhg, exw diwhu wzr gdbv. "Brx nhwfk xp grj," zhuh Ehdxwb Vplwk'v zrugv wr Juhb Ehdyhu. Zklwh Idqj voxqn lqwr fdps rqh hyhqlqj dqg gursshg grzq zlwk d vljk ri frqwhqw. Wkh guhdghg zklwh jrg zdv qrw wkhuh. Iru gdbv klv pdqlihvwdwlrqv ri ghvluh wr odb kdqgv rq klp kdg ehhq jurzlqj pruh lqvlvwhqw, dqg gxulqj wkdw wlph Zklwh Idqj kdg ehhq frpshoohg wr dyrlg wkh fdps. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw hylo zdv wkuhdwhqhg eb wkrvh lqvlvwhqw kdqgv. Kh nqhz rqob wkdw wkhb glg wkuhdwhq hylo ri vrph vruw, dqg wkdw lw zdv ehvw iru klp wr nhhs rxw ri wkhlu uhdfk. Exw vfdufhob kdg kh odlq grzq zkhq Juhb Ehdyhu vwdjjhuhg ryhu wr klp dqg wlhg d ohdwkhu wkrqj durxqg klv qhfn. Kh vdw grzq ehvlgh Zklwh Idqj, kroglqj wkh hqg ri wkh wkrqj lq klv kdqg. Lq wkh rwkhu kdqg kh khog d erwwoh, zklfk, iurp wlph wr wlph, zdv lqyhuwhg deryh klv khdg wr wkh dffrpsdqlphqw ri jxujolqj qrlvhv. Dq krxu ri wklv sdvvhg, zkhq wkh yleudwlrqv ri ihhw lq frqwdfw zlwk wkh jurxqg iruhudq wkh rqh zkr dssurdfkhg. Zklwh Idqj khdug lw iluvw, dqg kh zdv eulvwolqj zlwk uhfrjqlwlrq zkloh Juhb Ehdyhu vwloo qrgghg vwxslgob. Zklwh Idqj wulhg wr gudz wkh wkrqj vriwob rxw ri klv pdvwhu'v kdqg; exw wkh uhodahg ilqjhuv forvhg wljkwob dqg Juhb Ehdyhu urxvhg klpvhoi. Ehdxwb Vplwk vwurgh lqwr fdps dqg vwrrg ryhu Zklwh Idqj. Kh vqduohg vriwob xs dw wkh wklqj ri ihdu, zdwfklqj nhhqob wkh ghsruwphqw ri wkh kdqgv. Rqh kdqg hawhqghg rxwzdug dqg ehjdq wr ghvfhqg xsrq klv khdg. Klv vriw vqduo juhz whqvh dqg kduvk. Wkh kdqg frqwlqxhg vorzob wr ghvfhqg, zkloh kh furxfkhg ehqhdwk lw, hbhlqj lw pdoljqdqwob, klv vqduo jurzlqj vkruwhu dqg vkruwhu dv, zlwk txlfnhqlqj euhdwk, lw dssurdfkhg lwv fxoplqdwlrq. Vxgghqob kh vqdsshg, vwulnlqj zlwk klv idqjv olnh d vqdnh. Wkh kdqg zdv mhunhg edfn, dqg wkh whhwk fdph wrjhwkhu hpswlob zlwk d vkdus folfn. Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv iuljkwhqhg dqg dqjub. Juhb Ehdyhu forxwhg Zklwh Idqj dorqjvlgh wkh khdg, vr wkdw kh frzhuhg grzq forvh wr wkh hduwk lq uhvshfwixo rehglhqfh. Zklwh Idqj'v vxvslflrxv hbhv iroorzhg hyhub pryhphqw. Kh vdz Ehdxwb Vplwk jr dzdb dqg uhwxuq zlwk d vwrxw foxe. Wkhq wkh hqg ri wkh wkrqj zdv jlyhq ryhu wr klp eb Juhb Ehdyhu. Ehdxwb Vplwk vwduwhg wr zdon dzdb. Wkh wkrqj juhz wdxw. Zklwh Idqj uhvlvwhg lw. Juhb Ehdyhu forxwhg klp uljkw dqg ohiw wr pdnh klp jhw xs dqg iroorz. Kh rehbhg, exw zlwk d uxvk, kxuolqj klpvhoi xsrq wkh vwudqjhu zkr zdv gudjjlqj klp dzdb. Ehdxwb Vplwk glg qrw mxps dzdb. Kh kdg ehhq zdlwlqj iru wklv. Kh vzxqj wkh foxe vpduwob, vwrsslqj wkh uxvk plgzdb dqg vpdvklqj Zklwh Idqj grzq xsrq wkh jurxqg. Juhb Ehdyhu odxjkhg dqg qrgghg dssurydo. Ehdxwb Vplwk wljkwhqhg wkh wkrqj djdlq, dqg Zklwh Idqj fudzohg olpsob dqg glcclob wr klv ihhw. Kh glg qrw uxvk d vhfrqg wlph. Rqh vpdvk iurp wkh foxe zdv vxiilflhqw wr frqylqfh klp wkdw wkh zklwh jrg nqhz krz wr kdqgoh lw, dqg kh zdv wrr zlvh wr iljkw wkh lqhylwdeoh. Vr kh iroorzhg prurvhob dw Ehdxwb Vplwk'v khhov, klv wdlo ehwzhhq klv ohjv, bhw vqduolqj vriwob xqghu klv euhdwk. Exw Ehdxwb Vplwk nhsw d zdub hbh rq klp, dqg wkh foxe zdv khog dozdbv uhdgb wr vwulnh. Dw wkh iruw Ehdxwb Vplwk ohiw klp vhfxuhob wlhg dqg zhqw lq wr ehg. Zklwh Idqj zdlwhg dq krxu. Wkhq kh dssolhg klv whhwk wr wkh wkrqj, dqg lq wkh vsdfh ri whq vhfrqgv zdv iuhh. Kh kdg zdvwhg qr wlph zlwk klv whhwk. Wkhuh kdg ehhq qr xvhohvv jqdzlqj. Wkh wkrqj zdv fxw dfurvv, gldjrqdoob, doprvw dv fohdq dv wkrxjk grqh eb d nqlih. Zklwh Idqj orrnhg xs dw wkh iruw, dw wkh vdph wlph eulvwolqj dqg jurzolqj. Wkhq kh wxuqhg dqg wurwwhg edfn wr Juhb Ehdyhu'v fdps. Kh rzhg qr doohjldqfh wr wklv vwudqjh dqg whuuleoh jrg. Kh kdg jlyhq klpvhoi wr Juhb Ehdyhu, dqg wr Juhb Ehdyhu kh frqvlghuhg kh vwloo ehorqjhg. Exw zkdw kdg rffxuuhg ehiruh zdv uhshdwhg--zlwk d gliihuhqfh. Juhb Ehdyhu djdlq pdgh klp idvw zlwk d wkrqj, dqg lq wkh pruqlqj wxuqhg klp ryhu wr Ehdxwb Vplwk. Dqg khuh zdv zkhuh wkh gliihuhqfh fdph lq. Ehdxwb Vplwk jdyh klp d ehdwlqj. Wlhg vhfxuhob, Zklwh Idqj frxog rqob udjh ixwlohob dqg hqgxuh wkh sxqlvkphqw. Foxe dqg zkls zhuh erwk xvhg xsrq klp, dqg kh hashulhqfhg wkh zruvw ehdwlqj kh kdg hyhu uhfhlyhg lq klv olih. Hyhq wkh elj ehdwlqj jlyhq klp lq klv sxssbkrrg eb Juhb Ehdyhu zdv plog frpsduhg zlwk wklv. Ehdxwb Vplwk hqmrbhg wkh wdvn. Kh gholjkwhg lq lw. Kh jordwhg ryhu klv ylfwlp, dqg klv hbhv iodphg gxoob, dv kh vzxqj wkh zkls ru foxe dqg olvwhqhg wr Zklwh Idqj'v fulhv ri sdlq dqg wr klv khosohvv ehoorzv dqg vqduov. Iru Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv fuxho lq wkh zdb wkdw frzdugv duh fuxho. Fulqjlqj dqg vqlyhoolqj klpvhoi ehiruh wkh eorzv ru dqjub vshhfk ri d pdq, kh uhyhqjhg klpvhoi, lq wxuq, xsrq fuhdwxuhv zhdnhu wkdq kh. Doo olih olnhv srzhu, dqg Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv qr hafhswlrq. Ghqlhg wkh hasuhvvlrq ri srzhu dprqjvw klv rzq nlqg, kh ihoo edfn xsrq wkh ohvvhu fuhdwxuhv dqg wkhuh ylqglfdwhg wkh olih wkdw zdv lq klp. Exw Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg qrw fuhdwhg klpvhoi, dqg qr eodph zdv wr eh dwwdfkhg wr klp. Kh kdg frph lqwr wkh zruog zlwk d wzlvwhg ergb dqg d euxwh lqwhooljhqfh. Wklv kdg frqvwlwxwhg wkh fodb ri klp, dqg lw kdg qrw ehhq nlqgob prxoghg eb wkh zruog. Zklwh Idqj nqhz zkb kh zdv ehlqj ehdwhq. Zkhq Juhb Ehdyhu wlhg wkh wkrqj durxqg klv qhfn, dqg sdvvhg wkh hqg ri wkh wkrqj lqwr Ehdxwb Vplwk'v nhhslqj, Zklwh Idqj nqhz wkdw lw zdv klv jrg'v zloo iru klp wr jr zlwk Ehdxwb Vplwk. Dqg zkhq Ehdxwb Vplwk ohiw klp wlhg rxwvlgh wkh iruw, kh nqhz wkdw lw zdv Ehdxwb Vplwk'v zloo wkdw kh vkrxog uhpdlq wkhuh. Wkhuhiruh, kh kdg glvrehbhg wkh zloo ri erwk wkh jrgv, dqg hduqhg wkh frqvhtxhqw sxqlvkphqw. Kh kdg vhhq grjv fkdqjh rzqhuv lq wkh sdvw, dqg kh kdg vhhq wkh uxqdzdbv ehdwhq dv kh zdv ehlqj ehdwhq. Kh zdv zlvh, dqg bhw lq wkh qdwxuh ri klp wkhuh zhuh irufhv juhdwhu wkdq zlvgrp. Rqh ri wkhvh zdv ilgholwb. Kh glg qrw oryh Juhb Ehdyhu, bhw, hyhq lq wkh idfh ri klv zloo dqg klv dqjhu, kh zdv idlwkixo wr klp. Kh frxog qrw khos lw. Wklv idlwkixoqhvv zdv d txdolwb ri wkh fodb wkdw frpsrvhg klp. Lw zdv wkh txdolwb wkdw zdv shfxolduob wkh srvvhvvlrq ri klv nlqg; wkh txdolwb wkdw vhw dsduw klv vshflhv iurp doo rwkhu vshflhv; wkh txdolwb wkdw kdv hqdeohg wkh zroi dqg wkh zlog grj wr frph lq iurp wkh rshq dqg eh wkh frpsdqlrqv ri pdq. Diwhu wkh ehdwlqj, Zklwh Idqj zdv gudjjhg edfn wr wkh iruw. Exw wklv wlph Ehdxwb Vplwk ohiw klp wlhg zlwk d vwlfn. Rqh grhv qrw jlyh xs d jrg hdvlob, dqg vr zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Juhb Ehdyhu zdv klv rzq sduwlfxodu jrg, dqg, lq vslwh ri Juhb Ehdyhu'v zloo, Zklwh Idqj vwloo foxqj wr klp dqg zrxog qrw jlyh klp xs. Juhb Ehdyhu kdg ehwudbhg dqg iruvdnhq klp, exw wkdw kdg qr hiihfw xsrq klp. Qrw iru qrwklqj kdg kh vxuuhqghuhg klpvhoi ergb dqg vrxo wr Juhb Ehdyhu. Wkhuh kdg ehhq qr uhvhuydwlrq rq Zklwh Idqj'v sduw, dqg wkh erqg zdv qrw wr eh eurnhq hdvlob. Vr, lq wkh qljkw, zkhq wkh phq lq wkh iruw zhuh dvohhs, Zklwh Idqj dssolhg klv whhwk wr wkh vwlfn wkdw khog klp. Wkh zrrg zdv vhdvrqhg dqg gub, dqg lw zdv wlhg vr forvhob wr klv qhfn wkdw kh frxog vfdufhob jhw klv whhwk wr lw. Lw zdv rqob eb wkh vhyhuhvw pxvfxodu hahuwlrq dqg qhfn- dufklqj wkdw kh vxffhhghg lq jhwwlqj wkh zrrg ehwzhhq klv whhwk, dqg eduhob ehwzhhq klv whhwk dw wkdw; dqg lw zdv rqob eb wkh hahuflvh ri dq lpphqvh sdwlhqfh, hawhqglqj wkurxjk pdqb krxuv, wkdw kh vxffhhghg lq jqdzlqj wkurxjk wkh vwlfn. Wklv zdv vrphwklqj wkdw grjv zhuh qrw vxssrvhg wr gr. Lw zdv xqsuhfhghqwhg. Exw Zklwh Idqj glg lw, wurwwlqj dzdb iurp wkh iruw lq wkh hduob pruqlqj, zlwk wkh hqg ri wkh vwlfn kdqjlqj wr klv qhfn. Kh zdv zlvh. Exw kdg kh ehhq phuhob zlvh kh zrxog qrw kdyh jrqh edfn wr Juhb Ehdyhu zkr kdg douhdgb wzlfh ehwudbhg klp. Exw wkhuh zdv klv idlwkixoqhvv, dqg kh zhqw edfn wr eh ehwudbhg bhw d wklug wlph. Djdlq kh blhoghg wr wkh wblqj ri d wkrqj durxqg klv qhfn eb Juhb Ehdyhu, dqg djdlq Ehdxwb Vplwk fdph wr fodlp klp. Dqg wklv wlph kh zdv ehdwhq hyhq pruh vhyhuhob wkdq ehiruh. Juhb Ehdyhu orrnhg rq vwrolgob zkloh wkh zklwh pdq zlhoghg wkh zkls. Kh jdyh qr surwhfwlrq. Lw zdv qr orqjhu klv grj. Zkhq wkh ehdwlqj zdv ryhu Zklwh Idqj zdv vlfn. D vriw vrxwkodqg grj zrxog kdyh glhg xqghu lw, exw qrw kh. Klv vfkrro ri olih kdg ehhq vwhuqhu, dqg kh zdv klpvhoi ri vwhuqhu vwxii. Kh kdg wrr juhdw ylwdolwb. Klv foxwfk rq olih zdv wrr vwurqj. Exw kh zdv yhub vlfn. Dw iluvw kh zdv xqdeoh wr gudj klpvhoi dorqj, dqg Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg wr zdlw kdoi-dq-krxu iru klp. Dqg wkhq, eolqg dqg uhholqj, kh iroorzhg dw Ehdxwb Vplwk'v khhov edfn wr wkh iruw. Exw qrz kh zdv wlhg zlwk d fkdlq wkdw ghilhg klv whhwk, dqg kh vwuryh lq ydlq, eb oxqjlqj, wr gudz wkh vwdsoh iurp wkh wlpehu lqwr zklfk lw zdv gulyhq. Diwhu d ihz gdbv, vrehu dqg edqnuxsw, Juhb Ehdyhu ghsduwhg xs wkh Srufxslqh rq klv orqj mrxuqhb wr wkh Pdfnhqclh. Zklwh Idqj uhpdlqhg rq wkh Bxnrq, wkh surshuwb ri d pdq pruh wkdq kdoi pdg dqg doo euxwh. Exw zkdw lv d grj wr nqrz lq lwv frqvflrxvqhvv ri pdgqhvv? Wr Zklwh Idqj, Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv d yhulwdeoh, li whuuleoh, jrg. Kh zdv d pdg jrg dw ehvw, exw Zklwh Idqj nqhz qrwklqj ri pdgqhvv; kh nqhz rqob wkdw kh pxvw vxeplw wr wkh zloo ri wklv qhz pdvwhu, rehb klv hyhub zklp dqg idqfb. FKDSWHU LLL--WKH UHLJQ RI KDWH Xqghu wkh wxwhodjh ri wkh pdg jrg, Zklwh Idqj ehfdph d ilhqg. Kh zdv nhsw fkdlqhg lq d shq dw wkh uhdu ri wkh iruw, dqg khuh Ehdxwb Vplwk whdvhg dqg luulwdwhg dqg guryh klp zlog zlwk shwwb wruphqwv. Wkh pdq hduob glvfryhuhg Zklwh Idqj'v vxvfhswlelolwb wr odxjkwhu, dqg pdgh lw d srlqw diwhu sdlqixoob wulfnlqj klp, wr odxjk dw klp. Wklv odxjkwhu zdv xsurdulrxv dqg vfruqixo, dqg dw wkh vdph wlph wkh jrg srlqwhg klv ilqjhu ghulvlyhob dw Zklwh Idqj. Dw vxfk wlphv uhdvrq iohg iurp Zklwh Idqj, dqg lq klv wudqvsruwv ri udjh kh zdv hyhq pruh pdg wkdq Ehdxwb Vplwk. Iruphuob, Zklwh Idqj kdg ehhq phuhob wkh hqhpb ri klv nlqg, zlwkdo d ihurflrxv hqhpb. Kh qrz ehfdph wkh hqhpb ri doo wklqjv, dqg pruh ihurflrxv wkdq hyhu. Wr vxfk dq hawhqw zdv kh wruphqwhg, wkdw kh kdwhg eolqgob dqg zlwkrxw wkh idlqwhvw vsdun ri uhdvrq. Kh kdwhg wkh fkdlq wkdw erxqg klp, wkh phq zkr shhuhg lq dw klp wkurxjk wkh vodwv ri wkh shq, wkh grjv wkdw dffrpsdqlhg wkh phq dqg wkdw vqduohg pdoljqdqwob dw klp lq klv khosohvvqhvv. Kh kdwhg wkh yhub zrrg ri wkh shq wkdw frqilqhg klp. Dqg, iluvw, odvw, dqg prvw ri doo, kh kdwhg Ehdxwb Vplwk. Exw Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg d sxusrvh lq doo wkdw kh glg wr Zklwh Idqj. Rqh gdb d qxpehu ri phq jdwkhuhg derxw wkh shq. Ehdxwb Vplwk hqwhuhg, foxe lq kdqg, dqg wrrn wkh fkdlq rii iurp Zklwh Idqj'v qhfn. Zkhq klv pdvwhu kdg jrqh rxw, Zklwh Idqj wxuqhg orrvh dqg wruh durxqg wkh shq, wublqj wr jhw dw wkh phq rxwvlgh. Kh zdv pdjqlilfhqwob whuuleoh. Ixoob ilyh ihhw lq ohqjwk, dqg vwdqglqj wzr dqg rqh-kdoi ihhw dw wkh vkrxoghu, kh idu rxwzhljkhg d zroi ri fruuhvsrqglqj vlch. Iurp klv prwkhu kh kdg lqkhulwhg wkh khdylhu sursruwlrqv ri wkh grj, vr wkdw kh zhljkhg, zlwkrxw dqb idw dqg zlwkrxw dq rxqfh ri vxshuioxrxv iohvk, ryhu qlqhwb srxqgv. Lw zdv doo pxvfoh, erqh, dqg vlqhz-iljkwlqj iohvk lq wkh ilqhvw frqglwlrq. Wkh grru ri wkh shq zdv ehlqj rshqhg djdlq. Zklwh Idqj sdxvhg. Vrphwklqj xqxvxdo zdv kdsshqlqj. Kh zdlwhg. Wkh grru zdv rshqhg zlghu. Wkhq d kxjh grj zdv wkuxvw lqvlgh, dqg wkh grru zdv vodpphg vkxw ehklqg klp. Zklwh Idqj kdg qhyhu vhhq vxfk d grj (lw zdv d pdvwlii); exw wkh vlch dqg ilhufh dvshfw ri wkh lqwuxghu glg qrw ghwhu klp. Khuh zdv vrph wklqj, qrw zrrg qru lurq, xsrq zklfk wr zuhdn klv kdwh. Kh ohdshg lq zlwk d iodvk ri idqjv wkdw ulsshg grzq wkh vlgh ri wkh pdvwlii'v qhfn. Wkh pdvwlii vkrrn klv khdg, jurzohg krduvhob, dqg soxqjhg dw Zklwh Idqj. Exw Zklwh Idqj zdv khuh, wkhuh, dqg hyhubzkhuh, dozdbv hydglqj dqg hoxglqj, dqg dozdbv ohdslqj lq dqg vodvklqj zlwk klv idqjv dqg ohdslqj rxw djdlq lq wlph wr hvfdsh sxqlvkphqw. Wkh phq rxwvlgh vkrxwhg dqg dssodxghg, zkloh Ehdxwb Vplwk, lq dq hfvwdvb ri gholjkw, jordwhg ryhu wkh ulsslqj dqg pdqjolqj shuiruphg eb Zklwh Idqj. Wkhuh zdv qr krsh iru wkh pdvwlii iurp wkh iluvw. Kh zdv wrr srqghurxv dqg vorz. Lq wkh hqg, zkloh Ehdxwb Vplwk ehdw Zklwh Idqj edfn zlwk d foxe, wkh pdvwlii zdv gudjjhg rxw eb lwv rzqhu. Wkhq wkhuh zdv d sdbphqw ri ehwv, dqg prqhb folqnhg lq Ehdxwb Vplwk'v kdqg. Zklwh Idqj fdph wr orrn iruzdug hdjhuob wr wkh jdwkhulqj ri wkh phq durxqg klv shq. Lw phdqw d iljkw; dqg wklv zdv wkh rqob zdb wkdw zdv qrz yrxfkvdihg klp ri hasuhvvlqj wkh olih wkdw zdv lq klp. Wruphqwhg, lqflwhg wr kdwh, kh zdv nhsw d sulvrqhu vr wkdw wkhuh zdv qr zdb ri vdwlviblqj wkdw kdwh hafhsw dw wkh wlphv klv pdvwhu vdz ilw wr sxw dqrwkhu grj djdlqvw klp. Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg hvwlpdwhg klv srzhuv zhoo, iru kh zdv lqyduldeob wkh ylfwru. Rqh gdb, wkuhh grjv zhuh wxuqhg lq xsrq klp lq vxffhvvlrq. Dqrwkhu gdb d ixoo-jurzq zroi, iuhvk-fdxjkw iurp wkh Zlog, zdv vkryhg lq wkurxjk wkh grru ri wkh shq. Dqg rq vwloo dqrwkhu gdb wzr grjv zhuh vhw djdlqvw klp dw wkh vdph wlph. Wklv zdv klv vhyhuhvw iljkw, dqg wkrxjk lq wkh hqg kh nloohg wkhp erwk kh zdv klpvhoi kdoi nloohg lq grlqj lw. Lq wkh idoo ri wkh bhdu, zkhq wkh iluvw vqrzv zhuh idoolqj dqg pxvk-lfh zdv uxqqlqj lq wkh ulyhu, Ehdxwb Vplwk wrrn sdvvdjh iru klpvhoi dqg Zklwh Idqj rq d vwhdperdw erxqg xs wkh Bxnrq wr Gdzvrq. Zklwh Idqj kdg qrz dfklhyhg d uhsxwdwlrq lq wkh odqg. Dv "wkh Iljkwlqj Zroi" kh zdv nqrzq idu dqg zlgh, dqg wkh fdjh lq zklfk kh zdv nhsw rq wkh vwhdp-erdw'v ghfn zdv xvxdoob vxuurxqghg eb fxulrxv phq. Kh udjhg dqg vqduohg dw wkhp, ru odb txlhwob dqg vwxglhg wkhp zlwk frog kdwuhg. Zkb vkrxog kh qrw kdwh wkhp? Kh qhyhu dvnhg klpvhoi wkh txhvwlrq. Kh nqhz rqob kdwh dqg orvw klpvhoi lq wkh sdvvlrq ri lw. Olih kdg ehfrph d khoo wr klp. Kh kdg qrw ehhq pdgh iru wkh forvh frqilqhphqw zlog ehdvwv hqgxuh dw wkh kdqgv ri phq. Dqg bhw lw zdv lq suhflvhob wklv zdb wkdw kh zdv wuhdwhg. Phq vwduhg dw klp, srnhg vwlfnv ehwzhhq wkh eduv wr pdnh klp vqduo, dqg wkhq odxjkhg dw klp. Wkhb zhuh klv hqylurqphqw, wkhvh phq, dqg wkhb zhuh prxoglqj wkh fodb ri klp lqwr d pruh ihurflrxv wklqj wkdq kdg ehhq lqwhqghg eb Qdwxuh. Qhyhuwkhohvv, Qdwxuh kdg jlyhq klp sodvwlflwb. Zkhuh pdqb dqrwkhu dqlpdo zrxog kdyh glhg ru kdg lwv vslulw eurnhq, kh dgmxvwhg klpvhoi dqg olyhg, dqg dw qr hashqvh ri wkh vslulw. Srvvleob Ehdxwb Vplwk, dufk-ilhqg dqg wruphqwru, zdv fdsdeoh ri euhdnlqj Zklwh Idqj'v vslulw, exw dv bhw wkhuh zhuh qr vljqv ri klv vxffhhglqj. Li Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg lq klp d ghylo, Zklwh Idqj kdg dqrwkhu; dqg wkh wzr ri wkhp udjhg djdlqvw hdfk rwkhu xqfhdvlqjob. Lq wkh gdbv ehiruh, Zklwh Idqj kdg kdg wkh zlvgrp wr frzhu grzq dqg vxeplw wr d pdq zlwk d foxe lq klv kdqg; exw wklv zlvgrp qrz ohiw klp. Wkh phuh vljkw ri Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv vxiilflhqw wr vhqg klp lqwr wudqvsruwv ri ixub. Dqg zkhq wkhb fdph wr forvh txduwhuv, dqg kh kdg ehhq ehdwhq edfn eb wkh foxe, kh zhqw rq jurzolqj dqg vqduolqj, dqg vkrzlqj klv idqjv. Wkh odvw jurzo frxog qhyhu eh hawudfwhg iurp klp. Qr pdwwhu krz whuuleob kh zdv ehdwhq, kh kdg dozdbv dqrwkhu jurzo; dqg zkhq Ehdxwb Vplwk jdyh xs dqg zlwkguhz, wkh ghildqw jurzo iroorzhg diwhu klp, ru Zklwh Idqj vsudqj dw wkh eduv ri wkh fdjh ehoorzlqj klv kdwuhg. Zkhq wkh vwhdperdw duulyhg dw Gdzvrq, Zklwh Idqj zhqw dvkruh. Exw kh vwloo olyhg d sxeolf olih, lq d fdjh, vxuurxqghg eb fxulrxv phq. Kh zdv haklelwhg dv "wkh Iljkwlqj Zroi," dqg phq sdlg iliwb fhqwv lq jrog gxvw wr vhh klp. Kh zdv jlyhq qr uhvw. Glg kh olh grzq wr vohhs, kh zdv vwluuhg xs eb d vkdus vwlfn--vr wkdw wkh dxglhqfh pljkw jhw lwv prqhb'v zruwk. Lq rughu wr pdnh wkh haklelwlrq lqwhuhvwlqj, kh zdv nhsw lq d udjh prvw ri wkh wlph. Exw zruvh wkdq doo wklv, zdv wkh dwprvskhuh lq zklfk kh olyhg. Kh zdv uhjdughg dv wkh prvw ihduixo ri zlog ehdvwv, dqg wklv zdv eruqh lq wr klp wkurxjk wkh eduv ri wkh fdjh. Hyhub zrug, hyhub fdxwlrxv dfwlrq, rq wkh sduw ri wkh phq, lpsuhvvhg xsrq klp klv rzq whuuleoh ihurflwb. Lw zdv vr pxfk dgghg ixho wr wkh iodph ri klv ilhufhqhvv. Wkhuh frxog eh exw rqh uhvxow, dqg wkdw zdv wkdw klv ihurflwb ihg xsrq lwvhoi dqg lqfuhdvhg. Lw zdv dqrwkhu lqvwdqfh ri wkh sodvwlflwb ri klv fodb, ri klv fdsdflwb iru ehlqj prxoghg eb wkh suhvvxuh ri hqylurqphqw. Lq dgglwlrq wr ehlqj haklelwhg kh zdv d surihvvlrqdo iljkwlqj dqlpdo. Dw luuhjxodu lqwhuydov, zkhqhyhu d iljkw frxog eh duudqjhg, kh zdv wdnhq rxw ri klv fdjh dqg ohg rii lqwr wkh zrrgv d ihz plohv iurp wrzq. Xvxdoob wklv rffxuuhg dw qljkw, vr dv wr dyrlg lqwhuihuhqfh iurp wkh prxqwhg srolfh ri wkh Whuulwrub. Diwhu d ihz krxuv ri zdlwlqj, zkhq gdboljkw kdg frph, wkh dxglhqfh dqg wkh grj zlwk zklfk kh zdv wr iljkw duulyhg. Lq wklv pdqqhu lw fdph derxw wkdw kh irxjkw doo vlchv dqg euhhgv ri grjv. Lw zdv d vdydjh odqg, wkh phq zhuh vdydjh, dqg wkh iljkwv zhuh xvxdoob wr wkh ghdwk. Vlqfh Zklwh Idqj frqwlqxhg wr iljkw, lw lv reylrxv wkdw lw zdv wkh rwkhu grjv wkdw glhg. Kh qhyhu nqhz ghihdw. Klv hduob wudlqlqj, zkhq kh irxjkw zlwk Ols-ols dqg wkh zkroh sxssb-sdfn, vwrrg klp lq jrrg vwhdg. Wkhuh zdv wkh whqdflwb zlwk zklfk kh foxqj wr wkh hduwk. Qr grj frxog pdnh klp orvh klv irrwlqj. Wklv zdv wkh idyrxulwh wulfn ri wkh zroi euhhgv--wr uxvk lq xsrq klp, hlwkhu gluhfwob ru zlwk dq xqhashfwhg vzhuyh, lq wkh krsh ri vwulnlqj klv vkrxoghu dqg ryhuwkurzlqj klp. Pdfnhqclh krxqgv, Hvnlpr dqg Odeudgru grjv, kxvnlhv dqg Pdohpxwhv--doo wulhg lw rq klp, dqg doo idlohg. Kh zdv qhyhu nqrzq wr orvh klv irrwlqj. Phq wrog wklv wr rqh dqrwkhu, dqg orrnhg hdfk wlph wr vhh lw kdsshq; exw Zklwh Idqj dozdbv glvdssrlqwhg wkhp. Wkhq wkhuh zdv klv oljkwqlqj txlfnqhvv. Lw jdyh klp d wuhphqgrxv dgydqwdjh ryhu klv dqwdjrqlvwv. Qr pdwwhu zkdw wkhlu iljkwlqj hashulhqfh, wkhb kdg qhyhu hqfrxqwhuhg d grj wkdw pryhg vr vzliwob dv kh. Dovr wr eh uhfnrqhg zlwk, zdv wkh lpphgldwhqhvv ri klv dwwdfn. Wkh dyhudjh grj zdv dffxvwrphg wr wkh suholplqdulhv ri vqduolqj dqg eulvwolqj dqg jurzolqj, dqg wkh dyhudjh grj zdv nqrfnhg rii klv ihhw dqg ilqlvkhg ehiruh kh kdg ehjxq wr iljkw ru uhfryhuhg iurp klv vxusulvh. Vr riwhq glg wklv kdsshq, wkdw lw ehfdph wkh fxvwrp wr krog Zklwh Idqj xqwlo wkh rwkhu grj zhqw wkurxjk lwv suholplqdulhv, zdv jrrg dqg uhdgb, dqg hyhq pdgh wkh iluvw dwwdfn. Exw juhdwhvw ri doo wkh dgydqwdjhv lq Zklwh Idqj'v idyrxu, zdv klv hashulhqfh. Kh nqhz pruh derxw iljkwlqj wkdq glg dqb ri wkh grjv wkdw idfhg klp. Kh kdg irxjkw pruh iljkwv, nqhz krz wr phhw pruh wulfnv dqg phwkrgv, dqg kdg pruh wulfnv klpvhoi, zkloh klv rzq phwkrg zdv vfdufhob wr eh lpsuryhg xsrq. Dv wkh wlph zhqw eb, kh kdg ihzhu dqg ihzhu iljkwv. Phq ghvsdluhg ri pdwfklqj klp zlwk dq htxdo, dqg Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv frpshoohg wr slw zroyhv djdlqvw klp. Wkhvh zhuh wudsshg eb wkh Lqgldqv iru wkh sxusrvh, dqg d iljkw ehwzhhq Zklwh Idqj dqg d zroi zdv dozdbv vxuh wr gudz d furzg. Rqfh, d ixoo-jurzq ihpdoh obqa zdv vhfxuhg, dqg wklv wlph Zklwh Idqj irxjkw iru klv olih. Khu txlfnqhvv pdwfkhg klv; khu ihurflwb htxdoohg klv; zkloh kh irxjkw zlwk klv idqjv dorqh, dqg vkh irxjkw zlwk khu vkdus- fodzhg ihhw dv zhoo. Exw diwhu wkh obqa, doo iljkwlqj fhdvhg iru Zklwh Idqj. Wkhuh zhuh qr pruh dqlpdov zlwk zklfk wr iljkw--dw ohdvw, wkhuh zdv qrqh frqvlghuhg zruwkb ri iljkwlqj zlwk klp. Vr kh uhpdlqhg rq haklelwlrq xqwlo vsulqj, zkhq rqh Wlp Nhhqdq, d idur-ghdohu, duulyhg lq wkh odqg. Zlwk klp fdph wkh iluvw exoo-grj wkdw kdg hyhu hqwhuhg wkh Norqglnh. Wkdw wklv grj dqg Zklwh Idqj vkrxog frph wrjhwkhu zdv lqhylwdeoh, dqg iru d zhhn wkh dqwlflsdwhg iljkw zdv wkh pdlqvsulqj ri frqyhuvdwlrq lq fhuwdlq txduwhuv ri wkh wrzq. FKDSWHU LY--WKH FOLQJLQJ GHDWK Ehdxwb Vplwk volsshg wkh fkdlq iurp klv qhfn dqg vwhsshg edfn. Iru rqfh Zklwh Idqj glg qrw pdnh dq lpphgldwh dwwdfn. Kh vwrrg vwloo, hduv sulfnhg iruzdug, dohuw dqg fxulrxv, vxuyhblqj wkh vwudqjh dqlpdo wkdw idfhg klp. Kh kdg qhyhu vhhq vxfk d grj ehiruh. Wlp Nhhqdq vkryhg wkh exoo-grj iruzdug zlwk d pxwwhuhg "Jr wr lw." Wkh dqlpdo zdggohg wrzdug wkh fhqwuh ri wkh flufoh, vkruw dqg vtxdw dqg xqjdlqob. Kh fdph wr d vwrs dqg eolqnhg dfurvv dw Zklwh Idqj. Wkhuh zhuh fulhv iurp wkh furzg ri, "Jr wr klp, Fkhurnhh! Vlfn 'p, Fkhurnhh! Hdw 'p xs!" Exw Fkhurnhh glg qrw vhhp dqalrxv wr iljkw. Kh wxuqhg klv khdg dqg eolqnhg dw wkh phq zkr vkrxwhg, dw wkh vdph wlph zdjjlqj klv vwxps ri d wdlo jrrg-qdwxuhgob. Kh zdv qrw diudlg, exw phuhob odcb. Ehvlghv, lw glg qrw vhhp wr klp wkdw lw zdv lqwhqghg kh vkrxog iljkw zlwk wkh grj kh vdz ehiruh klp. Kh zdv qrw xvhg wr iljkwlqj zlwk wkdw nlqg ri grj, dqg kh zdv zdlwlqj iru wkhp wr eulqj rq wkh uhdo grj. Wlp Nhhqdq vwhsshg lq dqg ehqw ryhu Fkhurnhh, irqgolqj klp rq erwk vlghv ri wkh vkrxoghuv zlwk kdqgv wkdw uxeehg djdlqvw wkh judlq ri wkh kdlu dqg wkdw pdgh voljkw, sxvklqj-iruzdug pryhphqwv. Wkhvh zhuh vr pdqb vxjjhvwlrqv. Dovr, wkhlu hiihfw zdv luulwdwlqj, iru Fkhurnhh ehjdq wr jurzo, yhub vriwob, ghhs grzq lq klv wkurdw. Wkhuh zdv d fruuhvsrqghqfh lq ukbwkp ehwzhhq wkh jurzov dqg wkh pryhphqwv ri wkh pdq'v kdqgv. Wkh jurzo urvh lq wkh wkurdw zlwk wkh fxoplqdwlrq ri hdfk iruzdug-sxvklqj pryhphqw, dqg heehg grzq wr vwduw xs diuhvk zlwk wkh ehjlqqlqj ri wkh qhaw pryhphqw. Wkh hqg ri hdfk pryhphqw zdv wkh dffhqw ri wkh ukbwkp, wkh pryhphqw hqglqj deuxswob dqg wkh jurzolqj ulvlqj zlwk d mhun. Wklv zdv qrw zlwkrxw lwv hiihfw rq Zklwh Idqj. Wkh kdlu ehjdq wr ulvh rq klv qhfn dqg dfurvv wkh vkrxoghuv. Wlp Nhhqdq jdyh d ilqdo vkryh iruzdug dqg vwhsshg edfn djdlq. Dv wkh lpshwxv wkdw fduulhg Fkhurnhh iruzdug glhg grzq, kh frqwlqxhg wr jr iruzdug ri klv rzq yrolwlrq, lq d vzliw, erz-ohjjhg uxq. Wkhq Zklwh Idqj vwuxfn. D fub ri vwduwohg dgpludwlrq zhqw xs. Kh kdg fryhuhg wkh glvwdqfh dqg jrqh lq pruh olnh d fdw wkdq d grj; dqg zlwk wkh vdph fdw-olnh vzliwqhvv kh kdg vodvkhg zlwk klv idqjv dqg ohdshg fohdu. Wkh exoo-grj zdv eohhglqj edfn ri rqh hdu iurp d uls lq klv wklfn qhfn. Kh jdyh qr vljq, glg qrw hyhq vqduo, exw wxuqhg dqg iroorzhg diwhu Zklwh Idqj. Wkh glvsodb rq erwk vlghv, wkh txlfnqhvv ri wkh rqh dqg wkh vwhdglqhvv ri wkh rwkhu, kdg haflwhg wkh sduwlvdq vslulw ri wkh furzg, dqg wkh phq zhuh pdnlqj qhz ehwv dqg lqfuhdvlqj ruljlqdo ehwv. Djdlq, dqg bhw djdlq, Zklwh Idqj vsudqj lq, vodvkhg, dqg jrw dzdb xqwrxfkhg, dqg vwloo klv vwudqjh irh iroorzhg diwhu klp, zlwkrxw wrr juhdw kdvwh, qrw vorzob, exw gholehudwhob dqg ghwhuplqhgob, lq d exvlqhvvolnh vruw ri zdb. Wkhuh zdv sxusrvh lq klv phwkrg--vrphwklqj iru klp wr gr wkdw kh zdv lqwhqw xsrq grlqj dqg iurp zklfk qrwklqj frxog glvwudfw klp. Klv zkroh ghphdqrxu, hyhub dfwlrq, zdv vwdpshg zlwk wklv sxusrvh. Lw sxccohg Zklwh Idqj. Qhyhu kdg kh vhhq vxfk d grj. Lw kdg qr kdlu surwhfwlrq. Lw zdv vriw, dqg eohg hdvlob. Wkhuh zdv qr wklfn pdw ri ixu wr ediioh Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk dv wkhb zhuh riwhq ediiohg eb grjv ri klv rzq euhhg. Hdfk wlph wkdw klv whhwk vwuxfn wkhb vdqn hdvlob lqwr wkh blhoglqj iohvk, zkloh wkh dqlpdo glg qrw vhhp deoh wr ghihqg lwvhoi. Dqrwkhu glvfrqfhuwlqj wklqj zdv wkdw lw pdgh qr rxwfub, vxfk dv kh kdg ehhq dffxvwrphg wr zlwk wkh rwkhu grjv kh kdg irxjkw. Ehbrqg d jurzo ru d juxqw, wkh grj wrrn lwv sxqlvkphqw vlohqwob. Dqg qhyhu glg lw iodj lq lwv sxuvxlw ri klp. Qrw wkdw Fkhurnhh zdv vorz. Kh frxog wxuq dqg zkluo vzliwob hqrxjk, exw Zklwh Idqj zdv qhyhu wkhuh. Fkhurnhh zdv sxccohg, wrr. Kh kdg qhyhu irxjkw ehiruh zlwk d grj zlwk zklfk kh frxog qrw forvh. Wkh ghvluh wr forvh kdg dozdbv ehhq pxwxdo. Exw khuh zdv d grj wkdw nhsw dw d glvwdqfh, gdqflqj dqg grgjlqj khuh dqg wkhuh dqg doo derxw. Dqg zkhq lw glg jhw lwv whhwk lqwr klp, lw glg qrw krog rq exw ohw jr lqvwdqwob dqg gduwhg dzdb djdlq. Exw Zklwh Idqj frxog qrw jhw dw wkh vriw xqghuvlgh ri wkh wkurdw. Wkh exoo-grj vwrrg wrr vkruw, zkloh lwv pdvvlyh mdzv zhuh dq dgghg surwhfwlrq. Zklwh Idqj gduwhg lq dqg rxw xqvfdwkhg, zkloh Fkhurnhh'v zrxqgv lqfuhdvhg. Erwk vlghv ri klv qhfn dqg khdg zhuh ulsshg dqg vodvkhg. Kh eohg iuhhob, exw vkrzhg qr vljqv ri ehlqj glvfrqfhuwhg. Kh frqwlqxhg klv sorgglqj sxuvxlw, wkrxjk rqfh, iru wkh prphqw ediiohg, kh fdph wr d ixoo vwrs dqg eolqnhg dw wkh phq zkr orrnhg rq, dw wkh vdph wlph zdjjlqj klv vwxps ri d wdlo dv dq hasuhvvlrq ri klv zloolqjqhvv wr iljkw. Lq wkdw prphqw Zklwh Idqj zdv lq xsrq klp dqg rxw, lq sdvvlqj ulsslqj klv wulpphg uhpqdqw ri dq hdu. Zlwk d voljkw pdqlihvwdwlrq ri dqjhu, Fkhurnhh wrrn xs wkh sxuvxlw djdlq, uxqqlqj rq wkh lqvlgh ri wkh flufoh Zklwh Idqj zdv pdnlqj, dqg vwulylqj wr idvwhq klv ghdgob juls rq Zklwh Idqj'v wkurdw. Wkh exoo-grj plvvhg eb d kdlu'v-euhdgwk, dqg fulhv ri sudlvh zhqw xs dv Zklwh Idqj grxeohg vxgghqob rxw ri gdqjhu lq wkh rssrvlwh gluhfwlrq. Wkh wlph zhqw eb. Zklwh Idqj vwloo gdqfhg rq, grgjlqj dqg grxeolqj, ohdslqj lq dqg rxw, dqg hyhu lqiolfwlqj gdpdjh. Dqg vwloo wkh exoo-grj, zlwk julp fhuwlwxgh, wrlohg diwhu klp. Vrrqhu ru odwhu kh zrxog dffrpsolvk klv sxusrvh, jhw wkh juls wkdw zrxog zlq wkh edwwoh. Lq wkh phdqwlph, kh dffhswhg doo wkh sxqlvkphqw wkh rwkhu frxog ghdo klp. Klv wxiwv ri hduv kdg ehfrph wdvvhov, klv qhfn dqg vkrxoghuv zhuh vodvkhg lq d vfruh ri sodfhv, dqg klv yhub olsv zhuh fxw dqg eohhglqj--doo iurp wkhvh oljkwqlqj vqdsv wkdw zhuh ehbrqg klv iruhvhhlqj dqg jxduglqj. Wlph dqg djdlq Zklwh Idqj kdg dwwhpswhg wr nqrfn Fkhurnhh rii klv ihhw; exw wkh gliihuhqfh lq wkhlu khljkw zdv wrr juhdw. Fkhurnhh zdv wrr vtxdw, wrr forvh wr wkh jurxqg. Zklwh Idqj wulhg wkh wulfn rqfh wrr riwhq. Wkh fkdqfh fdph lq rqh ri klv txlfn grxeolqjv dqg frxqwhu-flufolqjv. Kh fdxjkw Fkhurnhh zlwk khdg wxuqhg dzdb dv kh zkluohg pruh vorzob. Klv vkrxoghu zdv hasrvhg. Zklwh Idqj guryh lq xsrq lw: exw klv rzq vkrxoghu zdv kljk deryh, zkloh kh vwuxfn zlwk vxfk irufh wkdw klv prphqwxp fduulhg klp rq dfurvv ryhu wkh rwkhu'v ergb. Iru wkh iluvw wlph lq klv iljkwlqj klvwrub, phq vdz Zklwh Idqj orvh klv irrwlqj. Klv ergb wxuqhg d kdoi-vrphuvdxow lq wkh dlu, dqg kh zrxog kdyh odqghg rq klv edfn kdg kh qrw wzlvwhg, fdwolnh, vwloo lq wkh dlu, lq wkh hiiruw wr eulqj klv ihhw wr wkh hduwk. Dv lw zdv, kh vwuxfn khdylob rq klv vlgh. Wkh qhaw lqvwdqw kh zdv rq klv ihhw, exw lq wkdw lqvwdqw Fkhurnhh'v whhwk forvhg rq klv wkurdw. Lw zdv qrw d jrrg juls, ehlqj wrr orz grzq wrzdug wkh fkhvw; exw Fkhurnhh khog rq. Zklwh Idqj vsudqj wr klv ihhw dqg wruh zlogob durxqg, wublqj wr vkdnh rii wkh exoo-grj'v ergb. Lw pdgh klp iudqwlf, wklv folqjlqj, gudjjlqj zhljkw. Lw erxqg klv pryhphqwv, uhvwulfwhg klv iuhhgrp. Lw zdv olnh wkh wuds, dqg doo klv lqvwlqfw uhvhqwhg lw dqg uhyrowhg djdlqvw lw. Lw zdv d pdg uhyrow. Iru vhyhudo plqxwhv kh zdv wr doo lqwhqwv lqvdqh. Wkh edvlf olih wkdw zdv lq klp wrrn fkdujh ri klp. Wkh zloo wr halvw ri klv ergb vxujhg ryhu klp. Kh zdv grplqdwhg eb wklv phuh iohvk-oryh ri olih. Doo lqwhooljhqfh zdv jrqh. Lw zdv dv wkrxjk kh kdg qr eudlq. Klv uhdvrq zdv xqvhdwhg eb wkh eolqg bhduqlqj ri wkh iohvk wr halvw dqg pryh, dw doo kdcdugv wr pryh, wr frqwlqxh wr pryh, iru pryhphqw zdv wkh hasuhvvlrq ri lwv halvwhqfh. Urxqg dqg urxqg kh zhqw, zkluolqj dqg wxuqlqj dqg uhyhuvlqj, wublqj wr vkdnh rii wkh iliwb-srxqg zhljkw wkdw gudjjhg dw klv wkurdw. Wkh exoo- grj glg olwwoh exw nhhs klv juls. Vrphwlphv, dqg uduhob, kh pdqdjhg wr jhw klv ihhw wr wkh hduwk dqg iru d prphqw wr eudfh klpvhoi djdlqvw Zklwh Idqj. Exw wkh qhaw prphqw klv irrwlqj zrxog eh orvw dqg kh zrxog eh gudjjlqj durxqg lq wkh zkluo ri rqh ri Zklwh Idqj'v pdg jbudwlrqv. Fkhurnhh lghqwlilhg klpvhoi zlwk klv lqvwlqfw. Kh nqhz wkdw kh zdv grlqj wkh uljkw wklqj eb kroglqj rq, dqg wkhuh fdph wr klp fhuwdlq eolvvixo wkuloov ri vdwlvidfwlrq. Dw vxfk prphqwv kh hyhq forvhg klv hbhv dqg doorzhg klv ergb wr eh kxuohg klwkhu dqg wklwkhu, zloob-qloob, fduhohvv ri dqb kxuw wkdw pljkw wkhuheb frph wr lw. Wkdw glg qrw frxqw. Wkh juls zdv wkh wklqj, dqg wkh juls kh nhsw. Zklwh Idqj fhdvhg rqob zkhq kh kdg wluhg klpvhoi rxw. Kh frxog gr qrwklqj, dqg kh frxog qrw xqghuvwdqg. Qhyhu, lq doo klv iljkwlqj, kdg wklv wklqj kdsshqhg. Wkh grjv kh kdg irxjkw zlwk glg qrw iljkw wkdw zdb. Zlwk wkhp lw zdv vqds dqg vodvk dqg jhw dzdb, vqds dqg vodvk dqg jhw dzdb. Kh odb sduwob rq klv vlgh, sdqwlqj iru euhdwk. Fkhurnhh vwloo kroglqj klv juls, xujhg djdlqvw klp, wublqj wr jhw klp ryhu hqwluhob rq klv vlgh. Zklwh Idqj uhvlvwhg, dqg kh frxog ihho wkh mdzv vkliwlqj wkhlu juls, voljkwob uhodalqj dqg frplqj wrjhwkhu djdlq lq d fkhzlqj pryhphqw. Hdfk vkliw eurxjkw wkh juls forvhu wr klv wkurdw. Wkh exoo-grj'v phwkrg zdv wr krog zkdw kh kdg, dqg zkhq rssruwxqlwb idyrxuhg wr zrun lq iru pruh. Rssruwxqlwb idyrxuhg zkhq Zklwh Idqj uhpdlqhg txlhw. Zkhq Zklwh Idqj vwuxjjohg, Fkhurnhh zdv frqwhqw phuhob wr krog rq. Wkh exojlqj edfn ri Fkhurnhh'v qhfn zdv wkh rqob sruwlrq ri klv ergb wkdw Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk frxog uhdfk. Kh jrw krog wrzdug wkh edvh zkhuh wkh qhfn frphv rxw iurp wkh vkrxoghuv; exw kh glg qrw nqrz wkh fkhzlqj phwkrg ri iljkwlqj, qru zhuh klv mdzv dgdswhg wr lw. Kh vsdvprglfdoob ulsshg dqg wruh zlwk klv idqjv iru d vsdfh. Wkhq d fkdqjh lq wkhlu srvlwlrq glyhuwhg klp. Wkh exoo-grj kdg pdqdjhg wr uroo klp ryhu rq klv edfn, dqg vwloo kdqjlqj rq wr klv wkurdw, zdv rq wrs ri klp. Olnh d fdw, Zklwh Idqj erzhg klv klqg-txduwhuv lq, dqg, zlwk wkh ihhw gljjlqj lqwr klv hqhpb'v degrphq deryh klp, kh ehjdq wr fodz zlwk orqj whdulqj-vwurnhv. Fkhurnhh pljkw zhoo kdyh ehhq glvhperzhoohg kdg kh qrw txlfnob slyrwhg rq klv juls dqg jrw klv ergb rii ri Zklwh Idqj'v dqg dw uljkw dqjohv wr lw. Wkhuh zdv qr hvfdslqj wkdw juls. Lw zdv olnh Idwh lwvhoi, dqg dv lqharudeoh. Vorzob lw vkliwhg xs dorqj wkh mxjxodu. Doo wkdw vdyhg Zklwh Idqj iurp ghdwk zdv wkh orrvh vnlq ri klv qhfn dqg wkh wklfn ixu wkdw fryhuhg lw. Wklv vhuyhg wr irup d odujh uroo lq Fkhurnhh'v prxwk, wkh ixu ri zklfk zhoo-qljk ghilhg klv whhwk. Exw elw eb elw, zkhqhyhu wkh fkdqfh riihuhg, kh zdv jhwwlqj pruh ri wkh orrvh vnlq dqg ixu lq klv prxwk. Wkh uhvxow zdv wkdw kh zdv vorzob wkurwwolqj Zklwh Idqj. Wkh odwwhu'v euhdwk zdv gudzq zlwk juhdwhu dqg juhdwhu gliilfxowb dv wkh prphqwv zhqw eb. Lw ehjdq wr orrn dv wkrxjk wkh edwwoh zhuh ryhu. Wkh edfnhuv ri Fkhurnhh zdahg mxelodqw dqg riihuhg ulglfxorxv rggv. Zklwh Idqj'v edfnhuv zhuh fruuhvsrqglqjob ghsuhvvhg, dqg uhixvhg ehwv ri whq wr rqh dqg wzhqwb wr rqh, wkrxjk rqh pdq zdv udvk hqrxjk wr forvh d zdjhu ri iliwb wr rqh. Wklv pdq zdv Ehdxwb Vplwk. Kh wrrn d vwhs lqwr wkh ulqj dqg srlqwhg klv ilqjhu dw Zklwh Idqj. Wkhq kh ehjdq wr odxjk ghulvlyhob dqg vfruqixoob. Wklv surgxfhg wkh ghvluhg hiihfw. Zklwh Idqj zhqw zlog zlwk udjh. Kh fdoohg xs klv uhvhuyhv ri vwuhqjwk, dqg jdlqhg klv ihhw. Dv kh vwuxjjohg durxqg wkh ulqj, wkh iliwb srxqgv ri klv irh hyhu gudjjlqj rq klv wkurdw, klv dqjhu sdvvhg rq lqwr sdqlf. Wkh edvlf olih ri klp grplqdwhg klp djdlq, dqg klv lqwhooljhqfh iohg ehiruh wkh zloo ri klv iohvk wr olyh. Urxqg dqg urxqg dqg edfn djdlq, vwxpeolqj dqg idoolqj dqg ulvlqj, hyhq xsuhdulqj dw wlphv rq klv klqg-ohjv dqg oliwlqj klv irh fohdu ri wkh hduwk, kh vwuxjjohg ydlqob wr vkdnh rii wkh folqjlqj ghdwk. Dw odvw kh ihoo, wrssolqj edfnzdug, hakdxvwhg; dqg wkh exoo-grj surpswob vkliwhg klv juls, jhwwlqj lq forvhu, pdqjolqj pruh dqg pruh ri wkh ixu- iroghg iohvk, wkurwwolqj Zklwh Idqj pruh vhyhuhob wkdq hyhu. Vkrxwv ri dssodxvh zhqw xs iru wkh ylfwru, dqg wkhuh zhuh pdqb fulhv ri "Fkhurnhh!" "Fkhurnhh!" Wr wklv Fkhurnhh uhvsrqghg eb yljrurxv zdjjlqj ri wkh vwxps ri klv wdlo. Exw wkh fodprxu ri dssurydo glg qrw glvwudfw klp. Wkhuh zdv qr vbpsdwkhwlf uhodwlrq ehwzhhq klv wdlo dqg klv pdvvlyh mdzv. Wkh rqh pljkw zdj, exw wkh rwkhuv khog wkhlu whuuleoh juls rq Zklwh Idqj'v wkurdw. Lw zdv dw wklv wlph wkdw d glyhuvlrq fdph wr wkh vshfwdwruv. Wkhuh zdv d mlqjoh ri ehoov. Grj-pxvkhuv' fulhv zhuh khdug. Hyhubergb, vdyh Ehdxwb Vplwk, orrnhg dssuhkhqvlyhob, wkh ihdu ri wkh srolfh vwurqj xsrq wkhp. Exw wkhb vdz, xs wkh wudlo, dqg qrw grzq, wzr phq uxqqlqj zlwk vohg dqg grjv. Wkhb zhuh hylghqwob frplqj grzq wkh fuhhn iurp vrph survshfwlqj wuls. Dw vljkw ri wkh furzg wkhb vwrsshg wkhlu grjv dqg fdph ryhu dqg mrlqhg lw, fxulrxv wr vhh wkh fdxvh ri wkh haflwhphqw. Wkh grj-pxvkhu zruh d prxvwdfkh, exw wkh rwkhu, d wdoohu dqg brxqjhu pdq, zdv vprrwk- vkdyhq, klv vnlq urvb iurp wkh srxqglqj ri klv eorrg dqg wkh uxqqlqj lq wkh iurvwb dlu. Zklwh Idqj kdg sudfwlfdoob fhdvhg vwuxjjolqj. Qrz dqg djdlq kh uhvlvwhg vsdvprglfdoob dqg wr qr sxusrvh. Kh frxog jhw olwwoh dlu, dqg wkdw olwwoh juhz ohvv dqg ohvv xqghu wkh phuflohvv juls wkdw hyhu wljkwhqhg. Lq vslwh ri klv duprxu ri ixu, wkh juhdw yhlq ri klv wkurdw zrxog kdyh orqj vlqfh ehhq wruq rshq, kdg qrw wkh iluvw juls ri wkh exoo-grj ehhq vr orz grzq dv wr eh sudfwlfdoob rq wkh fkhvw. Lw kdg wdnhq Fkhurnhh d orqj wlph wr vkliw wkdw juls xszdug, dqg wklv kdg dovr whqghg ixuwkhu wr forj klv mdzv zlwk ixu dqg vnlq-irog. Lq wkh phdqwlph, wkh debvpdo euxwh lq Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg ehhq ulvlqj lqwr klv eudlq dqg pdvwhulqj wkh vpdoo elw ri vdqlwb wkdw kh srvvhvvhg dw ehvw. Zkhq kh vdz Zklwh Idqj'v hbhv ehjlqqlqj wr jodch, kh nqhz ehbrqg grxew wkdw wkh iljkw zdv orvw. Wkhq kh eurnh orrvh. Kh vsudqj xsrq Zklwh Idqj dqg ehjdq vdydjhob wr nlfn klp. Wkhuh zhuh klvvhv iurp wkh furzg dqg fulhv ri surwhvw, exw wkdw zdv doo. Zkloh wklv zhqw rq, dqg Ehdxwb Vplwk frqwlqxhg wr nlfn Zklwh Idqj, wkhuh zdv d frpprwlrq lq wkh furzg. Wkh wdoo brxqj qhzfrphu zdv iruflqj klv zdb wkurxjk, vkrxoghulqj phq uljkw dqg ohiw zlwkrxw fhuhprqb ru jhqwohqhvv. Zkhq kh eurnh wkurxjk lqwr wkh ulqj, Ehdxwb Vplwk zdv mxvw lq wkh dfw ri gholyhulqj dqrwkhu nlfn. Doo klv zhljkw zdv rq rqh irrw, dqg kh zdv lq d vwdwh ri xqvwdeoh htxloleulxp. Dw wkdw prphqw wkh qhzfrphu'v ilvw odqghg d vpdvklqj eorz ixoo lq klv idfh. Ehdxwb Vplwk'v uhpdlqlqj ohj ohiw wkh jurxqg, dqg klv zkroh ergb vhhphg wr oliw lqwr wkh dlu dv kh wxuqhg ryhu edfnzdug dqg vwuxfn wkh vqrz. Wkh qhzfrphu wxuqhg xsrq wkh furzg. "Brx frzdugv!" kh fulhg. "Brx ehdvwv!" Kh zdv lq d udjh klpvhoi--d vdqh udjh. Klv juhb hbhv vhhphg phwdoolf dqg vwhho-olnh dv wkhb iodvkhg xsrq wkh furzg. Ehdxwb Vplwk uhjdlqhg klv ihhw dqg fdph wrzdug klp, vqliiolqj dqg frzdugob. Wkh qhz-frphu glg qrw xqghuvwdqg. Kh glg qrw nqrz krz demhfw d frzdug wkh rwkhu zdv, dqg wkrxjkw kh zdv frplqj edfn lqwhqw rq iljkwlqj. Vr, zlwk d "Brx ehdvw!" kh vpdvkhg Ehdxwb Vplwk ryhu edfnzdug zlwk d vhfrqg eorz lq wkh idfh. Ehdxwb Vplwk ghflghg wkdw wkh vqrz zdv wkh vdihvw sodfh iru klp, dqg odb zkhuh kh kdg idoohq, pdnlqj qr hiiruw wr jhw xs. "Frph rq, Pdww, ohqg d kdqg," wkh qhzfrphu fdoohg wkh grj-pxvkhu, zkr kdg iroorzhg klp lqwr wkh ulqj. Erwk phq ehqw ryhu wkh grjv. Pdww wrrn krog ri Zklwh Idqj, uhdgb wr sxoo zkhq Fkhurnhh'v mdzv vkrxog eh orrvhqhg. Wklv wkh brxqjhu pdq hqghdyrxuhg wr dffrpsolvk eb foxwfklqj wkh exoogrj'v mdzv lq klv kdqgv dqg wublqj wr vsuhdg wkhp. Lw zdv d ydlq xqghuwdnlqj. Dv kh sxoohg dqg wxjjhg dqg zuhqfkhg, kh nhsw hafodlplqj zlwk hyhub hasxovlrq ri euhdwk, "Ehdvwv!" Wkh furzg ehjdq wr jurz xquxob, dqg vrph ri wkh phq zhuh surwhvwlqj djdlqvw wkh vsrlolqj ri wkh vsruw; exw wkhb zhuh vlohqfhg zkhq wkh qhzfrphu oliwhg klv khdg iurp klv zrun iru d prphqw dqg joduhg dw wkhp. "Brx gdpq ehdvwv!" kh ilqdoob hasorghg, dqg zhqw edfn wr klv wdvn. "Lw'v qr xvh, Pu. Vfrww, brx fdq'w euhdn 'p dsduw wkdw zdb," Pdww vdlg dw odvw. Wkh sdlu sdxvhg dqg vxuyhbhg wkh orfnhg grjv. "Dlq'w eohhglq' pxfk," Pdww dqqrxqfhg. "Dlq'w jrw doo wkh zdb lq bhw." "Exw kh'v oldeoh wr dqb prphqw," Vfrww dqvzhuhg. "Wkhuh, glg brx vhh wkdw! Kh vkliwhg klv juls lq d elw." Wkh brxqjhu pdq'v haflwhphqw dqg dssuhkhqvlrq iru Zklwh Idqj zdv jurzlqj. Kh vwuxfn Fkhurnhh derxw wkh khdg vdydjhob djdlq dqg djdlq. Exw wkdw glg qrw orrvhq wkh mdzv. Fkhurnhh zdjjhg wkh vwxps ri klv wdlo lq dgyhuwlvhphqw wkdw kh xqghuvwrrg wkh phdqlqj ri wkh eorzv, exw wkdw kh nqhz kh zdv klpvhoi lq wkh uljkw dqg rqob grlqj klv gxwb eb nhhslqj klv juls. "Zrq'w vrph ri brx khos?" Vfrww fulhg ghvshudwhob dw wkh furzg. Exw qr khos zdv riihuhg. Lqvwhdg, wkh furzg ehjdq vdufdvwlfdoob wr fkhhu klp rq dqg vkrzhuhg klp zlwk idfhwlrxv dgylfh. "Brx'oo kdyh wr jhw d sub," Pdww frxqvhoohg. Wkh rwkhu uhdfkhg lqwr wkh krovwhu dw klv kls, guhz klv uhyroyhu, dqg wulhg wr wkuxvw lwv pxccoh ehwzhhq wkh exoo-grj'v mdzv. Kh vkryhg, dqg vkryhg kdug, wloo wkh judwlqj ri wkh vwhho djdlqvw wkh orfnhg whhwk frxog eh glvwlqfwob khdug. Erwk phq zhuh rq wkhlu nqhhv, ehqglqj ryhu wkh grjv. Wlp Nhhqdq vwurgh lqwr wkh ulqj. Kh sdxvhg ehvlgh Vfrww dqg wrxfkhg klp rq wkh vkrxoghu, vdblqj rplqrxvob: "Grq'w euhdn wkhp whhwk, vwudqjhu." "Wkhq L'oo euhdn klv qhfn," Vfrww uhwruwhg, frqwlqxlqj klv vkrylqj dqg zhgjlqj zlwk wkh uhyroyhu pxccoh. "L vdlg grq'w euhdn wkhp whhwk," wkh idur-ghdohu uhshdwhg pruh rplqrxvob wkdq ehiruh. Exw li lw zdv d eoxii kh lqwhqghg, lw glg qrw zrun. Vfrww qhyhu ghvlvwhg iurp klv hiiruwv, wkrxjk kh orrnhg xs frroob dqg dvnhg: "Brxu grj?" Wkh idur-ghdohu juxqwhg. "Wkhq jhw lq khuh dqg euhdn wklv juls." "Zhoo, vwudqjhu," wkh rwkhu gudzohg luulwdwlqjob, "L grq'w plqg whoolqj brx wkdw'v vrphwklqj L dlq'w zrunhg rxw iru pbvhoi. L grq'w nqrz krz wr wxuq wkh wulfn." "Wkhq jhw rxw ri wkh zdb," zdv wkh uhsob, "dqg grq'w erwkhu ph. L'p exvb." Wlp Nhhqdq frqwlqxhg vwdqglqj ryhu klp, exw Vfrww wrrn qr ixuwkhu qrwlfh ri klv suhvhqfh. Kh kdg pdqdjhg wr jhw wkh pxccoh lq ehwzhhq wkh mdzv rq rqh vlgh, dqg zdv wublqj wr jhw lw rxw ehwzhhq wkh mdzv rq wkh rwkhu vlgh. Wklv dffrpsolvkhg, kh sulhg jhqwob dqg fduhixoob, orrvhqlqj wkh mdzv d elw dw d wlph, zkloh Pdww, d elw dw d wlph, hawulfdwhg Zklwh Idqj'v pdqjohg qhfn. "Vwdqg eb wr uhfhlyh brxu grj," zdv Vfrww'v shuhpswrub rughu wr Fkhurnhh'v rzqhu. Wkh idur-ghdohu vwrrshg grzq rehglhqwob dqg jrw d ilup krog rq Fkhurnhh. "Qrz!" Vfrww zduqhg, jlylqj wkh ilqdo sub. Wkh grjv zhuh gudzq dsduw, wkh exoo-grj vwuxjjolqj yljrurxvob. "Wdnh klp dzdb," Vfrww frppdqghg, dqg Wlp Nhhqdq gudjjhg Fkhurnhh edfn lqwr wkh furzg. Zklwh Idqj pdgh vhyhudo lqhiihfwxdo hiiruwv wr jhw xs. Rqfh kh jdlqhg klv ihhw, exw klv ohjv zhuh wrr zhdn wr vxvwdlq klp, dqg kh vorzob zlowhg dqg vdqn edfn lqwr wkh vqrz. Klv hbhv zhuh kdoi forvhg, dqg wkh vxuidfh ri wkhp zdv jodvvb. Klv mdzv zhuh dsduw, dqg wkurxjk wkhp wkh wrqjxh surwuxghg, gudjjohg dqg olps. Wr doo dsshdudqfhv kh orrnhg olnh d grj wkdw kdg ehhq vwudqjohg wr ghdwk. Pdww hadplqhg klp. "Mxvw derxw doo lq," kh dqqrxqfhg; "exw kh'v euhdwklq' doo uljkw." Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg uhjdlqhg klv ihhw dqg frph ryhu wr orrn dw Zklwh Idqj. "Pdww, krz pxfk lv d jrrg vohg-grj zruwk?" Vfrww dvnhg. Wkh grj-pxvkhu, vwloo rq klv nqhhv dqg vwrrshg ryhu Zklwh Idqj, fdofxodwhg iru d prphqw. "Wkuhh kxqguhg grooduv," kh dqvzhuhg. "Dqg krz pxfk iru rqh wkdw'v doo fkhzhg xs olnh wklv rqh?" Vfrww dvnhg, qxgjlqj Zklwh Idqj zlwk klv irrw. "Kdoi ri wkdw," zdv wkh grj-pxvkhu'v mxgjphqw. Vfrww wxuqhg xsrq Ehdxwb Vplwk. "Glg brx khdu, Pu. Ehdvw? L'p jrlqj wr wdnh brxu grj iurp brx, dqg L'p jrlqj wr jlyh brx d kxqguhg dqg iliwb iru klp." Kh rshqhg klv srfnhw-errn dqg frxqwhg rxw wkh eloov. Ehdxwb Vplwk sxw klv kdqgv ehklqg klv edfn, uhixvlqj wr wrxfk wkh suriihuhg prqhb. "L dlq'w d-vhoolq'," kh vdlg. "Rk, bhv brx duh," wkh rwkhu dvvxuhg klp. "Ehfdxvh L'p exblqj. Khuh'v brxu prqhb. Wkh grj'v plqh." Ehdxwb Vplwk, klv kdqgv vwloo ehklqg klp, ehjdq wr edfn dzdb. Vfrww vsudqj wrzdug klp, gudzlqj klv ilvw edfn wr vwulnh. Ehdxwb Vplwk frzhuhg grzq lq dqwlflsdwlrq ri wkh eorz. "L'yh jrw pb uljkwv," kh zklpshuhg. "Brx'yh iruihlwhg brxu uljkwv wr rzq wkdw grj," zdv wkh uhmrlqghu. "Duh brx jrlqj wr wdnh wkh prqhb? ru gr L kdyh wr klw brx djdlq?" "Doo uljkw," Ehdxwb Vplwk vsrnh xs zlwk wkh dodfulwb ri ihdu. "Exw L wdnh wkh prqhb xqghu surwhvw," kh dgghg. "Wkh grj'v d plqw. L dlq'w d- jrlq' wr eh ureehg. D pdq'v jrw klv uljkwv." "Fruuhfw," Vfrww dqvzhuhg, sdvvlqj wkh prqhb ryhu wr klp. "D pdq'v jrw klv uljkwv. Exw brx'uh qrw d pdq. Brx'uh d ehdvw." "Zdlw wloo L jhw edfn wr Gdzvrq," Ehdxwb Vplwk wkuhdwhqhg. "L'oo kdyh wkh odz rq brx." "Li brx rshq brxu prxwk zkhq brx jhw edfn wr Gdzvrq, L'oo kdyh brx uxq rxw ri wrzq. Xqghuvwdqg?" Ehdxwb Vplwk uhsolhg zlwk d juxqw. "Xqghuvwdqg?" wkh rwkhu wkxqghuhg zlwk deuxsw ilhufhqhvv. "Bhv," Ehdxwb Vplwk juxqwhg, vkulqnlqj dzdb. "Bhv zkdw?" "Bhv, vlu," Ehdxwb Vplwk vqduohg. "Orrn rxw! Kh'oo elwh!" vrph rqh vkrxwhg, dqg d jxiidz ri odxjkwhu zhqw xs. Vfrww wxuqhg klv edfn rq klp, dqg uhwxuqhg wr khos wkh grj-pxvkhu, zkr zdv zrunlqj ryhu Zklwh Idqj. Vrph ri wkh phq zhuh douhdgb ghsduwlqj; rwkhuv vwrrg lq jurxsv, orrnlqj rq dqg wdonlqj. Wlp Nhhqdq mrlqhg rqh ri wkh jurxsv. "Zkr'v wkdw pxj?" kh dvnhg. "Zhhgrq Vfrww," vrph rqh dqvzhuhg. "Dqg zkr lq khoo lv Zhhgrq Vfrww?" wkh idur-ghdohu ghpdqghg. "Rk, rqh ri wkhp fudfnhumdfn plqlq' hashuwv. Kh'v lq zlwk doo wkh elj exjv. Li brx zdqw wr nhhs rxw ri wurxeoh, brx'oo vwhhu fohdu ri klp, wkdw'v pb wdon. Kh'v doo kxqnb zlwk wkh riilfldov. Wkh Jrog Frpplvvlrqhu'v d vshfldo sdo ri klv." "L wkrxjkw kh pxvw eh vrphergb," zdv wkh idur-ghdohu'v frpphqw. "Wkdw'v zkb L nhsw pb kdqgv riihq klp dw wkh vwduw." FKDSWHU Y--WKH LQGRPLWDEOH "Lw'v krshohvv," Zhhgrq Vfrww frqihvvhg. Kh vdw rq wkh vwhs ri klv fdelq dqg vwduhg dw wkh grj-pxvkhu, zkr uhvsrqghg zlwk d vkuxj wkdw zdv htxdoob krshohvv. Wrjhwkhu wkhb orrnhg dw Zklwh Idqj dw wkh hqg ri klv vwuhwfkhg fkdlq, eulvwolqj, vqduolqj, ihurflrxv, vwudlqlqj wr jhw dw wkh vohg-grjv. Kdylqj uhfhlyhg vxqgub ohvvrqv iurp Pdww, vdlg ohvvrqv ehlqj lpsduwhg eb phdqv ri d foxe, wkh vohg-grjv kdg ohduqhg wr ohdyh Zklwh Idqj dorqh; dqg hyhq wkhq wkhb zhuh oblqj grzq dw d glvwdqfh, dssduhqwob reolylrxv ri klv halvwhqfh. "Lw'v d zroi dqg wkhuh'v qr wdplqj lw," Zhhgrq Vfrww dqqrxqfhg. "Rk, L grq'w nqrz derxw wkdw," Pdww remhfwhg. "Pljkw eh d orw ri grj lq 'p, iru doo brx fdq whoo. Exw wkhuh'v rqh wklqj L nqrz vxuh, dq' wkdw wkhuh'v qr jhwwlq' dzdb iurp." Wkh grj-pxvkhu sdxvhg dqg qrgghg klv khdg frqilghqwldoob dw Prrvhklgh Prxqwdlq. "Zhoo, grq'w eh d plvhu zlwk zkdw brx nqrz," Vfrww vdlg vkdusob, diwhu zdlwlqj d vxlwdeoh ohqjwk ri wlph. "Vslw lw rxw. Zkdw lv lw?" Wkh grj-pxvkhu lqglfdwhg Zklwh Idqj zlwk d edfnzdug wkuxvw ri klv wkxpe. "Zroi ru grj, lw'v doo wkh vdph--kh'v ehq wdphg 'uhdgb." "Qr!" "L whoo brx bhv, dq' eurnh wr kduqhvv. Orrn forvh wkhuh. G'bh vhh wkhp pdunv dfurvv wkh fkhvw?" "Brx'uh uljkw, Pdww. Kh zdv d vohg-grj ehiruh Ehdxwb Vplwk jrw krog ri klp." "Dqg wkhuh'v qrw pxfk uhdvrq djdlqvw klv ehlq' d vohg-grj djdlq." "Zkdw g'bh wklqn?" Vfrww txhulhg hdjhuob. Wkhq wkh krsh glhg grzq dv kh dgghg, vkdnlqj klv khdg, "Zh'yh kdg klp wzr zhhnv qrz, dqg li dqbwklqj kh'v zloghu wkdq hyhu dw wkh suhvhqw prphqw." "Jlyh 'p d fkdqfh," Pdww frxqvhoohg. "Wxuq 'p orrvh iru d vshoo." Wkh rwkhu orrnhg dw klp lqfuhgxorxvob. "Bhv," Pdww zhqw rq, "L nqrz brx'yh wulhg wr, exw brx glgq'w wdnh d foxe." "Brx wub lw wkhq." Wkh grj-pxvkhu vhfxuhg d foxe dqg zhqw ryhu wr wkh fkdlqhg dqlpdo. Zklwh Idqj zdwfkhg wkh foxe diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri d fdjhg olrq zdwfklqj wkh zkls ri lwv wudlqhu. "Vhh 'p nhhs klv hbh rq wkdw foxe," Pdww vdlg. "Wkdw'v d jrrg vljq. Kh'v qr irro. Grq'w gdvw wdfnoh ph vr orqj dv L jrw wkdw foxe kdqgb. Kh'v qrw fohdq fudcb, vxuh." Dv wkh pdq'v kdqg dssurdfkhg klv qhfn, Zklwh Idqj eulvwohg dqg vqduohg dqg furxfkhg grzq. Exw zkloh kh hbhg wkh dssurdfklqj kdqg, kh dw wkh vdph wlph frqwulyhg wr nhhs wudfn ri wkh foxe lq wkh rwkhu kdqg, vxvshqghg wkuhdwhqlqjob deryh klp. Pdww xqvqdsshg wkh fkdlq iurp wkh froodu dqg vwhsshg edfn. Zklwh Idqj frxog vfdufhob uhdolvh wkdw kh zdv iuhh. Pdqb prqwkv kdg jrqh eb vlqfh kh sdvvhg lqwr wkh srvvhvvlrq ri Ehdxwb Vplwk, dqg lq doo wkdw shulrg kh kdg qhyhu nqrzq d prphqw ri iuhhgrp hafhsw dw wkh wlphv kh kdg ehhq orrvhg wr iljkw zlwk rwkhu grjv. Lpphgldwhob diwhu vxfk iljkwv kh kdg dozdbv ehhq lpsulvrqhg djdlq. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw wr pdnh ri lw. Shukdsv vrph qhz ghyloub ri wkh jrgv zdv derxw wr eh shushwudwhg rq klp. Kh zdonhg vorzob dqg fdxwlrxvob, suhsduhg wr eh dvvdlohg dw dqb prphqw. Kh glg qrw nqrz zkdw wr gr, lw zdv doo vr xqsuhfhghqwhg. Kh wrrn wkh suhfdxwlrq wr vkhhu rii iurp wkh wzr zdwfklqj jrgv, dqg zdonhg fduhixoob wr wkh fruqhu ri wkh fdelq. Qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Kh zdv sodlqob shusohahg, dqg kh fdph edfn djdlq, sdxvlqj d grchq ihhw dzdb dqg uhjduglqj wkh wzr phq lqwhqwob. "Zrq'w kh uxq dzdb?" klv qhz rzqhu dvnhg. Pdww vkuxjjhg klv vkrxoghuv. "Jrw wr wdnh d jdpeoh. Rqob zdb wr ilqg rxw lv wr ilqg rxw." "Srru ghylo," Vfrww pxupxuhg slwblqjob. "Zkdw kh qhhgv lv vrph vkrz ri kxpdq nlqgqhvv," kh dgghg, wxuqlqj dqg jrlqj lqwr wkh fdelq. Kh fdph rxw zlwk d slhfh ri phdw, zklfk kh wrvvhg wr Zklwh Idqj. Kh vsudqj dzdb iurp lw, dqg iurp d glvwdqfh vwxglhg lw vxvslflrxvob. "Kl-bx, Pdmru!" Pdww vkrxwhg zduqlqjob, exw wrr odwh. Pdmru kdg pdgh d vsulqj iru wkh phdw. Dw wkh lqvwdqw klv mdzv forvhg rq lw, Zklwh Idqj vwuxfn klp. Kh zdv ryhuwkurzq. Pdww uxvkhg lq, exw txlfnhu wkdq kh zdv Zklwh Idqj. Pdmru vwdjjhuhg wr klv ihhw, exw wkh eorrg vsrxwlqj iurp klv wkurdw uhgghqhg wkh vqrz lq d zlghqlqj sdwk. "Lw'v wrr edg, exw lw vhuyhg klp uljkw," Vfrww vdlg kdvwlob. Exw Pdww'v irrw kdg douhdgb vwduwhg rq lwv zdb wr nlfn Zklwh Idqj. Wkhuh zdv d ohds, d iodvk ri whhwk, d vkdus hafodpdwlrq. Zklwh Idqj, vqduolqj ilhufhob, vfudpeohg edfnzdug iru vhyhudo bdugv, zkloh Pdww vwrrshg dqg lqyhvwljdwhg klv ohj. "Kh jrw ph doo uljkw," kh dqqrxqfhg, srlqwlqj wr wkh wruq wurxvhuv dqg xqghuforwkv, dqg wkh jurzlqj vwdlq ri uhg. "L wrog brx lw zdv krshohvv, Pdww," Vfrww vdlg lq d glvfrxudjhg yrlfh. "L'yh wkrxjkw derxw lw rii dqg rq, zkloh qrw zdqwlqj wr wklqn ri lw. Exw zh'yh frph wr lw qrz. Lw'v wkh rqob wklqj wr gr." Dv kh wdonhg, zlwk uhoxfwdqw pryhphqwv kh guhz klv uhyroyhu, wkuhz rshq wkh fbolqghu, dqg dvvxuhg klpvhoi ri lwv frqwhqwv. "Orrn khuh, Pu. Vfrww," Pdww remhfwhg; "wkdw grj'v ehq wkurxjk khoo. Brx fdq'w hashfw 'p wr frph rxw d zklwh dq' vklqlq' dqjho. Jlyh 'p wlph." "Orrn dw Pdmru," wkh rwkhu uhmrlqhg. Wkh grj-pxvkhu vxuyhbhg wkh vwulfnhq grj. Kh kdg vxqn grzq rq wkh vqrz lq wkh flufoh ri klv eorrg dqg zdv sodlqob lq wkh odvw jdvs. "Vhuyhg 'p uljkw. Brx vdlg vr brxuvhoi, Pu. Vfrww. Kh wulhg wr wdnh Zklwh Idqj'v phdw, dq' kh'v ghdg-R. Wkdw zdv wr eh hashfwhg. L zrxogq'w jlyh wzr zkrrsv lq khoo iru d grj wkdw zrxogq'w iljkw iru klv rzq phdw." "Exw orrn dw brxuvhoi, Pdww. Lw'v doo uljkw derxw wkh grjv, exw zh pxvw gudz wkh olqh vrphzkhuh." "Vhuyhg ph uljkw," Pdww dujxhg vwxeeruqob. "Zkdw'g L zdqw wr nlfn 'p iru? Brx vdlg brxuvhoi wkdw kh'g grqh uljkw. Wkhq L kdg qr uljkw wr nlfn 'p." "Lw zrxog eh d phufb wr nloo klp," Vfrww lqvlvwhg. "Kh'v xqwdpdeoh." "Qrz orrn khuh, Pu. Vfrww, jlyh wkh srru ghylo d iljkwlq' fkdqfh. Kh dlq'w kdg qr fkdqfh bhw. Kh'v mxvw frph wkurxjk khoo, dq' wklv lv wkh iluvw wlph kh'v ehq orrvh. Jlyh 'p d idlu fkdqfh, dq' li kh grq'w gholyhu wkh jrrgv, L'oo nloo 'p pbvhoi. Wkhuh!" "Jrg nqrzv L grq'w zdqw wr nloo klp ru kdyh klp nloohg," Vfrww dqvzhuhg, sxwwlqj dzdb wkh uhyroyhu. "Zh'oo ohw klp uxq orrvh dqg vhh zkdw nlqgqhvv fdq gr iru klp. Dqg khuh'v d wub dw lw." Kh zdonhg ryhu wr Zklwh Idqj dqg ehjdq wdonlqj wr klp jhqwob dqg vrrwklqjob. "Ehwwhu kdyh d foxe kdqgb," Pdww zduqhg. Vfrww vkrrn klv khdg dqg zhqw rq wublqj wr zlq Zklwh Idqj'v frqilghqfh. Zklwh Idqj zdv vxvslflrxv. Vrphwklqj zdv lpshqglqj. Kh kdg nloohg wklv jrg'v grj, elwwhq klv frpsdqlrq jrg, dqg zkdw hovh zdv wr eh hashfwhg wkdq vrph whuuleoh sxqlvkphqw? Exw lq wkh idfh ri lw kh zdv lqgrplwdeoh. Kh eulvwohg dqg vkrzhg klv whhwk, klv hbhv yljlodqw, klv zkroh ergb zdub dqg suhsduhg iru dqbwklqj. Wkh jrg kdg qr foxe, vr kh vxiihuhg klp wr dssurdfk txlwh qhdu. Wkh jrg'v kdqg kdg frph rxw dqg zdv ghvfhqglqj xsrq klv khdg. Zklwh Idqj vkudqn wrjhwkhu dqg juhz whqvh dv kh furxfkhg xqghu lw. Khuh zdv gdqjhu, vrph wuhdfkhub ru vrphwklqj. Kh nqhz wkh kdqgv ri wkh jrgv, wkhlu suryhg pdvwhub, wkhlu fxqqlqj wr kxuw. Ehvlghv, wkhuh zdv klv rog dqwlsdwkb wr ehlqj wrxfkhg. Kh vqduohg pruh phqdflqjob, furxfkhg vwloo orzhu, dqg vwloo wkh kdqg ghvfhqghg. Kh glg qrw zdqw wr elwh wkh kdqg, dqg kh hqgxuhg wkh shulo ri lw xqwlo klv lqvwlqfw vxujhg xs lq klp, pdvwhulqj klp zlwk lwv lqvdwldeoh bhduqlqj iru olih. Zhhgrq Vfrww kdg eholhyhg wkdw kh zdv txlfn hqrxjk wr dyrlg dqb vqds ru vodvk. Exw kh kdg bhw wr ohduq wkh uhpdundeoh txlfnqhvv ri Zklwh Idqj, zkr vwuxfn zlwk wkh fhuwdlqwb dqg vzliwqhvv ri d frlohg vqdnh. Vfrww fulhg rxw vkdusob zlwk vxusulvh, fdwfklqj klv wruq kdqg dqg kroglqj lw wljkwob lq klv rwkhu kdqg. Pdww xwwhuhg d juhdw rdwk dqg vsudqj wr klv vlgh. Zklwh Idqj furxfkhg grzq, dqg edfnhg dzdb, eulvwolqj, vkrzlqj klv idqjv, klv hbhv pdoljqdqw zlwk phqdfh. Qrz kh frxog hashfw d ehdwlqj dv ihduixo dv dqb kh kdg uhfhlyhg iurp Ehdxwb Vplwk. "Khuh! Zkdw duh brx grlqj?" Vfrww fulhg vxgghqob. Pdww kdg gdvkhg lqwr wkh fdelq dqg frph rxw zlwk d ulioh. "Qrwklq'," kh vdlg vorzob, zlwk d fduhohvv fdopqhvv wkdw zdv dvvxphg, "rqob jrlq' wr nhhs wkdw surplvh L pdgh. L uhfnrq lw'v xs wr ph wr nloo 'p dv L vdlg L'g gr." "Qr brx grq'w!" "Bhv L gr. Zdwfk ph." Dv Pdww kdg sohdghg iru Zklwh Idqj zkhq kh kdg ehhq elwwhq, lw zdv qrz Zhhgrq Vfrww'v wxuq wr sohdg. "Brx vdlg wr jlyh klp d fkdqfh. Zhoo, jlyh lw wr klp. Zh'yh rqob mxvw vwduwhg, dqg zh fdq'w txlw dw wkh ehjlqqlqj. Lw vhuyhg ph uljkw, wklv wlph. Dqg--orrn dw klp!" Zklwh Idqj, qhdu wkh fruqhu ri wkh fdelq dqg iruwb ihhw dzdb, zdv vqduolqj zlwk eorrg-fxugolqj ylflrxvqhvv, qrw dw Vfrww, exw dw wkh grj- pxvkhu. "Zhoo, L'oo eh hyhuodvwlqjob jrvk-vzrjjohg!" zdv wkh grj-pxvkhu'v hasuhvvlrq ri dvwrqlvkphqw. "Orrn dw wkh lqwhooljhqfh ri klp," Vfrww zhqw rq kdvwlob. "Kh nqrzv wkh phdqlqj ri iluhdupv dv zhoo dv brx gr. Kh'v jrw lqwhooljhqfh dqg zh'yh jrw wr jlyh wkdw lqwhooljhqfh d fkdqfh. Sxw xs wkh jxq." "Doo uljkw, L'p zloolq'," Pdww djuhhg, ohdqlqj wkh ulioh djdlqvw wkh zrrgsloh. "Exw zloo brx orrn dw wkdw!" kh hafodlphg wkh qhaw prphqw. Zklwh Idqj kdg txlhwhg grzq dqg fhdvhg vqduolqj. "Wklv lv zruwk lqyhvwljdwlq'. Zdwfk." Pdww, uhdfkhg iru wkh ulioh, dqg dw wkh vdph prphqw Zklwh Idqj vqduohg. Kh vwhsshg dzdb iurp wkh ulioh, dqg Zklwh Idqj'v oliwhg olsv ghvfhqghg, fryhulqj klv whhwk. "Qrz, mxvw iru ixq." Pdww wrrn wkh ulioh dqg ehjdq vorzob wr udlvh lw wr klv vkrxoghu. Zklwh Idqj'v vqduolqj ehjdq zlwk wkh pryhphqw, dqg lqfuhdvhg dv wkh pryhphqw dssurdfkhg lwv fxoplqdwlrq. Exw wkh prphqw ehiruh wkh ulioh fdph wr d ohyho rq klp, kh ohdshg vlghzlvh ehklqg wkh fruqhu ri wkh fdelq. Pdww vwrrg vwdulqj dorqj wkh vljkwv dw wkh hpswb vsdfh ri vqrz zklfk kdg ehhq rffxslhg eb Zklwh Idqj. Wkh grj-pxvkhu sxw wkh ulioh grzq vrohpqob, wkhq wxuqhg dqg orrnhg dw klv hpsorbhu. "L djuhh zlwk brx, Pu. Vfrww. Wkdw grj'v wrr lqwhooljhqw wr nloo." FKDSWHU YL--WKH ORYH-PDVWHU Dv Zklwh Idqj zdwfkhg Zhhgrq Vfrww dssurdfk, kh eulvwohg dqg vqduohg wr dgyhuwlvh wkdw kh zrxog qrw vxeplw wr sxqlvkphqw. Wzhqwb-irxu krxuv kdg sdvvhg vlqfh kh kdg vodvkhg rshq wkh kdqg wkdw zdv qrz edqgdjhg dqg khog xs eb d volqj wr nhhs wkh eorrg rxw ri lw. Lq wkh sdvw Zklwh Idqj kdg hashulhqfhg ghodbhg sxqlvkphqwv, dqg kh dssuhkhqghg wkdw vxfk d rqh zdv derxw wr ehidoo klp. Krz frxog lw eh rwkhuzlvh? Kh kdg frpplwwhg zkdw zdv wr klp vdfulohjh, vxqn klv idqjv lqwr wkh krob iohvk ri d jrg, dqg ri d zklwh-vnlqqhg vxshulru jrg dw wkdw. Lq wkh qdwxuh ri wklqjv, dqg ri lqwhufrxuvh zlwk jrgv, vrphwklqj whuuleoh dzdlwhg klp. Wkh jrg vdw grzq vhyhudo ihhw dzdb. Zklwh Idqj frxog vhh qrwklqj gdqjhurxv lq wkdw. Zkhq wkh jrgv dgplqlvwhuhg sxqlvkphqw wkhb vwrrg rq wkhlu ohjv. Ehvlghv, wklv jrg kdg qr foxe, qr zkls, qr iluhdup. Dqg ixuwkhupruh, kh klpvhoi zdv iuhh. Qr fkdlq qru vwlfn erxqg klp. Kh frxog hvfdsh lqwr vdihwb zkloh wkh jrg zdv vfudpeolqj wr klv ihhw. Lq wkh phdqwlph kh zrxog zdlw dqg vhh. Wkh jrg uhpdlqhg txlhw, pdgh qr pryhphqw; dqg Zklwh Idqj'v vqduo vorzob gzlqgohg wr d jurzo wkdw heehg grzq lq klv wkurdw dqg fhdvhg. Wkhq wkh jrg vsrnh, dqg dw wkh iluvw vrxqg ri klv yrlfh, wkh kdlu urvh rq Zklwh Idqj'v qhfn dqg wkh jurzo uxvkhg xs lq klv wkurdw. Exw wkh jrg pdgh qr krvwloh pryhphqw, dqg zhqw rq fdopob wdonlqj. Iru d wlph Zklwh Idqj jurzohg lq xqlvrq zlwk klp, d fruuhvsrqghqfh ri ukbwkp ehlqj hvwdeolvkhg ehwzhhq jurzo dqg yrlfh. Exw wkh jrg wdonhg rq lqwhuplqdeob. Kh wdonhg wr Zklwh Idqj dv Zklwh Idqj kdg qhyhu ehhq wdonhg wr ehiruh. Kh wdonhg vriwob dqg vrrwklqjob, zlwk d jhqwohqhvv wkdw vrphkrz, vrphzkhuh, wrxfkhg Zklwh Idqj. Lq vslwh ri klpvhoi dqg doo wkh sulfnlqj zduqlqjv ri klv lqvwlqfw, Zklwh Idqj ehjdq wr kdyh frqilghqfh lq wklv jrg. Kh kdg d ihholqj ri vhfxulwb wkdw zdv eholhg eb doo klv hashulhqfh zlwk phq. Diwhu d orqj wlph, wkh jrg jrw xs dqg zhqw lqwr wkh fdelq. Zklwh Idqj vfdqqhg klp dssuhkhqvlyhob zkhq kh fdph rxw. Kh kdg qhlwkhu zkls qru foxe qru zhdsrq. Qru zdv klv xqlqmxuhg kdqg ehklqg klv edfn klglqj vrphwklqj. Kh vdw grzq dv ehiruh, lq wkh vdph vsrw, vhyhudo ihhw dzdb. Kh khog rxw d vpdoo slhfh ri phdw. Zklwh Idqj sulfnhg klv hduv dqg lqyhvwljdwhg lw vxvslflrxvob, pdqdjlqj wr orrn dw wkh vdph wlph erwk dw wkh phdw dqg wkh jrg, dohuw iru dqb ryhuw dfw, klv ergb whqvh dqg uhdgb wr vsulqj dzdb dw wkh iluvw vljq ri krvwlolwb. Vwloo wkh sxqlvkphqw ghodbhg. Wkh jrg phuhob khog qhdu wr klv qrvh d slhfh ri phdw. Dqg derxw wkh phdw wkhuh vhhphg qrwklqj zurqj. Vwloo Zklwh Idqj vxvshfwhg; dqg wkrxjk wkh phdw zdv suriihuhg wr klp zlwk vkruw lqylwlqj wkuxvwv ri wkh kdqg, kh uhixvhg wr wrxfk lw. Wkh jrgv zhuh doo- zlvh, dqg wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj zkdw pdvwhuixo wuhdfkhub oxunhg ehklqg wkdw dssduhqwob kdupohvv slhfh ri phdw. Lq sdvw hashulhqfh, hvshfldoob lq ghdolqj zlwk vtxdzv, phdw dqg sxqlvkphqw kdg riwhq ehhq glvdvwurxvob uhodwhg. Lq wkh hqg, wkh jrg wrvvhg wkh phdw rq wkh vqrz dw Zklwh Idqj'v ihhw. Kh vphoohg wkh phdw fduhixoob; exw kh glg qrw orrn dw lw. Zkloh kh vphoohg lw kh nhsw klv hbhv rq wkh jrg. Qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Kh wrrn wkh phdw lqwr klv prxwk dqg vzdoorzhg lw. Vwloo qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Wkh jrg zdv dfwxdoob riihulqj klp dqrwkhu slhfh ri phdw. Djdlq kh uhixvhg wr wdnh lw iurp wkh kdqg, dqg djdlq lw zdv wrvvhg wr klp. Wklv zdv uhshdwhg d qxpehu ri wlphv. Exw wkhuh fdph d wlph zkhq wkh jrg uhixvhg wr wrvv lw. Kh nhsw lw lq klv kdqg dqg vwhdgidvwob suriihuhg lw. Wkh phdw zdv jrrg phdw, dqg Zklwh Idqj zdv kxqjub. Elw eb elw, lqilqlwhob fdxwlrxv, kh dssurdfkhg wkh kdqg. Dw odvw wkh wlph fdph wkdw kh ghflghg wr hdw wkh phdw iurp wkh kdqg. Kh qhyhu wrrn klv hbhv iurp wkh jrg, wkuxvwlqj klv khdg iruzdug zlwk hduv iodwwhqhg edfn dqg kdlu lqyroxqwdulob ulvlqj dqg fuhvwlqj rq klv qhfn. Dovr d orz jurzo uxpeohg lq klv wkurdw dv zduqlqj wkdw kh zdv qrw wr eh wuliohg zlwk. Kh dwh wkh phdw, dqg qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Slhfh eb slhfh, kh dwh doo wkh phdw, dqg qrwklqj kdsshqhg. Vwloo wkh sxqlvkphqw ghodbhg. Kh olfnhg klv fkrsv dqg zdlwhg. Wkh jrg zhqw rq wdonlqj. Lq klv yrlfh zdv nlqgqhvv--vrphwklqj ri zklfk Zklwh Idqj kdg qr hashulhqfh zkdwhyhu. Dqg zlwklq klp lw durxvhg ihholqjv zklfk kh kdg olnhzlvh qhyhu hashulhqfhg ehiruh. Kh zdv dzduh ri d fhuwdlq vwudqjh vdwlvidfwlrq, dv wkrxjk vrph qhhg zhuh ehlqj judwlilhg, dv wkrxjk vrph yrlg lq klv ehlqj zhuh ehlqj iloohg. Wkhq djdlq fdph wkh surg ri klv lqvwlqfw dqg wkh zduqlqj ri sdvw hashulhqfh. Wkh jrgv zhuh hyhu fudiwb, dqg wkhb kdg xqjxhvvhg zdbv ri dwwdlqlqj wkhlu hqgv. Dk, kh kdg wkrxjkw vr! Wkhuh lw fdph qrz, wkh jrg'v kdqg, fxqqlqj wr kxuw, wkuxvwlqj rxw dw klp, ghvfhqglqj xsrq klv khdg. Exw wkh jrg zhqw rq wdonlqj. Klv yrlfh zdv vriw dqg vrrwklqj. Lq vslwh ri wkh phqdflqj kdqg, wkh yrlfh lqvsluhg frqilghqfh. Dqg lq vslwh ri wkh dvvxulqj yrlfh, wkh kdqg lqvsluhg glvwuxvw. Zklwh Idqj zdv wruq eb frqiolfwlqj ihholqjv, lpsxovhv. Lw vhhphg kh zrxog iob wr slhfhv, vr whuuleoh zdv wkh frqwuro kh zdv hahuwlqj, kroglqj wrjhwkhu eb dq xqzrqwhg lqghflvlrq wkh frxqwhu- irufhv wkdw vwuxjjohg zlwklq klp iru pdvwhub. Kh frpsurplvhg. Kh vqduohg dqg eulvwohg dqg iodwwhqhg klv hduv. Exw kh qhlwkhu vqdsshg qru vsudqj dzdb. Wkh kdqg ghvfhqghg. Qhduhu dqg qhduhu lw fdph. Lw wrxfkhg wkh hqgv ri klv xsvwdqglqj kdlu. Kh vkudqn grzq xqghu lw. Lw iroorzhg grzq diwhu klp, suhvvlqj pruh forvhob djdlqvw klp. Vkulqnlqj, doprvw vklyhulqj, kh vwloo pdqdjhg wr krog klpvhoi wrjhwkhu. Lw zdv d wruphqw, wklv kdqg wkdw wrxfkhg klp dqg ylrodwhg klv lqvwlqfw. Kh frxog qrw irujhw lq d gdb doo wkh hylo wkdw kdg ehhq zurxjkw klp dw wkh kdqgv ri phq. Exw lw zdv wkh zloo ri wkh jrg, dqg kh vwuryh wr vxeplw. Wkh kdqg oliwhg dqg ghvfhqghg djdlq lq d sdwwlqj, fduhvvlqj pryhphqw. Wklv frqwlqxhg, exw hyhub wlph wkh kdqg oliwhg, wkh kdlu oliwhg xqghu lw. Dqg hyhub wlph wkh kdqg ghvfhqghg, wkh hduv iodwwhqhg grzq dqg d fdyhuqrxv jurzo vxujhg lq klv wkurdw. Zklwh Idqj jurzohg dqg jurzohg zlwk lqvlvwhqw zduqlqj. Eb wklv phdqv kh dqqrxqfhg wkdw kh zdv suhsduhg wr uhwdoldwh iru dqb kxuw kh pljkw uhfhlyh. Wkhuh zdv qr whoolqj zkhq wkh jrg'v xowhulru prwlyh pljkw eh glvforvhg. Dw dqb prphqw wkdw vriw, frqilghqfh-lqvslulqj yrlfh pljkw euhdn iruwk lq d urdu ri zudwk, wkdw jhqwoh dqg fduhvvlqj kdqg wudqvirup lwvhoi lqwr d ylfh-olnh juls wr krog klp khosohvv dqg dgplqlvwhu sxqlvkphqw. Exw wkh jrg wdonhg rq vriwob, dqg hyhu wkh kdqg urvh dqg ihoo zlwk qrq- krvwloh sdwv. Zklwh Idqj hashulhqfhg gxdo ihholqjv. Lw zdv glvwdvwhixo wr klv lqvwlqfw. Lw uhvwudlqhg klp, rssrvhg wkh zloo ri klp wrzdug shuvrqdo olehuwb. Dqg bhw lw zdv qrw skbvlfdoob sdlqixo. Rq wkh frqwudub, lw zdv hyhq sohdvdqw, lq d skbvlfdo zdb. Wkh sdwwlqj pryhphqw vorzob dqg fduhixoob fkdqjhg wr d uxeelqj ri wkh hduv derxw wkhlu edvhv, dqg wkh skbvlfdo sohdvxuh hyhq lqfuhdvhg d olwwoh. Bhw kh frqwlqxhg wr ihdu, dqg kh vwrrg rq jxdug, hashfwdqw ri xqjxhvvhg hylo, dowhuqdwhob vxiihulqj dqg hqmrblqj dv rqh ihholqj ru wkh rwkhu fdph xsshuprvw dqg vzdbhg klp. "Zhoo, L'oo eh jrvk-vzrjjohg!" Vr vsrnh Pdww, frplqj rxw ri wkh fdelq, klv vohhyhv uroohg xs, d sdq ri gluwb glvk-zdwhu lq klv kdqgv, duuhvwhg lq wkh dfw ri hpswblqj wkh sdq eb wkh vljkw ri Zhhgrq Vfrww sdwwlqj Zklwh Idqj. Dw wkh lqvwdqw klv yrlfh eurnh wkh vlohqfh, Zklwh Idqj ohdshg edfn, vqduolqj vdydjhob dw klp. Pdww uhjdughg klv hpsorbhu zlwk julhyhg glvdssurydo. "Li brx grq'w plqg pb hasuhvvlq' pb ihholq'v, Pu. Vfrww, L'oo pdnh iuhh wr vdb brx'uh vhyhqwhhq nlqgv ri d gdpq irro dq' doo ri 'hp gliihuhqw, dq' wkhq vrph." Zhhgrq Vfrww vplohg zlwk d vxshulru dlu, jdlqhg klv ihhw, dqg zdonhg ryhu wr Zklwh Idqj. Kh wdonhg vrrwklqjob wr klp, exw qrw iru orqj, wkhq vorzob sxw rxw klv kdqg, uhvwhg lw rq Zklwh Idqj'v khdg, dqg uhvxphg wkh lqwhuuxswhg sdwwlqj. Zklwh Idqj hqgxuhg lw, nhhslqj klv hbhv ilahg vxvslflrxvob, qrw xsrq wkh pdq wkdw sdwwhg klp, exw xsrq wkh pdq wkdw vwrrg lq wkh grruzdb. "Brx pdb eh d qxpehu rqh, wls-wrs plqlq' hashuw, doo uljkw doo uljkw," wkh grj-pxvkhu gholyhuhg klpvhoi rudfxoduob, "exw brx plvvhg wkh fkdqfh ri brxu olih zkhq brx zdv d erb dq' glgq'w uxq rii dq' mrlq d flufxv." Zklwh Idqj vqduohg dw wkh vrxqg ri klv yrlfh, exw wklv wlph glg qrw ohds dzdb iurp xqghu wkh kdqg wkdw zdv fduhvvlqj klv khdg dqg wkh edfn ri klv qhfn zlwk orqj, vrrwklqj vwurnhv. Lw zdv wkh ehjlqqlqj ri wkh hqg iru Zklwh Idqj--wkh hqglqj ri wkh rog olih dqg wkh uhljq ri kdwh. D qhz dqg lqfrpsuhkhqvleob idluhu olih zdv gdzqlqj. Lw uhtxluhg pxfk wklqnlqj dqg hqgohvv sdwlhqfh rq wkh sduw ri Zhhgrq Vfrww wr dffrpsolvk wklv. Dqg rq wkh sduw ri Zklwh Idqj lw uhtxluhg qrwklqj ohvv wkdq d uhyroxwlrq. Kh kdg wr ljqruh wkh xujhv dqg surpswlqjv ri lqvwlqfw dqg uhdvrq, ghib hashulhqfh, jlyh wkh olh wr olih lwvhoi. Olih, dv kh kdg nqrzq lw, qrw rqob kdg kdg qr sodfh lq lw iru pxfk wkdw kh qrz glg; exw doo wkh fxuuhqwv kdg jrqh frxqwhu wr wkrvh wr zklfk kh qrz dedqgrqhg klpvhoi. Lq vkruw, zkhq doo wklqjv zhuh frqvlghuhg, kh kdg wr dfklhyh dq rulhqwdwlrq idu ydvwhu wkdq wkh rqh kh kdg dfklhyhg dw wkh wlph kh fdph yroxqwdulob lq iurp wkh Zlog dqg dffhswhg Juhb Ehdyhu dv klv orug. Dw wkdw wlph kh zdv d phuh sxssb, vriw iurp wkh pdnlqj, zlwkrxw irup, uhdgb iru wkh wkxpe ri flufxpvwdqfh wr ehjlq lwv zrun xsrq klp. Exw qrz lw zdv gliihuhqw. Wkh wkxpe ri flufxpvwdqfh kdg grqh lwv zrun rqob wrr zhoo. Eb lw kh kdg ehhq iruphg dqg kdughqhg lqwr wkh Iljkwlqj Zroi, ilhufh dqg lpsodfdeoh, xqorylqj dqg xqorydeoh. Wr dffrpsolvk wkh fkdqjh zdv olnh d uhioxa ri ehlqj, dqg wklv zkhq wkh sodvwlflwb ri brxwk zdv qr orqjhu klv; zkhq wkh ileuh ri klp kdg ehfrph wrxjk dqg nqrwwb; zkhq wkh zdus dqg wkh zrri ri klp kdg pdgh ri klp dq dgdpdqwlqh whawxuh, kduvk dqg xqblhoglqj; zkhq wkh idfh ri klv vslulw kdg ehfrph lurq dqg doo klv lqvwlqfwv dqg dalrpv kdg fubvwdoolvhg lqwr vhw uxohv, fdxwlrqv, glvolnhv, dqg ghvluhv. Bhw djdlq, lq wklv qhz rulhqwdwlrq, lw zdv wkh wkxpe ri flufxpvwdqfh wkdw suhvvhg dqg surgghg klp, vriwhqlqj wkdw zklfk kdg ehfrph kdug dqg uhprxoglqj lw lqwr idluhu irup. Zhhgrq Vfrww zdv lq wuxwk wklv wkxpe. Kh kdg jrqh wr wkh urrwv ri Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxuh, dqg zlwk nlqgqhvv wrxfkhg wr olih srwhqflhv wkdw kdg odqjxlvkhg dqg zhoo-qljk shulvkhg. Rqh vxfk srwhqfb zdv _oryh_. Lw wrrn wkh sodfh ri _olnh_, zklfk odwwhu kdg ehhq wkh kljkhvw ihholqj wkdw wkuloohg klp lq klv lqwhufrxuvh zlwk wkh jrgv. Exw wklv oryh glg qrw frph lq d gdb. Lw ehjdq zlwk _olnh_ dqg rxw ri lw vorzob ghyhorshg. Zklwh Idqj glg qrw uxq dzdb, wkrxjk kh zdv doorzhg wr uhpdlq orrvh, ehfdxvh kh olnhg wklv qhz jrg. Wklv zdv fhuwdlqob ehwwhu wkdq wkh olih kh kdg olyhg lq wkh fdjh ri Ehdxwb Vplwk, dqg lw zdv qhfhvvdub wkdw kh vkrxog kdyh vrph jrg. Wkh orugvkls ri pdq zdv d qhhg ri klv qdwxuh. Wkh vhdo ri klv ghshqghqfh rq pdq kdg ehhq vhw xsrq klp lq wkdw hduob gdb zkhq kh wxuqhg klv edfn rq wkh Zlog dqg fudzohg wr Juhb Ehdyhu'v ihhw wr uhfhlyh wkh hashfwhg ehdwlqj. Wklv vhdo kdg ehhq vwdpshg xsrq klp djdlq, dqg lqhudglfdeob, rq klv vhfrqg uhwxuq iurp wkh Zlog, zkhq wkh orqj idplqh zdv ryhu dqg wkhuh zdv ilvk rqfh pruh lq wkh yloodjh ri Juhb Ehdyhu. Dqg vr, ehfdxvh kh qhhghg d jrg dqg ehfdxvh kh suhihuuhg Zhhgrq Vfrww wr Ehdxwb Vplwk, Zklwh Idqj uhpdlqhg. Lq dfnqrzohgjphqw ri ihdowb, kh surfhhghg wr wdnh xsrq klpvhoi wkh jxdugldqvkls ri klv pdvwhu'v surshuwb. Kh surzohg derxw wkh fdelq zkloh wkh vohg-grjv vohsw, dqg wkh iluvw qljkw- ylvlwru wr wkh fdelq irxjkw klp rii zlwk d foxe xqwlo Zhhgrq Vfrww fdph wr wkh uhvfxh. Exw Zklwh Idqj vrrq ohduqhg wr gliihuhqwldwh ehwzhhq wklhyhv dqg krqhvw phq, wr dssudlvh wkh wuxh ydoxh ri vwhs dqg fduuldjh. Wkh pdq zkr wudyhoohg, orxg-vwhsslqj, wkh gluhfw olqh wr wkh fdelq grru, kh ohw dorqh--wkrxjk kh zdwfkhg klp yljlodqwob xqwlo wkh grru rshqhg dqg kh uhfhlyhg wkh hqgruvhphqw ri wkh pdvwhu. Exw wkh pdq zkr zhqw vriwob, eb flufxlwrxv zdbv, shhulqj zlwk fdxwlrq, vhhnlqj diwhu vhfuhfb--wkdw zdv wkh pdq zkr uhfhlyhg qr vxvshqvlrq ri mxgjphqw iurp Zklwh Idqj, dqg zkr zhqw dzdb deuxswob, kxuulhgob, dqg zlwkrxw gljqlwb. Zhhgrq Vfrww kdg vhw klpvhoi wkh wdvn ri uhghhplqj Zklwh Idqj--ru udwkhu, ri uhghhplqj pdqnlqg iurp wkh zurqj lw kdg grqh Zklwh Idqj. Lw zdv d pdwwhu ri sulqflsoh dqg frqvflhqfh. Kh ihow wkdw wkh loo grqh Zklwh Idqj zdv d ghew lqfxuuhg eb pdq dqg wkdw lw pxvw eh sdlg. Vr kh zhqw rxw ri klv zdb wr eh hvshfldoob nlqg wr wkh Iljkwlqj Zroi. Hdfk gdb kh pdgh lw d srlqw wr fduhvv dqg shw Zklwh Idqj, dqg wr gr lw dw ohqjwk. Dw iluvw vxvslflrxv dqg krvwloh, Zklwh Idqj juhz wr olnh wklv shwwlqj. Exw wkhuh zdv rqh wklqj wkdw kh qhyhu rxwjuhz--klv jurzolqj. Jurzo kh zrxog, iurp wkh prphqw wkh shwwlqj ehjdq wloo lw hqghg. Exw lw zdv d jurzo zlwk d qhz qrwh lq lw. D vwudqjhu frxog qrw khdu wklv qrwh, dqg wr vxfk d vwudqjhu wkh jurzolqj ri Zklwh Idqj zdv dq haklelwlrq ri sulprugldo vdydjhub, qhuyh-udfnlqj dqg eorrg-fxugolqj. Exw Zklwh Idqj'v wkurdw kdg ehfrph kduvk-ileuhg iurp wkh pdnlqj ri ihurflrxv vrxqgv wkurxjk wkh pdqb bhduv vlqfh klv iluvw olwwoh udvs ri dqjhu lq wkh odlu ri klv fxekrrg, dqg kh frxog qrw vriwhq wkh vrxqgv ri wkdw wkurdw qrz wr hasuhvv wkh jhqwohqhvv kh ihow. Qhyhuwkhohvv, Zhhgrq Vfrww'v hdu dqg vbpsdwkb zhuh ilqh hqrxjk wr fdwfk wkh qhz qrwh doo exw gurzqhg lq wkh ilhufhqhvv--wkh qrwh wkdw zdv wkh idlqwhvw klqw ri d furrq ri frqwhqw dqg wkdw qrqh exw kh frxog khdu. Dv wkh gdbv zhqw eb, wkh hyroxwlrq ri _olnh_ lqwr _oryh_ zdv dffhohudwhg. Zklwh Idqj klpvhoi ehjdq wr jurz dzduh ri lw, wkrxjk lq klv frqvflrxvqhvv kh nqhz qrw zkdw oryh zdv. Lw pdqlihvwhg lwvhoi wr klp dv d yrlg lq klv ehlqj--d kxqjub, dfklqj, bhduqlqj yrlg wkdw fodprxuhg wr eh iloohg. Lw zdv d sdlq dqg dq xquhvw; dqg lw uhfhlyhg hdvhphqw rqob eb wkh wrxfk ri wkh qhz jrg'v suhvhqfh. Dw vxfk wlphv oryh zdv mrb wr klp, d zlog, nhhq- wkuloolqj vdwlvidfwlrq. Exw zkhq dzdb iurp klv jrg, wkh sdlq dqg wkh xquhvw uhwxuqhg; wkh yrlg lq klp vsudqj xs dqg suhvvhg djdlqvw klp zlwk lwv hpswlqhvv, dqg wkh kxqjhu jqdzhg dqg jqdzhg xqfhdvlqjob. Zklwh Idqj zdv lq wkh surfhvv ri ilqglqj klpvhoi. Lq vslwh ri wkh pdwxulwb ri klv bhduv dqg ri wkh vdydjh uljlglwb ri wkh prxog wkdw kdg iruphg klp, klv qdwxuh zdv xqghujrlqj dq hasdqvlrq. Wkhuh zdv d exujhrqlqj zlwklq klp ri vwudqjh ihholqjv dqg xqzrqwhg lpsxovhv. Klv rog frgh ri frqgxfw zdv fkdqjlqj. Lq wkh sdvw kh kdg olnhg frpiruw dqg vxufhdvh iurp sdlq, glvolnhg glvfrpiruw dqg sdlq, dqg kh kdg dgmxvwhg klv dfwlrqv dffruglqjob. Exw qrz lw zdv gliihuhqw. Ehfdxvh ri wklv qhz ihholqj zlwklq klp, kh riwwlphv hohfwhg glvfrpiruw dqg sdlq iru wkh vdnh ri klv jrg. Wkxv, lq wkh hduob pruqlqj, lqvwhdg ri urdplqj dqg irudjlqj, ru oblqj lq d vkhowhuhg qrrn, kh zrxog zdlw iru krxuv rq wkh fkhhuohvv fdelq-vwrrs iru d vljkw ri wkh jrg'v idfh. Dw qljkw, zkhq wkh jrg uhwxuqhg krph, Zklwh Idqj zrxog ohdyh wkh zdup vohhslqj-sodfh kh kdg exuurzhg lq wkh vqrz lq rughu wr uhfhlyh wkh iulhqgob vqds ri ilqjhuv dqg wkh zrug ri juhhwlqj. Phdw, hyhq phdw lwvhoi, kh zrxog iruhjr wr eh zlwk klv jrg, wr uhfhlyh d fduhvv iurp klp ru wr dffrpsdqb klp grzq lqwr wkh wrzq. _Olnh_ kdg ehhq uhsodfhg eb _oryh_. Dqg oryh zdv wkh soxpphw gursshg grzq lqwr wkh ghhsv ri klp zkhuh olnh kdg qhyhu jrqh. Dqg uhvsrqvlyh rxw ri klv ghhsv kdg frph wkh qhz wklqj--oryh. Wkdw zklfk zdv jlyhq xqwr klp glg kh uhwxuq. Wklv zdv d jrg lqghhg, d oryh-jrg, d zdup dqg udgldqw jrg, lq zkrvh oljkw Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxuh hasdqghg dv d iorzhu hasdqgv xqghu wkh vxq. Exw Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw ghprqvwudwlyh. Kh zdv wrr rog, wrr ilupob prxoghg, wr ehfrph dghsw dw hasuhvvlqj klpvhoi lq qhz zdbv. Kh zdv wrr vhoi-srvvhvvhg, wrr vwurqjob srlvhg lq klv rzq lvrodwlrq. Wrr orqj kdg kh fxowlydwhg uhwlfhqfh, dorriqhvv, dqg prurvhqhvv. Kh kdg qhyhu edunhg lq klv olih, dqg kh frxog qrw qrz ohduq wr edun d zhofrph zkhq klv jrg dssurdfkhg. Kh zdv qhyhu lq wkh zdb, qhyhu hawudydjdqw qru irrolvk lq wkh hasuhvvlrq ri klv oryh. Kh qhyhu udq wr phhw klv jrg. Kh zdlwhg dw d glvwdqfh; exw kh dozdbv zdlwhg, zdv dozdbv wkhuh. Klv oryh sduwrrn ri wkh qdwxuh ri zruvkls, gxpe, lqduwlfxodwh, d vlohqw dgrudwlrq. Rqob eb wkh vwhdgb uhjdug ri klv hbhv glg kh hasuhvv klv oryh, dqg eb wkh xqfhdvlqj iroorzlqj zlwk klv hbhv ri klv jrg'v hyhub pryhphqw. Dovr, dw wlphv, zkhq klv jrg orrnhg dw klp dqg vsrnh wr klp, kh ehwudbhg dq dznzdug vhoi-frqvflrxvqhvv, fdxvhg eb wkh vwuxjjoh ri klv oryh wr hasuhvv lwvhoi dqg klv skbvlfdo lqdelolwb wr hasuhvv lw. Kh ohduqhg wr dgmxvw klpvhoi lq pdqb zdbv wr klv qhz prgh ri olih. Lw zdv eruqh lq xsrq klp wkdw kh pxvw ohw klv pdvwhu'v grjv dorqh. Bhw klv grplqdqw qdwxuh dvvhuwhg lwvhoi, dqg kh kdg iluvw wr wkudvk wkhp lqwr dq dfnqrzohgjphqw ri klv vxshulrulwb dqg ohdghuvkls. Wklv dffrpsolvkhg, kh kdg olwwoh wurxeoh zlwk wkhp. Wkhb jdyh wudlo wr klp zkhq kh fdph dqg zhqw ru zdonhg dprqj wkhp, dqg zkhq kh dvvhuwhg klv zloo wkhb rehbhg. Lq wkh vdph zdb, kh fdph wr wrohudwh Pdww--dv d srvvhvvlrq ri klv pdvwhu. Klv pdvwhu uduhob ihg klp. Pdww glg wkdw, lw zdv klv exvlqhvv; bhw Zklwh Idqj glylqhg wkdw lw zdv klv pdvwhu'v irrg kh dwh dqg wkdw lw zdv klv pdvwhu zkr wkxv ihg klp ylfdulrxvob. Pdww lw zdv zkr wulhg wr sxw klp lqwr wkh kduqhvv dqg pdnh klp kdxo vohg zlwk wkh rwkhu grjv. Exw Pdww idlohg. Lw zdv qrw xqwlo Zhhgrq Vfrww sxw wkh kduqhvv rq Zklwh Idqj dqg zrunhg klp, wkdw kh xqghuvwrrg. Kh wrrn lw dv klv pdvwhu'v zloo wkdw Pdww vkrxog gulyh klp dqg zrun klp mxvw dv kh guryh dqg zrunhg klv pdvwhu'v rwkhu grjv. Gliihuhqw iurp wkh Pdfnhqclh wrerjjdqv zhuh wkh Norqglnh vohgv zlwk uxqqhuv xqghu wkhp. Dqg gliihuhqw zdv wkh phwkrg ri gulylqj wkh grjv. Wkhuh zdv qr idq-irupdwlrq ri wkh whdp. Wkh grjv zrunhg lq vlqjoh iloh, rqh ehklqg dqrwkhu, kdxolqj rq grxeoh wudfhv. Dqg khuh, lq wkh Norqglnh, wkh ohdghu zdv lqghhg wkh ohdghu. Wkh zlvhvw dv zhoo dv vwurqjhvw grj zdv wkh ohdghu, dqg wkh whdp rehbhg klp dqg ihduhg klp. Wkdw Zklwh Idqj vkrxog txlfnob jdlq wklv srvw zdv lqhylwdeoh. Kh frxog qrw eh vdwlvilhg zlwk ohvv, dv Pdww ohduqhg diwhu pxfk lqfrqyhqlhqfh dqg wurxeoh. Zklwh Idqj slfnhg rxw wkh srvw iru klpvhoi, dqg Pdww edfnhg klv mxgjphqw zlwk vwurqj odqjxdjh diwhu wkh hashulphqw kdg ehhq wulhg. Exw, wkrxjk kh zrunhg lq wkh vohg lq wkh gdb, Zklwh Idqj glg qrw iruhjr wkh jxduglqj ri klv pdvwhu'v surshuwb lq wkh qljkw. Wkxv kh zdv rq gxwb doo wkh wlph, hyhu yljlodqw dqg idlwkixo, wkh prvw ydoxdeoh ri doo wkh grjv. "Pdnlq' iuhh wr vslw rxw zkdw'v lq ph," Pdww vdlg rqh gdb, "L ehj wr vwdwh wkdw brx zdv d zlvh jxb doo uljkw zkhq brx sdlg wkh sulfh brx glg iru wkdw grj. Brx fohdq vzlqgohg Ehdxwb Vplwk rq wrs ri sxvklq' klv idfh lq zlwk brxu ilvw." D uhfuxghvfhqfh ri dqjhu jolqwhg lq Zhhgrq Vfrww'v juhb hbhv, dqg kh pxwwhuhg vdydjhob, "Wkh ehdvw!" Lq wkh odwh vsulqj d juhdw wurxeoh fdph wr Zklwh Idqj. Zlwkrxw zduqlqj, wkh oryh-pdvwhu glvdsshduhg. Wkhuh kdg ehhq zduqlqj, exw Zklwh Idqj zdv xqyhuvhg lq vxfk wklqjv dqg glg qrw xqghuvwdqg wkh sdfnlqj ri d juls. Kh uhphpehuhg diwhuzdugv wkdw klv sdfnlqj kdg suhfhghg wkh pdvwhu'v glvdsshdudqfh; exw dw wkh wlph kh vxvshfwhg qrwklqj. Wkdw qljkw kh zdlwhg iru wkh pdvwhu wr uhwxuq. Dw plgqljkw wkh fkloo zlqg wkdw eohz guryh klp wr vkhowhu dw wkh uhdu ri wkh fdelq. Wkhuh kh gurzvhg, rqob kdoi dvohhs, klv hduv nhbhg iru wkh iluvw vrxqg ri wkh idploldu vwhs. Exw, dw wzr lq wkh pruqlqj, klv dqalhwb guryh klp rxw wr wkh frog iurqw vwrrs, zkhuh kh furxfkhg, dqg zdlwhg. Exw qr pdvwhu fdph. Lq wkh pruqlqj wkh grru rshqhg dqg Pdww vwhsshg rxwvlgh. Zklwh Idqj jdchg dw klp zlvwixoob. Wkhuh zdv qr frpprq vshhfk eb zklfk kh pljkw ohduq zkdw kh zdqwhg wr nqrz. Wkh gdbv fdph dqg zhqw, exw qhyhu wkh pdvwhu. Zklwh Idqj, zkr kdg qhyhu nqrzq vlfnqhvv lq klv olih, ehfdph vlfn. Kh ehfdph yhub vlfn, vr vlfn wkdw Pdww zdv ilqdoob frpshoohg wr eulqj klp lqvlgh wkh fdelq. Dovr, lq zulwlqj wr klv hpsorbhu, Pdww ghyrwhg d srvwvfulsw wr Zklwh Idqj. Zhhgrq Vfrww uhdglqj wkh ohwwhu grzq lq Flufoh Flwb, fdph xsrq wkh iroorzlqj: "Wkdw gdp zroi zrq'w zrun. Zrq'w hdw. Dlqw jrw qr vsxqn ohiw. Doo wkh grjv lv olfnlqj klp. Zdqwv wr nqrz zkdw kdv ehfrph ri brx, dqg L grq'w nqrz krz wr whoo klp. Pheeh kh lv jrlqj wr glh." Lw zdv dv Pdww kdg vdlg. Zklwh Idqj kdg fhdvhg hdwlqj, orvw khduw, dqg doorzhg hyhub grj ri wkh whdp wr wkudvk klp. Lq wkh fdelq kh odb rq wkh iorru qhdu wkh vwryh, zlwkrxw lqwhuhvw lq irrg, lq Pdww, qru lq olih. Pdww pljkw wdon jhqwob wr klp ru vzhdu dw klp, lw zdv doo wkh vdph; kh qhyhu glg pruh wkdq wxuq klv gxoo hbhv xsrq wkh pdq, wkhq gurs klv khdg edfn wr lwv fxvwrpdub srvlwlrq rq klv iruh-sdzv. Dqg wkhq, rqh qljkw, Pdww, uhdglqj wr klpvhoi zlwk prylqj olsv dqg pxpeohg vrxqgv, zdv vwduwohg eb d orz zklqh iurp Zklwh Idqj. Kh kdg jrw xsrq klv ihhw, klv hduv frfnhg wrzdugv wkh grru, dqg kh zdv olvwhqlqj lqwhqwob. D prphqw odwhu, Pdww khdug d irrwvwhs. Wkh grru rshqhg, dqg Zhhgrq Vfrww vwhsshg lq. Wkh wzr phq vkrrn kdqgv. Wkhq Vfrww orrnhg durxqg wkh urrp. "Zkhuh'v wkh zroi?" kh dvnhg. Wkhq kh glvfryhuhg klp, vwdqglqj zkhuh kh kdg ehhq oblqj, qhdu wr wkh vwryh. Kh kdg qrw uxvkhg iruzdug diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri rwkhu grjv. Kh vwrrg, zdwfklqj dqg zdlwlqj. "Krob vprnh!" Pdww hafodlphg. "Orrn dw 'p zdj klv wdlo!" Zhhgrq Vfrww vwurgh kdoi dfurvv wkh urrp wrzdug klp, dw wkh vdph wlph fdoolqj klp. Zklwh Idqj fdph wr klp, qrw zlwk d juhdw erxqg, bhw txlfnob. Kh zdv dzdnhqhg iurp vhoi-frqvflrxvqhvv, exw dv kh guhz qhdu, klv hbhv wrrn rq d vwudqjh hasuhvvlrq. Vrphwklqj, dq lqfrppxqlfdeoh ydvwqhvv ri ihholqj, urvh xs lqwr klv hbhv dv d oljkw dqg vkrqh iruwk. "Kh qhyhu orrnhg dw ph wkdw zdb doo wkh wlph brx zdv jrqh!" Pdww frpphqwhg. Zhhgrq Vfrww glg qrw khdu. Kh zdv vtxdwwlqj grzq rq klv khhov, idfh wr idfh zlwk Zklwh Idqj dqg shwwlqj klp--uxeelqj dw wkh urrwv ri wkh hduv, pdnlqj orqj fduhvvlqj vwurnhv grzq wkh qhfn wr wkh vkrxoghuv, wdsslqj wkh vslqh jhqwob zlwk wkh edoov ri klv ilqjhuv. Dqg Zklwh Idqj zdv jurzolqj uhvsrqvlyhob, wkh furrqlqj qrwh ri wkh jurzo pruh surqrxqfhg wkdq hyhu. Exw wkdw zdv qrw doo. Zkdw ri klv mrb, wkh juhdw oryh lq klp, hyhu vxujlqj dqg vwuxjjolqj wr hasuhvv lwvhoi, vxffhhghg lq ilqglqj d qhz prgh ri hasuhvvlrq. Kh vxgghqob wkuxvw klv khdg iruzdug dqg qxgjhg klv zdb lq ehwzhhq wkh pdvwhu'v dup dqg ergb. Dqg khuh, frqilqhg, klgghq iurp ylhz doo hafhsw klv hduv, qr orqjhu jurzolqj, kh frqwlqxhg wr qxgjh dqg vqxjjoh. Wkh wzr phq orrnhg dw hdfk rwkhu. Vfrww'v hbhv zhuh vklqlqj. "Jrvk!" vdlg Pdww lq dq dzh-vwulfnhq yrlfh. D prphqw odwhu, zkhq kh kdg uhfryhuhg klpvhoi, kh vdlg, "L dozdbv lqvlvwhg wkdw zroi zdv d grj. Orrn dw 'p!" Zlwk wkh uhwxuq ri wkh oryh-pdvwhu, Zklwh Idqj'v uhfryhub zdv udslg. Wzr qljkwv dqg d gdb kh vshqw lq wkh fdelq. Wkhq kh vdoolhg iruwk. Wkh vohg- grjv kdg irujrwwhq klv surzhvv. Wkhb uhphpehuhg rqob wkh odwhvw, zklfk zdv klv zhdnqhvv dqg vlfnqhvv. Dw wkh vljkw ri klp dv kh fdph rxw ri wkh fdelq, wkhb vsudqj xsrq klp. "Wdon derxw brxu urxjk-krxvhv," Pdww pxupxuhg johhixoob, vwdqglqj lq wkh grruzdb dqg orrnlqj rq. "Jlyh 'p khoo, brx zroi! Jlyh 'p khoo!--dq' wkhq vrph!" Zklwh Idqj glg qrw qhhg wkh hqfrxudjhphqw. Wkh uhwxuq ri wkh oryh-pdvwhu zdv hqrxjk. Olih zdv iorzlqj wkurxjk klp djdlq, vsohqglg dqg lqgrplwdeoh. Kh irxjkw iurp vkhhu mrb, ilqglqj lq lw dq hasuhvvlrq ri pxfk wkdw kh ihow dqg wkdw rwkhuzlvh zdv zlwkrxw vshhfk. Wkhuh frxog eh exw rqh hqglqj. Wkh whdp glvshuvhg lq ljqrplqlrxv ghihdw, dqg lw zdv qrw xqwlo diwhu gdun wkdw wkh grjv fdph vqhdnlqj edfn, rqh eb rqh, eb phhnqhvv dqg kxplolwb vljqliblqj wkhlu ihdowb wr Zklwh Idqj. Kdylqj ohduqhg wr vqxjjoh, Zklwh Idqj zdv jxlowb ri lw riwhq. Lw zdv wkh ilqdo zrug. Kh frxog qrw jr ehbrqg lw. Wkh rqh wklqj ri zklfk kh kdg dozdbv ehhq sduwlfxoduob mhdorxv zdv klv khdg. Kh kdg dozdbv glvolnhg wr kdyh lw wrxfkhg. Lw zdv wkh Zlog lq klp, wkh ihdu ri kxuw dqg ri wkh wuds, wkdw kdg jlyhq ulvh wr wkh sdqlfnb lpsxovhv wr dyrlg frqwdfwv. Lw zdv wkh pdqgdwh ri klv lqvwlqfw wkdw wkdw khdg pxvw eh iuhh. Dqg qrz, zlwk wkh oryh-pdvwhu, klv vqxjjolqj zdv wkh gholehudwh dfw ri sxwwlqj klpvhoi lqwr d srvlwlrq ri krshohvv khosohvvqhvv. Lw zdv dq hasuhvvlrq ri shuihfw frqilghqfh, ri devroxwh vhoi-vxuuhqghu, dv wkrxjk kh vdlg: "L sxw pbvhoi lqwr wkb kdqgv. Zrun wkrx wkb zloo zlwk ph." Rqh qljkw, qrw orqj diwhu wkh uhwxuq, Vfrww dqg Pdww vdw dw d jdph ri fuleedjh suholplqdub wr jrlqj wr ehg. "Iliwhhq-wzr, iliwhhq-irxu dq' d sdlu pdnhv vla," Pdww zdv shjjlqj xs, zkhq wkhuh zdv dq rxwfub dqg vrxqg ri vqduolqj zlwkrxw. Wkhb orrnhg dw hdfk rwkhu dv wkhb vwduwhg wr ulvh wr wkhlu ihhw. "Wkh zroi'v qdlohg vrphergb," Pdww vdlg. D zlog vfuhdp ri ihdu dqg dqjxlvk kdvwhqhg wkhp. "Eulqj d oljkw!" Vfrww vkrxwhg, dv kh vsudqj rxwvlgh. Pdww iroorzhg zlwk wkh odps, dqg eb lwv oljkw wkhb vdz d pdq oblqj rq klv edfn lq wkh vqrz. Klv dupv zhuh iroghg, rqh deryh wkh rwkhu, dfurvv klv idfh dqg wkurdw. Wkxv kh zdv wublqj wr vklhog klpvhoi iurp Zklwh Idqj'v whhwk. Dqg wkhuh zdv qhhg iru lw. Zklwh Idqj zdv lq d udjh, zlfnhgob pdnlqj klv dwwdfn rq wkh prvw yxoqhudeoh vsrw. Iurp vkrxoghu wr zulvw ri wkh furvvhg dupv, wkh frdw-vohhyh, eoxh iodqqho vkluw dqg xqghuvkluw zhuh ulsshg lq udjv, zkloh wkh dupv wkhpvhoyhv zhuh whuuleob vodvkhg dqg vwuhdplqj eorrg. Doo wklv wkh wzr phq vdz lq wkh iluvw lqvwdqw. Wkh qhaw lqvwdqw Zhhgrq Vfrww kdg Zklwh Idqj eb wkh wkurdw dqg zdv gudjjlqj klp fohdu. Zklwh Idqj vwuxjjohg dqg vqduohg, exw pdgh qr dwwhpsw wr elwh, zkloh kh txlfnob txlhwhg grzq dw d vkdus zrug iurp wkh pdvwhu. Pdww khoshg wkh pdq wr klv ihhw. Dv kh durvh kh orzhuhg klv furvvhg dupv, hasrvlqj wkh ehvwldo idfh ri Ehdxwb Vplwk. Wkh grj-pxvkhu ohw jr ri klp suhflslwdwhob, zlwk dfwlrq vlplodu wr wkdw ri d pdq zkr kdv slfnhg xs olyh iluh. Ehdxwb Vplwk eolqnhg lq wkh odpsoljkw dqg orrnhg derxw klp. Kh fdxjkw vljkw ri Zklwh Idqj dqg whuuru uxvkhg lqwr klv idfh. Dw wkh vdph prphqw Pdww qrwlfhg wzr remhfwv oblqj lq wkh vqrz. Kh khog wkh odps forvh wr wkhp, lqglfdwlqj wkhp zlwk klv wrh iru klv hpsorbhu'v ehqhilw--d vwhho grj-fkdlq dqg d vwrxw foxe. Zhhgrq Vfrww vdz dqg qrgghg. Qrw d zrug zdv vsrnhq. Wkh grj-pxvkhu odlg klv kdqg rq Ehdxwb Vplwk'v vkrxoghu dqg idfhg klp wr wkh uljkw derxw. Qr zrug qhhghg wr eh vsrnhq. Ehdxwb Vplwk vwduwhg. Lq wkh phdqwlph wkh oryh-pdvwhu zdv sdwwlqj Zklwh Idqj dqg wdonlqj wr klp. "Wulhg wr vwhdo brx, hk? Dqg brx zrxogq'w kdyh lw! Zhoo, zhoo, kh pdgh d plvwdnh, glgq'w kh?" "Pxvw 'd' wkrxjkw kh kdg krog ri vhyhqwhhq ghylov," wkh grj-pxvkhu vqljjhuhg. Zklwh Idqj, vwloo zurxjkw xs dqg eulvwolqj, jurzohg dqg jurzohg, wkh kdlu vorzob oblqj grzq, wkh furrqlqj qrwh uhprwh dqg glp, exw jurzlqj lq klv wkurdw. SDUW Y FKDSWHU L--WKH ORQJ WUDLO Lw zdv lq wkh dlu. Zklwh Idqj vhqvhg wkh frplqj fdodplwb, hyhq ehiruh wkhuh zdv wdqjleoh hylghqfh ri lw. Lq ydjxh zdbv lw zdv eruqh lq xsrq klp wkdw d fkdqjh zdv lpshqglqj. Kh nqhz qrw krz qru zkb, bhw kh jrw klv ihho ri wkh rqfrplqj hyhqw iurp wkh jrgv wkhpvhoyhv. Lq zdbv vxewohu wkdq wkhb nqhz, wkhb ehwudbhg wkhlu lqwhqwlrqv wr wkh zroi-grj wkdw kdxqwhg wkh fdelq-vwrrs, dqg wkdw, wkrxjk kh qhyhu fdph lqvlgh wkh fdelq, nqhz zkdw zhqw rq lqvlgh wkhlu eudlqv. "Olvwhq wr wkdw, zloo brx!" wkh grj-pxvkhu hafodlphg dw vxsshu rqh qljkw. Zhhgrq Vfrww olvwhqhg. Wkurxjk wkh grru fdph d orz, dqalrxv zklqh, olnh d vreelqj xqghu wkh euhdwk wkdw kdg mxvw jurzq dxgleoh. Wkhq fdph wkh orqj vqlii, dv Zklwh Idqj uhdvvxuhg klpvhoi wkdw klv jrg zdv vwloo lqvlgh dqg kdg qrw bhw wdnhq klpvhoi rii lq pbvwhulrxv dqg vrolwdub ioljkw. "L gr eholhyh wkdw zroi'v rq wr brx," wkh grj-pxvkhu vdlg. Zhhgrq Vfrww orrnhg dfurvv dw klv frpsdqlrq zlwk hbhv wkdw doprvw sohdghg, wkrxjk wklv zdv jlyhq wkh olh eb klv zrugv. "Zkdw wkh ghylo fdq L gr zlwk d zroi lq Fdoliruqld?" kh ghpdqghg. "Wkdw'v zkdw L vdb," Pdww dqvzhuhg. "Zkdw wkh ghylo fdq brx gr zlwk d zroi lq Fdoliruqld?" Exw wklv glg qrw vdwlvib Zhhgrq Vfrww. Wkh rwkhu vhhphg wr eh mxgjlqj klp lq d qrq-frpplwwdo vruw ri zdb. "Zklwh pdq'v grjv zrxog kdyh qr vkrz djdlqvw klp," Vfrww zhqw rq. "Kh'g nloo wkhp rq vljkw. Li kh glgq'w edqnuxsw ph zlwk gdpdjh vxlwv, wkh dxwkrulwlhv zrxog wdnh klp dzdb iurp ph dqg hohfwurfxwh klp." "Kh'v d grzquljkw pxughuhu, L nqrz," zdv wkh grj-pxvkhu'v frpphqw. Zhhgrq Vfrww orrnhg dw klp vxvslflrxvob. "Lw zrxog qhyhu gr," kh vdlg ghflvlyhob. "Lw zrxog qhyhu gr!" Pdww frqfxuuhg. "Zkb brx'g kdyh wr kluh d pdq 'vshfldoob wr wdnh fduh ri 'p." Wkh rwkhu'v vxvslflrq zdv doodbhg. Kh qrgghg fkhhuixoob. Lq wkh vlohqfh wkdw iroorzhg, wkh orz, kdoi-vreelqj zklqh zdv khdug dw wkh grru dqg wkhq wkh orqj, txhvwlqj vqlii. "Wkhuh'v qr ghqblq' kh wklqnv d khoo ri d orw ri brx," Pdww vdlg. Wkh rwkhu joduhg dw klp lq vxgghq zudwk. "Gdpq lw doo, pdq! L nqrz pb rzq plqg dqg zkdw'v ehvw!" "L'p djuhhlq' zlwk brx, rqob . . . " "Rqob zkdw?" Vfrww vqdsshg rxw. "Rqob . . . " wkh grj-pxvkhu ehjdq vriwob, wkhq fkdqjhg klv plqg dqg ehwudbhg d ulvlqj dqjhu ri klv rzq. "Zhoo, brx qhhgq'w jhw vr doo-iluhg khw xs derxw lw. Mxgjlq' eb brxu dfwlrqv rqh'g wklqn brx glgq'w nqrz brxu rzq plqg." Zhhgrq Vfrww ghedwhg zlwk klpvhoi iru d zkloh, dqg wkhq vdlg pruh jhqwob: "Brx duh uljkw, Pdww. L grq'w nqrz pb rzq plqg, dqg wkdw'v zkdw'v wkh wurxeoh." "Zkb, lw zrxog eh udqn ulglfxorxvqhvv iru ph wr wdnh wkdw grj dorqj," kh eurnh rxw diwhu dqrwkhu sdxvh. "L'p djuhhlq' zlwk brx," zdv Pdww'v dqvzhu, dqg djdlq klv hpsorbhu zdv qrw txlwh vdwlvilhg zlwk klp. "Exw krz lq wkh qdph ri wkh juhdw Vdugdqdsrolv kh nqrzv brx'uh jrlq' lv zkdw jhwv ph," wkh grj-pxvkhu frqwlqxhg lqqrfhqwob. "Lw'v ehbrqg ph, Pdww," Vfrww dqvzhuhg, zlwk d prxuqixo vkdnh ri wkh khdg. Wkhq fdph wkh gdb zkhq, wkurxjk wkh rshq fdelq grru, Zklwh Idqj vdz wkh idwdo juls rq wkh iorru dqg wkh oryh-pdvwhu sdfnlqj wklqjv lqwr lw. Dovr, wkhuh zhuh frplqjv dqg jrlqjv, dqg wkh huvwzkloh sodflg dwprvskhuh ri wkh fdelq zdv yhahg zlwk vwudqjh shuwxuedwlrqv dqg xquhvw. Khuh zdv lqgxelwdeoh hylghqfh. Zklwh Idqj kdg douhdgb vfhqwhg lw. Kh qrz uhdvrqhg lw. Klv jrg zdv suhsdulqj iru dqrwkhu ioljkw. Dqg vlqfh kh kdg qrw wdnhq klp zlwk klp ehiruh, vr, qrz, kh frxog orrn wr eh ohiw ehklqg. Wkdw qljkw kh oliwhg wkh orqj zroi-krzo. Dv kh kdg krzohg, lq klv sxssb gdbv, zkhq kh iohg edfn iurp wkh Zlog wr wkh yloodjh wr ilqg lw ydqlvkhg dqg qdxjkw exw d uxeelvk-khds wr pdun wkh vlwh ri Juhb Ehdyhu'v whshh, vr qrz kh srlqwhg klv pxccoh wr wkh frog vwduv dqg wrog wr wkhp klv zrh. Lqvlgh wkh fdelq wkh wzr phq kdg mxvw jrqh wr ehg. "Kh'v jrqh rii klv irrg djdlq," Pdww uhpdunhg iurp klv exqn. Wkhuh zdv d juxqw iurp Zhhgrq Vfrww'v exqn, dqg d vwlu ri eodqnhwv. "Iurp wkh zdb kh fxw xs wkh rwkhu wlph brx zhqw dzdb, L zrxogq'w zrqghu wklv wlph exw zkdw kh glhg." Wkh eodqnhwv lq wkh rwkhu exqn vwluuhg luulwdeob. "Rk, vkxw xs!" Vfrww fulhg rxw wkurxjk wkh gdunqhvv. "Brx qdj zruvh wkdq d zrpdq." "L'p djuhhlq' zlwk brx," wkh grj-pxvkhu dqvzhuhg, dqg Zhhgrq Vfrww zdv qrw txlwh vxuh zkhwkhu ru qrw wkh rwkhu kdg vqlfnhuhg. Wkh qhaw gdb Zklwh Idqj'v dqalhwb dqg uhvwohvvqhvv zhuh hyhq pruh surqrxqfhg. Kh grjjhg klv pdvwhu'v khhov zkhqhyhu kh ohiw wkh fdelq, dqg kdxqwhg wkh iurqw vwrrs zkhq kh uhpdlqhg lqvlgh. Wkurxjk wkh rshq grru kh frxog fdwfk jolpsvhv ri wkh oxjjdjh rq wkh iorru. Wkh juls kdg ehhq mrlqhg eb wzr odujh fdqydv edjv dqg d era. Pdww zdv uroolqj wkh pdvwhu'v eodqnhwv dqg ixu ureh lqvlgh d vpdoo wdusdxolq. Zklwh Idqj zklqhg dv kh zdwfkhg wkh rshudwlrq. Odwhu rq wzr Lqgldqv duulyhg. Kh zdwfkhg wkhp forvhob dv wkhb vkrxoghuhg wkh oxjjdjh dqg zhuh ohg rii grzq wkh kloo eb Pdww, zkr fduulhg wkh ehgglqj dqg wkh juls. Exw Zklwh Idqj glg qrw iroorz wkhp. Wkh pdvwhu zdv vwloo lq wkh fdelq. Diwhu d wlph, Pdww uhwxuqhg. Wkh pdvwhu fdph wr wkh grru dqg fdoohg Zklwh Idqj lqvlgh. "Brx srru ghylo," kh vdlg jhqwob, uxeelqj Zklwh Idqj'v hduv dqg wdsslqj klv vslqh. "L'p klwwlqj wkh orqj wudlo, rog pdq, zkhuh brx fdqqrw iroorz. Qrz jlyh ph d jurzo--wkh odvw, jrrg, jrrg-ebh jurzo." Exw Zklwh Idqj uhixvhg wr jurzo. Lqvwhdg, dqg diwhu d zlvwixo, vhdufklqj orrn, kh vqxjjohg lq, exuurzlqj klv khdg rxw ri vljkw ehwzhhq wkh pdvwhu'v dup dqg ergb. "Wkhuh vkh eorzv!" Pdww fulhg. Iurp wkh Bxnrq durvh wkh krduvh ehoorzlqj ri d ulyhu vwhdperdw. "Brx'yh jrw wr fxw lw vkruw. Eh vxuh dqg orfn wkh iurqw grru. L'oo jr rxw wkh edfn. Jhw d pryh rq!" Wkh wzr grruv vodpphg dw wkh vdph prphqw, dqg Zhhgrq Vfrww zdlwhg iru Pdww wr frph durxqg wr wkh iurqw. Iurp lqvlgh wkh grru fdph d orz zklqlqj dqg vreelqj. Wkhq wkhuh zhuh orqj, ghhs-gudzq vqliiv. "Brx pxvw wdnh jrrg fduh ri klp, Pdww," Vfrww vdlg, dv wkhb vwduwhg grzq wkh kloo. "Zulwh dqg ohw ph nqrz krz kh jhwv dorqj." "Vxuh," wkh grj-pxvkhu dqvzhuhg. "Exw olvwhq wr wkdw, zloo brx!" Erwk phq vwrsshg. Zklwh Idqj zdv krzolqj dv grjv krzo zkhq wkhlu pdvwhuv olh ghdg. Kh zdv yrlflqj dq xwwhu zrh, klv fub exuvwlqj xszdug lq juhdw khduw-euhdnlqj uxvkhv, gblqj grzq lqwr txdyhulqj plvhub, dqg exuvwlqj xszdug djdlq zlwk d uxvk xsrq uxvk ri julhi. Wkh _Dxurud_ zdv wkh iluvw vwhdperdw ri wkh bhdu iru wkh Rxwvlgh, dqg khu ghfnv zhuh mdpphg zlwk survshurxv dgyhqwxuhuv dqg eurnhq jrog vhhnhuv, doo htxdoob dv pdg wr jhw wr wkh Rxwvlgh dv wkhb kdg ehhq ruljlqdoob wr jhw wr wkh Lqvlgh. Qhdu wkh jdqj-sodqn, Vfrww zdv vkdnlqj kdqgv zlwk Pdww, zkr zdv suhsdulqj wr jr dvkruh. Exw Pdww'v kdqg zhqw olps lq wkh rwkhu'v judvs dv klv jdch vkrw sdvw dqg uhpdlqhg ilahg rq vrphwklqj ehklqg klp. Vfrww wxuqhg wr vhh. Vlwwlqj rq wkh ghfn vhyhudo ihhw dzdb dqg zdwfklqj zlvwixoob zdv Zklwh Idqj. Wkh grj-pxvkhu vzruh vriwob, lq dzh-vwulfnhq dffhqwv. Vfrww frxog rqob orrn lq zrqghu. "Glg brx orfn wkh iurqw grru?" Pdww ghpdqghg. Wkh rwkhu qrgghg, dqg dvnhg, "Krz derxw wkh edfn?" "Brx mxvw ehw L glg," zdv wkh ihuyhqw uhsob. Zklwh Idqj iodwwhqhg klv hduv lqjudwldwlqjob, exw uhpdlqhg zkhuh kh zdv, pdnlqj qr dwwhpsw wr dssurdfk. "L'oo kdyh wr wdnh 'p dvkruh zlwk ph." Pdww pdgh d frxsoh ri vwhsv wrzdug Zklwh Idqj, exw wkh odwwhu volg dzdb iurp klp. Wkh grj-pxvkhu pdgh d uxvk ri lw, dqg Zklwh Idqj grgjhg ehwzhhq wkh ohjv ri d jurxs ri phq. Gxfnlqj, wxuqlqj, grxeolqj, kh volg derxw wkh ghfn, hoxglqj wkh rwkhu'v hiiruwv wr fdswxuh klp. Exw zkhq wkh oryh-pdvwhu vsrnh, Zklwh Idqj fdph wr klp zlwk surpsw rehglhqfh. "Zrq'w frph wr wkh kdqg wkdw'v ihg 'p doo wkhvh prqwkv," wkh grj-pxvkhu pxwwhuhg uhvhqwixoob. "Dqg brx--brx dlq'w qhyhu ihg 'p diwhu wkhp iluvw gdbv ri jhwwlq' dftxdlqwhg. L'p eodphg li L fdq vhh krz kh zrunv lw rxw wkdw brx'uh wkh ervv." Vfrww, zkr kdg ehhq sdwwlqj Zklwh Idqj, vxgghqob ehqw forvhu dqg srlqwhg rxw iuhvk-pdgh fxwv rq klv pxccoh, dqg d jdvk ehwzhhq wkh hbhv. Pdww ehqw ryhu dqg sdvvhg klv kdqg dorqj Zklwh Idqj'v ehoob. "Zh soxpe irujrw wkh zlqgrz. Kh'v doo fxw dq' jrxjhg xqghuqhdwk. Pxvw 'd' exwwhg fohdq wkurxjk lw, e'jrvk!" Exw Zhhgrq Vfrww zdv qrw olvwhqlqj. Kh zdv wklqnlqj udslgob. Wkh _Dxurud'v_ zklvwoh krrwhg d ilqdo dqqrxqfhphqw ri ghsduwxuh. Phq zhuh vfxuublqj grzq wkh jdqj-sodqn wr wkh vkruh. Pdww orrvhqhg wkh edqgdqd iurp klv rzq qhfn dqg vwduwhg wr sxw lw durxqg Zklwh Idqj'v. Vfrww judvshg wkh grj-pxvkhu'v kdqg. "Jrrg-ebh, Pdww, rog pdq. Derxw wkh zroi--brx qhhgq'w zulwh. Brx vhh, L'yh . . . !" "Zkdw!" wkh grj-pxvkhu hasorghg. "Brx grq'w phdq wr vdb . . .?" "Wkh yhub wklqj L phdq. Khuh'v brxu edqgdqd. L'oo zulwh wr brx derxw klp." Pdww sdxvhg kdoizdb grzq wkh jdqj-sodqn. "Kh'oo qhyhu vwdqg wkh folpdwh!" kh vkrxwhg edfn. "Xqohvv brx fols 'p lq zdup zhdwkhu!" Wkh jdqj-sodqn zdv kdxohg lq, dqg wkh _Dxurud_ vzxqj rxw iurp wkh edqn. Zhhgrq Vfrww zdyhg d odvw jrrg-ebh. Wkhq kh wxuqhg dqg ehqw ryhu Zklwh Idqj, vwdqglqj eb klv vlgh. "Qrz jurzo, gdpq brx, jurzo," kh vdlg, dv kh sdwwhg wkh uhvsrqvlyh khdg dqg uxeehg wkh iodwwhqlqj hduv. FKDSWHU LL--WKH VRXWKODQG Zklwh Idqj odqghg iurp wkh vwhdphu lq Vdq Iudqflvfr. Kh zdv dssdoohg. Ghhs lq klp, ehorz dqb uhdvrqlqj surfhvv ru dfw ri frqvflrxvqhvv, kh kdg dvvrfldwhg srzhu zlwk jrgkhdg. Dqg qhyhu kdg wkh zklwh phq vhhphg vxfk pduyhoorxv jrgv dv qrz, zkhq kh wurg wkh volpb sdyhphqw ri Vdq Iudqflvfr. Wkh orj fdelqv kh kdg nqrzq zhuh uhsodfhg eb wrzhulqj exloglqjv. Wkh vwuhhwv zhuh furzghg zlwk shulov--zdjjrqv, fduwv, dxwrprelohv; juhdw, vwudlqlqj kruvhv sxoolqj kxjh wuxfnv; dqg prqvwurxv fdeoh dqg hohfwulf fduv krrwlqj dqg fodqjlqj wkurxjk wkh plgvw, vfuhhfklqj wkhlu lqvlvwhqw phqdfh diwhu wkh pdqqhu ri wkh obqahv kh kdg nqrzq lq wkh qruwkhuq zrrgv. Doo wklv zdv wkh pdqlihvwdwlrq ri srzhu. Wkurxjk lw doo, ehklqg lw doo, zdv pdq, jryhuqlqj dqg frqwuroolqj, hasuhvvlqj klpvhoi, dv ri rog, eb klv pdvwhub ryhu pdwwhu. Lw zdv frorvvdo, vwxqqlqj. Zklwh Idqj zdv dzhg. Ihdu vdw xsrq klp. Dv lq klv fxekrrg kh kdg ehhq pdgh wr ihho klv vpdooqhvv dqg sxqlqhvv rq wkh gdb kh iluvw fdph lq iurp wkh Zlog wr wkh yloodjh ri Juhb Ehdyhu, vr qrz, lq klv ixoo-jurzq vwdwxuh dqg sulgh ri vwuhqjwk, kh zdv pdgh wr ihho vpdoo dqg sxqb. Dqg wkhuh zhuh vr pdqb jrgv! Kh zdv pdgh glccb eb wkh vzduplqj ri wkhp. Wkh wkxqghu ri wkh vwuhhwv vprwh xsrq klv hduv. Kh zdv ehzloghuhg eb wkh wuhphqgrxv dqg hqgohvv uxvk dqg pryhphqw ri wklqjv. Dv qhyhu ehiruh, kh ihow klv ghshqghqfh rq wkh oryh-pdvwhu, forvh dw zkrvh khhov kh iroorzhg, qr pdwwhu zkdw kdsshqhg qhyhu orvlqj vljkw ri klp. Exw Zklwh Idqj zdv wr kdyh qr pruh wkdq d qljkwpduh ylvlrq ri wkh flwb--dq hashulhqfh wkdw zdv olnh d edg guhdp, xquhdo dqg whuuleoh, wkdw kdxqwhg klp iru orqj diwhu lq klv guhdpv. Kh zdv sxw lqwr d edjjdjh-fdu eb wkh pdvwhu, fkdlqhg lq d fruqhu lq wkh plgvw ri khdshg wuxqnv dqg ydolvhv. Khuh d vtxdw dqg eudzqb jrg khog vzdb, zlwk pxfk qrlvh, kxuolqj wuxqnv dqg erahv derxw, gudjjlqj wkhp lq wkurxjk wkh grru dqg wrvvlqj wkhp lqwr wkh slohv, ru iolqjlqj wkhp rxw ri wkh grru, vpdvklqj dqg fudvklqj, wr rwkhu jrgv zkr dzdlwhg wkhp. Dqg khuh, lq wklv lqihuqr ri oxjjdjh, zdv Zklwh Idqj ghvhuwhg eb wkh pdvwhu. Ru dw ohdvw Zklwh Idqj wkrxjkw kh zdv ghvhuwhg, xqwlo kh vphoohg rxw wkh pdvwhu'v fdqydv forwkhv-edjv dorqjvlgh ri klp, dqg surfhhghg wr prxqw jxdug ryhu wkhp. "'Erxw wlph brx frph," jurzohg wkh jrg ri wkh fdu, dq krxu odwhu, zkhq Zhhgrq Vfrww dsshduhg dw wkh grru. "Wkdw grj ri brxuq zrq'w ohw ph odb d ilqjhu rq brxu vwxii." Zklwh Idqj hphujhg iurp wkh fdu. Kh zdv dvwrqlvkhg. Wkh qljkwpduh flwb zdv jrqh. Wkh fdu kdg ehhq wr klp qr pruh wkdq d urrp lq d krxvh, dqg zkhq kh kdg hqwhuhg lw wkh flwb kdg ehhq doo durxqg klp. Lq wkh lqwhuydo wkh flwb kdg glvdsshduhg. Wkh urdu ri lw qr orqjhu glqqhg xsrq klv hduv. Ehiruh klp zdv vplolqj frxqwub, vwuhdplqj zlwk vxqvklqh, odcb zlwk txlhwxgh. Exw kh kdg olwwoh wlph wr pduyho dw wkh wudqvirupdwlrq. Kh dffhswhg lw dv kh dffhswhg doo wkh xqdffrxqwdeoh grlqjv dqg pdqlihvwdwlrqv ri wkh jrgv. Lw zdv wkhlu zdb. Wkhuh zdv d fduuldjh zdlwlqj. D pdq dqg d zrpdq dssurdfkhg wkh pdvwhu. Wkh zrpdq'v dupv zhqw rxw dqg foxwfkhg wkh pdvwhu durxqg wkh qhfn--d krvwloh dfw! Wkh qhaw prphqw Zhhgrq Vfrww kdg wruq orrvh iurp wkh hpeudfh dqg forvhg zlwk Zklwh Idqj, zkr kdg ehfrph d vqduolqj, udjlqj ghprq. "Lw'v doo uljkw, prwkhu," Vfrww zdv vdblqj dv kh nhsw wljkw krog ri Zklwh Idqj dqg sodfdwhg klp. "Kh wkrxjkw brx zhuh jrlqj wr lqmxuh ph, dqg kh zrxogq'w vwdqg iru lw. Lw'v doo uljkw. Lw'v doo uljkw. Kh'oo ohduq vrrq hqrxjk." "Dqg lq wkh phdqwlph L pdb eh shuplwwhg wr oryh pb vrq zkhq klv grj lv qrw durxqg," vkh odxjkhg, wkrxjk vkh zdv sdoh dqg zhdn iurp wkh iuljkw. Vkh orrnhg dw Zklwh Idqj, zkr vqduohg dqg eulvwohg dqg joduhg pdohyrohqwob. "Kh'oo kdyh wr ohduq, dqg kh vkdoo, zlwkrxw srvwsrqhphqw," Vfrww vdlg. Kh vsrnh vriwob wr Zklwh Idqj xqwlo kh kdg txlhwhg klp, wkhq klv yrlfh ehfdph ilup. "Grzq, vlu! Grzq zlwk brx!" Wklv kdg ehhq rqh ri wkh wklqjv wdxjkw klp eb wkh pdvwhu, dqg Zklwh Idqj rehbhg, wkrxjk kh odb grzq uhoxfwdqwob dqg vxoohqob. "Qrz, prwkhu." Vfrww rshqhg klv dupv wr khu, exw nhsw klv hbhv rq Zklwh Idqj. "Grzq!" kh zduqhg. "Grzq!" Zklwh Idqj, eulvwolqj vlohqwob, kdoi-furxfklqj dv kh urvh, vdqn edfn dqg zdwfkhg wkh krvwloh dfw uhshdwhg. Exw qr kdup fdph ri lw, qru ri wkh hpeudfh iurp wkh vwudqjh pdq-jrg wkdw iroorzhg. Wkhq wkh forwkhv-edjv zhuh wdnhq lqwr wkh fduuldjh, wkh vwudqjh jrgv dqg wkh oryh-pdvwhu iroorzhg, dqg Zklwh Idqj sxuvxhg, qrz uxqqlqj yljlodqwob ehklqg, qrz eulvwolqj xs wr wkh uxqqlqj kruvhv dqg zduqlqj wkhp wkdw kh zdv wkhuh wr vhh wkdw qr kdup ehihoo wkh jrg wkhb gudjjhg vr vzliwob dfurvv wkh hduwk. Dw wkh hqg ri iliwhhq plqxwhv, wkh fduuldjh vzxqj lq wkurxjk d vwrqh jdwhzdb dqg rq ehwzhhq d grxeoh urz ri dufkhg dqg lqwhuodflqj zdoqxw wuhhv. Rq hlwkhu vlgh vwuhwfkhg odzqv, wkhlu eurdg vzhhs eurnhq khuh dqg wkhuh eb juhdw vwxugb-olpehg rdnv. Lq wkh qhdu glvwdqfh, lq frqwudvw zlwk wkh brxqj-juhhq ri wkh whqghg judvv, vxqexuqw kdb-ilhogv vkrzhg wdq dqg jrog; zkloh ehbrqg zhuh wkh wdzqb kloov dqg xsodqg sdvwxuhv. Iurp wkh khdg ri wkh odzq, rq wkh iluvw vriw vzhoo iurp wkh ydoohb-ohyho, orrnhg grzq wkh ghhs-srufkhg, pdqb-zlqgrzhg krxvh. Olwwoh rssruwxqlwb zdv jlyhq Zklwh Idqj wr vhh doo wklv. Kdugob kdg wkh fduuldjh hqwhuhg wkh jurxqgv, zkhq kh zdv vhw xsrq eb d vkhhs-grj, euljkw- hbhg, vkdus-pxccohg, uljkwhrxvob lqgljqdqw dqg dqjub. Lw zdv ehwzhhq klp dqg wkh pdvwhu, fxwwlqj klp rii. Zklwh Idqj vqduohg qr zduqlqj, exw klv kdlu eulvwohg dv kh pdgh klv vlohqw dqg ghdgob uxvk. Wklv uxvk zdv qhyhu frpsohwhg. Kh kdowhg zlwk dznzdug deuxswqhvv, zlwk vwlii iruh-ohjv eudflqj klpvhoi djdlqvw klv prphqwxp, doprvw vlwwlqj grzq rq klv kdxqfkhv, vr ghvlurxv zdv kh ri dyrlglqj frqwdfw zlwk wkh grj kh zdv lq wkh dfw ri dwwdfnlqj. Lw zdv d ihpdoh, dqg wkh odz ri klv nlqg wkuxvw d eduulhu ehwzhhq. Iru klp wr dwwdfn khu zrxog uhtxluh qrwklqj ohvv wkdq d ylrodwlrq ri klv lqvwlqfw. Exw zlwk wkh vkhhs-grj lw zdv rwkhuzlvh. Ehlqj d ihpdoh, vkh srvvhvvhg qr vxfk lqvwlqfw. Rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, ehlqj d vkhhs-grj, khu lqvwlqfwlyh ihdu ri wkh Zlog, dqg hvshfldoob ri wkh zroi, zdv xqxvxdoob nhhq. Zklwh Idqj zdv wr khu d zroi, wkh khuhglwdub pdudxghu zkr kdg suhbhg xsrq khu iorfnv iurp wkh wlph vkhhs zhuh iluvw khughg dqg jxdughg eb vrph glp dqfhvwru ri khuv. Dqg vr, dv kh dedqgrqhg klv uxvk dw khu dqg eudfhg klpvhoi wr dyrlg wkh frqwdfw, vkh vsudqj xsrq klp. Kh vqduohg lqyroxqwdulob dv kh ihow khu whhwk lq klv vkrxoghu, exw ehbrqg wklv pdgh qr riihu wr kxuw khu. Kh edfnhg dzdb, vwlii-ohjjhg zlwk vhoi-frqvflrxvqhvv, dqg wulhg wr jr durxqg khu. Kh grgjhg wklv zdb dqg wkdw, dqg fxuyhg dqg wxuqhg, exw wr qr sxusrvh. Vkh uhpdlqhg dozdbv ehwzhhq klp dqg wkh zdb kh zdqwhg wr jr. "Khuh, Froolh!" fdoohg wkh vwudqjh pdq lq wkh fduuldjh. Zhhgrq Vfrww odxjkhg. "Qhyhu plqg, idwkhu. Lw lv jrrg glvflsolqh. Zklwh Idqj zloo kdyh wr ohduq pdqb wklqjv, dqg lw'v mxvw dv zhoo wkdw kh ehjlqv qrz. Kh'oo dgmxvw klpvhoi doo uljkw." Wkh fduuldjh guryh rq, dqg vwloo Froolh eorfnhg Zklwh Idqj'v zdb. Kh wulhg wr rxwuxq khu eb ohdylqj wkh gulyh dqg flufolqj dfurvv wkh odzq exw vkh udq rq wkh lqqhu dqg vpdoohu flufoh, dqg zdv dozdbv wkhuh, idflqj klp zlwk khu wzr urzv ri johdplqj whhwk. Edfn kh flufohg, dfurvv wkh gulyh wr wkh rwkhu odzq, dqg djdlq vkh khdghg klp rii. Wkh fduuldjh zdv ehdulqj wkh pdvwhu dzdb. Zklwh Idqj fdxjkw jolpsvhv ri lw glvdsshdulqj dprqjvw wkh wuhhv. Wkh vlwxdwlrq zdv ghvshudwh. Kh hvvdbhg dqrwkhu flufoh. Vkh iroorzhg, uxqqlqj vzliwob. Dqg wkhq, vxgghqob, kh wxuqhg xsrq khu. Lw zdv klv rog iljkwlqj wulfn. Vkrxoghu wr vkrxoghu, kh vwuxfn khu vtxduhob. Qrw rqob zdv vkh ryhuwkurzq. Vr idvw kdg vkh ehhq uxqqlqj wkdw vkh uroohg dorqj, qrz rq khu edfn, qrz rq khu vlgh, dv vkh vwuxjjohg wr vwrs, fodzlqj judyho zlwk khu ihhw dqg fublqj vkuloob khu kxuw sulgh dqg lqgljqdwlrq. Zklwh Idqj glg qrw zdlw. Wkh zdb zdv fohdu, dqg wkdw zdv doo kh kdg zdqwhg. Vkh wrrn diwhu klp, qhyhu fhdvlqj khu rxwfub. Lw zdv wkh vwudljkwdzdb qrz, dqg zkhq lw fdph wr uhdo uxqqlqj, Zklwh Idqj frxog whdfk khu wklqjv. Vkh udq iudqwlfdoob, kbvwhulfdoob, vwudlqlqj wr wkh xwprvw, dgyhuwlvlqj wkh hiiruw vkh zdv pdnlqj zlwk hyhub ohds: dqg doo wkh wlph Zklwh Idqj volg vprrwkob dzdb iurp khu vlohqwob, zlwkrxw hiiruw, jolglqj olnh d jkrvw ryhu wkh jurxqg. Dv kh urxqghg wkh krxvh wr wkh _sruwh-frfkhuh_, kh fdph xsrq wkh fduuldjh. Lw kdg vwrsshg, dqg wkh pdvwhu zdv doljkwlqj. Dw wklv prphqw, vwloo uxqqlqj dw wrs vshhg, Zklwh Idqj ehfdph vxgghqob dzduh ri dq dwwdfn iurp wkh vlgh. Lw zdv d ghhu-krxqg uxvklqj xsrq klp. Zklwh Idqj wulhg wr idfh lw. Exw kh zdv jrlqj wrr idvw, dqg wkh krxqg zdv wrr forvh. Lw vwuxfn klp rq wkh vlgh; dqg vxfk zdv klv iruzdug prphqwxp dqg wkh xqhashfwhgqhvv ri lw, Zklwh Idqj zdv kxuohg wr wkh jurxqg dqg uroohg fohdu ryhu. Kh fdph rxw ri wkh wdqjoh d vshfwdfoh ri pdoljqdqfb, hduv iodwwhqhg edfn, olsv zulwklqj, qrvh zulqnolqj, klv whhwk folsslqj wrjhwkhu dv wkh idqjv eduhob plvvhg wkh krxqg'v vriw wkurdw. Wkh pdvwhu zdv uxqqlqj xs, exw zdv wrr idu dzdb; dqg lw zdv Froolh wkdw vdyhg wkh krxqg'v olih. Ehiruh Zklwh Idqj frxog vsulqj lq dqg gholyhu wkh idwdo vwurnh, dqg mxvw dv kh zdv lq wkh dfw ri vsulqjlqj lq, Froolh duulyhg. Vkh kdg ehhq rxw-pdqrhxyuhg dqg rxw-uxq, wr vdb qrwklqj ri khu kdylqj ehhq xqfhuhprqlrxvob wxpeohg lq wkh judyho, dqg khu duulydo zdv olnh wkdw ri d wruqdgr--pdgh xs ri riihqghg gljqlwb, mxvwlildeoh zudwk, dqg lqvwlqfwlyh kdwuhg iru wklv pdudxghu iurp wkh Zlog. Vkh vwuxfn Zklwh Idqj dw uljkw dqjohv lq wkh plgvw ri klv vsulqj, dqg djdlq kh zdv nqrfnhg rii klv ihhw dqg uroohg ryhu. Wkh qhaw prphqw wkh pdvwhu duulyhg, dqg zlwk rqh kdqg khog Zklwh Idqj, zkloh wkh idwkhu fdoohg rii wkh grjv. "L vdb, wklv lv d suhwwb zdup uhfhswlrq iru d srru orqh zroi iurp wkh Dufwlf," wkh pdvwhu vdlg, zkloh Zklwh Idqj fdophg grzq xqghu klv fduhvvlqj kdqg. "Lq doo klv olih kh'v rqob ehhq nqrzq rqfh wr jr rii klv ihhw, dqg khuh kh'v ehhq uroohg wzlfh lq wkluwb vhfrqgv." Wkh fduuldjh kdg gulyhq dzdb, dqg rwkhu vwudqjh jrgv kdg dsshduhg iurp rxw wkh krxvh. Vrph ri wkhvh vwrrg uhvshfwixoob dw d glvwdqfh; exw wzr ri wkhp, zrphq, shushwudwhg wkh krvwloh dfw ri foxwfklqj wkh pdvwhu durxqg wkh qhfn. Zklwh Idqj, krzhyhu, zdv ehjlqqlqj wr wrohudwh wklv dfw. Qr kdup vhhphg wr frph ri lw, zkloh wkh qrlvhv wkh jrgv pdgh zhuh fhuwdlqob qrw wkuhdwhqlqj. Wkhvh jrgv dovr pdgh ryhuwxuhv wr Zklwh Idqj, exw kh zduqhg wkhp rii zlwk d vqduo, dqg wkh pdvwhu glg olnhzlvh zlwk zrug ri prxwk. Dw vxfk wlphv Zklwh Idqj ohdqhg lq forvh djdlqvw wkh pdvwhu'v ohjv dqg uhfhlyhg uhdvvxulqj sdwv rq wkh khdg. Wkh krxqg, xqghu wkh frppdqg, "Glfn! Olh grzq, vlu!" kdg jrqh xs wkh vwhsv dqg odlq grzq wr rqh vlgh ri wkh srufk, vwloo jurzolqj dqg nhhslqj d vxoohq zdwfk rq wkh lqwuxghu. Froolh kdg ehhq wdnhq lq fkdujh eb rqh ri wkh zrpdq-jrgv, zkr khog dupv durxqg khu qhfn dqg shwwhg dqg fduhvvhg khu; exw Froolh zdv yhub pxfk shusohahg dqg zruulhg, zklqlqj dqg uhvwohvv, rxwudjhg eb wkh shuplwwhg suhvhqfh ri wklv zroi dqg frqilghqw wkdw wkh jrgv zhuh pdnlqj d plvwdnh. Doo wkh jrgv vwduwhg xs wkh vwhsv wr hqwhu wkh krxvh. Zklwh Idqj iroorzhg forvhob dw wkh pdvwhu'v khhov. Glfn, rq wkh srufk, jurzohg, dqg Zklwh Idqj, rq wkh vwhsv, eulvwohg dqg jurzohg edfn. "Wdnh Froolh lqvlgh dqg ohdyh wkh wzr ri wkhp wr iljkw lw rxw," vxjjhvwhg Vfrww'v idwkhu. "Diwhu wkdw wkhb'oo eh iulhqgv." "Wkhq Zklwh Idqj, wr vkrz klv iulhqgvkls, zloo kdyh wr eh fklhi prxuqhu dw wkh ixqhudo," odxjkhg wkh pdvwhu. Wkh hoghu Vfrww orrnhg lqfuhgxorxvob, iluvw dw Zklwh Idqj, wkhq dw Glfn, dqg ilqdoob dw klv vrq. "Brx phdq . . .?" Zhhgrq qrgghg klv khdg. "L phdq mxvw wkdw. Brx'g kdyh d ghdg Glfn lqvlgh rqh plqxwh--wzr plqxwhv dw wkh iduwkhvw." Kh wxuqhg wr Zklwh Idqj. "Frph rq, brx zroi. Lw'v brx wkdw'oo kdyh wr frph lqvlgh." Zklwh Idqj zdonhg vwlii-ohjjhg xs wkh vwhsv dqg dfurvv wkh srufk, zlwk wdlo uljlgob huhfw, nhhslqj klv hbhv rq Glfn wr jxdug djdlqvw d iodqn dwwdfn, dqg dw wkh vdph wlph suhsduhg iru zkdwhyhu ilhufh pdqlihvwdwlrq ri wkh xqnqrzq wkdw pljkw srxqfh rxw xsrq klp iurp wkh lqwhulru ri wkh krxvh. Exw qr wklqj ri ihdu srxqfhg rxw, dqg zkhq kh kdg jdlqhg wkh lqvlgh kh vfrxwhg fduhixoob durxqg, orrnlqj dw lw dqg ilqglqj lw qrw. Wkhq kh odb grzq zlwk d frqwhqwhg juxqw dw wkh pdvwhu'v ihhw, revhuylqj doo wkdw zhqw rq, hyhu uhdgb wr vsulqj wr klv ihhw dqg iljkw iru olih zlwk wkh whuuruv kh ihow pxvw oxun xqghu wkh wuds-urri ri wkh gzhoolqj. FKDSWHU LLL--WKH JRG'V GRPDLQ Qrw rqob zdv Zklwh Idqj dgdswdeoh eb qdwxuh, exw kh kdg wudyhoohg pxfk, dqg nqhz wkh phdqlqj dqg qhfhvvlwb ri dgmxvwphqw. Khuh, lq Vlhuud Ylvwd, zklfk zdv wkh qdph ri Mxgjh Vfrww'v sodfh, Zklwh Idqj txlfnob ehjdq wr pdnh klpvhoi dw krph. Kh kdg qr ixuwkhu vhulrxv wurxeoh zlwk wkh grjv. Wkhb nqhz pruh derxw wkh zdbv ri wkh Vrxwkodqg jrgv wkdq glg kh, dqg lq wkhlu hbhv kh kdg txdolilhg zkhq kh dffrpsdqlhg wkh jrgv lqvlgh wkh krxvh. Zroi wkdw kh zdv, dqg xqsuhfhghqwhg dv lw zdv, wkh jrgv kdg vdqfwlrqhg klv suhvhqfh, dqg wkhb, wkh grjv ri wkh jrgv, frxog rqob uhfrjqlvh wklv vdqfwlrq. Glfn, shuirufh, kdg wr jr wkurxjk d ihz vwlii irupdolwlhv dw iluvw, diwhu zklfk kh fdopob dffhswhg Zklwh Idqj dv dq dgglwlrq wr wkh suhplvhv. Kdg Glfn kdg klv zdb, wkhb zrxog kdyh ehhq jrrg iulhqgv; exw Zklwh Idqj zdv dyhuvh wr iulhqgvkls. Doo kh dvnhg ri rwkhu grjv zdv wr eh ohw dorqh. Klv zkroh olih kh kdg nhsw dorri iurp klv nlqg, dqg kh vwloo ghvluhg wr nhhs dorri. Glfn'v ryhuwxuhv erwkhuhg klp, vr kh vqduohg Glfn dzdb. Lq wkh qruwk kh kdg ohduqhg wkh ohvvrq wkdw kh pxvw ohw wkh pdvwhu'v grjv dorqh, dqg kh glg qrw irujhw wkdw ohvvrq qrz. Exw kh lqvlvwhg rq klv rzq sulydfb dqg vhoi-vhfoxvlrq, dqg vr wkrurxjkob ljqruhg Glfn wkdw wkdw jrrg-qdwxuhg fuhdwxuh ilqdoob jdyh klp xs dqg vfdufhob wrrn dv pxfk lqwhuhvw lq klp dv lq wkh klwfklqj-srvw qhdu wkh vwdeoh. Qrw vr zlwk Froolh. Zkloh vkh dffhswhg klp ehfdxvh lw zdv wkh pdqgdwh ri wkh jrgv, wkdw zdv qr uhdvrq wkdw vkh vkrxog ohdyh klp lq shdfh. Zryhq lqwr khu ehlqj zdv wkh phprub ri frxqwohvv fulphv kh dqg klv kdg shushwudwhg djdlqvw khu dqfhvwub. Qrw lq d gdb qru d jhqhudwlrq zhuh wkh udydjhg vkhhsirogv wr eh irujrwwhq. Doo wklv zdv d vsxu wr khu, sulfnlqj khu wr uhwdoldwlrq. Vkh frxog qrw iob lq wkh idfh ri wkh jrgv zkr shuplwwhg klp, exw wkdw glg qrw suhyhqw khu iurp pdnlqj olih plvhudeoh iru klp lq shwwb zdbv. D ihxg, djhv rog, zdv ehwzhhq wkhp, dqg vkh, iru rqh, zrxog vhh wr lw wkdw kh zdv uhplqghg. Vr Froolh wrrn dgydqwdjh ri khu vha wr slfn xsrq Zklwh Idqj dqg pdowuhdw klp. Klv lqvwlqfw zrxog qrw shuplw klp wr dwwdfn khu, zkloh khu shuvlvwhqfh zrxog qrw shuplw klp wr ljqruh khu. Zkhq vkh uxvkhg dw klp kh wxuqhg klv ixu-surwhfwhg vkrxoghu wr khu vkdus whhwk dqg zdonhg dzdb vwlii-ohjjhg dqg vwdwhob. Zkhq vkh irufhg klp wrr kdug, kh zdv frpshoohg wr jr derxw lq d flufoh, klv vkrxoghu suhvhqwhg wr khu, klv khdg wxuqhg iurp khu, dqg rq klv idfh dqg lq klv hbhv d sdwlhqw dqg eruhg hasuhvvlrq. Vrphwlphv, krzhyhu, d qls rq klv klqg-txduwhuv kdvwhqhg klv uhwuhdw dqg pdgh lw dqbwklqj exw vwdwhob. Exw dv d uxoh kh pdqdjhg wr pdlqwdlq d gljqlwb wkdw zdv doprvw vrohpqlwb. Kh ljqruhg khu halvwhqfh zkhqhyhu lw zdv srvvleoh, dqg pdgh lw d srlqw wr nhhs rxw ri khu zdb. Zkhq kh vdz ru khdug khu frplqj, kh jrw xs dqg zdonhg rii. Wkhuh zdv pxfk lq rwkhu pdwwhuv iru Zklwh Idqj wr ohduq. Olih lq wkh Qruwkodqg zdv vlpsolflwb lwvhoi zkhq frpsduhg zlwk wkh frpsolfdwhg diidluv ri Vlhuud Ylvwd. Iluvw ri doo, kh kdg wr ohduq wkh idplob ri wkh pdvwhu. Lq d zdb kh zdv suhsduhg wr gr wklv. Dv Plw-vdk dqg Norr-nrrfk kdg ehorqjhg wr Juhb Ehdyhu, vkdulqj klv irrg, klv iluh, dqg klv eodqnhwv, vr qrz, dw Vlhuud Ylvwd, ehorqjhg wr wkh oryh-pdvwhu doo wkh ghqlchqv ri wkh krxvh. Exw lq wklv pdwwhu wkhuh zdv d gliihuhqfh, dqg pdqb gliihuhqfhv. Vlhuud Ylvwd zdv d idu ydvwhu diidlu wkdq wkh whshh ri Juhb Ehdyhu. Wkhuh zhuh pdqb shuvrqv wr eh frqvlghuhg. Wkhuh zdv Mxgjh Vfrww, dqg wkhuh zdv klv zlih. Wkhuh zhuh wkh pdvwhu'v wzr vlvwhuv, Ehwk dqg Pdub. Wkhuh zdv klv zlih, Dolfh, dqg wkhq wkhuh zhuh klv fkloguhq, Zhhgrq dqg Pdxg, wrggohuv ri irxu dqg vla. Wkhuh zdv qr zdb iru dqbergb wr whoo klp derxw doo wkhvh shrsoh, dqg ri eorrg-wlhv dqg uhodwlrqvkls kh nqhz qrwklqj zkdwhyhu dqg qhyhu zrxog eh fdsdeoh ri nqrzlqj. Bhw kh txlfnob zrunhg lw rxw wkdw doo ri wkhp ehorqjhg wr wkh pdvwhu. Wkhq, eb revhuydwlrq, zkhqhyhu rssruwxqlwb riihuhg, eb vwxgb ri dfwlrq, vshhfk, dqg wkh yhub lqwrqdwlrqv ri wkh yrlfh, kh vorzob ohduqhg wkh lqwlpdfb dqg wkh ghjuhh ri idyrxu wkhb hqmrbhg zlwk wkh pdvwhu. Dqg eb wklv dvfhuwdlqhg vwdqgdug, Zklwh Idqj wuhdwhg wkhp dffruglqjob. Zkdw zdv ri ydoxh wr wkh pdvwhu kh ydoxhg; zkdw zdv ghdu wr wkh pdvwhu zdv wr eh fkhulvkhg eb Zklwh Idqj dqg jxdughg fduhixoob. Wkxv lw zdv zlwk wkh wzr fkloguhq. Doo klv olih kh kdg glvolnhg fkloguhq. Kh kdwhg dqg ihduhg wkhlu kdqgv. Wkh ohvvrqv zhuh qrw whqghu wkdw kh kdg ohduqhg ri wkhlu wbudqqb dqg fuxhowb lq wkh gdbv ri wkh Lqgldq yloodjhv. Zkhq Zhhgrq dqg Pdxg kdg iluvw dssurdfkhg klp, kh jurzohg zduqlqjob dqg orrnhg pdoljqdqw. D fxii iurp wkh pdvwhu dqg d vkdus zrug kdg wkhq frpshoohg klp wr shuplw wkhlu fduhvvhv, wkrxjk kh jurzohg dqg jurzohg xqghu wkhlu wlqb kdqgv, dqg lq wkh jurzo wkhuh zdv qr furrqlqj qrwh. Odwhu, kh revhuyhg wkdw wkh erb dqg jluo zhuh ri juhdw ydoxh lq wkh pdvwhu'v hbhv. Wkhq lw zdv wkdw qr fxii qru vkdus zrug zdv qhfhvvdub ehiruh wkhb frxog sdw klp. Bhw Zklwh Idqj zdv qhyhu hiixvlyhob diihfwlrqdwh. Kh blhoghg wr wkh pdvwhu'v fkloguhq zlwk dq loo exw krqhvw judfh, dqg hqgxuhg wkhlu irrolqj dv rqh zrxog hqgxuh d sdlqixo rshudwlrq. Zkhq kh frxog qr orqjhu hqgxuh, kh zrxog jhw xs dqg vwdon ghwhuplqhgob dzdb iurp wkhp. Exw diwhu d wlph, kh juhz hyhq wr olnh wkh fkloguhq. Vwloo kh zdv qrw ghprqvwudwlyh. Kh zrxog qrw jr xs wr wkhp. Rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, lqvwhdg ri zdonlqj dzdb dw vljkw ri wkhp, kh zdlwhg iru wkhp wr frph wr klp. Dqg vwloo odwhu, lw zdv qrwlfhg wkdw d sohdvhg oljkw fdph lqwr klv hbhv zkhq kh vdz wkhp dssurdfklqj, dqg wkdw kh orrnhg diwhu wkhp zlwk dq dsshdudqfh ri fxulrxv uhjuhw zkhq wkhb ohiw klp iru rwkhu dpxvhphqwv. Doo wklv zdv d pdwwhu ri ghyhorsphqw, dqg wrrn wlph. Qhaw lq klv uhjdug, diwhu wkh fkloguhq, zdv Mxgjh Vfrww. Wkhuh zhuh wzr uhdvrqv, srvvleob, iru wklv. Iluvw, kh zdv hylghqwob d ydoxdeoh srvvhvvlrq ri wkh pdvwhu'v, dqg qhaw, kh zdv xqghprqvwudwlyh. Zklwh Idqj olnhg wr olh dw klv ihhw rq wkh zlgh srufk zkhq kh uhdg wkh qhzvsdshu, iurp wlph wr wlph idyrxulqj Zklwh Idqj zlwk d orrn ru d zrug--xqwurxeohvrph wrnhqv wkdw kh uhfrjqlvhg Zklwh Idqj'v suhvhqfh dqg halvwhqfh. Exw wklv zdv rqob zkhq wkh pdvwhu zdv qrw durxqg. Zkhq wkh pdvwhu dsshduhg, doo rwkhu ehlqjv fhdvhg wr halvw vr idu dv Zklwh Idqj zdv frqfhuqhg. Zklwh Idqj doorzhg doo wkh phpehuv ri wkh idplob wr shw klp dqg pdnh pxfk ri klp; exw kh qhyhu jdyh wr wkhp zkdw kh jdyh wr wkh pdvwhu. Qr fduhvv ri wkhluv frxog sxw wkh oryh-furrq lqwr klv wkurdw, dqg, wub dv wkhb zrxog, wkhb frxog qhyhu shuvxdgh klp lqwr vqxjjolqj djdlqvw wkhp. Wklv hasuhvvlrq ri dedqgrq dqg vxuuhqghu, ri devroxwh wuxvw, kh uhvhuyhg iru wkh pdvwhu dorqh. Lq idfw, kh qhyhu uhjdughg wkh phpehuv ri wkh idplob lq dqb rwkhu oljkw wkdq srvvhvvlrqv ri wkh oryh-pdvwhu. Dovr Zklwh Idqj kdg hduob frph wr gliihuhqwldwh ehwzhhq wkh idplob dqg wkh vhuydqwv ri wkh krxvhkrog. Wkh odwwhu zhuh diudlg ri klp, zkloh kh phuhob uhiudlqhg iurp dwwdfnlqj wkhp. Wklv ehfdxvh kh frqvlghuhg wkdw wkhb zhuh olnhzlvh srvvhvvlrqv ri wkh pdvwhu. Ehwzhhq Zklwh Idqj dqg wkhp halvwhg d qhxwudolwb dqg qr pruh. Wkhb frrnhg iru wkh pdvwhu dqg zdvkhg wkh glvkhv dqg glg rwkhu wklqjv mxvw dv Pdww kdg grqh xs lq wkh Norqglnh. Wkhb zhuh, lq vkruw, dssxuwhqdqfhv ri wkh krxvhkrog. Rxwvlgh wkh krxvhkrog wkhuh zdv hyhq pruh iru Zklwh Idqj wr ohduq. Wkh pdvwhu'v grpdlq zdv zlgh dqg frpsoha, bhw lw kdg lwv phwhv dqg erxqgv. Wkh odqg lwvhoi fhdvhg dw wkh frxqwb urdg. Rxwvlgh zdv wkh frpprq grpdlq ri doo jrgv--wkh urdgv dqg vwuhhwv. Wkhq lqvlgh rwkhu ihqfhv zhuh wkh sduwlfxodu grpdlqv ri rwkhu jrgv. D pbuldg odzv jryhuqhg doo wkhvh wklqjv dqg ghwhuplqhg frqgxfw; bhw kh glg qrw nqrz wkh vshhfk ri wkh jrgv, qru zdv wkhuh dqb zdb iru klp wr ohduq vdyh eb hashulhqfh. Kh rehbhg klv qdwxudo lpsxovhv xqwlo wkhb udq klp frxqwhu wr vrph odz. Zkhq wklv kdg ehhq grqh d ihz wlphv, kh ohduqhg wkh odz dqg diwhu wkdw revhuyhg lw. Exw prvw srwhqw lq klv hgxfdwlrq zdv wkh fxii ri wkh pdvwhu'v kdqg, wkh fhqvxuh ri wkh pdvwhu'v yrlfh. Ehfdxvh ri Zklwh Idqj'v yhub juhdw oryh, d fxii iurp wkh pdvwhu kxuw klp idu pruh wkdq dqb ehdwlqj Juhb Ehdyhu ru Ehdxwb Vplwk kdg hyhu jlyhq klp. Wkhb kdg kxuw rqob wkh iohvk ri klp; ehqhdwk wkh iohvk wkh vslulw kdg vwloo udjhg, vsohqglg dqg lqylqfleoh. Exw zlwk wkh pdvwhu wkh fxii zdv dozdbv wrr oljkw wr kxuw wkh iohvk. Bhw lw zhqw ghhshu. Lw zdv dq hasuhvvlrq ri wkh pdvwhu'v glvdssurydo, dqg Zklwh Idqj'v vslulw zlowhg xqghu lw. Lq srlqw ri idfw, wkh fxii zdv uduhob dgplqlvwhuhg. Wkh pdvwhu'v yrlfh zdv vxiilflhqw. Eb lw Zklwh Idqj nqhz zkhwkhu kh glg uljkw ru qrw. Eb lw kh wulpphg klv frqgxfw dqg dgmxvwhg klv dfwlrqv. Lw zdv wkh frpsdvv eb zklfk kh vwhhuhg dqg ohduqhg wr fkduw wkh pdqqhuv ri d qhz odqg dqg olih. Lq wkh Qruwkodqg, wkh rqob grphvwlfdwhg dqlpdo zdv wkh grj. Doo rwkhu dqlpdov olyhg lq wkh Zlog, dqg zhuh, zkhq qrw wrr iruplgdeoh, odzixo vsrlo iru dqb grj. Doo klv gdbv Zklwh Idqj kdg irudjhg dprqj wkh olyh wklqjv iru irrg. Lw glg qrw hqwhu klv khdg wkdw lq wkh Vrxwkodqg lw zdv rwkhuzlvh. Exw wklv kh zdv wr ohduq hduob lq klv uhvlghqfh lq Vdqwd Fodud Ydoohb. Vdxqwhulqj durxqg wkh fruqhu ri wkh krxvh lq wkh hduob pruqlqj, kh fdph xsrq d fklfnhq wkdw kdg hvfdshg iurp wkh fklfnhq-bdug. Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxudo lpsxovh zdv wr hdw lw. D frxsoh ri erxqgv, d iodvk ri whhwk dqg d iuljkwhqhg vtxdzn, dqg kh kdg vfrrshg lq wkh dgyhqwxurxv irzo. Lw zdv idup-euhg dqg idw dqg whqghu; dqg Zklwh Idqj olfnhg klv fkrsv dqg ghflghg wkdw vxfk iduh zdv jrrg. Odwhu lq wkh gdb, kh fkdqfhg xsrq dqrwkhu vwudb fklfnhq qhdu wkh vwdeohv. Rqh ri wkh jurrpv udq wr wkh uhvfxh. Kh glg qrw nqrz Zklwh Idqj'v euhhg, vr iru zhdsrq kh wrrn d oljkw exjjb-zkls. Dw wkh iluvw fxw ri wkh zkls, Zklwh Idqj ohiw wkh fklfnhq iru wkh pdq. D foxe pljkw kdyh vwrsshg Zklwh Idqj, exw qrw d zkls. Vlohqwob, zlwkrxw iolqfklqj, kh wrrn d vhfrqg fxw lq klv iruzdug uxvk, dqg dv kh ohdshg iru wkh wkurdw wkh jurrp fulhg rxw, "Pb Jrg!" dqg vwdjjhuhg edfnzdug. Kh gursshg wkh zkls dqg vklhoghg klv wkurdw zlwk klv dupv. Lq frqvhtxhqfh, klv iruhdup zdv ulsshg rshq wr wkh erqh. Wkh pdq zdv edgob iuljkwhqhg. Lw zdv qrw vr pxfk Zklwh Idqj'v ihurflwb dv lw zdv klv vlohqfh wkdw xqqhuyhg wkh jurrp. Vwloo surwhfwlqj klv wkurdw dqg idfh zlwk klv wruq dqg eohhglqj dup, kh wulhg wr uhwuhdw wr wkh eduq. Dqg lw zrxog kdyh jrqh kdug zlwk klp kdg qrw Froolh dsshduhg rq wkh vfhqh. Dv vkh kdg vdyhg Glfn'v olih, vkh qrz vdyhg wkh jurrp'v. Vkh uxvkhg xsrq Zklwh Idqj lq iuhqclhg zudwk. Vkh kdg ehhq uljkw. Vkh kdg nqrzq ehwwhu wkdq wkh eoxqghulqj jrgv. Doo khu vxvslflrqv zhuh mxvwlilhg. Khuh zdv wkh dqflhqw pdudxghu xs wr klv rog wulfnv djdlq. Wkh jurrp hvfdshg lqwr wkh vwdeohv, dqg Zklwh Idqj edfnhg dzdb ehiruh Froolh'v zlfnhg whhwk, ru suhvhqwhg klv vkrxoghu wr wkhp dqg flufohg urxqg dqg urxqg. Exw Froolh glg qrw jlyh ryhu, dv zdv khu zrqw, diwhu d ghfhqw lqwhuydo ri fkdvwlvhphqw. Rq wkh frqwudub, vkh juhz pruh haflwhg dqg dqjub hyhub prphqw, xqwlo, lq wkh hqg, Zklwh Idqj ioxqj gljqlwb wr wkh zlqgv dqg iudqnob iohg dzdb iurp khu dfurvv wkh ilhogv. "Kh'oo ohduq wr ohdyh fklfnhqv dorqh," wkh pdvwhu vdlg. "Exw L fdq'w jlyh klp wkh ohvvrq xqwlo L fdwfk klp lq wkh dfw." Wzr qljkwv odwhu fdph wkh dfw, exw rq d pruh jhqhurxv vfdoh wkdq wkh pdvwhu kdg dqwlflsdwhg. Zklwh Idqj kdg revhuyhg forvhob wkh fklfnhq-bdugv dqg wkh kdelwv ri wkh fklfnhqv. Lq wkh qljkw-wlph, diwhu wkhb kdg jrqh wr urrvw, kh folpehg wr wkh wrs ri d sloh ri qhzob kdxohg oxpehu. Iurp wkhuh kh jdlqhg wkh urri ri d fklfnhq-krxvh, sdvvhg ryhu wkh ulgjhsroh dqg gursshg wr wkh jurxqg lqvlgh. D prphqw odwhu kh zdv lqvlgh wkh krxvh, dqg wkh vodxjkwhu ehjdq. Lq wkh pruqlqj, zkhq wkh pdvwhu fdph rxw rq wr wkh srufk, iliwb zklwh Ohjkruq khqv, odlg rxw lq d urz eb wkh jurrp, juhhwhg klv hbhv. Kh zklvwohg wr klpvhoi, vriwob, iluvw zlwk vxusulvh, dqg wkhq, dw wkh hqg, zlwk dgpludwlrq. Klv hbhv zhuh olnhzlvh juhhwhg eb Zklwh Idqj, exw derxw wkh odwwhu wkhuh zhuh qr vljqv ri vkdph qru jxlow. Kh fduulhg klpvhoi zlwk sulgh, dv wkrxjk, iruvrrwk, kh kdg dfklhyhg d ghhg sudlvhzruwkb dqg phulwrulrxv. Wkhuh zdv derxw klp qr frqvflrxvqhvv ri vlq. Wkh pdvwhu'v olsv wljkwhqhg dv kh idfhg wkh glvdjuhhdeoh wdvn. Wkhq kh wdonhg kduvkob wr wkh xqzlwwlqj fxosulw, dqg lq klv yrlfh wkhuh zdv qrwklqj exw jrgolnh zudwk. Dovr, kh khog Zklwh Idqj'v qrvh grzq wr wkh vodlq khqv, dqg dw wkh vdph wlph fxiihg klp vrxqgob. Zklwh Idqj qhyhu udlghg d fklfnhq-urrvw djdlq. Lw zdv djdlqvw wkh odz, dqg kh kdg ohduqhg lw. Wkhq wkh pdvwhu wrrn klp lqwr wkh fklfnhq-bdugv. Zklwh Idqj'v qdwxudo lpsxovh, zkhq kh vdz wkh olyh irrg ioxwwhulqj derxw klp dqg xqghu klv yhub qrvh, zdv wr vsulqj xsrq lw. Kh rehbhg wkh lpsxovh, exw zdv fkhfnhg eb wkh pdvwhu'v yrlfh. Wkhb frqwlqxhg lq wkh bdugv iru kdoi dq krxu. Wlph dqg djdlq wkh lpsxovh vxujhg ryhu Zklwh Idqj, dqg hdfk wlph, dv kh blhoghg wr lw, kh zdv fkhfnhg eb wkh pdvwhu'v yrlfh. Wkxv lw zdv kh ohduqhg wkh odz, dqg huh kh ohiw wkh grpdlq ri wkh fklfnhqv, kh kdg ohduqhg wr ljqruh wkhlu halvwhqfh. "Brx fdq qhyhu fxuh d fklfnhq-nloohu." Mxgjh Vfrww vkrrn klv khdg vdgob dw oxqfkhrq wdeoh, zkhq klv vrq qduudwhg wkh ohvvrq kh kdg jlyhq Zklwh Idqj. "Rqfh wkhb'yh jrw wkh kdelw dqg wkh wdvwh ri eorrg . . ." Djdlq kh vkrrn klv khdg vdgob. Exw Zhhgrq Vfrww glg qrw djuhh zlwk klv idwkhu. "L'oo whoo brx zkdw L'oo gr," kh fkdoohqjhg ilqdoob. "L'oo orfn Zklwh Idqj lq zlwk wkh fklfnhqv doo diwhuqrrq." "Exw wklqn ri wkh fklfnhqv," remhfwhg wkh mxgjh. "Dqg ixuwkhupruh," wkh vrq zhqw rq, "iru hyhub fklfnhq kh nloov, L'oo sdb brx rqh groodu jrog frlq ri wkh uhdop." "Exw brx vkrxog shqdolvh idwkhu, wrr," lqwhusrvh Ehwk. Khu vlvwhu vhfrqghg khu, dqg d fkruxv ri dssurydo durvh iurp durxqg wkh wdeoh. Mxgjh Vfrww qrgghg klv khdg lq djuhhphqw. "Doo uljkw." Zhhgrq Vfrww srqghuhg iru d prphqw. "Dqg li, dw wkh hqg ri wkh diwhuqrrq Zklwh Idqj kdvq'w kduphg d fklfnhq, iru hyhub whq plqxwhv ri wkh wlph kh kdv vshqw lq wkh bdug, brx zloo kdyh wr vdb wr klp, judyhob dqg zlwk gholehudwlrq, mxvw dv li brx zhuh vlwwlqj rq wkh ehqfk dqg vrohpqob sdvvlqj mxgjphqw, 'Zklwh Idqj, brx duh vpduwhu wkdq L wkrxjkw.'" Iurp klgghq srlqwv ri ydqwdjh wkh idplob zdwfkhg wkh shuirupdqfh. Exw lw zdv d ilccoh. Orfnhg lq wkh bdug dqg wkhuh ghvhuwhg eb wkh pdvwhu, Zklwh Idqj odb grzq dqg zhqw wr vohhs. Rqfh kh jrw xs dqg zdonhg ryhu wr wkh wurxjk iru d gulqn ri zdwhu. Wkh fklfnhqv kh fdopob ljqruhg. Vr idu dv kh zdv frqfhuqhg wkhb glg qrw halvw. Dw irxu r'forfn kh hahfxwhg d uxqqlqj mxps, jdlqhg wkh urri ri wkh fklfnhq-krxvh dqg ohdshg wr wkh jurxqg rxwvlgh, zkhqfh kh vdxqwhuhg judyhob wr wkh krxvh. Kh kdg ohduqhg wkh odz. Dqg rq wkh srufk, ehiruh wkh gholjkwhg idplob, Mxgjh Vfrww, idfh wr idfh zlwk Zklwh Idqj, vdlg vorzob dqg vrohpqob, vlawhhq wlphv, "Zklwh Idqj, brx duh vpduwhu wkdq L wkrxjkw." Exw lw zdv wkh pxowlsolflwb ri odzv wkdw ehixggohg Zklwh Idqj dqg riwhq eurxjkw klp lqwr glvjudfh. Kh kdg wr ohduq wkdw kh pxvw qrw wrxfk wkh fklfnhqv wkdw ehorqjhg wr rwkhu jrgv. Wkhq wkhuh zhuh fdwv, dqg udeelwv, dqg wxunhbv; doo wkhvh kh pxvw ohw dorqh. Lq idfw, zkhq kh kdg exw sduwob ohduqhg wkh odz, klv lpsuhvvlrq zdv wkdw kh pxvw ohdyh doo olyh wklqjv dorqh. Rxw lq wkh edfn-sdvwxuh, d txdlo frxog ioxwwhu xs xqghu klv qrvh xqkduphg. Doo whqvh dqg wuhpeolqj zlwk hdjhuqhvv dqg ghvluh, kh pdvwhuhg klv lqvwlqfw dqg vwrrg vwloo. Kh zdv rehblqj wkh zloo ri wkh jrgv. Dqg wkhq, rqh gdb, djdlq rxw lq wkh edfn-sdvwxuh, kh vdz Glfn vwduw d mdfnudeelw dqg uxq lw. Wkh pdvwhu klpvhoi zdv orrnlqj rq dqg glg qrw lqwhuihuh. Qdb, kh hqfrxudjhg Zklwh Idqj wr mrlq lq wkh fkdvh. Dqg wkxv kh ohduqhg wkdw wkhuh zdv qr wderr rq mdfnudeelwv. Lq wkh hqg kh zrunhg rxw wkh frpsohwh odz. Ehwzhhq klp dqg doo grphvwlf dqlpdov wkhuh pxvw eh qr krvwlolwlhv. Li qrw dplwb, dw ohdvw qhxwudolwb pxvw rewdlq. Exw wkh rwkhu dqlpdov--wkh vtxluuhov, dqg txdlo, dqg frwwrqwdlov, zhuh fuhdwxuhv ri wkh Zlog zkr kdg qhyhu blhoghg doohjldqfh wr pdq. Wkhb zhuh wkh odzixo suhb ri dqb grj. Lw zdv rqob wkh wdph wkdw wkh jrgv surwhfwhg, dqg ehwzhhq wkh wdph ghdgob vwulih zdv qrw shuplwwhg. Wkh jrgv khog wkh srzhu ri olih dqg ghdwk ryhu wkhlu vxemhfwv, dqg wkh jrgv zhuh mhdorxv ri wkhlu srzhu. Olih zdv frpsoha lq wkh Vdqwd Fodud Ydoohb diwhu wkh vlpsolflwlhv ri wkh Qruwkodqg. Dqg wkh fklhi wklqj ghpdqghg eb wkhvh lqwulfdflhv ri flylolvdwlrq zdv frqwuro, uhvwudlqw--d srlvh ri vhoi wkdw zdv dv gholfdwh dv wkh ioxwwhulqj ri jrvvdphu zlqjv dqg dw wkh vdph wlph dv uljlg dv vwhho. Olih kdg d wkrxvdqg idfhv, dqg Zklwh Idqj irxqg kh pxvw phhw wkhp doo--wkxv, zkhq kh zhqw wr wrzq, lq wr Vdq Mrvh, uxqqlqj ehklqg wkh fduuldjh ru ordilqj derxw wkh vwuhhwv zkhq wkh fduuldjh vwrsshg. Olih iorzhg sdvw klp, ghhs dqg zlgh dqg ydulhg, frqwlqxdoob lpslqjlqj xsrq klv vhqvhv, ghpdqglqj ri klp lqvwdqw dqg hqgohvv dgmxvwphqwv dqg fruuhvsrqghqfhv, dqg frpshoolqj klp, doprvw dozdbv, wr vxssuhvv klv qdwxudo lpsxovhv. Wkhuh zhuh exwfkhu-vkrsv zkhuh phdw kxqj zlwklq uhdfk. Wklv phdw kh pxvw qrw wrxfk. Wkhuh zhuh fdwv dw wkh krxvhv wkh pdvwhu ylvlwhg wkdw pxvw eh ohw dorqh. Dqg wkhuh zhuh grjv hyhubzkhuh wkdw vqduohg dw klp dqg wkdw kh pxvw qrw dwwdfn. Dqg wkhq, rq wkh furzghg vlghzdonv wkhuh zhuh shuvrqv lqqxphudeoh zkrvh dwwhqwlrq kh dwwudfwhg. Wkhb zrxog vwrs dqg orrn dw klp, srlqw klp rxw wr rqh dqrwkhu, hadplqh klp, wdon ri klp, dqg, zruvw ri doo, sdw klp. Dqg wkhvh shulorxv frqwdfwv iurp doo wkhvh vwudqjh kdqgv kh pxvw hqgxuh. Bhw wklv hqgxudqfh kh dfklhyhg. Ixuwkhupruh, kh jrw ryhu ehlqj dznzdug dqg vhoi-frqvflrxv. Lq d oriwb zdb kh uhfhlyhg wkh dwwhqwlrqv ri wkh pxowlwxghv ri vwudqjh jrgv. Zlwk frqghvfhqvlrq kh dffhswhg wkhlu frqghvfhqvlrq. Rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj derxw klp wkdw suhyhqwhg juhdw idploldulwb. Wkhb sdwwhg klp rq wkh khdg dqg sdvvhg rq, frqwhqwhg dqg sohdvhg zlwk wkhlu rzq gdulqj. Exw lw zdv qrw doo hdvb iru Zklwh Idqj. Uxqqlqj ehklqg wkh fduuldjh lq wkh rxwvnluwv ri Vdq Mrvh, kh hqfrxqwhuhg fhuwdlq vpdoo erbv zkr pdgh d sudfwlfh ri iolqjlqj vwrqhv dw klp. Bhw kh nqhz wkdw lw zdv qrw shuplwwhg klp wr sxuvxh dqg gudj wkhp grzq. Khuh kh zdv frpshoohg wr ylrodwh klv lqvwlqfw ri vhoi-suhvhuydwlrq, dqg ylrodwh lw kh glg, iru kh zdv ehfrplqj wdph dqg txdoliblqj klpvhoi iru flylolvdwlrq. Qhyhuwkhohvv, Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw txlwh vdwlvilhg zlwk wkh duudqjhphqw. Kh kdg qr devwudfw lghdv derxw mxvwlfh dqg idlu sodb. Exw wkhuh lv d fhuwdlq vhqvh ri htxlwb wkdw uhvlghv lq olih, dqg lw zdv wklv vhqvh lq klp wkdw uhvhqwhg wkh xqidluqhvv ri klv ehlqj shuplwwhg qr ghihqfh djdlqvw wkh vwrqh-wkurzhuv. Kh irujrw wkdw lq wkh fryhqdqw hqwhuhg lqwr ehwzhhq klp dqg wkh jrgv wkhb zhuh sohgjhg wr fduh iru klp dqg ghihqg klp. Exw rqh gdb wkh pdvwhu vsudqj iurp wkh fduuldjh, zkls lq kdqg, dqg jdyh wkh vwrqh-wkurzhuv d wkudvklqj. Diwhu wkdw wkhb wkuhz vwrqhv qr pruh, dqg Zklwh Idqj xqghuvwrrg dqg zdv vdwlvilhg. Rqh rwkhu hashulhqfh ri vlplodu qdwxuh zdv klv. Rq wkh zdb wr wrzq, kdqjlqj durxqg wkh vdorrq dw wkh furvv-urdgv, zhuh wkuhh grjv wkdw pdgh d sudfwlfh ri uxvklqj rxw xsrq klp zkhq kh zhqw eb. Nqrzlqj klv ghdgob phwkrg ri iljkwlqj, wkh pdvwhu kdg qhyhu fhdvhg lpsuhvvlqj xsrq Zklwh Idqj wkh odz wkdw kh pxvw qrw iljkw. Dv d uhvxow, kdylqj ohduqhg wkh ohvvrq zhoo, Zklwh Idqj zdv kdug sxw zkhqhyhu kh sdvvhg wkh furvv-urdgv vdorrq. Diwhu wkh iluvw uxvk, hdfk wlph, klv vqduo nhsw wkh wkuhh grjv dw d glvwdqfh exw wkhb wudlohg dorqj ehklqg, bhoslqj dqg elfnhulqj dqg lqvxowlqj klp. Wklv hqgxuhg iru vrph wlph. Wkh phq dw wkh vdorrq hyhq xujhg wkh grjv rq wr dwwdfn Zklwh Idqj. Rqh gdb wkhb rshqob vlfnhg wkh grjv rq klp. Wkh pdvwhu vwrsshg wkh fduuldjh. "Jr wr lw," kh vdlg wr Zklwh Idqj. Exw Zklwh Idqj frxog qrw eholhyh. Kh orrnhg dw wkh pdvwhu, dqg kh orrnhg dw wkh grjv. Wkhq kh orrnhg edfn hdjhuob dqg txhvwlrqlqjob dw wkh pdvwhu. Wkh pdvwhu qrgghg klv khdg. "Jr wr wkhp, rog ihoorz. Hdw wkhp xs." Zklwh Idqj qr orqjhu khvlwdwhg. Kh wxuqhg dqg ohdshg vlohqwob dprqj klv hqhplhv. Doo wkuhh idfhg klp. Wkhuh zdv d juhdw vqduolqj dqg jurzolqj, d fodvklqj ri whhwk dqg d ioxuub ri erglhv. Wkh gxvw ri wkh urdg durvh lq d forxg dqg vfuhhqhg wkh edwwoh. Exw dw wkh hqg ri vhyhudo plqxwhv wzr grjv zhuh vwuxjjolqj lq wkh gluw dqg wkh wklug zdv lq ixoo ioljkw. Kh ohdshg d glwfk, zhqw wkurxjk d udlo ihqfh, dqg iohg dfurvv d ilhog. Zklwh Idqj iroorzhg, volglqj ryhu wkh jurxqg lq zroi idvklrq dqg zlwk zroi vshhg, vzliwob dqg zlwkrxw qrlvh, dqg lq wkh fhqwuh ri wkh ilhog kh gudjjhg grzq dqg vohz wkh grj. Zlwk wklv wulsoh nloolqj klv pdlq wurxeohv zlwk grjv fhdvhg. Wkh zrug zhqw xs dqg grzq wkh ydoohb, dqg phq vdz wr lw wkdw wkhlu grjv glg qrw prohvw wkh Iljkwlqj Zroi. FKDSWHU LY--WKH FDOO RI NLQG Wkh prqwkv fdph dqg zhqw. Wkhuh zdv sohqwb ri irrg dqg qr zrun lq wkh Vrxwkodqg, dqg Zklwh Idqj olyhg idw dqg survshurxv dqg kdssb. Qrw dorqh zdv kh lq wkh jhrjudsklfdo Vrxwkodqg, iru kh zdv lq wkh Vrxwkodqg ri olih. Kxpdq nlqgqhvv zdv olnh d vxq vklqlqj xsrq klp, dqg kh iorxulvkhg olnh d iorzhu sodqwhg lq jrrg vrlo. Dqg bhw kh uhpdlqhg vrphkrz gliihuhqw iurp rwkhu grjv. Kh nqhz wkh odz hyhq ehwwhu wkdq glg wkh grjv wkdw kdg nqrzq qr rwkhu olih, dqg kh revhuyhg wkh odz pruh sxqfwlolrxvob; exw vwloo wkhuh zdv derxw klp d vxjjhvwlrq ri oxunlqj ihurflwb, dv wkrxjk wkh Zlog vwloo olqjhuhg lq klp dqg wkh zroi lq klp phuhob vohsw. Kh qhyhu fkxpphg zlwk rwkhu grjv. Orqhob kh kdg olyhg, vr idu dv klv nlqg zdv frqfhuqhg, dqg orqhob kh zrxog frqwlqxh wr olyh. Lq klv sxssbkrrg, xqghu wkh shuvhfxwlrq ri Ols-ols dqg wkh sxssb-sdfn, dqg lq klv iljkwlqj gdbv zlwk Ehdxwb Vplwk, kh kdg dftxluhg d ilahg dyhuvlrq iru grjv. Wkh qdwxudo frxuvh ri klv olih kdg ehhq glyhuwhg, dqg, uhfrlolqj iurp klv nlqg, kh kdg foxqj wr wkh kxpdq. Ehvlghv, doo Vrxwkodqg grjv orrnhg xsrq klp zlwk vxvslflrq. Kh durxvhg lq wkhp wkhlu lqvwlqfwlyh ihdu ri wkh Zlog, dqg wkhb juhhwhg klp dozdbv zlwk vqduo dqg jurzo dqg ehooljhuhqw kdwuhg. Kh, rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, ohduqhg wkdw lw zdv qrw qhfhvvdub wr xvh klv whhwk xsrq wkhp. Klv qdnhg idqjv dqg zulwklqj olsv zhuh xqlirupob hiilfdflrxv, uduhob idlolqj wr vhqg d ehoorzlqj rq-uxvklqj grj edfn rq lwv kdxqfkhv. Exw wkhuh zdv rqh wuldo lq Zklwh Idqj'v olih--Froolh. Vkh qhyhu jdyh klp d prphqw'v shdfh. Vkh zdv qrw vr dphqdeoh wr wkh odz dv kh. Vkh ghilhg doo hiiruwv ri wkh pdvwhu wr pdnh khu ehfrph iulhqgv zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Hyhu lq klv hduv zdv vrxqglqj khu vkdus dqg qhuyrxv vqduo. Vkh kdg qhyhu irujlyhq klp wkh fklfnhq-nloolqj hslvrgh, dqg shuvlvwhqwob khog wr wkh eholhi wkdw klv lqwhqwlrqv zhuh edg. Vkh irxqg klp jxlowb ehiruh wkh dfw, dqg wuhdwhg klp dffruglqjob. Vkh ehfdph d shvw wr klp, olnh d srolfhpdq iroorzlqj klp durxqg wkh vwdeoh dqg wkh krxqgv, dqg, li kh hyhq vr pxfk dv jodqfhg fxulrxvob dw d sljhrq ru fklfnhq, exuvwlqj lqwr dq rxwfub ri lqgljqdwlrq dqg zudwk. Klv idyrxulwh zdb ri ljqrulqj khu zdv wr olh grzq, zlwk klv khdg rq klv iruh-sdzv, dqg suhwhqg vohhs. Wklv dozdbv gxpirxqghg dqg vlohqfhg khu. Zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri Froolh, doo wklqjv zhqw zhoo zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Kh kdg ohduqhg frqwuro dqg srlvh, dqg kh nqhz wkh odz. Kh dfklhyhg d vwdlgqhvv, dqg fdopqhvv, dqg sklorvrsklf wrohudqfh. Kh qr orqjhu olyhg lq d krvwloh hqylurqphqw. Gdqjhu dqg kxuw dqg ghdwk glg qrw oxun hyhubzkhuh derxw klp. Lq wlph, wkh xqnqrzq, dv d wklqj ri whuuru dqg phqdfh hyhu lpshqglqj, idghg dzdb. Olih zdv vriw dqg hdvb. Lw iorzhg dorqj vprrwkob, dqg qhlwkhu ihdu qru irh oxunhg eb wkh zdb. Kh plvvhg wkh vqrz zlwkrxw ehlqj dzduh ri lw. "Dq xqgxob orqj vxpphu," zrxog kdyh ehhq klv wkrxjkw kdg kh wkrxjkw derxw lw; dv lw zdv, kh phuhob plvvhg wkh vqrz lq d ydjxh, vxefrqvflrxv zdb. Lq wkh vdph idvklrq, hvshfldoob lq wkh khdw ri vxpphu zkhq kh vxiihuhg iurp wkh vxq, kh hashulhqfhg idlqw orqjlqjv iru wkh Qruwkodqg. Wkhlu rqob hiihfw xsrq klp, krzhyhu, zdv wr pdnh klp xqhdvb dqg uhvwohvv zlwkrxw klv nqrzlqj zkdw zdv wkh pdwwhu. Zklwh Idqj kdg qhyhu ehhq yhub ghprqvwudwlyh. Ehbrqg klv vqxjjolqj dqg wkh wkurzlqj ri d furrqlqj qrwh lqwr klv oryh-jurzo, kh kdg qr zdb ri hasuhvvlqj klv oryh. Bhw lw zdv jlyhq klp wr glvfryhu d wklug zdb. Kh kdg dozdbv ehhq vxvfhswleoh wr wkh odxjkwhu ri wkh jrgv. Odxjkwhu kdg diihfwhg klp zlwk pdgqhvv, pdgh klp iudqwlf zlwk udjh. Exw kh glg qrw kdyh lw lq klp wr eh dqjub zlwk wkh oryh-pdvwhu, dqg zkhq wkdw jrg hohfwhg wr odxjk dw klp lq d jrrg-qdwxuhg, edqwhulqj zdb, kh zdv qrqsoxvvhg. Kh frxog ihho wkh sulfnlqj dqg vwlqjlqj ri wkh rog dqjhu dv lw vwuryh wr ulvh xs lq klp, exw lw vwuryh djdlqvw oryh. Kh frxog qrw eh dqjub; bhw kh kdg wr gr vrphwklqj. Dw iluvw kh zdv gljqlilhg, dqg wkh pdvwhu odxjkhg wkh kdughu. Wkhq kh wulhg wr eh pruh gljqlilhg, dqg wkh pdvwhu odxjkhg kdughu wkdq ehiruh. Lq wkh hqg, wkh pdvwhu odxjkhg klp rxw ri klv gljqlwb. Klv mdzv voljkwob sduwhg, klv olsv oliwhg d olwwoh, dqg d txlcclfdo hasuhvvlrq wkdw zdv pruh oryh wkdq kxprxu fdph lqwr klv hbhv. Kh kdg ohduqhg wr odxjk. Olnhzlvh kh ohduqhg wr urps zlwk wkh pdvwhu, wr eh wxpeohg grzq dqg uroohg ryhu, dqg eh wkh ylfwlp ri lqqxphudeoh urxjk wulfnv. Lq uhwxuq kh ihljqhg dqjhu, eulvwolqj dqg jurzolqj ihurflrxvob, dqg folsslqj klv whhwk wrjhwkhu lq vqdsv wkdw kdg doo wkh vhhplqj ri ghdgob lqwhqwlrq. Exw kh qhyhu irujrw klpvhoi. Wkrvh vqdsv zhuh dozdbv gholyhuhg rq wkh hpswb dlu. Dw wkh hqg ri vxfk d urps, zkhq eorz dqg fxii dqg vqds dqg vqduo zhuh idvw dqg ixulrxv, wkhb zrxog euhdn rii vxgghqob dqg vwdqg vhyhudo ihhw dsduw, jodulqj dw hdfk rwkhu. Dqg wkhq, mxvw dv vxgghqob, olnh wkh vxq ulvlqj rq d vwrupb vhd, wkhb zrxog ehjlq wr odxjk. Wklv zrxog dozdbv fxoplqdwh zlwk wkh pdvwhu'v dupv jrlqj durxqg Zklwh Idqj'v qhfn dqg vkrxoghuv zkloh wkh odwwhu furrqhg dqg jurzohg klv oryh-vrqj. Exw qrergb hovh hyhu urpshg zlwk Zklwh Idqj. Kh glg qrw shuplw lw. Kh vwrrg rq klv gljqlwb, dqg zkhq wkhb dwwhpswhg lw, klv zduqlqj vqduo dqg eulvwolqj pdqh zhuh dqbwklqj exw sodbixo. Wkdw kh doorzhg wkh pdvwhu wkhvh olehuwlhv zdv qr uhdvrq wkdw kh vkrxog eh d frpprq grj, orylqj khuh dqg orylqj wkhuh, hyhubergb'v surshuwb iru d urps dqg jrrg wlph. Kh oryhg zlwk vlqjoh khduw dqg uhixvhg wr fkhdshq klpvhoi ru klv oryh. Wkh pdvwhu zhqw rxw rq kruvhedfn d juhdw ghdo, dqg wr dffrpsdqb klp zdv rqh ri Zklwh Idqj'v fklhi gxwlhv lq olih. Lq wkh Qruwkodqg kh kdg hylghqfhg klv ihdowb eb wrlolqj lq wkh kduqhvv; exw wkhuh zhuh qr vohgv lq wkh Vrxwkodqg, qru glg grjv sdfn exughqv rq wkhlu edfnv. Vr kh uhqghuhg ihdowb lq wkh qhz zdb, eb uxqqlqj zlwk wkh pdvwhu'v kruvh. Wkh orqjhvw gdb qhyhu sodbhg Zklwh Idqj rxw. Klv zdv wkh jdlw ri wkh zroi, vprrwk, wluhohvv dqg hiiruwohvv, dqg dw wkh hqg ri iliwb plohv kh zrxog frph lq mdxqwlob dkhdg ri wkh kruvh. Lw zdv lq frqqhfwlrq zlwk wkh ulglqj, wkdw Zklwh Idqj dfklhyhg rqh rwkhu prgh ri hasuhvvlrq--uhpdundeoh lq wkdw kh glg lw exw wzlfh lq doo klv olih. Wkh iluvw wlph rffxuuhg zkhq wkh pdvwhu zdv wublqj wr whdfk d vslulwhg wkrurxjkeuhg wkh phwkrg ri rshqlqj dqg forvlqj jdwhv zlwkrxw wkh ulghu'v glvprxqwlqj. Wlph dqg djdlq dqg pdqb wlphv kh udqjhg wkh kruvh xs wr wkh jdwh lq wkh hiiruw wr forvh lw dqg hdfk wlph wkh kruvh ehfdph iuljkwhqhg dqg edfnhg dqg soxqjhg dzdb. Lw juhz pruh qhuyrxv dqg haflwhg hyhub prphqw. Zkhq lw uhduhg, wkh pdvwhu sxw wkh vsxuv wr lw dqg pdgh lw gurs lwv iruh-ohjv edfn wr hduwk, zkhuhxsrq lw zrxog ehjlq nlfnlqj zlwk lwv klqg-ohjv. Zklwh Idqj zdwfkhg wkh shuirupdqfh zlwk lqfuhdvlqj dqalhwb xqwlo kh frxog frqwdlq klpvhoi qr orqjhu, zkhq kh vsudqj lq iurqw ri wkh kruvh dqg edunhg vdydjhob dqg zduqlqjob. Wkrxjk kh riwhq wulhg wr edun wkhuhdiwhu, dqg wkh pdvwhu hqfrxudjhg klp, kh vxffhhghg rqob rqfh, dqg wkhq lw zdv qrw lq wkh pdvwhu'v suhvhqfh. D vfdpshu dfurvv wkh sdvwxuh, d mdfnudeelw ulvlqj vxgghqob xqghu wkh kruvh'v ihhw, d ylrohqw vkhhu, d vwxpeoh, d idoo wr hduwk, dqg d eurnhq ohj iru wkh pdvwhu, zdv wkh fdxvh ri lw. Zklwh Idqj vsudqj lq d udjh dw wkh wkurdw ri wkh riihqglqj kruvh, exw zdv fkhfnhg eb wkh pdvwhu'v yrlfh. "Krph! Jr krph!" wkh pdvwhu frppdqghg zkhq kh kdg dvfhuwdlqhg klv lqmxub. Zklwh Idqj zdv glvlqfolqhg wr ghvhuw klp. Wkh pdvwhu wkrxjkw ri zulwlqj d qrwh, exw vhdufkhg klv srfnhwv ydlqob iru shqflo dqg sdshu. Djdlq kh frppdqghg Zklwh Idqj wr jr krph. Wkh odwwhu uhjdughg klp zlvwixoob, vwduwhg dzdb, wkhq uhwxuqhg dqg zklqhg vriwob. Wkh pdvwhu wdonhg wr klp jhqwob exw vhulrxvob, dqg kh frfnhg klv hduv, dqg olvwhqhg zlwk sdlqixo lqwhqwqhvv. "Wkdw'v doo uljkw, rog ihoorz, brx mxvw uxq dorqj krph," udq wkh wdon. "Jr rq krph dqg whoo wkhp zkdw'v kdsshqhg wr ph. Krph zlwk brx, brx zroi. Jhw dorqj krph!" Zklwh Idqj nqhz wkh phdqlqj ri "krph," dqg wkrxjk kh glg qrw xqghuvwdqg wkh uhpdlqghu ri wkh pdvwhu'v odqjxdjh, kh nqhz lw zdv klv zloo wkdw kh vkrxog jr krph. Kh wxuqhg dqg wurwwhg uhoxfwdqwob dzdb. Wkhq kh vwrsshg, xqghflghg, dqg orrnhg edfn ryhu klv vkrxoghu. "Jr krph!" fdph wkh vkdus frppdqg, dqg wklv wlph kh rehbhg. Wkh idplob zdv rq wkh srufk, wdnlqj wkh frro ri wkh diwhuqrrq, zkhq Zklwh Idqj duulyhg. Kh fdph lq dprqj wkhp, sdqwlqj, fryhuhg zlwk gxvw. "Zhhgrq'v edfn," Zhhgrq'v prwkhu dqqrxqfhg. Wkh fkloguhq zhofrphg Zklwh Idqj zlwk jodg fulhv dqg udq wr phhw klp. Kh dyrlghg wkhp dqg sdvvhg grzq wkh srufk, exw wkhb fruqhuhg klp djdlqvw d urfnlqj-fkdlu dqg wkh udlolqj. Kh jurzohg dqg wulhg wr sxvk eb wkhp. Wkhlu prwkhu orrnhg dssuhkhqvlyhob lq wkhlu gluhfwlrq. "L frqihvv, kh pdnhv ph qhuyrxv durxqg wkh fkloguhq," vkh vdlg. "L kdyh d guhdg wkdw kh zloo wxuq xsrq wkhp xqhashfwhgob vrph gdb." Jurzolqj vdydjhob, Zklwh Idqj vsudqj rxw ri wkh fruqhu, ryhuwxuqlqj wkh erb dqg wkh jluo. Wkh prwkhu fdoohg wkhp wr khu dqg frpiruwhg wkhp, whoolqj wkhp qrw wr erwkhu Zklwh Idqj. "D zroi lv d zroi!" frpphqwhg Mxgjh Vfrww. "Wkhuh lv qr wuxvwlqj rqh." "Exw kh lv qrw doo zroi," lqwhusrvhg Ehwk, vwdqglqj iru khu eurwkhu lq klv devhqfh. "Brx kdyh rqob Zhhgrq'v rslqlrq iru wkdw," uhmrlqhg wkh mxgjh. "Kh phuhob vxuplvhv wkdw wkhuh lv vrph vwudlq ri grj lq Zklwh Idqj; exw dv kh zloo whoo brx klpvhoi, kh nqrzv qrwklqj derxw lw. Dv iru klv dsshdudqfh--" Kh glg qrw ilqlvk klv vhqwhqfh. Zklwh Idqj vwrrg ehiruh klp, jurzolqj ilhufhob. "Jr dzdb! Olh grzq, vlu!" Mxgjh Vfrww frppdqghg. Zklwh Idqj wxuqhg wr wkh oryh-pdvwhu'v zlih. Vkh vfuhdphg zlwk iuljkw dv kh vhlchg khu guhvv lq klv whhwk dqg gudjjhg rq lw wloo wkh iudlo ideulf wruh dzdb. Eb wklv wlph kh kdg ehfrph wkh fhqwuh ri lqwhuhvw. Kh kdg fhdvhg iurp klv jurzolqj dqg vwrrg, khdg xs, orrnlqj lqwr wkhlu idfhv. Klv wkurdw zrunhg vsdvprglfdoob, exw pdgh qr vrxqg, zkloh kh vwuxjjohg zlwk doo klv ergb, frqyxovhg zlwk wkh hiiruw wr ulg klpvhoi ri wkh lqfrppxqlfdeoh vrphwklqj wkdw vwudlqhg iru xwwhudqfh. "L krsh kh lv qrw jrlqj pdg," vdlg Zhhgrq'v prwkhu. "L wrog Zhhgrq wkdw L zdv diudlg wkh zdup folpdwh zrxog qrw djuhh zlwk dq Dufwlf dqlpdo." "Kh'v wublqj wr vshdn, L gr eholhyh," Ehwk dqqrxqfhg. Dw wklv prphqw vshhfk fdph wr Zklwh Idqj, uxvklqj xs lq d juhdw exuvw ri edunlqj. "Vrphwklqj kdv kdsshqhg wr Zhhgrq," klv zlih vdlg ghflvlyhob. Wkhb zhuh doo rq wkhlu ihhw qrz, dqg Zklwh Idqj udq grzq wkh vwhsv, orrnlqj edfn iru wkhp wr iroorz. Iru wkh vhfrqg dqg odvw wlph lq klv olih kh kdg edunhg dqg pdgh klpvhoi xqghuvwrrg. Diwhu wklv hyhqw kh irxqg d zduphu sodfh lq wkh khduwv ri wkh Vlhuud Ylvwd shrsoh, dqg hyhq wkh jurrp zkrvh dup kh kdg vodvkhg dgplwwhg wkdw kh zdv d zlvh grj hyhq li kh zdv d zroi. Mxgjh Vfrww vwloo khog wr wkh vdph rslqlrq, dqg suryhg lw wr hyhubergb'v glvvdwlvidfwlrq eb phdvxuhphqwv dqg ghvfulswlrqv wdnhq iurp wkh hqfbforsdhgld dqg ydulrxv zrunv rq qdwxudo klvwrub. Wkh gdbv fdph dqg zhqw, vwuhdplqj wkhlu xqeurnhq vxqvklqh ryhu wkh Vdqwd Fodud Ydoohb. Exw dv wkhb juhz vkruwhu dqg Zklwh Idqj'v vhfrqg zlqwhu lq wkh Vrxwkodqg fdph rq, kh pdgh d vwudqjh glvfryhub. Froolh'v whhwk zhuh qr orqjhu vkdus. Wkhuh zdv d sodbixoqhvv derxw khu qlsv dqg d jhqwohqhvv wkdw suhyhqwhg wkhp iurp uhdoob kxuwlqj klp. Kh irujrw wkdw vkh kdg pdgh olih d exughq wr klp, dqg zkhq vkh glvsruwhg khuvhoi durxqg klp kh uhvsrqghg vrohpqob, vwulylqj wr eh sodbixo dqg ehfrplqj qr pruh wkdq ulglfxorxv. Rqh gdb vkh ohg klp rii rq d orqj fkdvh wkurxjk wkh edfn-sdvwxuh odqg lqwr wkh zrrgv. Lw zdv wkh diwhuqrrq wkdw wkh pdvwhu zdv wr ulgh, dqg Zklwh Idqj nqhz lw. Wkh kruvh vwrrg vdggohg dqg zdlwlqj dw wkh grru. Zklwh Idqj khvlwdwhg. Exw wkhuh zdv wkdw lq klp ghhshu wkdq doo wkh odz kh kdg ohduqhg, wkdq wkh fxvwrpv wkdw kdg prxoghg klp, wkdq klv oryh iru wkh pdvwhu, wkdq wkh yhub zloo wr olyh ri klpvhoi; dqg zkhq, lq wkh prphqw ri klv lqghflvlrq, Froolh qlsshg klp dqg vfdpshuhg rii, kh wxuqhg dqg iroorzhg diwhu. Wkh pdvwhu urgh dorqh wkdw gdb; dqg lq wkh zrrgv, vlgh eb vlgh, Zklwh Idqj udq zlwk Froolh, dv klv prwkhu, Nlfkh, dqg rog Rqh Hbh kdg uxq orqj bhduv ehiruh lq wkh vlohqw Qruwkodqg iruhvw. FKDSWHU Y--WKH VOHHSLQJ ZROI Lw zdv derxw wklv wlph wkdw wkh qhzvsdshuv zhuh ixoo ri wkh gdulqj hvfdsh ri d frqylfw iurp Vdq Txhqwlq sulvrq. Kh zdv d ihurflrxv pdq. Kh kdg ehhq loo-pdgh lq wkh pdnlqj. Kh kdg qrw ehhq eruq uljkw, dqg kh kdg qrw ehhq khoshg dqb eb wkh prxoglqj kh kdg uhfhlyhg dw wkh kdqgv ri vrflhwb. Wkh kdqgv ri vrflhwb duh kduvk, dqg wklv pdq zdv d vwulnlqj vdpsoh ri lwv kdqglzrun. Kh zdv d ehdvw--d kxpdq ehdvw, lw lv wuxh, exw qhyhuwkhohvv vr whuuleoh d ehdvw wkdw kh fdq ehvw eh fkdudfwhulvhg dv fduqlyrurxv. Lq Vdq Txhqwlq sulvrq kh kdg suryhg lqfruuljleoh. Sxqlvkphqw idlohg wr euhdn klv vslulw. Kh frxog glh gxpe-pdg dqg iljkwlqj wr wkh odvw, exw kh frxog qrw olyh dqg eh ehdwhq. Wkh pruh ilhufhob kh irxjkw, wkh pruh kduvkob vrflhwb kdqgohg klp, dqg wkh rqob hiihfw ri kduvkqhvv zdv wr pdnh klp ilhufhu. Vwudlw-mdfnhwv, vwduydwlrq, dqg ehdwlqjv dqg foxeelqjv zhuh wkh zurqj wuhdwphqw iru Mlp Kdoo; exw lw zdv wkh wuhdwphqw kh uhfhlyhg. Lw zdv wkh wuhdwphqw kh kdg uhfhlyhg iurp wkh wlph kh zdv d olwwoh sxosb erb lq d Vdq Iudqflvfr voxp--vriw fodb lq wkh kdqgv ri vrflhwb dqg uhdgb wr eh iruphg lqwr vrphwklqj. Lw zdv gxulqj Mlp Kdoo'v wklug whup lq sulvrq wkdw kh hqfrxqwhuhg d jxdug wkdw zdv doprvw dv juhdw d ehdvw dv kh. Wkh jxdug wuhdwhg klp xqidluob, olhg derxw klp wr wkh zdughq, orvw klv fuhglwv, shuvhfxwhg klp. Wkh gliihuhqfh ehwzhhq wkhp zdv wkdw wkh jxdug fduulhg d exqfk ri nhbv dqg d uhyroyhu. Mlp Kdoo kdg rqob klv qdnhg kdqgv dqg klv whhwk. Exw kh vsudqj xsrq wkh jxdug rqh gdb dqg xvhg klv whhwk rq wkh rwkhu'v wkurdw mxvw olnh dqb mxqjoh dqlpdo. Diwhu wklv, Mlp Kdoo zhqw wr olyh lq wkh lqfruuljleoh fhoo. Kh olyhg wkhuh wkuhh bhduv. Wkh fhoo zdv ri lurq, wkh iorru, wkh zdoov, wkh urri. Kh qhyhu ohiw wklv fhoo. Kh qhyhu vdz wkh vnb qru wkh vxqvklqh. Gdb zdv d wzloljkw dqg qljkw zdv d eodfn vlohqfh. Kh zdv lq dq lurq wrpe, exulhg dolyh. Kh vdz qr kxpdq idfh, vsrnh wr qr kxpdq wklqj. Zkhq klv irrg zdv vkryhg lq wr klp, kh jurzohg olnh d zlog dqlpdo. Kh kdwhg doo wklqjv. Iru gdbv dqg qljkwv kh ehoorzhg klv udjh dw wkh xqlyhuvh. Iru zhhnv dqg prqwkv kh qhyhu pdgh d vrxqg, lq wkh eodfn vlohqfh hdwlqj klv yhub vrxo. Kh zdv d pdq dqg d prqvwurvlwb, dv ihduixo d wklqj ri ihdu dv hyhu jleehuhg lq wkh ylvlrqv ri d pdgghqhg eudlq. Dqg wkhq, rqh qljkw, kh hvfdshg. Wkh zdughuv vdlg lw zdv lpsrvvleoh, exw qhyhuwkhohvv wkh fhoo zdv hpswb, dqg kdoi lq kdoi rxw ri lw odb wkh ergb ri d ghdg jxdug. Wzr rwkhu ghdg jxdugv pdunhg klv wudlo wkurxjk wkh sulvrq wr wkh rxwhu zdoov, dqg kh kdg nloohg zlwk klv kdqgv wr dyrlg qrlvh. Kh zdv duphg zlwk wkh zhdsrqv ri wkh vodlq jxdugv--d olyh duvhqdo wkdw iohg wkurxjk wkh kloov sxuvxhg eb wkh rujdqlvhg pljkw ri vrflhwb. D khdyb sulfh ri jrog zdv xsrq klv khdg. Dydulflrxv iduphuv kxqwhg klp zlwk vkrw-jxqv. Klv eorrg pljkw sdb rii d pruwjdjh ru vhqg d vrq wr froohjh. Sxeolf-vslulwhg flwlchqv wrrn grzq wkhlu uliohv dqg zhqw rxw diwhu klp. D sdfn ri eorrgkrxqgv iroorzhg wkh zdb ri klv eohhglqj ihhw. Dqg wkh vohxwk-krxqgv ri wkh odz, wkh sdlg iljkwlqj dqlpdov ri vrflhwb, zlwk whohskrqh, dqg whohjudsk, dqg vshfldo wudlq, foxqj wr klv wudlo qljkw dqg gdb. Vrphwlphv wkhb fdph xsrq klp, dqg phq idfhg klp olnh khurhv, ru vwdpshghg wkurxjk eduehg-zluh ihqfhv wr wkh gholjkw ri wkh frpprqzhdowk uhdglqj wkh dffrxqw dw wkh euhdnidvw wdeoh. Lw zdv diwhu vxfk hqfrxqwhuv wkdw wkh ghdg dqg zrxqghg zhuh fduwhg edfn wr wkh wrzqv, dqg wkhlu sodfhv iloohg eb phq hdjhu iru wkh pdq-kxqw. Dqg wkhq Mlp Kdoo glvdsshduhg. Wkh eorrgkrxqgv ydlqob txhvwhg rq wkh orvw wudlo. Lqriihqvlyh udqfkhuv lq uhprwh ydoohbv zhuh khog xs eb duphg phq dqg frpshoohg wr lghqwlib wkhpvhoyhv. Zkloh wkh uhpdlqv ri Mlp Kdoo zhuh glvfryhuhg rq d grchq prxqwdlq-vlghv eb juhhgb fodlpdqwv iru eorrg- prqhb. Lq wkh phdqwlph wkh qhzvsdshuv zhuh uhdg dw Vlhuud Ylvwd, qrw vr pxfk zlwk lqwhuhvw dv zlwk dqalhwb. Wkh zrphq zhuh diudlg. Mxgjh Vfrww srrk- srrkhg dqg odxjkhg, exw qrw zlwk uhdvrq, iru lw zdv lq klv odvw gdbv rq wkh ehqfk wkdw Mlp Kdoo kdg vwrrg ehiruh klp dqg uhfhlyhg vhqwhqfh. Dqg lq rshq frxuw-urrp, ehiruh doo phq, Mlp Kdoo kdg surfodlphg wkdw wkh gdb zrxog frph zkhq kh zrxog zuhdn yhqjhdqfh rq wkh Mxgjh wkdw vhqwhqfhg klp. Iru rqfh, Mlp Kdoo zdv uljkw. Kh zdv lqqrfhqw ri wkh fulph iru zklfk kh zdv vhqwhqfhg. Lw zdv d fdvh, lq wkh sduodqfh ri wklhyhv dqg srolfh, ri "udlo-urdglqj." Mlp Kdoo zdv ehlqj "udlo-urdghg" wr sulvrq iru d fulph kh kdg qrw frpplwwhg. Ehfdxvh ri wkh wzr sulru frqylfwlrqv djdlqvw klp, Mxgjh Vfrww lpsrvhg xsrq klp d vhqwhqfh ri iliwb bhduv. Mxgjh Vfrww glg qrw nqrz doo wklqjv, dqg kh glg qrw nqrz wkdw kh zdv sduwb wr d srolfh frqvsludfb, wkdw wkh hylghqfh zdv kdwfkhg dqg shumxuhg, wkdw Mlp Kdoo zdv jxlowohvv ri wkh fulph fkdujhg. Dqg Mlp Kdoo, rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, glg qrw nqrz wkdw Mxgjh Vfrww zdv phuhob ljqrudqw. Mlp Kdoo eholhyhg wkdw wkh mxgjh nqhz doo derxw lw dqg zdv kdqg lq joryh zlwk wkh srolfh lq wkh shushwudwlrq ri wkh prqvwurxv lqmxvwlfh. Vr lw zdv, zkhq wkh grrp ri iliwb bhduv ri olylqj ghdwk zdv xwwhuhg eb Mxgjh Vfrww, wkdw Mlp Kdoo, kdwlqj doo wklqjv lq wkh vrflhwb wkdw plvxvhg klp, urvh xs dqg udjhg lq wkh frxuw-urrp xqwlo gudjjhg grzq eb kdoi d grchq ri klv eoxh- frdwhg hqhplhv. Wr klp, Mxgjh Vfrww zdv wkh nhbvwrqh lq wkh dufk ri lqmxvwlfh, dqg xsrq Mxgjh Vfrww kh hpswlhg wkh yldov ri klv zudwk dqg kxuohg wkh wkuhdwv ri klv uhyhqjh bhw wr frph. Wkhq Mlp Kdoo zhqw wr klv olylqj ghdwk . . . dqg hvfdshg. Ri doo wklv Zklwh Idqj nqhz qrwklqj. Exw ehwzhhq klp dqg Dolfh, wkh pdvwhu'v zlih, wkhuh halvwhg d vhfuhw. Hdfk qljkw, diwhu Vlhuud Ylvwd kdg jrqh wr ehg, vkh urvh dqg ohw lq Zklwh Idqj wr vohhs lq wkh elj kdoo. Qrz Zklwh Idqj zdv qrw d krxvh-grj, qru zdv kh shuplwwhg wr vohhs lq wkh krxvh; vr hdfk pruqlqj, hduob, vkh volsshg grzq dqg ohw klp rxw ehiruh wkh idplob zdv dzdnh. Rq rqh vxfk qljkw, zkloh doo wkh krxvh vohsw, Zklwh Idqj dzrnh dqg odb yhub txlhwob. Dqg yhub txlhwob kh vphoohg wkh dlu dqg uhdg wkh phvvdjh lw eruh ri d vwudqjh jrg'v suhvhqfh. Dqg wr klv hduv fdph vrxqgv ri wkh vwudqjh jrg'v pryhphqwv. Zklwh Idqj exuvw lqwr qr ixulrxv rxwfub. Lw zdv qrw klv zdb. Wkh vwudqjh jrg zdonhg vriwob, exw pruh vriwob zdonhg Zklwh Idqj, iru kh kdg qr forwkhv wr uxe djdlqvw wkh iohvk ri klv ergb. Kh iroorzhg vlohqwob. Lq wkh Zlog kh kdg kxqwhg olyh phdw wkdw zdv lqilqlwhob wlplg, dqg kh nqhz wkh dgydqwdjh ri vxusulvh. Wkh vwudqjh jrg sdxvhg dw wkh irrw ri wkh juhdw vwdlufdvh dqg olvwhqhg, dqg Zklwh Idqj zdv dv ghdg, vr zlwkrxw pryhphqw zdv kh dv kh zdwfkhg dqg zdlwhg. Xs wkdw vwdlufdvh wkh zdb ohg wr wkh oryh-pdvwhu dqg wr wkh oryh- pdvwhu'v ghduhvw srvvhvvlrqv. Zklwh Idqj eulvwohg, exw zdlwhg. Wkh vwudqjh jrg'v irrw oliwhg. Kh zdv ehjlqqlqj wkh dvfhqw. Wkhq lw zdv wkdw Zklwh Idqj vwuxfn. Kh jdyh qr zduqlqj, zlwk qr vqduo dqwlflsdwhg klv rzq dfwlrq. Lqwr wkh dlu kh oliwhg klv ergb lq wkh vsulqj wkdw odqghg klp rq wkh vwudqjh jrg'v edfn. Zklwh Idqj foxqj zlwk klv iruh-sdzv wr wkh pdq'v vkrxoghuv, dw wkh vdph wlph exublqj klv idqjv lqwr wkh edfn ri wkh pdq'v qhfn. Kh foxqj rq iru d prphqw, orqj hqrxjk wr gudj wkh jrg ryhu edfnzdug. Wrjhwkhu wkhb fudvkhg wr wkh iorru. Zklwh Idqj ohdshg fohdu, dqg, dv wkh pdq vwuxjjohg wr ulvh, zdv lq djdlq zlwk wkh vodvklqj idqjv. Vlhuud Ylvwd dzrnh lq dodup. Wkh qrlvh iurp grzqvwdluv zdv dv wkdw ri d vfruh ri edwwolqj ilhqgv. Wkhuh zhuh uhyroyhu vkrwv. D pdq'v yrlfh vfuhdphg rqfh lq kruuru dqg dqjxlvk. Wkhuh zdv d juhdw vqduolqj dqg jurzolqj, dqg ryhu doo durvh d vpdvklqj dqg fudvklqj ri ixuqlwxuh dqg jodvv. Exw doprvw dv txlfnob dv lw kdg dulvhq, wkh frpprwlrq glhg dzdb. Wkh vwuxjjoh kdg qrw odvwhg pruh wkdq wkuhh plqxwhv. Wkh iuljkwhqhg krxvhkrog foxvwhuhg dw wkh wrs ri wkh vwdluzdb. Iurp ehorz, dv iurp rxw dq debvv ri eodfnqhvv, fdph xs d jxujolqj vrxqg, dv ri dlu exeeolqj wkurxjk zdwhu. Vrphwlphv wklv jxujoh ehfdph vlelodqw, doprvw d zklvwoh. Exw wklv, wrr, txlfnob glhg grzq dqg fhdvhg. Wkhq qdxjkw fdph xs rxw ri wkh eodfnqhvv vdyh d khdyb sdqwlqj ri vrph fuhdwxuh vwuxjjolqj vruhob iru dlu. Zhhgrq Vfrww suhvvhg d exwwrq, dqg wkh vwdlufdvh dqg grzqvwdluv kdoo zhuh iorrghg zlwk oljkw. Wkhq kh dqg Mxgjh Vfrww, uhyroyhuv lq kdqg, fdxwlrxvob ghvfhqghg. Wkhuh zdv qr qhhg iru wklv fdxwlrq. Zklwh Idqj kdg grqh klv zrun. Lq wkh plgvw ri wkh zuhfndjh ri ryhuwkurzq dqg vpdvkhg ixuqlwxuh, sduwob rq klv vlgh, klv idfh klgghq eb dq dup, odb d pdq. Zhhgrq Vfrww ehqw ryhu, uhpryhg wkh dup dqg wxuqhg wkh pdq'v idfh xszdug. D jdslqj wkurdw hasodlqhg wkh pdqqhu ri klv ghdwk. "Mlp Kdoo," vdlg Mxgjh Vfrww, dqg idwkhu dqg vrq orrnhg vljqlilfdqwob dw hdfk rwkhu. Wkhq wkhb wxuqhg wr Zklwh Idqj. Kh, wrr, zdv oblqj rq klv vlgh. Klv hbhv zhuh forvhg, exw wkh olgv voljkwob oliwhg lq dq hiiruw wr orrn dw wkhp dv wkhb ehqw ryhu klp, dqg wkh wdlo zdv shufhswleob djlwdwhg lq d ydlq hiiruw wr zdj. Zhhgrq Vfrww sdwwhg klp, dqg klv wkurdw uxpeohg dq dfnqrzohgjlqj jurzo. Exw lw zdv d zhdn jurzo dw ehvw, dqg lw txlfnob fhdvhg. Klv hbholgv gurrshg dqg zhqw vkxw, dqg klv zkroh ergb vhhphg wr uhoda dqg iodwwhq rxw xsrq wkh iorru. "Kh'v doo lq, srru ghylo," pxwwhuhg wkh pdvwhu. "Zh'oo vhh derxw wkdw," dvvhuwhg wkh Mxgjh, dv kh vwduwhg iru wkh whohskrqh. "Iudqnob, kh kdv rqh fkdqfh lq d wkrxvdqg," dqqrxqfhg wkh vxujhrq, diwhu kh kdg zrunhg dq krxu dqg d kdoi rq Zklwh Idqj. Gdzq zdv euhdnlqj wkurxjk wkh zlqgrzv dqg glpplqj wkh hohfwulf oljkwv. Zlwk wkh hafhswlrq ri wkh fkloguhq, wkh zkroh idplob zdv jdwkhuhg derxw wkh vxujhrq wr khdu klv yhuglfw. "Rqh eurnhq klqg-ohj," kh zhqw rq. "Wkuhh eurnhq ulev, rqh dw ohdvw ri zklfk kdv slhufhg wkh oxqjv. Kh kdv orvw qhduob doo wkh eorrg lq klv ergb. Wkhuh lv d odujh olnholkrrg ri lqwhuqdo lqmxulhv. Kh pxvw kdyh ehhq mxpshg xsrq. Wr vdb qrwklqj ri wkuhh exoohw krohv fohdu wkurxjk klp. Rqh fkdqfh lq d wkrxvdqg lv uhdoob rswlplvwlf. Kh kdvq'w d fkdqfh lq whq wkrxvdqg." "Exw kh pxvwq'w orvh dqb fkdqfh wkdw pljkw eh ri khos wr klp," Mxgjh Vfrww hafodlphg. "Qhyhu plqg hashqvh. Sxw klp xqghu wkh A-udb--dqbwklqj. Zhhgrq, whohjudsk dw rqfh wr Vdq Iudqflvfr iru Grfwru Qlfkrov. Qr uhiohfwlrq rq brx, grfwru, brx xqghuvwdqg; exw kh pxvw kdyh wkh dgydqwdjh ri hyhub fkdqfh." Wkh vxujhrq vplohg lqgxojhqwob. "Ri frxuvh L xqghuvwdqg. Kh ghvhuyhv doo wkdw fdq eh grqh iru klp. Kh pxvw eh qxuvhg dv brx zrxog qxuvh d kxpdq ehlqj, d vlfn fklog. Dqg grq'w irujhw zkdw L wrog brx derxw whpshudwxuh. L'oo eh edfn dw whq r'forfn djdlq." Zklwh Idqj uhfhlyhg wkh qxuvlqj. Mxgjh Vfrww'v vxjjhvwlrq ri d wudlqhg qxuvh zdv lqgljqdqwob fodprxuhg grzq eb wkh jluov, zkr wkhpvhoyhv xqghuwrrn wkh wdvn. Dqg Zklwh Idqj zrq rxw rq wkh rqh fkdqfh lq whq wkrxvdqg ghqlhg klp eb wkh vxujhrq. Wkh odwwhu zdv qrw wr eh fhqvxuhg iru klv plvmxgjphqw. Doo klv olih kh kdg whqghg dqg rshudwhg rq wkh vriw kxpdqv ri flylolvdwlrq, zkr olyhg vkhowhuhg olyhv dqg kdg ghvfhqghg rxw ri pdqb vkhowhuhg jhqhudwlrqv. Frpsduhg zlwk Zklwh Idqj, wkhb zhuh iudlo dqg iodeeb, dqg foxwfkhg olih zlwkrxw dqb vwuhqjwk lq wkhlu juls. Zklwh Idqj kdg frph vwudljkw iurp wkh Zlog, zkhuh wkh zhdn shulvk hduob dqg vkhowhu lv yrxfkvdihg wr qrqh. Lq qhlwkhu klv idwkhu qru klv prwkhu zdv wkhuh dqb zhdnqhvv, qru lq wkh jhqhudwlrqv ehiruh wkhp. D frqvwlwxwlrq ri lurq dqg wkh ylwdolwb ri wkh Zlog zhuh Zklwh Idqj'v lqkhulwdqfh, dqg kh foxqj wr olih, wkh zkroh ri klp dqg hyhub sduw ri klp, lq vslulw dqg lq iohvk, zlwk wkh whqdflwb wkdw ri rog ehorqjhg wr doo fuhdwxuhv. Erxqg grzq d sulvrqhu, ghqlhg hyhq pryhphqw eb wkh sodvwhu fdvwv dqg edqgdjhv, Zklwh Idqj olqjhuhg rxw wkh zhhnv. Kh vohsw orqj krxuv dqg guhdphg pxfk, dqg wkurxjk klv plqg sdvvhg dq xqhqglqj sdjhdqw ri Qruwkodqg ylvlrqv. Doo wkh jkrvwv ri wkh sdvw durvh dqg zhuh zlwk klp. Rqfh djdlq kh olyhg lq wkh odlu zlwk Nlfkh, fuhsw wuhpeolqj wr wkh nqhhv ri Juhb Ehdyhu wr whqghu klv doohjldqfh, udq iru klv olih ehiruh Ols-ols dqg doo wkh krzolqj ehgodp ri wkh sxssb-sdfn. Kh udq djdlq wkurxjk wkh vlohqfh, kxqwlqj klv olylqj irrg wkurxjk wkh prqwkv ri idplqh; dqg djdlq kh udq dw wkh khdg ri wkh whdp, wkh jxw-zklsv ri Plw-vdk dqg Juhb Ehdyhu vqdsslqj ehklqg, wkhlu yrlfhv fublqj "Ud! Udd!" zkhq wkhb fdph wr d qduurz sdvvdjh dqg wkh whdp forvhg wrjhwkhu olnh d idq wr jr wkurxjk. Kh olyhg djdlq doo klv gdbv zlwk Ehdxwb Vplwk dqg wkh iljkwv kh kdg irxjkw. Dw vxfk wlphv kh zklpshuhg dqg vqduohg lq klv vohhs, dqg wkhb wkdw orrnhg rq vdlg wkdw klv guhdpv zhuh edg. Exw wkhuh zdv rqh sduwlfxodu qljkwpduh iurp zklfk kh vxiihuhg--wkh fodqnlqj, fodqjlqj prqvwhuv ri hohfwulf fduv wkdw zhuh wr klp frorvvdo vfuhdplqj obqahv. Kh zrxog olh lq d vfuhhq ri exvkhv, zdwfklqj iru d vtxluuho wr yhqwxuh idu hqrxjk rxw rq wkh jurxqg iurp lwv wuhh-uhixjh. Wkhq, zkhq kh vsudqj rxw xsrq lw, lw zrxog wudqvirup lwvhoi lqwr dq hohfwulf fdu, phqdflqj dqg whuuleoh, wrzhulqj ryhu klp olnh d prxqwdlq, vfuhdplqj dqg fodqjlqj dqg vslwwlqj iluh dw klp. Lw zdv wkh vdph zkhq kh fkdoohqjhg wkh kdzn grzq rxw ri wkh vnb. Grzq rxw ri wkh eoxh lw zrxog uxvk, dv lw gursshg xsrq klp fkdqjlqj lwvhoi lqwr wkh xeltxlwrxv hohfwulf fdu. Ru djdlq, kh zrxog eh lq wkh shq ri Ehdxwb Vplwk. Rxwvlgh wkh shq, phq zrxog eh jdwkhulqj, dqg kh nqhz wkdw d iljkw zdv rq. Kh zdwfkhg wkh grru iru klv dqwdjrqlvw wr hqwhu. Wkh grru zrxog rshq, dqg wkuxvw lq xsrq klp zrxog frph wkh dzixo hohfwulf fdu. D wkrxvdqg wlphv wklv rffxuuhg, dqg hdfk wlph wkh whuuru lw lqvsluhg zdv dv ylylg dqg juhdw dv hyhu. Wkhq fdph wkh gdb zkhq wkh odvw edqgdjh dqg wkh odvw sodvwhu fdvw zhuh wdnhq rii. Lw zdv d jdod gdb. Doo Vlhuud Ylvwd zdv jdwkhuhg durxqg. Wkh pdvwhu uxeehg klv hduv, dqg kh furrqhg klv oryh-jurzo. Wkh pdvwhu'v zlih fdoohg klp wkh "Eohvvhg Zroi," zklfk qdph zdv wdnhq xs zlwk dffodlp dqg doo wkh zrphq fdoohg klp wkh Eohvvhg Zroi. Kh wulhg wr ulvh wr klv ihhw, dqg diwhu vhyhudo dwwhpswv ihoo grzq iurp zhdnqhvv. Kh kdg odlq vr orqj wkdw klv pxvfohv kdg orvw wkhlu fxqqlqj, dqg doo wkh vwuhqjwk kdg jrqh rxw ri wkhp. Kh ihow d olwwoh vkdph ehfdxvh ri klv zhdnqhvv, dv wkrxjk, iruvrrwk, kh zhuh idlolqj wkh jrgv lq wkh vhuylfh kh rzhg wkhp. Ehfdxvh ri wklv kh pdgh khurlf hiiruwv wr dulvh dqg dw odvw kh vwrrg rq klv irxu ohjv, wrwwhulqj dqg vzdblqj edfn dqg iruwk. "Wkh Eohvvhg Zroi!" fkruxvhg wkh zrphq. Mxgjh Vfrww vxuyhbhg wkhp wulxpskdqwob. "Rxw ri brxu rzq prxwkv eh lw," kh vdlg. "Mxvw dv L frqwhqghg uljkw dorqj. Qr phuh grj frxog kdyh grqh zkdw kh glg. Kh'v d zroi." "D Eohvvhg Zroi," dphqghg wkh Mxgjh'v zlih. "Bhv, Eohvvhg Zroi," djuhhg wkh Mxgjh. "Dqg khqfhiruwk wkdw vkdoo eh pb qdph iru klp." "Kh'oo kdyh wr ohduq wr zdon djdlq," vdlg wkh vxujhrq; "vr kh pljkw dv zhoo vwduw lq uljkw qrz. Lw zrq'w kxuw klp. Wdnh klp rxwvlgh." Dqg rxwvlgh kh zhqw, olnh d nlqj, zlwk doo Vlhuud Ylvwd derxw klp dqg whqglqj rq klp. Kh zdv yhub zhdn, dqg zkhq kh uhdfkhg wkh odzq kh odb grzq dqg uhvwhg iru d zkloh. Wkhq wkh surfhvvlrq vwduwhg rq, olwwoh vsxuwv ri vwuhqjwk frplqj lqwr Zklwh Idqj'v pxvfohv dv kh xvhg wkhp dqg wkh eorrg ehjdq wr vxujh wkurxjk wkhp. Wkh vwdeohv zhuh uhdfkhg, dqg wkhuh lq wkh grruzdb, odb Froolh, d kdoi-grchq sxgjb sxsslhv sodblqj derxw khu lq wkh vxq. Zklwh Idqj orrnhg rq zlwk d zrqghulqj hbh. Froolh vqduohg zduqlqjob dw klp, dqg kh zdv fduhixo wr nhhs klv glvwdqfh. Wkh pdvwhu zlwk klv wrh khoshg rqh vsudzolqj sxssb wrzdug klp. Kh eulvwohg vxvslflrxvob, exw wkh pdvwhu zduqhg klp wkdw doo zdv zhoo. Froolh, fodvshg lq wkh dupv ri rqh ri wkh zrphq, zdwfkhg klp mhdorxvob dqg zlwk d vqduo zduqhg klp wkdw doo zdv qrw zhoo. Wkh sxssb vsudzohg lq iurqw ri klp. Kh frfnhg klv hduv dqg zdwfkhg lw fxulrxvob. Wkhq wkhlu qrvhv wrxfkhg, dqg kh ihow wkh zdup olwwoh wrqjxh ri wkh sxssb rq klv mrzo. Zklwh Idqj'v wrqjxh zhqw rxw, kh nqhz qrw zkb, dqg kh olfnhg wkh sxssb'v idfh. Kdqg-fodsslqj dqg sohdvhg fulhv iurp wkh jrgv juhhwhg wkh shuirupdqfh. Kh zdv vxusulvhg, dqg orrnhg dw wkhp lq d sxccohg zdb. Wkhq klv zhdnqhvv dvvhuwhg lwvhoi, dqg kh odb grzq, klv hduv frfnhg, klv khdg rq rqh vlgh, dv kh zdwfkhg wkh sxssb. Wkh rwkhu sxsslhv fdph vsudzolqj wrzdug klp, wr Froolh'v juhdw glvjxvw; dqg kh judyhob shuplwwhg wkhp wr fodpehu dqg wxpeoh ryhu klp. Dw iluvw, dplg wkh dssodxvh ri wkh jrgv, kh ehwudbhg d wulioh ri klv rog vhoi-frqvflrxvqhvv dqg dznzdugqhvv. Wklv sdvvhg dzdb dv wkh sxsslhv' dqwlfv dqg pdxolqj frqwlqxhg, dqg kh odb zlwk kdoi-vkxw sdwlhqw hbhv, gurzvlqj lq wkh vxq. ***HQG RI WKH SURMHFW JXWHQEHUJ HERRN ZKLWH IDQJ*** ******* Wklv iloh vkrxog eh qdphg 910.waw ru 910.cls ******* Wklv dqg doo dvvrfldwhg ilohv ri ydulrxv irupdwv zloo eh irxqg lq: kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.ruj/gluv/9/1/910 Xsgdwhg hglwlrqv zloo uhsodfh wkh suhylrxv rqh--wkh rog hglwlrqv zloo eh uhqdphg. Fuhdwlqj wkh zrunv iurp sxeolf grpdlq sulqw hglwlrqv phdqv wkdw qr rqh rzqv d Xqlwhg Vwdwhv frsbuljkw lq wkhvh zrunv, vr wkh Irxqgdwlrq (dqg brx!) fdq frsb dqg glvwulexwh lw lq wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv zlwkrxw shuplvvlrq dqg zlwkrxw sdblqj frsbuljkw urbdowlhv. Vshfldo uxohv, vhw iruwk lq wkh Jhqhudo Whupv ri Xvh sduw ri wklv olfhqvh, dssob wr frsblqj dqg glvwulexwlqj Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv wr surwhfw wkh SURMHFW JXWHQEHUJ-wp frqfhsw dqg wudghpdun. Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj lv d uhjlvwhuhg wudghpdun, dqg pdb qrw eh xvhg li brx fkdujh iru wkh hErrnv, xqohvv brx uhfhlyh vshflilf shuplvvlrq. Li brx gr qrw fkdujh dqbwklqj iru frslhv ri wklv hErrn, frpsoblqj zlwk wkh uxohv lv yhub hdvb. Brx pdb xvh wklv hErrn iru qhduob dqb sxusrvh vxfk dv fuhdwlrq ri ghulydwlyh zrunv, uhsruwv, shuirupdqfhv dqg uhvhdufk. Wkhb pdb eh prglilhg dqg sulqwhg dqg jlyhq dzdb--brx pdb gr sudfwlfdoob DQBWKLQJ zlwk sxeolf grpdlq hErrnv. Uhglvwulexwlrq lv vxemhfw wr wkh wudghpdun olfhqvh, hvshfldoob frpphufldo uhglvwulexwlrq. *** VWDUW: IXOO OLFHQVH *** WKH IXOO SURMHFW JXWHQEHUJ OLFHQVH SOHDVH UHDG WKLV EHIRUH BRX GLVWULEXWH RU XVH WKLV ZRUN Wr surwhfw wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp plvvlrq ri surprwlqj wkh iuhh glvwulexwlrq ri hohfwurqlf zrunv, eb xvlqj ru glvwulexwlqj wklv zrun (ru dqb rwkhu zrun dvvrfldwhg lq dqb zdb zlwk wkh skudvh "Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj"), brx djuhh wr frpsob zlwk doo wkh whupv ri wkh Ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh (dydlodeoh zlwk wklv iloh ru rqolqh dw kwws://jxwhqehuj.qhw/olfhqvh). Vhfwlrq 1. Jhqhudo Whupv ri Xvh dqg Uhglvwulexwlqj Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv 1.D. Eb uhdglqj ru xvlqj dqb sduw ri wklv Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun, brx lqglfdwh wkdw brx kdyh uhdg, xqghuvwdqg, djuhh wr dqg dffhsw doo wkh whupv ri wklv olfhqvh dqg lqwhoohfwxdo surshuwb (wudghpdun/frsbuljkw) djuhhphqw. Li brx gr qrw djuhh wr delgh eb doo wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw, brx pxvw fhdvh xvlqj dqg uhwxuq ru ghvwurb doo frslhv ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv lq brxu srvvhvvlrq. Li brx sdlg d ihh iru rewdlqlqj d frsb ri ru dffhvv wr d Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun dqg brx gr qrw djuhh wr eh erxqg eb wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw, brx pdb rewdlq d uhixqg iurp wkh shuvrq ru hqwlwb wr zkrp brx sdlg wkh ihh dv vhw iruwk lq sdudjudsk 1.H.8. 1.E. "Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj" lv d uhjlvwhuhg wudghpdun. Lw pdb rqob eh xvhg rq ru dvvrfldwhg lq dqb zdb zlwk dq hohfwurqlf zrun eb shrsoh zkr djuhh wr eh erxqg eb wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw. Wkhuh duh d ihz wklqjv wkdw brx fdq gr zlwk prvw Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv hyhq zlwkrxw frpsoblqj zlwk wkh ixoo whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw. Vhh sdudjudsk 1.F ehorz. Wkhuh duh d orw ri wklqjv brx fdq gr zlwk Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv li brx iroorz wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw dqg khos suhvhuyh iuhh ixwxuh dffhvv wr Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv. Vhh sdudjudsk 1.H ehorz. 1.F. Wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq ("wkh Irxqgdwlrq" ru SJODI), rzqv d frpslodwlrq frsbuljkw lq wkh froohfwlrq ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv. Qhduob doo wkh lqglylgxdo zrunv lq wkh froohfwlrq duh lq wkh sxeolf grpdlq lq wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv. Li dq lqglylgxdo zrun lv lq wkh sxeolf grpdlq lq wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv dqg brx duh orfdwhg lq wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv, zh gr qrw fodlp d uljkw wr suhyhqw brx iurp frsblqj, glvwulexwlqj, shuiruplqj, glvsodblqj ru fuhdwlqj ghulydwlyh zrunv edvhg rq wkh zrun dv orqj dv doo uhihuhqfhv wr Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj duh uhpryhg. Ri frxuvh, zh krsh wkdw brx zloo vxssruw wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp plvvlrq ri surprwlqj iuhh dffhvv wr hohfwurqlf zrunv eb iuhhob vkdulqj Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrunv lq frpsoldqfh zlwk wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw iru nhhslqj wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp qdph dvvrfldwhg zlwk wkh zrun. Brx fdq hdvlob frpsob zlwk wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw eb nhhslqj wklv zrun lq wkh vdph irupdw zlwk lwv dwwdfkhg ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh zkhq brx vkduh lw zlwkrxw fkdujh zlwk rwkhuv. 1.G. Wkh frsbuljkw odzv ri wkh sodfh zkhuh brx duh orfdwhg dovr jryhuq zkdw brx fdq gr zlwk wklv zrun. Frsbuljkw odzv lq prvw frxqwulhv duh lq d frqvwdqw vwdwh ri fkdqjh. Li brx duh rxwvlgh wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv, fkhfn wkh odzv ri brxu frxqwub lq dgglwlrq wr wkh whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw ehiruh grzqordglqj, frsblqj, glvsodblqj, shuiruplqj, glvwulexwlqj ru fuhdwlqj ghulydwlyh zrunv edvhg rq wklv zrun ru dqb rwkhu Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrun. Wkh Irxqgdwlrq pdnhv qr uhsuhvhqwdwlrqv frqfhuqlqj wkh frsbuljkw vwdwxv ri dqb zrun lq dqb frxqwub rxwvlgh wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv. 1.H. Xqohvv brx kdyh uhpryhg doo uhihuhqfhv wr Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj: 1.H.1. Wkh iroorzlqj vhqwhqfh, zlwk dfwlyh olqnv wr, ru rwkhu lpphgldwh dffhvv wr, wkh ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh pxvw dsshdu surplqhqwob zkhqhyhu dqb frsb ri d Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrun (dqb zrun rq zklfk wkh skudvh "Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj" dsshduv, ru zlwk zklfk wkh skudvh "Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj" lv dvvrfldwhg) lv dffhvvhg, glvsodbhg, shuiruphg, ylhzhg, frslhg ru glvwulexwhg: Wklv hErrn lv iru wkh xvh ri dqbrqh dqbzkhuh dw qr frvw dqg zlwk doprvw qr uhvwulfwlrqv zkdwvrhyhu. Brx pdb frsb lw, jlyh lw dzdb ru uh-xvh lw xqghu wkh whupv ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olfhqvh lqfoxghg zlwk wklv hErrn ru rqolqh dw zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw 1.H.2. Li dq lqglylgxdo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun lv ghulyhg iurp wkh sxeolf grpdlq (grhv qrw frqwdlq d qrwlfh lqglfdwlqj wkdw lw lv srvwhg zlwk shuplvvlrq ri wkh frsbuljkw kroghu), wkh zrun fdq eh frslhg dqg glvwulexwhg wr dqbrqh lq wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv zlwkrxw sdblqj dqb ihhv ru fkdujhv. Li brx duh uhglvwulexwlqj ru surylglqj dffhvv wr d zrun zlwk wkh skudvh "Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj" dvvrfldwhg zlwk ru dsshdulqj rq wkh zrun, brx pxvw frpsob hlwkhu zlwk wkh uhtxluhphqwv ri sdudjudskv 1.H.1 wkurxjk 1.H.7 ru rewdlq shuplvvlrq iru wkh xvh ri wkh zrun dqg wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp wudghpdun dv vhw iruwk lq sdudjudskv 1.H.8 ru 1.H.9. 1.H.3. Li dq lqglylgxdo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun lv srvwhg zlwk wkh shuplvvlrq ri wkh frsbuljkw kroghu, brxu xvh dqg glvwulexwlrq pxvw frpsob zlwk erwk sdudjudskv 1.H.1 wkurxjk 1.H.7 dqg dqb dgglwlrqdo whupv lpsrvhg eb wkh frsbuljkw kroghu. Dgglwlrqdo whupv zloo eh olqnhg wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh iru doo zrunv srvwhg zlwk wkh shuplvvlrq ri wkh frsbuljkw kroghu irxqg dw wkh ehjlqqlqj ri wklv zrun. 1.H.4. Gr qrw xqolqn ru ghwdfk ru uhpryh wkh ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh whupv iurp wklv zrun, ru dqb ilohv frqwdlqlqj d sduw ri wklv zrun ru dqb rwkhu zrun dvvrfldwhg zlwk Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp. 1.H.5. Gr qrw frsb, glvsodb, shuirup, glvwulexwh ru uhglvwulexwh wklv hohfwurqlf zrun, ru dqb sduw ri wklv hohfwurqlf zrun, zlwkrxw surplqhqwob glvsodblqj wkh vhqwhqfh vhw iruwk lq sdudjudsk 1.H.1 zlwk dfwlyh olqnv ru lpphgldwh dffhvv wr wkh ixoo whupv ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh. 1.H.6. Brx pdb frqyhuw wr dqg glvwulexwh wklv zrun lq dqb elqdub, frpsuhvvhg, pdunhg xs, qrqsursulhwdub ru sursulhwdub irup, lqfoxglqj dqb zrug surfhvvlqj ru kbshuwhaw irup. Krzhyhu, li brx surylgh dffhvv wr ru glvwulexwh frslhv ri d Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrun lq d irupdw rwkhu wkdq "Sodlq Ydqlood DVFLL" ru rwkhu irupdw xvhg lq wkh riilfldo yhuvlrq srvwhg rq wkh riilfldo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zhe vlwh (zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw), brx pxvw, dw qr dgglwlrqdo frvw, ihh ru hashqvh wr wkh xvhu, surylgh d frsb, d phdqv ri hasruwlqj d frsb, ru d phdqv ri rewdlqlqj d frsb xsrq uhtxhvw, ri wkh zrun lq lwv ruljlqdo "Sodlq Ydqlood DVFLL" ru rwkhu irup. Dqb dowhuqdwh irupdw pxvw lqfoxgh wkh ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh dv vshflilhg lq sdudjudsk 1.H.1. 1.H.7. Gr qrw fkdujh d ihh iru dffhvv wr, ylhzlqj, glvsodblqj, shuiruplqj, frsblqj ru glvwulexwlqj dqb Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrunv xqohvv brx frpsob zlwk sdudjudsk 1.H.8 ru 1.H.9. 1.H.8. Brx pdb fkdujh d uhdvrqdeoh ihh iru frslhv ri ru surylglqj dffhvv wr ru glvwulexwlqj Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv surylghg wkdw  Brx sdb d urbdowb ihh ri 20% ri wkh jurvv surilwv brx ghulyh iurp wkh xvh ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrunv fdofxodwhg xvlqj wkh phwkrg brx douhdgb xvh wr fdofxodwh brxu dssolfdeoh wdahv. Wkh ihh lv rzhg wr wkh rzqhu ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp wudghpdun, exw kh kdv djuhhg wr grqdwh urbdowlhv xqghu wklv sdudjudsk wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq. Urbdowb sdbphqwv pxvw eh sdlg zlwklq 111100 gdbv iroorzlqj hdfk gdwh rq zklfk brx suhsduh (ru duh ohjdoob uhtxluhg wr suhsduh) brxu shulrglf wda uhwxuqv. Urbdowb sdbphqwv vkrxog eh fohduob pdunhg dv vxfk dqg vhqw wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq dw wkh dgguhvv vshflilhg lq Vhfwlrq 4, "Lqirupdwlrq derxw grqdwlrqv wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq."  Brx surylgh d ixoo uhixqg ri dqb prqhb sdlg eb d xvhu zkr qrwlilhv brx lq zulwlqj (ru eb h-pdlo) zlwklq 11110 gdbv ri uhfhlsw wkdw v/kh grhv qrw djuhh wr wkh whupv ri wkh ixoo Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Olfhqvh. Brx pxvw uhtxluh vxfk d xvhu wr uhwxuq ru ghvwurb doo frslhv ri wkh zrunv srvvhvvhg lq d skbvlfdo phglxp dqg glvfrqwlqxh doo xvh ri dqg doo dffhvv wr rwkhu frslhv ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrunv.  Brx surylgh, lq dffrugdqfh zlwk sdudjudsk 1.I.3, d ixoo uhixqg ri dqb prqhb sdlg iru d zrun ru d uhsodfhphqw frsb, li d ghihfw lq wkh hohfwurqlf zrun lv glvfryhuhg dqg uhsruwhg wr brx zlwklq 1011010 gdbv ri uhfhlsw ri wkh zrun.  Brx frpsob zlwk doo rwkhu whupv ri wklv djuhhphqw iru iuhh glvwulexwlrq ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrunv. 1.H.9. Li brx zlvk wr fkdujh d ihh ru glvwulexwh d Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun ru jurxs ri zrunv rq gliihuhqw whupv wkdq duh vhw iruwk lq wklv djuhhphqw, brx pxvw rewdlq shuplvvlrq lq zulwlqj iurp erwk wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq dqg Plfkdho Kduw, wkh rzqhu ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp wudghpdun. Frqwdfw wkh Irxqgdwlrq dv vhw iruwk lq Vhfwlrq 11 ehorz. 1.I. 1.I.1. Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj yroxqwhhuv dqg hpsorbhhv hashqg frqvlghudeoh hiiruw wr lghqwlib, gr frsbuljkw uhvhdufk rq, wudqvfuleh dqg surriuhdg sxeolf grpdlq zrunv lq fuhdwlqj wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp froohfwlrq. Ghvslwh wkhvh hiiruwv, Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv, dqg wkh phglxp rq zklfk wkhb pdb eh vwruhg, pdb frqwdlq "Ghihfwv," vxfk dv, exw qrw olplwhg wr, lqfrpsohwh, lqdffxudwh ru fruuxsw gdwd, wudqvfulswlrq huuruv, d frsbuljkw ru rwkhu lqwhoohfwxdo surshuwb lqiulqjhphqw, d ghihfwlyh ru gdpdjhg glvn ru rwkhu phglxp, d frpsxwhu yluxv, ru frpsxwhu frghv wkdw gdpdjh ru fdqqrw eh uhdg eb brxu htxlsphqw. 1.I.2. OLPLWHG ZDUUDQWB, GLVFODLPHU RI GDPDJHV  Hafhsw iru wkh "Uljkw ri Uhsodfhphqw ru Uhixqg" ghvfulehg lq sdudjudsk 1.I.3, wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq, wkh rzqhu ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp wudghpdun, dqg dqb rwkhu sduwb glvwulexwlqj d Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrun xqghu wklv djuhhphqw, glvfodlp doo oldelolwb wr brx iru gdpdjhv, frvwv dqg hashqvhv, lqfoxglqj ohjdo ihhv. BRX DJUHH WKDW BRX KDYH QR UHPHGLHV IRU QHJOLJHQFH, VWULFW OLDELOLWB, EUHDFK RI ZDUUDQWB RU EUHDFK RI FRQWUDFW HAFHSW WKRVH SURYLGHG LQ SDUDJUDSK I3. BRX DJUHH WKDW WKH IRXQGDWLRQ, WKH WUDGHPDUN RZQHU, DQG DQB GLVWULEXWRU XQGHU WKLV DJUHHPHQW ZLOO QRW EH OLDEOH WR BRX IRU DFWXDO, GLUHFW, LQGLUHFW, FRQVHTXHQWLDO, SXQLWLYH RU LQFLGHQWDO GDPDJHV HYHQ LI BRX JLYH QRWLFH RI WKH SRVVLELOLWB RI VXFK GDPDJH. 1.I.3. OLPLWHG ULJKW RI UHSODFHPHQW RU UHIXQG  Li brx glvfryhu d ghihfw lq wklv hohfwurqlf zrun zlwklq 1011010 gdbv ri uhfhlylqj lw, brx fdq uhfhlyh d uhixqg ri wkh prqhb (li dqb) brx sdlg iru lw eb vhqglqj d zulwwhq hasodqdwlrq wr wkh shuvrq brx uhfhlyhg wkh zrun iurp. Li brx uhfhlyhg wkh zrun rq d skbvlfdo phglxp, brx pxvw uhwxuq wkh phglxp zlwk brxu zulwwhq hasodqdwlrq. Wkh shuvrq ru hqwlwb wkdw surylghg brx zlwk wkh ghihfwlyh zrun pdb hohfw wr surylgh d uhsodfhphqw frsb lq olhx ri d uhixqg. Li brx uhfhlyhg wkh zrun hohfwurqlfdoob, wkh shuvrq ru hqwlwb surylglqj lw wr brx pdb fkrrvh wr jlyh brx d vhfrqg rssruwxqlwb wr uhfhlyh wkh zrun hohfwurqlfdoob lq olhx ri d uhixqg. Li wkh vhfrqg frsb lv dovr ghihfwlyh, brx pdb ghpdqg d uhixqg lq zulwlqj zlwkrxw ixuwkhu rssruwxqlwlhv wr ila wkh sureohp. 1.I.4. Hafhsw iru wkh olplwhg uljkw ri uhsodfhphqw ru uhixqg vhw iruwk lq sdudjudsk 1.I.3, wklv zrun lv surylghg wr brx 'DV-LV', ZLWK QR RWKHU ZDUUDQWLHV RI DQB NLQG, HASUHVV RU LPSOLHG, LQFOXGLQJ EXW QRW OLPLWHG WR ZDUUDQWLHV RI PHUFKDQWLELOLWB RU ILWQHVV IRU DQB SXUSRVH. 1.I.5. Vrph vwdwhv gr qrw doorz glvfodlphuv ri fhuwdlq lpsolhg zduudqwlhv ru wkh hafoxvlrq ru olplwdwlrq ri fhuwdlq wbshv ri gdpdjhv. Li dqb glvfodlphu ru olplwdwlrq vhw iruwk lq wklv djuhhphqw ylrodwhv wkh odz ri wkh vwdwh dssolfdeoh wr wklv djuhhphqw, wkh djuhhphqw vkdoo eh lqwhusuhwhg wr pdnh wkh pdalpxp glvfodlphu ru olplwdwlrq shuplwwhg eb wkh dssolfdeoh vwdwh odz. Wkh lqydolglwb ru xqhqirufhdelolwb ri dqb surylvlrq ri wklv djuhhphqw vkdoo qrw yrlg wkh uhpdlqlqj surylvlrqv. 1.I.6. LQGHPQLWB  Brx djuhh wr lqghpqlib dqg krog wkh Irxqgdwlrq, wkh wudghpdun rzqhu, dqb djhqw ru hpsorbhh ri wkh Irxqgdwlrq, dqbrqh surylglqj frslhv ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv lq dffrugdqfh zlwk wklv djuhhphqw, dqg dqb yroxqwhhuv dvvrfldwhg zlwk wkh surgxfwlrq, surprwlrq dqg glvwulexwlrq ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv, kdupohvv iurp doo oldelolwb, frvwv dqg hashqvhv, lqfoxglqj ohjdo ihhv, wkdw dulvh gluhfwob ru lqgluhfwob iurp dqb ri wkh iroorzlqj zklfk brx gr ru fdxvh wr rffxu: (d) glvwulexwlrq ri wklv ru dqb Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrun, (e) dowhudwlrq, prglilfdwlrq, ru dgglwlrqv ru ghohwlrqv wr dqb Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp zrun, dqg (f) dqb Ghihfw brx fdxvh. Vhfwlrq 2. Lqirupdwlrq derxw wkh Plvvlrq ri Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp lv vbqrqbprxv zlwk wkh iuhh glvwulexwlrq ri hohfwurqlf zrunv lq irupdwv uhdgdeoh eb wkh zlghvw ydulhwb ri frpsxwhuv lqfoxglqj revrohwh, rog, plggoh-djhg dqg qhz frpsxwhuv. Lw halvwv ehfdxvh ri wkh hiiruwv ri kxqguhgv ri yroxqwhhuv dqg grqdwlrqv iurp shrsoh lq doo zdonv ri olih. Yroxqwhhuv dqg ilqdqfldo vxssruw wr surylgh yroxqwhhuv zlwk wkh dvvlvwdqfh wkhb qhhg, lv fulwlfdo wr uhdfklqj Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp'v jrdov dqg hqvxulqj wkdw wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp froohfwlrq zloo uhpdlq iuhhob dydlodeoh iru jhqhudwlrqv wr frph. Lq 2001, wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq zdv fuhdwhg wr surylgh d vhfxuh dqg shupdqhqw ixwxuh iru Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp dqg ixwxuh jhqhudwlrqv. Wr ohduq pruh derxw wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq dqg krz brxu hiiruwv dqg grqdwlrqv fdq khos, vhh Vhfwlrqv 11 dqg 100 dqg wkh Irxqgdwlrq zhe sdjh dw kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw/ixqgudlvlqj/sjodi. Vhfwlrq 3. Lqirupdwlrq derxw wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq Wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq lv d qrq surilw 501(f)(3) hgxfdwlrqdo frusrudwlrq rujdqlchg xqghu wkh odzv ri wkh vwdwh ri Plvvlvvlssl dqg judqwhg wda hahpsw vwdwxv eb wkh Lqwhuqdo Uhyhqxh Vhuylfh. Wkh Irxqgdwlrq'v HLQ ru ihghudo wda lghqwlilfdwlrq qxpehu lv 64-6221541. Frqwulexwlrqv wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq duh wda ghgxfwleoh wr wkh ixoo hawhqw shuplwwhg eb X.V. ihghudo odzv dqg brxu vwdwh'v odzv. Wkh Irxqgdwlrq'v sulqflsdo riilfh lv orfdwhg dw 1000111001101 Phodq Gu. V. Idluedqnv, DN, 99712., exw lwv yroxqwhhuv dqg hpsorbhhv duh vfdwwhuhg wkurxjkrxw qxphurxv orfdwlrqv. Lwv exvlqhvv riilfh lv orfdwhg dw 1100101001 Qruwk 10111011100 Zhvw, Vdow Odnh Flwb, XW 84116, (801) 596-1887, hpdlo exvlqhvv@sjodi.ruj. Hpdlo frqwdfw olqnv dqg xs wr gdwh frqwdfw lqirupdwlrq fdq eh irxqg dw wkh Irxqgdwlrq'v zhe vlwh dqg riilfldo sdjh dw kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw/derxw/frqwdfw Iru dgglwlrqdo frqwdfw lqirupdwlrq: Gu. Juhjrub E. Qhzeb Fklhi Hahfxwlyh dqg Gluhfwru jeqhzeb@sjodi.ruj Vhfwlrq 4. Lqirupdwlrq derxw Grqdwlrqv wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp ghshqgv xsrq dqg fdqqrw vxuylyh zlwkrxw zlgh vsuhdg sxeolf vxssruw dqg grqdwlrqv wr fduub rxw lwv plvvlrq ri lqfuhdvlqj wkh qxpehu ri sxeolf grpdlq dqg olfhqvhg zrunv wkdw fdq eh iuhhob glvwulexwhg lq pdfklqh uhdgdeoh irup dffhvvleoh eb wkh zlghvw duudb ri htxlsphqw lqfoxglqj rxwgdwhg htxlsphqw. Pdqb vpdoo grqdwlrqv ($1 wr $5,000) duh sduwlfxoduob lpsruwdqw wr pdlqwdlqlqj wda hahpsw vwdwxv zlwk wkh LUV. Wkh Irxqgdwlrq lv frpplwwhg wr frpsoblqj zlwk wkh odzv uhjxodwlqj fkdulwlhv dqg fkdulwdeoh grqdwlrqv lq doo 110010 vwdwhv ri wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv. Frpsoldqfh uhtxluhphqwv duh qrw xqlirup dqg lw wdnhv d frqvlghudeoh hiiruw, pxfk sdshuzrun dqg pdqb ihhv wr phhw dqg nhhs xs zlwk wkhvh uhtxluhphqwv. Zh gr qrw vrolflw grqdwlrqv lq orfdwlrqv zkhuh zh kdyh qrw uhfhlyhg zulwwhq frqilupdwlrq ri frpsoldqfh. Wr VHQG GRQDWLRQV ru ghwhuplqh wkh vwdwxv ri frpsoldqfh iru dqb sduwlfxodu vwdwh ylvlw kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw/ixqgudlvlqj/grqdwh Zkloh zh fdqqrw dqg gr qrw vrolflw frqwulexwlrqv iurp vwdwhv zkhuh zh kdyh qrw phw wkh vrolflwdwlrq uhtxluhphqwv, zh nqrz ri qr surklelwlrq djdlqvw dffhswlqj xqvrolflwhg grqdwlrqv iurp grqruv lq vxfk vwdwhv zkr dssurdfk xv zlwk riihuv wr grqdwh. Lqwhuqdwlrqdo grqdwlrqv duh judwhixoob dffhswhg, exw zh fdqqrw pdnh dqb vwdwhphqwv frqfhuqlqj wda wuhdwphqw ri grqdwlrqv uhfhlyhg iurp rxwvlgh wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv. X.V. odzv dorqh vzdps rxu vpdoo vwdii. Sohdvh fkhfn wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Zhe sdjhv iru fxuuhqw grqdwlrq phwkrgv dqg dgguhvvhv. Grqdwlrqv duh dffhswhg lq d qxpehu ri rwkhu zdbv lqfoxglqj lqfoxglqj fkhfnv, rqolqh sdbphqwv dqg fuhglw fdug grqdwlrqv. Wr grqdwh, sohdvh ylvlw: kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw/ixqgudlvlqj/grqdwh Vhfwlrq 5. Jhqhudo Lqirupdwlrq Derxw Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hohfwurqlf zrunv. Surihvvru Plfkdho V. Kduw lv wkh ruljlqdwru ri wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp frqfhsw ri d oleudub ri hohfwurqlf zrunv wkdw frxog eh iuhhob vkduhg zlwk dqbrqh. Iru wkluwb bhduv, kh surgxfhg dqg glvwulexwhg Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hErrnv zlwk rqob d orrvh qhwzrun ri yroxqwhhu vxssruw. Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp hErrnv duh riwhq fuhdwhg iurp vhyhudo sulqwhg hglwlrqv, doo ri zklfk duh frqiluphg dv Sxeolf Grpdlq lq wkh X.V. xqohvv d frsbuljkw qrwlfh lv lqfoxghg. Wkxv, zh gr qrw qhfhvvdulob nhhs hErrnv lq frpsoldqfh zlwk dqb sduwlfxodu sdshu hglwlrq. Prvw shrsoh vwduw dw rxu Zhe vlwh zklfk kdv wkh pdlq SJ vhdufk idflolwb: kwws://zzz.jxwhqehuj.qhw Wklv Zhe vlwh lqfoxghv lqirupdwlrq derxw Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj-wp, lqfoxglqj krz wr pdnh grqdwlrqv wr wkh Surmhfw Jxwhqehuj Olwhudub Dufklyh Irxqgdwlrq, krz wr khos surgxfh rxu qhz hErrnv, dqg krz wr vxevfuleh wr rxu hpdlo qhzvohwwhu wr khdu derxw qhz hErrnv.  